Your fuckbuddy was clear-ish about his intentions when he asked if you were "into taking loads," HOLE. And perhaps a little clearer when he said, "I don't care. That's nice for you, though." It would appear you've backed into a sexual relationship with a selfish top, a term with its own Urban Dictionary entry:
"A top who makes sure he is pleased and only cares if he cums [sic] without getting the bottom off
Girl I slept with this guy last night and I spent all night giving him head and letting him top me until he came but then he just got up and left without doing shit for me. Fuck selfish tops"
So, yeah, selfish tops are a thing. He may not be selfish with his primary partner—he and his husband may have mutually satisfying, GGG sex, and he may put some effort and thought into getting his husband off. Who knows? (His husband.) Maybe this is a kink he indulges only with other guys. He could and should seek out guys who are into selfish tops; there are men out there who get off on being used, dig oral and/or anal "no recip" scenes, etc. You're not one of them. I don't know if this guy is an asshole, HOLE, but not making sure servicing a selfish top was okay with you? In clear and unambiguous terms? Definitely an asshole move.
But you kindasorta accidentally consented to this treatment/scene/behavior—sortakindasorta—by "sort of" saying "no problem." You're allowed to withdraw your kindasorta consent at any time, of course, and if sex with this might-be-an-asshole guy is making you unhappy—if taking his loads and being his come dump makes you feel bad/used/unsatisfied—withdraw your consent or renegotiate your deal. If not getting to come yourself during these encounters isn't what you want going forward, HOLE, make your dissatisfaction known and your satisfaction a requirement.
Finally, HOLE, you said he doesn't help you get off but you don't say he objects to you getting yourself off while he fucks you. If the fucking is good and everything else about the dude works for you and he doesn't object to you stroking yourself while he fucks you—some selfish tops don't want the bottom touching himself—then maybe you can work this out. If not, find another fuckbuddy.



You've done so many things right, ESCORT, that I'm not convinced you need my help. Yeah, yeah: you lost your shit when that text arrived. But humans lose their shit from time to time—we are a shit-losing species—what matters is how quickly a person relocates their shit. And you relocated your shit fast, ESCORT, and what came next was everything the advice columnist might order, from calmly listening to your boyfriend express his interest in sex work to being upfront about your own feelings/misgivings. You seem like the very model of modern mature, shit-relocating partner. (Something else that matters in the shit-losing department: the ability to lose your shit without being physically or emotionally violent.)
Moving on to your anxieties...
Quoting your own words, we should all "want to maintain a relationship that allows us to maximize our experiences in life, rather than pass on opportunities that pique our interest." I agree, ESCORT, but I would add that we're also entitled to reasonable boundaries. There will be times in our lives when we have to forgo an opportunity to accommodate a partner's reasonable boundary; there may even be times in our lives when we have to forgo an opportunity to accommodate a partner's irrational insecurity. And while our boundaries—and our insecurities—can shift, evolve, and dissolve over time, ESCORT, some boundaries are forever. Maybe your boyfriend exchanging sex for money is a boundary for you, maybe for now, maybe forever—and that's okay! As Dossie Easton and Janet Hardy say in The Ethical Slut:
Boundaries are how we understand where I end and you begin, where we meet and how we are separate as individuals. You need to figure out what your limits are, what constitutes comfortable distance or closeness between yourself and others in various situations, and particularly the ways in which you and your lovers are different and individual and unique.
Your anxiety could stem from the real risks of sex work. It may help you (and, of course, your boyfriend) to read up on some tips and facts. SWOP USA has a good research page with tips for screening clients, working online, and general health and safety information. But if you're fine with other guys doing sex work, ESCORT, just not your guy... well, then we may be talking about sex work stigma and some unexamined whore-phobia on your part.
As for your specific questions...
"Am I stupid for entertaining this idea?"
Nope.
"Does it make me sex-negative if I don't want him to pursue it?"
Not necessarily.
"Is that even within my rights to deny him?"
You can ask him not to do sex work—you can even make it a condition of being with you—but in the end your boyfriend gets to make up his own mind/make his own choices/set conditions for being with him.
"Am I making a mountain out of a mole hill?"
I think so. It sounds to me like your boyfriend is interested in a sex work as an adventure, not a career choice. (Not that there's anything wrong with the latter.) You're in an open relationship, ESCORT, and he already fucks other guys once in a while. What difference does it make if one or two guys pays for the privilege?


Before we get into your boyfriend's hair fetish—which isn't common but he's obviously not the only person on earth with this particular kink (those "tons" of YouTube videos weren't made just for him)—let's take a quick stroll through the garden of your fuck-ups:
1: Despite knowing it's "not great" to snoop through your partner's phone (which is how you got into this panicky mess), you did it. Snooping can sometimes be justified in retrospect, depending on what the snooper finds (secret second families, risky/stupid sex outside the relationship, "Make America Great Again" merchandise orders), but I don't think this is one of those times. You've only been serious for two months, HAIR, and at two months you don't have the right to police his every thought, impulse, fantasy, etc. (Or at two years or twenty years, IMO.) A "right to privacy" is the default setting in every relationship, whatever the length, even if—again—the impulse to snoop is understandable in some circumstances and retroactively justifiable in others.
2: You thought it was a good idea to "shut it down" by texting the escort directly, putting this innocent third party in an extremely awkward position. Instead of wasting her time, HAIR, you could've and should've had a conversation with your boyfriend about what you found. Having that convo would've required you to confess to and apologize for fuck-up #1, which I suspect is why why you reached out to the escort instead.
3: You discovered your boyfriend has a hair shaving fetish and leapt to the conclusion that a hairdresser must have molested him. First, that's not how kinks work; second, that's an extremely fucked up, sex-negative, and kink-shaming leap.
So, yeah, hair fetishes. A quick search on Google would show that hair fetishes are pretty abundant, and, like most fetishes, they manifest in a variety of ways; sometimes people want to trim someone's armpits and sometimes they want to shave someone's head. And, again, this doesn't mean they were molested by a fucking hairdresser. Foot fetishists weren't molested by podiatrists (although some might like to be), swim cap fetishists weren't molested by Olympic butterfly strokers (ditto), and suit-and-tie fetishists weren't molested by George Zimmer (ditto again). As with all fetishes, there's no way to pinpoint a cause; people have kinks because they do. Asking why—to say nothing of assigning blame—is a waste of time when kinksters do it to themselves, it's sex-negative/kink-shaming crap when kinkmuggles do it to them.) 
If you're curious what a hair-shaving fetishist has to say about his kink, HAIR, here's a link to a Reddit AmA where a guy with a head shaving fetish answers questions. But you should think about skipping that link, HAIR, and just ask your boyfriend why he's into it. Which you can do right after you cop to and apologize for snooping.
And before you blow up at your boyfriend about cheating, HAIR, mull this over: Your boyfriend has this kink, he's probably always had this kink, and he was making a plan—and taking an enormous risk—to act on this kink. If having your head shaved isn't something you're willing to do with/for him—and doing so would go far beyond the call of GGG ("game for anything within reason")—then you two will have to come to terms. He'll either have to agree to go without ever exploring/acting on this kink (under the duress of a breakup threat), HAIR, or you'll have to give him the okay to act on it with someone else—like, oh, an escort who might be willing to part with her hair for $1000 and then rake in the bucks from the many dudes out there with a fetish for bald women (none of whom were molested by oncologists).
UPDATE & P.S. The freaked-out-by-touching-vagina thing seems like a much bigger issue than the has-a-fantasy/chatted-up-an-escort-about-it thing.

Listen to my mouthy podcast, the Savage Lovecast, at www.savagelovecast.com.
Congrats, BBW, on finding a kind, patient, and experienced partner who's clearly into you. (Men rarely invite women they feel "meh" about to sit on their faces.) In regards to your concerns, BBW, you can start by telling this guy exactly what you told us: "I'm worried you won't say anything if I'm hurting you. Having grown up bigger, I know the expectation is that you're extra strong. But, if I ever hurt you, let me know."
By giving him the okay to communicate with you about this concern, BBW, the onus—like your butt—is on him. If something is uncomfortable or painful or awkward, he needs to let you know and knows he can. Once you've made your speech, once you've opened up those lines of communication, you can focus on enjoying yourself. He may never say anything—he may never need to—but even if he does say something at some point, BBW, it's not a big deal. So long as you quickly and courteously adjust, shift your weight, get into a new position, etc., without telegraphing annoyance (as that might make him hesitate to give you feedback in the future), there's most likely no harm and certainly no foul. With sex, no matter a person's size, there's always two (or three or seven) people moving over, under, and beside each other, with limbs, holes, bellies, faces, and gravity all in play. Sometimes people knee each other or put weight in a weird place. In those situations adults use their words ("Hey, you're putting a little too much pressure on my face") and their manners ("Oh, sorry, I'll get up") and adjust, navigate, shift, rollover, whatever.
And regardless of how much pressure you put on his face, BBW, you're never gonna crush his skull all your lonesome. Science says so:
An average human skull can withstand 520 pounds of force before crushing. This human bone is stronger than steel and concrete of the same mass and is almost impossible to crush unless using a heavy object. A cubic inch of bone can bear a load of 19,000 pounds before crushing. Force is calculated by multiplying the mass by the acceleration of an object. A quite heavy object must be traveling at a significant speed to achieve the force necessary to crush a human skull, and it is not possible for human beings to produce the force required for this experiment.
Now, extra weight can stress knees and other joints, making some sex positions uncomfortable, so find positions that work best for the two of you. Many large folks recommend spooning, fucking from behind, and a modified missionary position with pillows supporting the hips. And, as always, sex isn't just about penetration. Oral sex, toys, spanking, etc. are easy to incorporate!
And by the way, BBW, studies have shown that being overweight can have surprising benefits in bed, like larger men being less likely to experience premature ejaculation and larger women reporting more frequent sex. For a book suggestion, Hanne Blank's "Big Big Love: A Sex and Relationships Guide for People of Size (and Those Who Love Them)" will boost your self-esteem and dispel some myths.


Why would I use "gift" as a verb? Dunno. I guess my mom and dad didn't parent me right.


Listen to my dumb podcast, the Savage Lovecast, at www.savagelovecast.com.
I like to say Savage Love is a conversation but rarely do I get to hear more than one side of a story. So thanks for letting BFF know you wrote me, TRUMP, and thank you, BFF, for writing in. And TRUMP? You must have known BFF would share the details he did. So it seems you have some reservations about marrying this woman, TRUMP, you just outsourced the expressing of those reservations to your old friend.
So... yeah. BFF has doubts about your happy and committed relationship, TRUMP, and these doubts are bringing up concerns for me, too. Maybe you really do believe your relationship is terrific and lovely and hot, TRUMP, and maybe you've worked through the mishigas and your girlfriend has conquered her irrational jealousy, etc. But if everyone else in your life telling you it might be a big mistake to marry your girlfriend... it might be a big mistake to marry your girlfriend.
Let's review the details BFF shared:
• she's a regular drug abuser• she's incredibly volatile• she puts you through the emotional wringer• she accuses you of "impossible acts" of infidelity (that sounds kinda hot TBH) • you break up frequently• you're in this to change her (people don't change... except when they do... which they rarely do)
Something else to consider: If this is how your girlfriend treats you when she needs you to marry her—when she's likely to be on her very best behavior—how will she treat you once legal residency is secured and the pressure is off?
BFF might be a dirty liar, of course. I've heard people describe pot smokers as "regular drug abusers." Or BFF could mean meth. I don't know. (And I could've written back and didn't... so maybe I don't want to know.) But I do know that right after you submitted your letter to me, TRUMP, you forwarded it to a friend who isn't a fan of your girlfriend. That just the kind of passive-aggressive move that makes me question a person's judgment.
Sorry. I'm rambling, huh?
Here's what I think you should do, TRUMP: Get all your friends together and pop the question to the group. Should you marry the girlfriend or should you not marry the girlfriend? If the majority leans towards marry the girlfriend—if BFF is a dirty liar and a dirty outlier—go ahead and marry the girlfriend. But if all of your friends urge you not to marry the girlfriend, then don't marry the girlfriend. Find other ways to help her—ways that don't make you responsible for her credit card debt or entitle her to half your shit when if you split.

You do, it seems—handjobs on demand. So stop using your hands and start using your words: "You prefer handjobs, I prefer fucking. This isn't about shame, it's about reciprocity, it's about being GGG and GGG being a two-way street. It's about each of us making an effort to meet the other's needs. So we're going to take turns: I get fucked, you get a handjob, I get fucked, you get a handjob. Deal? Oh, and before you answer: I cannot commit to a life where I'm only getting 5-8 minutes of dick. If we need to mix it up for a good reason—say maintaining and sustaining reasons—then we do some dicking for me, some handjobing for you, some more dicking for me. But on my nights there will be more dicking than jobbing. And before you say anything, honey, bear this in mind: the answer you've been waiting on from me hinges on the answer I'm now waiting on from you."
You're married to a crazy person, SAD. And while you're worried about wasting pills, I'm more worried about your kids. 
Backing up: Our bodies don't function on prayers and beliefs. You understand this, SAD, but your wife has issues with this basic concept. You can't cross your fingers and magically manifest a concrete boner, just like your wife can't will her body to have a vaginal birth if a C-section is needed. (C-sections have done more to save the lives of babies and moms than any other medical procedure. That said, the procedure appears to be overused. But when it's necessary, it's necessary.) Unfortunately, SAD, it seems your wife's issue with Cialis is a part of a larger issue that won't be cured with some magic words (provided by me) or medical factsheets (available online but get one from your physician).
Your wife is crazy—no, wait. That's ableist. Your wife is an irrational asshole. Since she won't budge on her ridiculous aversion to modern medicine, SAD, here's what you can do: You can take Cialis. You can fuck your wife. You can enjoy yourself. She can enjoy herself. And if she asks if you took Cialis, you can say yes, because you shouldn't have to lie, and let the chips fall where they may. Or you can spare yourself the grief and lie to your asshole wife—without guilt, SAD, as deception is sometimes the only rational/tolerable workaround when your partner is utterly irrational about a certain subject. Both equally valid choices if you ask me, SAD, which you did. (And if you take Cialis and your wife suddenly doesn't want to fuck or announces it's family movie night, excuse yourself, grab your laptop, and go have a long and pleasurable wank.) 
Now about your kids: If they have issues—medical or psychological issues—and would benefit from treatment and/or medications that they're not getting because your wife is fucking crazy an irrational asshole, DIVORCE YOUR GODDAM DAMN WIFE, go for custody, get your kids they help and meds they need, SAD, and get yourself a girlfriend who appreciates hard cock and modern medicine.


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats, lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Thanks for sharing, FJWL, and I'll only add this: Yes, we should all try to kind and compassionate when dumping someone, if at all possible, and an explanation that helps a dumpee drag their own asses a little closer to closure certainly counts as compassionate and considerate. (Remember, kids: closure is something we do for ourselves, it is not a gift we're given and/or a severance package we're entitled to.) But the dumper does not have to keep meeting with and/or explaining themselves to a dumpee who rejects the explanations they've already been given.
Thanks for writing... and writing... and writing, CLOSURE, and I hope you looked at the comment thread on the post. My readers had some good advice for you. Some of their advice for you was gentle...
Two people who don't live close to each other and don't spend enough time together then go away on a vacation together after which the LW gets dumped. Why? Because his beloved saw-heard-experienced more than she'd known about him as they were sharing living and sleeping space for a brief (but extended) time. Evidently, what she saw-heard-experienced was more than enough for her to have a visceral reaction and serious doubts for the future of this relationship. Someone above mentioned that you can't "logic" someone into saving a relationship, especially if the one who broke it off was acting upon a gut feeling. She may not be able to specify just why she broke things off, but it will be worse for you, LW, if you continue to try to pry it out of her. Let it go. Let her go. And don't go to the extent (oh, the drama of modern life) of blocking her. Just don't contact her (or stalk, etc.).
...some of it gently insightful...
Ever heard the phrase "It's not you, it's me"? It exists for a reason. Maybe it is her. It sounds like she wants something that she can't put her finger on, but whatever it is, you can't offer it. She hoped you could; she spent two years trying to round you up to one, but eventually she realised it wouldn't happen. Maybe there is no big reason; maybe there are a lot of little reasons. Maybe it's just her trusting her instinct. And here you are trying to argue her out of trusting her instinct. If she can't verbalise the exact sources of her discontent, then maybe that is her, not you; her inability to communicate effectively is a reason you should be glad the relationship is over.
...and some of it not-so-gentle:
Maybe the reason she doesn't give you reasons is that you always have a ready solution (in your own mind, at least) for every reason she's offered thus far. Rather than face an Oxford-style debate every time the two of you engage in a relationship discussion, she's chosen to move on. Some people prefer to end troublesome relationships quietly and without drama - so you will have to figure out your own closure strategy for this one, CLOSURE. Suggestion from someone who's been in your shoes before? Next time around, you should make a greater effort to shut up and listen, rather than always trying to score your own extremely valid points. So. There's your answer. There's your closure. Feel better?
All of it is worth a read, CLOSURE, if you can hack it in your delicate state. (Remember: some commenters are assholes—although I'm glad to say that commenters on SLLOTD are less assholey than most. But please ignore the assholes.) And now, quickly, in answer to your final question... 
Yes, there are lots of couples out there who split up and got back together and it all worked out until one or the other or both of them dropped dead. But those couples are relatively rare—forgive me for overstating their numbers—and in any case, CLOSURE, it's in the best interest of the dumpee to assume the dumper won't wanna get back together.
Now if the dumpee wants to get back together, CLOSURE, they can and should let the dumper know—as you've already done—but the dumpee should, again, proceed under the assumption that the relationship is over. (That means getting on with your life, CLOSURE, getting your ass back out there, dating/kissing/fucking other people, etc.) Then if the dumpee should from hear from the dumper—and hear what the dumpee most wants to hear ("Take me back")—it'll come as a pleasant surprise. But if the dumpee never hears from the dumper again, the dumpee didn't waste more time and energy than was necessary pining away for someone they couldn't have.
In other words, CLOSURE: It's better for a dumpee to "live in nope" than "live in hope."
1. Here's what I make of this person and how she ended things: She wanted to end things, she had her reasons for ending things, she ended things.
Now here are a few things I'm wondering about you, CLOSURE. First, I wonder if there isn't more going on here...
I am human, though, and I admit that some stuff may have slipped through the cracks, and I didn’t always have perfect responses to things she said.
...than you let on. Are you minimizing? Or is it possible your ex may have experienced those "imperfect responses" differently than you did? Did she find your imperfect responses intimidating or threatening in ways you didn't intend and/or didn't pick up on at the time?
And while I'm fond of the f-word and use it liberally myself, I wonder if this little flash of anger... 
“Let’s spend more fucking time together.”
...isn't a clue. Maybe, maybe not.
And I wonder if you caught the second Q&A; in this recent Savage Love. My advice to STUCK, whose boyfriend wouldn't let her break up with him, included this...
Breakups are the only aspect of our romantic and/or sexual lives where the other person's consent is irrelevant. The other person's pain is relevant, of course, and we should be as compassionate and considerate as possible when ending a relationship. (Unless we're talking about dumping an abuser, in which case safety and self-care are all that matters.) But we don't need someone's consent to dump them. That means you don't have to win an argument to break up with your boyfriend, STUCK, nor do you have to convince him your reasons are rational. You don't even have to discuss your reasons for ending the relationship. You just have to say, "It's over; we're done." It's a conversation (and relationship) ender, STUCK, not a conversation starter.
...and the flip-side/photo-negative of my advice for STUCK applies to you, CLOSURE: Your ex doesn't have to win an argument with you to end this relationship. Sometimes we get dumped for reasons that are obvious and we don't need answers or explanations. Sometimes we get dumped for reasons that seem mysterious and we're left scratching our heads. Sometimes we get answers from our exes and it all makes sense. Sometimes we get answers from our exes and our egos won't allow us to see the sense in them.
Final thing I'm wondering: Why on earth she keeps meeting, emailing, and talking with you, CLOSURE, and why on earth you keep meeting, emailing, and talking with her. You haven't gotten a satisfactory answer from her yet and you're never gonna get one... because you don't think it should be over. The lesson in all of this for you—what you're going to learn from this experience—is an old one: you can't have always have what you want. That goes for answers and ass, partners and presidents, threesomes and threesomethingselse... 
Final wonder: I'm wondering if you've made a close study of the campsite rule, CLOSURE. Here it is:
In any relationship, but particularly those with a large age and/or experience gap, the older partner/more experienced partner has the responsibility to leave the younger/less experienced partner in at least as good a state (emotionally and physically) as before the relationship. The campsite rule includes things like leaving the younger/less experienced partner with no STDs, no unwanted pregnancies, and not overburdening them with emotional and sexual baggage.
The campsite rule allows for leaving—hell, it presumes leaving. And your ass got left, CLOSURE. We all get left sometimes. And while it can feel devastating... it's typically (and paradoxically) not an experience that leaves us devastated. If you really think you're suffering from PTSD as a result of what sounds like your run-of-the-mill/bolt-from-the-blue dumping to me, CLOSURE, you may have been too emotionally fragile to enter into this relationship in the first place. Maybe it's just the freshness of the pain talking, CLOSURE, but if getting dumped—which is always a risk—is impacting your mental health this severely, your issues may be bigger than "my ex didn't dump me juuuuust right."
If that's the case, CLOSURE, I would recommend talking with a therapist or a counselor about relationships generally and coping skills specifically. I'm not saying you're unwell or a monster or an asshole. But if you're not being hyperbolic, CLOSURE, you need to talk this shit out with someone other than/in addition to a snarky faggot with an advice column.
2. Continue talking? Not if rehashing the end of this relationship is the only thing you have to discuss. Remain friends? Not if being her friend causes you pain or if you have an ulterior motive, e.g. you're hoping to get back together. Block her? If that's the only way to protect yourself from Instagram and Twitter posts and text messages that cause you pain, CLOSURE, then block away. But definitely stop checking in on her social media accounts and pumping friends for info. It doesn't sound like you've crossed the line into stalking—if looking at an ex's Instagram account is stalking, we are all stalkers—but it's not making you feel any better, is it? So stop.
3. No.
Thanksgiving is about eating too much and—this year—arguing about Donald Trump, the popular vote, the Dakota Access Pipeline, and whether or not you can bring your polyamorous third to grandma's house, THANKS, but it's also about giving thanks. So thank you for this lovely thank-you note. I'm so glad you were able to welcome this special guest star into your bedroom/playroom and that the experience was a positive one all around. And if your Thanksgiving is less than enjoyable—if you're outnumbered by relatives who voted for Trump—schedule some time with your new special guest star and torture the shit out of each other. It'll make you feel better!
And speaking of thanks...
I will of course always be thankful for letters like yours, THANKS, but I'm also thankful letters like this one...
When a person has no concept of God, which I assume you don't, nothing is "off limits" as to the bounds of sexual depravity. I once was where you are now (almost anyway), but came to realize that sex is a sacred pleasure given to men and women to practice responsibly. You turn sex into an ugly recreation, where there are no restrictions or morals. I hope as you mature in life, you begin to realize the true meaning of loving sex. I don't expect a rebuttal, but thanks for giving me a chance to vent.
Bob Z.
Thanks for taking the time to write, Bob. My sexual credo—my guiding star, my moral code—goes like this: “Do unto others as you would have them do unto you.” Perhaps that rings a bell/clamps a tit?
Treat each other with respect, treat your sex partner(s) with consideration, be kind, be decently indecent, make sure everything is consensual, meet each other's needs, don't take each other for granted, and, like THANKS, always treat very special guest stars with generosity and grace. There’s a strong moral code at the heart of my advice. You may be too distracted—or too titillated—by the bells and whistles (and threesomes and bondage and clamps) to see it, Bob. But like a forearm in a power bottom at Folsom, it's in there.
Happy Thanksgiving to you and yours, Bob. I’m honestly glad you’re happy where you’re at now. But I'd be thankful if you refrained form projecting your prior unhappiness—unhappiness with choices you made that weren't working for you—onto others. Loving sex is great, Bob, and it comes in many guises. Still, I'm sincerely glad you've discovered what works for you both sexually and emotionally. But you can love the loving sex you're having and find meaning in it without disparaging or making assumptions about the sex other people have and find meaning in.

While what you're suggesting is probably illegal, CHOICE, even if it's the kind of woman-to-woman badassery/pro-choice-hackery I would normally get behind. Still, most medical professionals—buzzkills, each and every one—would advise people not to use medications they haven't been approved to use. There are also some valid concerns about hoarded medicines being expired or recalled. Plus, CHOICE, if you want to supply long-term medication to an American woman without insurance, you'll have to lie to your own doctor, which could cause complications and/or misdiagnoses in your own treatment, i.e. your doc may attribute some symptom you're manifesting to hormonal birth control or refrain from prescribing a med you might need in order to avoid a harmful drug interaction with the birth control pills your doc thinks you're taking.
That said...
With all the three branches of US government soon to be controlled by Republicans and the sieg-heiling neo-Nazis they're welcoming into the party, reproductive rights in the US are going to come under renewed and sustained attack. Currently, however, birth control is still widely available here, and it probably won't be the first right attacked by Donald Trump's pussy-grabbing/goose-stepping anti-choice extremists. Abortion services, on the other hand, have already been under attack by GOP-dominated state legislatures for years, are nearly impossible to access in several states, and may be criminalized by a Trump-packed Supreme Court.
Karen Hartman, Seattle-based "intersectional AF" playwright and co-founder of #TogetherForAbortion agrees, and says that "the new regime of assholes has vowed to restrict abortion rights further. Would you consider abortion support, CHOICE, including pills? You could start connecting with American women now online, and work your northern savior plan from there as needed. Some ideas: #TogetherForAbortion is a network of conversations around the anniversary of Roe vs Wade (January 22nd). We would welcome Canadian women! I run a Facebook group #TalkAbortionRights that's private but searchable. Anyone can request to join. (Savage Love readers too—just convince me you're not a troll.) #ShoutYourAbortion, dedicated to de-stigmatizing abortion in the US, has online groups by region. These are all decentralized, personal conversations, which seems to me (not a doctor, not a lawyer!) the best shot for your big-hearted indie vision." 
Donations to Planned Parenthood and the Center for Reproductive Rights are the easiest, legal-iest forms of providing support. (There was a beautiful and tragic piece posted in The Guardiantwo days ago about a Dutch not-for-profit that mails funds to American women in need of abortions. So, CHOICE, your concerns are shared!) But if you want to start connecting with American women who need your help (whether you're an American or not) you're going to have to find these women. Online forums, like Facebook groups and Reddits, are good places to start, but joining established groups like #ShoutYourAbortion and #TalkAbortionRights will connect you to individuals in need and get you involved in the larger conversations more quickly.
Listen to my goddam podcast, the Savage Lovecast, at www.savagelovecast.com.
Give your friends a heads up—do it ASAP, WAH—in case they wanna make other plans. Like working in a soup kitchen all day and getting lap dances all night. 
If your friends still wanna join you and your folks for dinner, inform everyone—mom and dad included—that talking politics is absolutely verboten. If your friends balk or begin blow up during dinner, WAH, pull them aside and ask them to see your parents for the pitiable wrecks they are: really old and really scared and totally brainwashed/braindead. None of that makes voting for a racist demagogue okay, of course, but arguing with your sad, old, scared, brainwashed parents isn't going to convince electors to do their constitutional duty and prevent Trump from taking office.
And since your parents will probably be too dead four years from now to make the same mistake again, what's the point in arguing with them? Your friends can save the passionate anti-Trump arguments for 2020's likely/likelier voters.
First, full disclosure: I've been flying for the last 24 hours—Delhi to Amsterdam, Amsterdam to Seattle—and I haven't slept and I probably shouldn't be operating an advice column in this condition. With that said...
If a guy person or a girl person or a nonbinary person decides to tell some other person (SOP) they've been masturbating about them—which is likelier to end a friendship than start a sexship—and SOP's response isn't Fuck Yeah! So great to know that! Keep it up! Send me vids!, CON, then the guy person/girl person/nonbinary person needs to shut their fucking mouth and not discuss their masturbatory routines with that particular SOP ever again.
Your guy didn't stop, CON. He continued to text you about his kinks and his shrinking dick despite your gentle efforts to disengage. One would think when you slowly... stopped... responding...  your friend would've taken the hint and slowly... stopped... creeping. But your friend has boundary issues in addition to an ever-shrinking dick and a phone with a camera powerful enough to capture pictures of it. And while I would never fault you for your friend's behavior—his behavior is on him, and his behavior was likely to continue whatever you did short of terminating the friendship (and could've persisted even after that)—his actions didn't call for gentle deflection, i.e. merely avoiding chat. No, CON, this was a job for, "Knock this shit the fuck off, dude, right fucking now," followed by blocking his phone number and social media accounts if the TMI or auto-SPH continued. (SPH link not NSFW.)
But what about the money? 
Well, gee. You've been friends with this guy for decades putting up with this guy's shit for years. Perhaps you deserve some compensation for the all those annoying texts and unsolicited dick pics. Financial domination—or findom for short—can be a mutually beneficial arrangement, i.e. a horny turn-on for a sensible sub who doesn't break the bank, a nice income stream for an ethical dom who doesn't take advantage. (Do not let this happen to you/do not do this to someone.) But the idea, much like this friendship, makes you feel uncomfortable, CON, and it should make you feel uncomfortable—this guy has demonstrated time and again that he has no boundaries and accepting gifts will make him feel even more entitled to your time, attention, and inbox. So I would advise you to tell him you're not interested—and you need to tell him in clear and unambiguous terms. ("The answer is no, absolutely not, and do not ever bring the subject up again.") And if he isn't able to respect your boundaries, CON, block the motherfucker already. 
Spoiler: He won't be able to respect your boundaries, CON, so you might as well BTMFA and get it over with. 

Let's review the tape...
...my asexual ex-girlfriend... my extremely neurotic asexual ex-girlfriend... my ex-girlfriend was using my phone... this fucked up sexless friend-relationship... my ex-girlfriend...
You seem pretty clear about this woman being your EX-girlfriend, COME. Have you made that clear to her? If not, do so immediately.
Then once it's over—really, truly, explicitly and officially over—you and your ex gotta start acting like it's over. That means moving out, that means moving on, that means disregarding whatever your ex has to say about your sexual and/or sextual interests, adventures, outlets, etc. Sexual compatibility, relationship rules, and one particular person's good opinion of your sexual/sextual interests, adventures, outlets, etc., only matter in an ongoing relationships, COME. You two are not a going concern. You two broke up for what appear to be good reasons. Extremely good ones. Excellent reasons even. So it doesn't matter what your ex thinks about anything, COME, least of all your sext life. It's none of her fucking business.
But just to set your mind at ease...
The practice of sexting may be more common than generally thought among adults. More than 8 out of 10 people surveyed online admitted to sexting in the prior year, according to research presented at the American Psychological Association’s 123rd Annual Convention.... The researchers found that 88 percent of participants reported ever having sexted and 82 percent reported they had sexted in the past year. Nearly 75 percent said they sexted in the context of a committed relationship and 43 percent said they sexted as part of a casual relationship. Additionally, the researchers found that greater levels of sexting were associated with greater sexual satisfaction, especially for those in a relationship. 
You are not a pervert. Sexting is not fucked up or weird , COME, it's common and healthy. In fact, it sounds like something you should do more often. There are a lot of things you should be doing, COME, things that could help release you from your this fucked up limbo you're stuck in—things like getting out of the house, looking for a new apartment, and meeting other people. Go volunteer with an organization doing something that interests you, COME, and you may wind up making some new friends based on a shared interest in whatever the fuck interests you.
Finally, COME,  I get there are circumstances which require people to continue living with each other after a break up. Life doesn't always work out as the way we plan and sometimes we're stuck with an ex for eight more months of a lease. Often, though, it's the fear of being alone that paralyzes us. But Joan Price observed on an episode of the Savage Lovecast a few months back, it's better to be alone because you're alone than to be alone because you're with the wrong person. You're with the wrong person, COME—you're with/living with your ex. Move the fuck out already. If you can't physically get away from her, detach emotionally. You don't have to remain friends, or even friendly, with an ex who makes you miserable.
Everything I know about vore comes from book/internet learnin', FULL, but I know enough to say vore covers a pretty diverse set of practices and people get into vore for all sorts of reasons. (Both things could be said of any fetish or kink.) So you'll have to do some more exploring and press your boyfriend to share more details. Is he into the intimacy and protection aspects of vore? Is it an extension of a mouth and/or pregnancy fetish? Does it tie into an interest in bondage? Learning more about what gets him going (in addition to him wanting to be the eatee) is the first step.
For readers who aren't familiar with vore, the thread that links its different genres is that the person is turned on by the thought of being eaten alive or eating another creature alive. Vore is divided between "soft" and "hard," kinda like BDSM; soft vore doesn't require simulated bloodshed, hard vore is rarer and involves the ripping of (imaginary!) flesh and the shedding of (simulated!) blood. Large creatures capable of swallowing and/or devouring humans are usually important to the fetish (as you'll discover if you do an image search for 'vore' on Google), but sometimes it's just a grown man hanging out inside a pregnant woman's belly. Since most vore fantasies involve large creatures that qualify as fantastical beasts (megakinkfauna), the fetish requires its participants to create fantasy narratives, build their own creatures, or seek employment at the Jim Henson Company (where they can sneak in after hours and repurpose vore-scale Muppets).
So, FULL, you can act out these narratives in real life—props, costumes, stage blood—or you can explore through roleplay and dirty talk. You don't even have to be in the same room to get started: you can sext each other about vore, you can create a dirty story together over email, you can make videos of you licking a phone camera or closing it inside your mouth, etc. If your boyfriend wants to get physical, start with mouthy things like biting, licking, sucking, etc., combined with dirty talk about digesty things like chewing, swallowing, gastric juicing, etc. You can swaddle him in bedsheets and simulate him being in your stomach—incorporate some gooey liquid to make it feel more like being in a stomach—but be careful not to smother him if you go "full enclosure." Remember, kids: accidentally smothering someone is bad.
Vore isn't a fetish most people can wrap their heads around, FULL, so you're getting upgraded to a platinum GGG card.
Our week of non-Trump related SLLOTDs continues...
I'm sure you're a smart, smutty twenty-something with a drop-dead gorgeous ween, TC, but let me first clarify that anal sex isn't a "perverted fantasy." (Maybe you were referring to your other perverted fantasies—and if you have them, good for you! But, all on its own, anal sex doesn't qualify as perverted. Unless you're Mike Pence.) Anal sex—like all types of sex—is sticky and intense and sometimes messy and not everyone is going to be into it. Not even all gay men are into anal sex. And no one bursts out of the closet ready to power bottom. That's a skill, TC, one that takes time and dedicated practice to acquire.
And, hey, maybe your past couple of partners haven't been into bottoming or into bottoming with you or into bottoming on the first date. Don't let a string of bad luck turn into a complex. And remember: You can help guys get into bottoming by being relaxed and comfortable when you're topping, setting a good example when bottoming (by being assertive about your safety, pleasure, and comfort while bottoming), and setting a good example when anal isn't on the menu (by seamlessly pivoting to some of the other stuff gay men like to do without pouting—remember: the guy who isn't up for anal tonight might be up for it next time).
Based on your letter, it sounds like you're relationship-focused. That's great, if you're into that sort of thing! But don't shit on Grindr or Purr or farts or rando hookups. Grindr can be a useful tool, Purr is always crowded (so it must have something to recommend it), farts can be hilarious (and some people are actually into them), and Rando hookups can lead to lasting, loving, committed relationships (ahem). A lot of gay Seattlelites who love bottoming also love rando hookup-ing, Grindr-ing, and drinking at Purr, TC, and most have to fart once in a while (because they're human and stuff).  Writing off guys for those reasons isn't going to shorten your search. 
Yes, there are issues to gripe about with Grindr (and gay bars and farts), but don't piss on it, TC (at least not without its permission). You know what's great about Grindr? You can ask for what you want! And you know what happens? Especially in the GAY city of Seattle? People respond! Some politely! And some will wanna give you what you want! Hookup apps make some users anxious and some asshole-ish. They're not for everybody and they don't bring out the best in everyone. But I encourage you to get past your hang-ups so you can hookup. And, again, look the fuck around (and not just at Amazon): lots of great, lasting, loving relationships got their starts as hookups.
White people with racist relatives could skip Thanksgiving this year. And every year that. But if you can't skip Thanksgiving for some reason...
Orgasms produce oxytocin which make you more forgiving says Sister Augusta at @_sexualfreedom— UglyMugs.ie (@uglymugsie) November 14, 2016
Orgasms produce oxytocin which make you more forgiving says Sister Augusta at @_sexualfreedom— UglyMugs.ie (@uglymugsie) November 14, 2016
...try subtly jerking off under your parents' dining room table* during Thanksgiving dinner. Who knows? Maybe you'll be able to forgive your dad after blowing three or four dozen loads. But even if you can find within yourself (or your sack) to forgive your dad, his racism shouldn't be tolerated—no one's racism should be—so you go right ahead and throw those baked potatoes anyway.
* Don't attempt this if your parents have a glass-topped dining room table, WMV, as you'll never be invited to Thanksgiving dinner ever again. On second thought: If your parents don't have a glass-topped dining room table, go get them one. Happy wanking.
Sorry the SLLOTD is so late today, gang. I'll give you one guess as to why that might be.
Anyway, NGAF, I want to congratulate you on making the choice to divorce your Duck Dynasty motherfucker of a husband. Trump voter or not (distrust but verify, as someone or other almost said), your husband sounds like an asshole, and a rapey one at that. Leaving him and his old white guy crap is a choice that took courage and self-respect. Or it's a choice that will take courage and self-respect, I mean, since you haven't technically left him yet. Either way, I admire you for making up your mind to make that choice. (I actually want to scream that you should divorce him right now, NGAF, and leave him to rot while he watches Trump TV with no one to care for him. But divorces take time and cost money, especially when there are children involved. Still: It kills me to think that you're living with someone who violates you and who can't be trusted not to sabotage your business, it he's aware that's what it'll take to keep you. (Is he aware of that?()
In the meantime, NGAF, engage in domestic acts of resistance to maintain your sanity and self-respect—like getting a non-hormonal IUD from your nearest Planned Parenthood.
Stop picking up after the asshole. Let him see how his world falls apart without your thoughtful and generous care that he doesn't deserve. Your bearded, groping man-child husband and his sexual needs are not your top priority—your future is. Build your business, let your marriage whither. Like you said, men like Trump have drained you your entire life. Now's the time to take your life back. To that end: move into another bedroom, if you have one, and put a lock on the door. Tell him your sexual relationship is over. Tell him if he touches you without your consent, you'll report him for marital rape.
The next few years are going to be rough, NGAF, for you and us all, particularly immigrants, Muslims, people of color, and queers. Women's bodies are under attack everywhere. I don't know what small town you live in, but now is the time to start building a community of supportive friends that can help pull you and your children get out of this marriage. I'm going to borrow a slogan Hillary Clinton since, you know, she's not using it anymore: We're Stronger Together. Assemble your team.
And remember, Hillary Clinton won the fucking popular vote. You are not alone. We're in for a nightmare, apocalyptic presidency led by a reality TV star who got to the White House by appealing to the worst impulses of white, whiny and weak men like your husband. (And, sad to say, a lot of white, whiny and weak women.) At the very least, it'll take us a decade or two to dig ourselves out from under this catastrophe. But we will. And that starts by holding your momma head high with pride, with the knowledge that your body is yours. Fuck your husband. (Not literally, of course, not if you can help it.)
Thanks for sharing, Steve69.
I'm tempted to ask what your other "wicked cool, manly names" were for your son. Vesuvius? Maximus? Antinous? Actually, no. Don't tell me, OHNO, because it doesn't matter. You have to call your son the name he wants to be called, which just so happens to be the name you gave him. You also have got to stop flipping out over this big nothing burger of a non-problem.
You didn't share the name of you gave your son, OHNO, but there are worse names for a boy than Alonso, Bassanio, Benvolio, Cassio, Dromio, Gratiano, Gonzalo, Orlando, Prospero, or Romeo. Even a little baby Caliban could be cute. If you can't bear to call your son by the name he would like to be called by—which, again, just so happens to be the name you and your husband gave him—go ahead and call him honey, buddy, sweetheart, or some other affectionate/maternal pet name. And please try to put keep your non-problem in perspective: parenting is tough work and if this is the worst crisis you face over the next decade and a half, OHNO, you got off lucky. And when you find yourself getting tense about this bullshit or some other bullshit, just remind yourself that it's your job to love, support, and guide your son, even if some of his choices—name-related or otherwise—wind up being annoying variations on your own lousy choice(s) or his own uniquely annoying choices.
And take comfort, OHNO: Your literary pretensions and references could be worse. Friends of a friend named their son Grisha, after the boy in Chekhov's The Cherry Orchard who drowned at age seven. While that name sounds REALLY FUCKING JINXY TO ME, non-fictional Grisha is ten years old now... so, hey, they're out of the jinxy/danger/OMFG zone. BUT STILL.
Finally, NM, you say you can't let it go. That's equal parts bullshit and self-fulfilling prophecy. You can let it go. Like someone or other once said: "Things without all remedy should be without regard: what's done, is done."
Your son has a name. That's done and cannot be undone. Get over it, ma.
Let's go to the transcript...
Personally, SAD, I wouldn't be able to climb into bed with someone who was planning to vote for Donald Trump. I would be out the door. But if you can't leave because you love him despite his moral and political bankruptcy, or because leaving isn't an option for you financially, avoid the subject for the next three weeks, don't take whatever bait your husband throws out, and try not to gloat too much when Hillary hands Donald his ass on November 8.
So, yeah, no. I didn't tell SAD to leave her husband, SADDER. I told SAD I would leave him if he were my husband ("I" statements!), which he's not (thank god!), before pivoting to some practical/obvious advice intended to deliver SAD's marriage safely through the final weeks/days of this terrible, horrible, no good, very bad election (avoid the subject, don't take the bait) as well as some advice for how SAD should comport herself (no gloating) after her husband's preferred candidate loses the election next Tuesday (please, God) in an historic landslide (pretty please, God). My advice, if followed, could very well save SAD's marriage.
And I'm sorry, SADDER, but Donald Trump's racism and xenophobia, his sexism and homophobia, his alleged sexual assaults, his incitements to violence, his repeated threats to jail his political opponent, his attacks on the media, etc., etc., etc., are not "ultimately a non-issue." They are the issue. As Andrew Sullivan wrote today for New York Magazine...
Anyone paying attention knew this before he conquered the Republican Party. Look at what has happened since then. He sees the judicial system as entirely subordinate to his political and personal interests, and impugned a federal judge for his ethnicity. He has accused the Justice Department and FBI of a criminal conspiracy to protect Hillary Clinton. He has refused to accept in advance the results of any election in which he loses. He has openly argued for government persecution of newspapers that oppose him — pledging to open up antitrust prosecution against the Washington Post, for example. He is the first candidate in American history to subject the press pool to mob hatred—“disgusting, disgusting people”—and anti-Semitic poison from his foulest supporters. He is the first candidate in American history to pledge to imprison his election opponent if he wins power. He has mused about using nuclear weapons in regional wars. He has celebrated police powers that openly deploy racial profiling. His favorite foreign leader is a man who murders journalists, commits war crimes, uses xenophobia and warfare to cement his political standing, and believes in the dismemberment of both NATO and the European Union. Nor has he rejected any of his most odious promises during the primary—from torturing prisoners “even if it doesn’t work” to murdering the innocent family members of terror suspects to rounding up several million noncitizens to declaring war on an entire religion, proposing to create a database to monitor its adherents and bar most from entering the country.
We are told we cannot use the term fascist to describe this. I’m at a loss to find a more accurate alternative.
"A liberal is a man too broadminded to take his own side in a quarrel," somebody or other once said. You're the perfect illustration of that quip (of Robert Frost's), SADDER. Liberals and progressives and sane conservatives are engaged in a fight to stop a fascist wannabe dictator from coming to power in this country—we're fighting to save our country—and you're tone policing a sex-advice columnist. Five days before the election—five days before this election—you're quarreling with me about a column I wrote three weeks ago?
Fuck you, dude. 
African American voters are being purged from the rolls in one swing state, the Trump campaign has launched illegal voter-intimidation efforts in other swing states, polling places have been shut down in minority communities throughout the South, there's evidence the FBI is openly colluding with the Trump campaign to swing the election... and your chief concern right now is that I'm not being the change you want to see in the world. 
Fuuuuuuuuck you, dude. 
I'm all for "open and honest communication," SADDER. But "Donald Trump is a fascist," "This isn't fucking funny anymore," and "I'm leaving you if you vote for this monster" are sentiments that can and sometimes must be communicated openly, honestly, impatiently, and bluntly. Sometimes intelligent, open-minded, and socially-progressive people have to stand up and fight—and this is one of those times. Because this isn't just another run-of-the-mill "political argument," SADDER. This is an extinction-level event. Pull your head out of your ass.
There's a lot I could say here—most of which I've said before—but I'm going to let JABBER have the last word.

My response after the jump...
You're just a simple heterosexual girl who wants to be part of her boyfriend's "pissing experience" because that would turn you on—nothing kinky or hardcore about that, no sir. You're just after some old-fashioned, all-American, plain-vanilla voyeuristic piss play.
I'm not sure there's anything I could say here that would persuade your boyfriend to include you in his pissing experience. If knowing that it would make his piss-freak girlfriend insanely horny doesn't motivate a guy to unlock the door and let her watch, PISSED, he's unlikely to be convinced by some gay dude with an advice column. (But just in case: Hey, PISSED's BF! Open the damn door!) So if watching your boyfriend piss is really that important to you, PISSED, you'll have to get a new boyfriend or start following the one you've got into public restrooms.
P.S. As a gamer, my other major porn outlet is clips of my favorite video game characters going at it, animated quite professionally by amateur artists. It's also a great way to satisfy more hard-core fantasies I wouldn't want real women to experience, even for money. Not sure if you knew about that scene? I've never seen it covered on Savage Love, but it's getting pretty big.
Cam sites are one of the safest ways for women—and men and gender nonconforming power bottoms and non-binary piss sluts and home-schooling Mormon housewives—to do sex work. Camming is legal and some of the risks associated with sex work, like being busted by cops with nothing better to do or having to be in the same room with someone with lousy personal hygiene, are mitigated away to nothing. Sex work is work, however, no matter how someone does it. Getting others off requires emotional and physical labor from a cam girl or boy—labor that should be compensated and, where criminalized, decriminalized. Online sex work can have consequences IRL forms of sex work don't, like screenshots and surreptitious recordings circulating online long after the performer hangs up his/her/der camming software.
Some specific good news for you (and the girls you get off to): Chaturbate is a pretty ethical site. The owner of Chaturbate had this to say during an AMA about the people who cam for money there:
The ones who are there to make money don’t work "for" Chaturbate, they work on it. When they do work on CB, although they are independent, they must agree to comply with legal documentation requirements and they must agree to act ethically and legally as set forth in our terms.
The performers on Chaturbate (and cam sites in general) work for themselves, they collect their earnings, and camming can allow them to create fan bases that can support performers in other ways, i.e. via Amazon Wishlists and other online gift registries.
Zooming out: Everyone has their preferred method of getting off, CAMMER, which is why there are almost as many paths to solid/enhanced solo orgasms as there are sexual interests. Mainstream porn works for some (it must, right?), romance novels do it for others, group sex livestreams do it for a select few. Some masturbatory traditionalists can even managae, in these porn-swamped times, to get off using their own dirty imaginations. That said, it's encouraging to see more and more people concerned about the ethics of the porn they consume. A woman asked me this a few weeks ago: "The porn industry is dangerous for women and a lot of the content that can be found online isn't really consensual and ethical... where do we find feminist porn?" Some corners of the porn industry are dangerous and exploitative, of course, but others are not. Some corners are consensual and feminist. It's on us to seek out the ethical stuff and take our responsibilities as consumers seriously. Feminist porn, again, is a great place to start. And as I told this particular letter writer:
It's important to note that if we wanna see more feminist porn in the world and on the web, we have to support that kind of porn—and by "support," of course, I mean "consume," PORNO, and the only kind of consumption that matters here is the kind that creates a viable market, i.e. paid consumption. Paying for porn downloads helps finance projects and create careers for filmmakers and performers we like (and get off to). If you gets all your porn from Tumblr and/or the various tubes, you forfeit your right to complain about the porn that's out there. Buy the kind of porn you like and more of the porn you like will be made.
So, yeah. Want more ethical porn? Find the ethical, guilt-free porn—but don't just masturbate to it. Pay for it.
P.S. I'm aware of animated video game character porn, CAMMER, but I've never had to field a question about it. I can only assume that people who masturbate to video game character porn are perfectly content and don't have any sexual or interpersonal problems they'd need my help solving.



I don't know how this Tindermajob thing works exactly, as I've never been on Tinder (my catfishing-straight-boys days are behind me), and I can't check with any of my madly-swiping millennial pals because I'm on an aeroplane at the moment. But perhaps it wasn't a glitch that caused his profile to vanish. If someone swipes you left before you can swipe them right... are you still be able to see their profile? I dunno. Perhaps a Tinder user will jump into the comments and assplain it all for me.
That said, TSM, each social network has its own unique culture and unwritten code of conduct, and Instagram is Facebook's shallow, sexy younger sibling. And from what I hear—cough, cough—quite a lot can go down in a person's Instagram DMs. So it wouldn't be weird for you to DM him. Since unsolicited nudes are a dime a dozen on Instagram—more coughing—try sending him something rarer and potentially more intriguing: the truth.
"I saw you on Tinder and thought your profile was funny. Accidentally swiped left (oops!), but you seem like an interesting guy. Hope you don't mind hearing from me here. HMU if you want."
But only send one message. TSM. If he responds, great! If he doesn't, don't follow him. More don'ts: don't flip through his pics before bed; don't DM his friends; don't add him on LinkedIn. And no matter the outcome, TSM, be proud of yourself for getting back out there.
P.S. And, hey, if this is a question you're afraid to ask your friends and your sister—because they're judgy and disapproving—then make some better friends and stop confiding in your shitty sister.
P.S. We're in Philadelphia.
Instead of donating your erotic graphic novels online (I'm not sure how that would work anyway), GRAPHIC, donate your collection to a worthy local non-profit.
Call some used bookstores in Philadelphia and offer to give them your graphic erotic novels—if they want them, if they think they can sell them. Don't burden a poor bookstore by dumping books on 'em without asking; always call first. But if you're not hurting for money and you're want your novels erotic graphic to find a good home, donating them to a good used bookstore is a great way to go.
I know, I know: a used bookstore isn't technically a "non-profit." But used bookstores are valuable community institutions, their profit margins are ridiculously slim, and they're worthy of our support.
Actually, DAMNED, you can just not say anything. You can even actively lie. Because someone who flips out when you tell them the truth about something that's none of their business has forfeited their (technically non-existent) right to be told the truth—and that goes double for parental someones who insist on not being lied to but flip out when the truth isn't to their liking.
Start running your mother on a need-to-know basis, DAMNED, and your mother doesn't need to know when you're going on a weed run or who you're fucking or where you're fucking them. So the next time mom asks about a stray text message, DAMNED, just smile and say, "He's just a friend [that I'm fucking]." The part in brackets—"[that I'm fucking]"—is silent. You don't have to say that part out loud and you shouldn't say that part out loud. Because it's none of your mom's fucking business. And if she narrows her eyes and stares at you and asks again, DAMNED, doubledown on the lie: "Yes, mom, that's all. Just a friend [that I'm fucking]." If she keeps at it, change the subject. If she won't let you change the subject, leave the room.
Want your mother to respect your boundaries, DAMNED? Establish and enforce them.
And finally, DAMNED, tune out your mother's slut-shaming bullshit and don't allow her to undermine you or minimize your accomplishments. You got out of a shitty relationship, you got through college, you got a good job, and you're gonna get out on your own soon. You're living at home right now, true, but lots of people in their early twenties are living with their parents these days—and not all of them have as much to show for it as you do, DAMNED. You took advantage of your parents' generous offer but it was the right sort of advantage taking. You should be proud of yourself.
It's Friday, it's been a long week, and I'm feeling zonked and scattered. So I'm not gonna to dig into every issue you've raise in your long, long letter, TBIAVM, and I don't really need to. The answer you're looking for is right there in paragraph ten or eleven of your letter: be more assertive. Yeah. Do that. Be more assertive. That's the ticket.
But a couple of quick points...
You refer to topping and bottoming as "both sexual experiences," TBIAVM, and use "sex" to mean "anal sex" throughout your letter. But there's more to gay sex than anal, just as there's more to straight sex than vaginal. There's also more to versatility than topping or bottoming during anal: you can be versatile at and with oral, mutual masturbation, rimming, frottage, BDSM, and more. So instead of bottoming the next time you wanna fuck and your boyfriend doesn't feel like getting fucked, TBIAVM, try blowing each other or jerking each other off or tying each other up and blowing and jerking each other off. You don't have to default to one role or the other during anal intercourse. You can default to something else entirely.
Moving on...
If we no longer regard women who are strong and assertive as somehow unfeminine—and we don't anymore—we shouldn't regard men who are beautiful as somehow emasculated. Women and girls can be strong and still be feminine; men and boys can be be cute and pretty and still be masculine. Please make a note of it.
I really liked the way you put this, TBIAVM: "This top/bottom thing... Why are these nouns? They really should just be verbs." But the editor in me wants to make two little tweaks: "Why are these only nouns? They can just be verbs."
Some gay and bi men identify very strongly with these roles—top/bottom as nouns—and find them meaningful, resonant, and erotically charged. There's nothing wrong with identifying as a top or a bottom, just as there's nothing wrong with identifying as neither or versatile or as someone who isn't into anal at all. But some gay and bi men out there view topping or bottoming as something they are, not just something they do. So those terms aren't ever going to "just" be verbs. People shouldn't be consigned to categories by others, of course, and perhaps fewer people would consign themselves to these categories if gay culture/porn/men didn't put so much emphasis on them. But you have no more right to strip self-identified/self-actualized tops and bottoms of the labels they've embraced than your boyfriend has to "default" you into bottoming for him exclusively.
Circling back to the advice you gave yourself: be more assertive. And if you wind feeling pressured into bottoming every time you have anal sex with your boyfriend, try take anal sex—and your pretty, cute, and skilled butt—off the sex menu for a while. If you don't default to anal every time you have sex, TBIAVM, you can't default to bottoming either.
Some couples write down their expectations about an impending or proposed commitment, CID, while some discuss their expectations with a mediator, i.e. a pre-marital counselor, the person who's going to marry them, their trusted Magic 8 Ball. But most couples simply discuss their expectations privately—they articulate their wants, needs, deal breakers, etc., to each other. But these discussions about what commitment means to both halves of a couple take place before the wedding, CID, not after.
So, yeah, you're kinda fucked. Your spouse isn't interested in defining what your commitment means because they want everything to be open for discussion and figuring out as you go along... except that one thing you thought you'd discussed with them before the wedding: your preference for open relationships. Monogamy, unlike everything else, isn't open for discussion.
A marriage is either open or it isn't. There's no middle ground between your spouse's position and yours on this issue. Your spouse might come around in time, CID, but how long are you willing to wait and how long are you willing to be monogamous? If this is something you want resolved now, well, then someone is gonna lose: you insist on non-monogamy and your spouse unhappily relents or your spouse insists on monogamy and you unhappily relent.
You might wanna see a couples counselor, CID, to work through this issue. But I suspect you'll be seeing a divorce lawyer in the end.
My answers are:
1. Anything is possible.
2. Why do you feel hurt and disappointed? Because it sucks to be cheated on.
But your feelings of hurt and disappointment may be more keenly felt because you're implicated in this, RFSA. I don't mean you're implicated directly—you didn't set her up with the dude she cheated on you with—but her wrongs obviously call your own to mind. And the same majority that hates and despises her for what she's done to you would hate and despise you if they knew what you'd done to your ex. But they don't know and your ex doesn't know and your current girlfriend doesn't know. You could tell the majority and the current GF (no need to bother the ex)—you could say something like, "Look, I've cheated on someone myself and I have to take that into account while I figure out what's next for us"—but telling this particular and contextualizing truth would mean sacrificing the moral high ground. Right now you're seen as the wronged party—the pure one, the good one, the victimized one—but you know it's more complicated than that. To protect you from feelings of guilt and/or grayness, to preserve your "wholly pure" status, your subconscious mind could be ramping up those feelings of hurt in order to cover and atone for your own infidelities.
3. Do you want to give it another shot? Then give it another shot. She swears never to cheat again, you swear never to cheat (without disclosing your priors), you take each other back. Maybe it'll work out, maybe it won't. Maybe she'll cheat again, or you'll cheat again, and cheating will ruin your relationship and all your friends and family will rush in and scream their I-told-you-so's in your face. (The unsuspected/uncaught/unconfessed cheaters will be the ones screaming the loudest.)
Or...
You could give honesty and self-awareness shot. Open up to your girlfriend about your priors, RFSA, by disclosing your own history of infidelities. Then have a radically honest conversation with her—cheater to cheater—about whether you should really be making monogamous commitments to each other or anyone else. A committed non-monogamous relationship can still be destroyed by infidelity, of course, since cheating can happen even in open relationships. But infidelity always destroys monogamous committed relationships entered into by those who are incapable of actually being monogamous.
4. Is anything really?
Get rid of the shitty girlfriend, keep the great job, enjoy your time abroad.
DTMFA, ABA, DTMFA.
The woman you took for a lovely and horny little lesbian turned out to be a lying and manipulative little shit, ABA, one with a penchant for projection. ("You can't talk to your exes because then you will cheat on meeeeeee!") Don't beat up on yourself: We've all made mistakes like this—misreading a new romantic partner—and in your case, ABA, you were actively misled.
I don't know if your girlfriend was consciously and maliciously trying to shred your sexual self-confidence, ABA, but at the this stage her conscious intentions are irrelevant. You were clear about who you are and what you need, ABA, and she lied to you about who she is and what she can give you. Not only did she lie to you about her position on cheating—not a deal breaker when she does it!—she admits to only pretending to enjoy sex in order to "keep you."
Or so she says. I suspect your soon-to-be-ex-girlfriend enjoys sex, ABA, but she enjoys power more. The sex early in the relationship got her off because it gave her power over you, i.e. the power to make you fall for her; the power to order you to cut off your exes (isolating someone is an abuser's move, btw); and ultimately the power to uproot your ass and move it halfway round the world. And now that she's got you, now that you're over there, she enjoys denying you sex because your disappointment ("I came all this way for this?"), embarrassment ("I'll look like a fool to everyone back at home if we break up now!"), and desperation ("I have to figure out how to rekindle this!") all give her power over you.
Want to conduct an experiment? Tell your soon-to-be-ex-girlfriend you want to "take a break" from the relationship without officially breaking up. She'll be "surprising" you at your apartment before a week is up. Let her in and she'll be fucking you senseless again—she'll be initiating and being verbal and sending dirty texts and pictures—and she'll keep that shit up until you take her back. At that point the sex will start to dwindle again, ABA, and in two months tops you'll be right back where you are now: telling an advice columnist you're "happy" in paragraph two of your letter and "upset," "hurt," and "disappointed" in paragraph seven.
My advice: Don't take a break, ABA, just break up.
Then you have a choice to make after you break up: You can choose to view your current predicament as a humiliating indictment of your judgement and you can spend the rest of your time abroad beating yourself up and being miserable, ABA, or you can choose to look on the bright side. And the bright side here is pretty fucking bright: You've got a great job, you have your own place, and you're in Europe. Add "single" and "free to offer intense oral and penetrative stimulation to other women" and "not stuck in the United States durin  this hugely depressing national election" to that mix, ABA, and your bright side is so fucking bright it hurts to look at.
There are worse fates than being youngish, single, employed, and abroad. Do some traveling, do some other women, and do count your blessings.
First: stop talking about porn with your parents.
Second: let's all watch the Answered Prayers trailer together, shall we?

Impressive. I haven't seen Answered Prayers and the trailer makes it look pretty cool—and ambitious for porn these days. So, hey, thanks for the tip. And after reading up Cockyboys just now I have to say it does sound like a really cool company to work for. So here's hoping you land that dream job, TYFYT.
But porn is something we adults discuss with lovers and special friends, TYFYT, not with our parents. Now porn presumably isn't the only thing you're passionate about; therefore it's not the only thing you can talk about with mom. We are not obligated to share every single thing we love with every last person we love. I loved my mother very much, TYFYT, and we were very close. But there were things we didn't talk about because she didn't particularly enjoy discussing them. Not forcing my mom into long, detailed conversations about the artistic aspects of husband's armpits was one of the ways I showed my mother just how much I loved her.
So again, TYFYT, stop talking with your parents about porn. If you go on to have a big career in porn I'm sure your mom will be willing to watch the PG-13 trailers for your films. But even then, TYFYT, share your passion for porn with your lovers and special friends, not your parents.
No one should be ashamed of their kinks. Kinks are nothing to be ashamed of, shame is a waste of time and mental energy, and it's not like shame is the cure—shame isn't chemo, i.e. it's not an unpleasant poison that attacks kink tumors. Someone's kink, whatever it is, will turn them on before a waste-of-time shame spiral and it's going to turn them on after a waste-of-time shame spiral. During, too, most likely.
But how we choose to explore and/or express our kinks? That matters—and that's where shame can come into play.
Take a young man who gets off on masturbating into women's underwear. That's nothing to be ashamed of. The young man can acquire some panties—ethically—and masturbate into them to his part's content. A young man who gets off on masturbating into his mother's underwear? That's a little dicier—because icky fucking ick—and he should definitely/immediately talk to someone about that. But even that young man can express even that icky kink in a way that he needn't be ashamed of.
God tear off my fingers, God slam my laptop shut, God drain my battery...
The young man can acquire some non-mom underpants ethically—Amazon, Goodwill, the abandoned bin at a laundromat—and pretend he's masturbating into mom's underpants. Or... icky fucking ick... he could maybe fish a pair of his actual mom's discarded underpants out of the trash and do what he needs to do and what he definitely/immediately needs to see a shrink about BUT he absolutely/positively must never ever ever ever ever ever ever ever tell his mother what he's doing. EVER.
Because telling mom—and his girlfriend—is not okay. Unless this young man's mom is as messed up as he is, she's not going to feel safe in her own underpants anymore—let alone her own house—and that's what your caller should be ashamed of. The kink, all by itself, isn't the shameful part. The way he's choosing to express it—and talk about it—is the shameful and the creepy and the fucked up and the selfish and the inconsiderate and the icky fucking ick part. This young man has definitely victimized his mother by sharing this disturbing information with her. 
Finally, SQUICKED, here's hoping this young man's story was just that: a story. Maybe the idea turns him on, and he gets off on convincing some stranger that he's actually doing this. Or maybe he just gets off on freaking out people who work on suicide hotlines—also shameful, but far less squicky.
Not one of these problems, HUMP, is actually your problem.
Your friend's "more and more monogamish" marriage isn't yours to micromanage. His wife wants him to use condoms with other partners, which means they've had a discussion and set rules and boundaries for sleeping with other people and he—presumably—has managed to find a condom that works for him and his dick. (Maybe he's using female condoms?) Whatever is going on in the latex department, your friend of many years and his micro-penis will have to deal with his very controlling wife on his own. You're sleeping with him, HUMP, not her. If their relationship isn't balanced—if things aren't fair—and your friend is unhappy, you can encourage him to address that with his wife, but that's really all you can do.
Also, some couples in open-or-monogamish relationships agree to terms that seem unfair, imbalanced, or controlling to others, HUMP, but are acceptable to/accepted by both parties. Sometimes a reasonable insecurity isn't being accommodated, sometimes an unreasonable one is. But if your friend hasn't told you he feels humiliated or mistreated, HUMP, this imbalance may not be a problem for him. Don't project onto your friend how you would feel if similar terms were imposed on you.
Regarding your second and third problems-that-aren't-your-problems: Come on, HUMP... Really? Now, I don't want to doubt your ability to identify a micro-penis, but you're the one under the assumption your friend is completely unaware of his own micro-penis, so I'll ask it: Are you sure it's a micro-penis? Or just on the small end of the average range? Regardless, HUMP, men with small dicks—even micro-dicks—can have healthy, non-problematic sex lives and, yes, manage to keep a condom on. (And men with large dicks can have lousy sex lives and break a lot of condoms to boot.) Your friend of many years can deal with his very controlling wife and his micro-penis on his own. If he asks for help or suggestions or feedback (on his marriage, on his body), then feel free to jump in.
But let's say your friend has a micro-penis and somehow managed to get to 50 without ever realizing it. Maybe the kind, loving and friendly thing to do here is, I don't know, not tell your friend he has a micro-penis? Let him continue to live in blissful ignorance?
In your monogamish explorations, HUMP, be more concerned with fulfilling your needs, your partner's needs, and treating everyone involved with respect. Don't get into the habit of micromanaging and/or intervening in the lives, marriages, bodies, etc., of your other partners. Unless your thing is finding new levels of awkwardness that are difficult to negotiate and ensure that your relationships with others are brief and unpleasant.


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump:
First, a stroll down memory lane: Hearing anal sex referred to as "Greek" took me back to the days when I was a 13-year-old closet case reading the personal ads in the back of a purloined copy of the Advocate, wondering what the fuck fags meant when they described themselves as "Greek active" or "Greek passive," and why it was that Greek actives invariably described themselves as "French passive." It all seemed so mysterious and continental. Now, everyone is either a top or a bottom and romance is dead.
Moving on, FAT, it pains me to inform you that you've ruined your dick with that towel-and-mattress routine. You've trained your dick to respond to one kind of stimulation and one kind of stimulation only, a particular kind of stimulation that has very little in common with the sensations provided by big-butted porn stars. Your only hope is to stop humping the bed. Get some lube; use your left hand; use your right hand; invest in a Fleshlight; masturbate on your back, standing up, kneeling. Vary your masturbatory routine and habits and—this is the hard part—don't resort to the towel and mattress if you have difficulty getting off. You spent a lot of time programming your dick, and it's going to take some time to reprogram your dick, FAT. The only way to do that is to deny your dick—forever and ever, amen—the towel-and-mattress routine. Once your dick realizes that there's no going back, it'll adapt; it will begin to respond to the new and closer-to-human sensations that you're making available to it. Good luck.
My response after the jump...
I agree with your wife: Let it go. Ignore your mother's hurtful e-mail—just don't respond—and focus on your wife and the child you two are having together. The last thing you need is your mother getting in your wife's face about her kinks or running to fetus protective services because she believes kinky parents are a danger to their children.
But...
Just in case your mother brings it up again—if she presses you for an undeserved thank-you-for-terrorizing-me note—write an e-mail to your mother, one that your wife sees in advance and approves. Something along the lines of: "My adolescent sexual fantasies were none of your business, and your inability to respect my privacy and sexual autonomy caused me great personal distress at the time. Your actions did not help me. They damaged our relationship. My adult sex life is none of your business, and I am not going to answer any invasive or inappropriate questions. All you need to know is this: My wife and I very happy together—both emotionally and sexually compatible—and if you want to be fully involved in the life of your grandchild, you will never bring this subject up again."
I don't think you're a dipshit, AWT.
But I am wondering why it didn't occur to youngish you, digital native that you are, to Google "dating sites," "minor," and "scam." Because it occurred to oldish me, digital immigrant that I am, to Google that shit. And my by-no-means exhaustive/by-all-means-obvious search unearthed a dozen or more examples of scams involving people pretending to be minors on dating sites like OKCupid, including several examples that sounded exactly like the one you described: Someone "meets" a woman on a site like OKCupid, the chat quickly gets sexual, phone numbers are exchanged, dirty texts and sexts follow, the woman goes silent, a day or two later daddy calls to inform you that you've been sexting with his underage daughter and demanding money or else he'll go to the cops. Click through the example I linked, AWT, and you'll see three people who say they're lawyers (maybe they are, maybe they aren't—this is the Internet) advising the poster to ignore that call.
"There is no girl at all and there is no father," says Lawyer Paul Goodman, "just a scammer... It's all just a scam that is rampant online." (Paul has no photo and calls himself an "Internet Lawyer," which I didn't know was a thing. Still, I think his advice is solid! And it's on the Internet so it's gotta be true!)
But just to be on the safe side, AWT...
Minors aren't supposed to have accounts on OKCupid. The rules barring minors from using the service are here, the feedback form you can use to flag a suspicious account is here. If the cops come and knock on your door—which they won't—you can tell them you reported the account to OKCupid when you heard from the non-existent parents of the non-existent young lady.
My response to Help Me Please, the woman facing a health crisis and pining for her shitty, selfish, sadistic boyfriend, included this paragraph...
Don't get me wrong: I sleep with men, I understand the sexual appeal of a man who treats you like shit, I'm a huge Peggy Lee fan. But you can't depend on a guy like that at a time like this. If it turns out you're seriously ill, HMP, you need to lean on family and friends, join a support group, buy one of those vaporizers, and concentrate on getting healthy. And take comfort: If/when your health is restored, there are plenty of shitty, selfish, sadistic guys on the planet who'll treat you badly, cheat on you flagrantly, and—not coincidentally—get you off spectacularly.
I'm not being defensive, NICE, just making it clear that I'm not completely blind to the emotional/sexual/gender dynamic you've unpacked at such great length. Thanks for sharing and I'll give your point some thought.
My response after the jump...
Being poly means being open to or being in more than one romantic relationship—concurrent committed relationships—and what you've described sounds pretty poly to me. Perhaps it's the triad designation that makes your partner uncomfortable. That particular label implies that you're all equal partners—not just equally attracted to each other and in love with each other (which three people rarely are), but equals on the emotional, social, and financial fronts as well, i.e., equally obligated to one another. Your partner may regard his best friend as fun to have around, but not an equal partner, and not someone he is responsible to/for in the same way you two are responsible for each other.
Or maybe your partner regards his best friend as his boyfriend, not yours, and while he's happy to share his boyfriend with you sexually, he's not into the idea that you might be in love with his boyfriend and vice versa, so the "triad" label irks him.
Or maybe your partner is one of those people who believes that poly folks are deranged sex maniacs and whatever he's doing can't be poly because he's not a deranged sex maniac, HAPPY, which makes him more comfortable with cognitive dissonance than the "triad" label.
Yes, it's important to be interesting. It's just as important to be interested. In my experience interesting people are interested people and vice-versa.
"Women want guys who care what's going on in their lives and minds," Alice continues, "both [interesting and interested] make a real package!"
Agreed!
Remember the old adage/proverb/saying: if something sounds too good to be true, it probably is. A swingers club with three times as many female members as male members? Unheard of in swinging circles—and, therefore, too good to be true.
So, yeah, it would be a bad idea to follow up with this woman. If you do follow up with her, STIC, she'll be hitting you up for a steep membership or initiation fee before you're allowed to visit this nonexistent club where women outnumber men three to one. Don't believe me? Instead of chit-chatting with a scammer—a scammer who is most likely male—spend ten minutes reading the membership rules posted online by legit swingers clubs. (Clubs with their own websites where they post info about becoming a member? Very likely legitimate. Clubs that trawl personals websites to recruit members? Most definitely illegitimate.) You'll quickly spot a pattern, STIC...
We allow single women; however, single men are not permitted.
Our events are open to mixed-sex couples, female-only couples, and single females.
Membership is restricted to sexy open-minded sexually liberal Couples and Single Ladies.
Couples and single women welcome, single men not welcome—them's the rules at swingers clubs the world over. Swingers clubs don't adopt this rule because they're run by a single cartel of sex-positive misandrists, STIC, but because without this rule swingers clubs would be overwhelmed by single men. And a public sex space where straight guys outnumber women by ten or twenty or a hundred to one is gonna start feeling pretty gang-rape-y pretty fast, STIC, and the women are gonna flee. (This isn't the only way men are discriminated against in the swingers clubs: "Nudity is allowed everywhere but the buffet area. However, men are only allowed to be nude when they are actively involved in play, on a bed, or waiting your turn at the orgy bed. Simply, men can not walk around the club nude, that includes partially nude. Women can be nude when walking around as long as shoes are worn.)
So this swingers club your OKCupid match told you about? I'm sorry to say it doesn't exist, STIC.
Finally, STIC, something else to bear in mind when you open your laptop: There are shitty people online who specialize in preying on and scamming lonely men. So make sure your bullshit detectors are fully engaged whenever you're interacting with strangers online. (Also: put up a recent pic on your dating profile, ask a friend to look it over your answers to the questions and offer input, and consider working with a therapist on your interpersonal skills. Good luck.)
I don't know of any charities that provide weekends away for standup people with large families, NEIGHBOR, but I do know how you can help. Go and talk to your neighbors, heap praise on them for doing right by their nephews, and then offer to keep an eye on their kids once in a while. The nephews, being teenagers, most likely don't need or want babysitting. But they might be up for hanging out at your place with your teenagers while you're keeping an eye on your neighbor's younger kids. 
Don't mention that you're making this offer because you wanna make sure they're still fucking each other on the regular, NEIGHBOR, as that would be creepy. Just let 'em know you're willing to provide them with a little gratis childcare. An evening off every other month or so will be a much bigger help to your neighbors than a single splashy weekend away ever could—and you can make that happen for them without having to form a 501c3.
In other words: be the charity you wish to see the in world.
If your partner hasn't fucked you for eight years... and they're not bothered enough by that fact to broach the subject... you haven't cheated them out of anything when you fuck someone else.
But you didn't ask me to help process/frame/dispense with your guilt about that one-off affair. You wanna know how to end a twenty-year relationship that—sex aside—has long been and remains pretty great. He's a thoughtful partner, you love him, he loves you, and there's that mortgage to think about. All of which has me wondering why you would wanna end this relationship at all.
Okay, okay: You don't wanna fuck this guy ever again, GMAM, and you're worried he wants to resume fucking after a long fucking hiatus. But how do you know that? Because he's finally getting a vasectomy, GMAM? It could mean what you think it means, I suppose, or it could mean he thinks you want him to wanna start fucking you again and so he's getting a vasectomy so he can start fucking you again but he actually dreads the prospect of fucking you again just as much as you dread the prospect of fucking him again.
If I were a betting man, GMAM, I'd put my money on dread, i.e. he's only getting the vasectomy because he thinks it's what you want. And if I were you, GMAM, I wouldn't dread the vasectomy if he decides to go through with it. (And that seems like a big "if" to me.) An outpatient surgical procedure is unlikely to turn a guy who didn't wanna fuck you for the better part of a decade into a guy who can't keep his hands off you/his dick out of you. He could get the vasectomy, you could continue to avoid sex the subject and sex the act, and nothing could change in the end, i.e. he won't make a move to fuck you, you won't have to fuck him, everything post-vasectomy stays as it was pre-vasectomy.
But let's say he gets the vasectomy and then tries to fuck you—what then?
Don't dump him, GMAM, talk to him. Start by telling him you're happy with things as they are—you love being his companion, you love living with him, you wanna grow old with him, you hope to still be together when your mortgage is finally above water—and that you don't wanna reintroduce sex into the mix. You don't have to tell him you're not attracted to him sexually, GMAM, as that'll be implicit enough. Add that you don't mind if he has sex with other people—tell him you don't mind if he's already had sex with other people—because your relationship is a loving, companionate, and successful one, as you both know, but it isn't one that's defined by sex. And your relationship hasn't—at least in your opinion—been harmed by the absence of sex. Indeed, what you've been doing (or not doing) has been working and so you would like to keep doing (or not doing) what you've been doing (or not doing).
Then hear him out. It's possible he'll be relieved—my money is on relieved—but it's also possible he'll be hurt. Maybe he's wanted sex all along and either didn't think you did or couldn't find the words to ask for it. If that's the case, GMAM, you'll have to risk making your lack of interest in him sexually explicit.
And at that point, GMAM, the future of your relationship—and your mortgage—will be in his hands.
A troglodyte is a hermit, a person who lives in a cave, or a person who is old fashioned or "deliberately ignorant." (It isn't someone who's really into the Joan Crawford movie Trog.) Since it's highly unlikely you live in a cave (no Wifi) or are a hermit (hermits don't have sex partners), HARD, that leaves old fashioned or deliberately ignorant.
My money is on semi-deliberate ignorance. Because as anyone who reads my column would know—and you would have to be reading me to write me—finding a suitable/compatible long-term relationship isn't easy and mismatched libidos are a common and often relationship-ending problem. So you're not some monstrously horny, freakishly perverted outlier, HARD. You're just another high-sex-drive normal person who's had the misfortunate of partnering with a series of women who happened to be low-sex-drives normal persons.
My advice: take comfort in knowing you're not alone, HARD, while prioritizing sexual compatibility as you search for a new new partner.
Repeat after me: "Sexual compatibility is important, I have a right to prioritize sexual compatibility in a partner, and there are women out there that can match my animality bone-for-bone." Be upfront with new partners early on in the relationship: You have a high libido, you're looking for someone whose libido matches or—Yahtzee!—exceeds yours. Establish a connection and mutual interest before making this disclosure, HARD, unless you met someone on a website for the sexually adventurous, in which case you can put it at the top of your profile. And if someone's interest in sex craters after a few months, you can end things and start searching for a new partner with a clear conscience because sexual compatibility matters.
But if absolutely every last woman you're with loses interest after a few short months, HARD, it's possible-to-probable you're doing something wrong. Or somethings, plural. Because a partner with a high libidos is a blessing when that libido comes bundled with a high emotional IQ, good sexual technique, concern for a partner's pleasure, attentiveness, solicitousness, follow through, etc., whereas a high libido paired with selfishness, cluelessness, or skill-less-ness is fucking curse. So do a little critical self-assessment, maybe ask for some feedback from exes you're on good terms with, and make 1. sure it's not you and 2. make whatever improvements you can. (There's always room for improvement, HARD.)
And finally, HARD, you don't mention whether you're against a non-monogamous or monogamish relationship. But if you keep running into this problem—the sex drops off but the relationship is solid—then experiment with a relationship that's open might be allow you to have the good & stable LTR you're seeking plus the excitement of the new. Good luck, troglodyte!
HUMP! 2017Call for Submissions!

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats, lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
An easy one to close out the week...
Speaking from personal experience—bitter personal experience—you have to end this now. Because if you don't end it before the trip, MUM, you're going to end on the trip.
And that will be so much worse.
Here's what's gonna happen if you don't break up with him and try to power through that vacation: Your boyfriend is gonna sense something's wrong, he's gonna get all insecure on your ass, and then he's gonna require a stream of reassurances from you—reassurances you will hesitate to give him because you're gonna end it when the trip is over and you don't want him throwing those reassuring lies back in your face when you do end it because you don't wanna feel like an even bigger asshole then than you already do now. Your hesitancy is gonna cause him to feel even more insecure, his demands for reassurances will come at an even faster clip, you'll hedge and you'll duck, you'll try to change the subject, you'll wind up avoiding spending time alone with him, and... BOOM. There's gonna be a confrontation, MUM, an explosive one, and the relationship will be over.
But the vacation won't be.
You'll be stuck in the same hotel room for the better part of two weeks with someone who won't stop crying or wishing you were dead or both.
So either way—whether dump him before the trip or wind up dumping during on the trip—this two-week vacation you've planned for immediately after your return from three months of traveling (nice life!) is gonna be ruined, MUM. And if you wait to dump him until you're on vacation, MUM, it's not just your vacation and his that will be ruined. Your mutual friends—those innocent bystanders—are gonna be splattered with emotional gore and have their vacations ruined as well.
Break up with him when you get home, MUM. Right away. Then you'll have a week to figure out whether you can go on the trip as friends—which I think would be a mistake—or which one of you is gonna be gracious, eat the cost, and let the other go on the trip solo. Since you've been away for months, and since you're the one who's doing the dumping, he's the one who's gonna need the vacation. So let him go, MUM.
Because your boyfriend is an asshole, CABO.
Your boyfriend is one of those selfish, manipulative fucksplats who wants one set of rules for him (he gets to fuck around) and another set of rules for his boyfriend (you don't get to fuck around). Isn't it obvious?
You asked why he's like this, CABO, and I'm pretty sure I nailed it. Now here are some questions you need to ask yourself....
"Why am I putting up with this?"
"Why do I know relevant things about his behavior that he doesn't know I know?"
"Why didn't I bring up the guys he messed around with during our first month together when he freaked out about the guy I messed around with during our first week together?"
"Why haven't I discussed the 'separate incident' of the other dude's cock in the night?"
"Why haven't I confronted him about any of this shit?"
I'm thinking I might know the answer to that last question: Because you're afraid to lose him, CABO, and that fear has allowed him to manipulate you with his anger (leaving you afraid to confront him)—or, hey, maybe you're the kind of person who shies away from confrontation generally (which he may or may not be aware of but he's certainly benefiting from).
No more, CABO. It's time to confront your boyfriend. Tell him everything you know and then tell him you're not going to put up with this. You want an egalitarian relationship where you're both equally free and/or equally restrained—and equally honest—but not you're not sticking around for some sort of non-consensual/non-aboveboard/non-fun cuckolding relationship where he polices your browser history when he's not fucking around behind your back.
But to be perfectly honest, CABO, the best advice for someone with a jealous, manipulative, and controlling boyfriend can be found here.
My response after the jump...
My response is likely to wind up on antigay websites, TOLD, so let me preface it with this: We only started hearing that monogamy wasn't just the cultural expectation/default setting for married couples but a crucial, essential, definitional element of marriage when same-sex couples began to press for marriage rights. Married heterosexual swingers were fucking around (and recruiting other married heterosexuals into their "lifestyle," a term swingers embrace!) decades before the marriage-equality movement got off the ground. And religious conservatives, while not fans of swinging, never argued that nonmonogamous heterosexual couples weren't really married or that they should be barred from marrying. So it seems that monogamy—like children and religion—only defines marriage when same-sex couples want to marry.
Anyway, TOLD, you don't have to be married to be monogamous or monogamous to be married—and most gay male couples, married or not, aren't monogamous. So go ahead and wear your wedding ring. While a wedding ring on a straight married man (or woman) will be assumed to mean "taken and off-limits," the same assumption doesn't apply in the case of a married gay man. If someone at one of the events you're attending is interested in you, he's likely to flirt with you first and make polite inquiries about your marriage (monogamous? Monogamish? Open? Poly?) second. Your trans disclosure is likelier to be the bigger deal—and a far bigger obstacle for most (but not all) gay men—than your wedding ring. Good luck.
P.S. If you're wondering why I'm going at all, when this wedding was announced I started testing the waters, sending up a few trial balloons about potentially being unable to make it. The response was for my non-crazy relatives was to immediately send me money to help with travel expenses, along with big speeches about how important it is to be there for family. I concluded that it would create a lot of drama to skip, and it would be easier just to attend. The wedding is so close now that I really would be an asshole if I backed out.
This wedding doesn't belong in either the "engage" or "shut it down" categories, TRUMP. It belongs in the "skip it entirely/basket of deplorables/fuck these people" category. To paraphrase Lady B: To have racist relatives, Mr. TRUMP, may be regarded as a misfortune. To attend their wedding looks like callousness. (Callousness: "emotionally hardened; unfeeling: a callous indifference to the suffering of others,
Hormonal forms of birth control—like the pill—can indeed suppress and/or warp women's libidos. Take it away, Jezebel...
Researchers at the University of Heidelberg in Germany studied 1,086 women, and found that those taking hormonal contraceptives were at higher risk of sexual dysfunction than those using non-hormonal or no birth control.... But doctors—and the cheery ads for "period control" on television—often fail to discuss this problem. While the Pill was apparently revolutionary for including printed inserts that explained side effects directly to patients, these inserts don't always mention sexual issues. Perhaps this is because they haven't received as much studies as other, more life-threatening problems. But while it's obviously important to protect women from blood clots and cancers, it would also be nice if a drug that enabled women to have sex without pregnancy didn't also kill their desire to do so.
So, yeah, going off the pill could kick your libido into gear—that's not just a good hunch, UTAH, that's a solid plan with some actual science to back it up. I would recommend talking it over with your doctor first, particularly if you're on meds for depression or anxiety, and taking your doctor's advice about whether you should phase out your hormonal birth control gradually or if you can stop cold turkey.
If your boyfriend knows how to use condoms correctly, they're an effective birth control option, UTAH, but keep a box of Plan B in your medicine cabinet in case one leaks or breaks. There are also non-hormonal birth control options—read about copper IUDs here—that are more effective than condoms when it comes to preventing unwanted pregnancies. (IUDs, like the pill, don't provide protection from sexually transmitted infections—but you knew that, right?)
If your libido kicks into gear after going off the pill, UTAH, you might find yourself feeling sexually attracted to guys who aren't your boyfriend. Hopefully you won't feel any less attracted to your boyfriend—fingers crossed—and once you know it's possible to find others attractive without any loss of feeling for your partner, UTAH, you may feel less threatened/angered/unhinged by your boyfriend's normal and natural attraction to other women and his occasional use of porn. And he's likelier to share the porn he watches with you once you're no longer having melt downs about it.
Hell, UTAH, once your libido kicks into gear, you may finally discover the particular kind of porn or erotica that works for you—and vibrators might start working for you too.
But don't pressure to start having orgasms immediately after going off the pill, UTAH, and don't view yourself as broken if it takes some time to get there. Lots of women come into coming a little and sometimes lot later in life than dudes do, thanks primarily (IMHO) to the massive zap the culture places on women's heads. Boys are encouraged to beat off, and the culture normalizes masturbation for males, while girls are discouraged from seeing themselves as sexual actors, from masturbating, and from taking pleasure in their own bodies with or without a partner present. It can take time, experimentation, patience, and sometimes a little pot to un-zap yourself, to undo the damage, unearth your desires, and find your sweet spots.
And finally...
Originally used as a reference to neighborhoods where members of a minority group reside—mostly due to social, political or economic pressure—the term "ghetto" has since become a racist and classist pejorative. In reality, only people who have lived in these areas can really say what's "ghetto" and what's not. But that's not what usually happens. Instead, "ghetto" has become an adjective used to negatively judge any number of things, from outfits to run-down facilities. In common media tropes, "ghetto" is also associated with black people and their cultural expressions, including braids, gold hoop earrings and rap music. The term has largely become synonymous with being cheap, substandard, undesirable and, yes, black.
Please don't describe porn or anything else as "ghetto." By some measures, UTAH, the state where you live has the highest porn consumption rates in the country, per capita, so it would be more accurate to describe porn as a Utah/Mormon/White thing that to suggest that porn is a "cheap, substandard, undesirable" or black thing. Zap that expression from your vocabulary.
Whatever happened with the male friend of your lady friend—whatever he advanced, whatever you failed to head off at the pass, whatever photos or videos or other digital evidence of his incursions wound up on your phone for your fiancé to find—it didn't just happen. You did it, STWL, and I'm gonna assume you did it of your own free will and that his advances didn't involve coercion and that whatever went down (and was so thoroughly and incriminatingly documented) was entirely consensual.
So, again, it didn't just happen. You did it... and you did it for a reason... and I'm thinking you did it for a very good reason. You need out of the relationship you're in now, STWL, and even if you don't know it... your pussy seems to know it. So maybe it was your pussy that did it. Maybe your neglected pussy decided to stage an intervention by slamming itself down on the eject button—which came disguised as this other man's dick—and everything was going according to your pussy's plan (get her some, get her caught, get her dumped) but then your fiancé screwed up your pussy's plan by not dumping you for cheating on him.
Your pussy tried to make it happen for you, STWL, but now you're going to make it happen for yourself. The sex isn't there, he has nothing to say to you, and he expects you to cook, clean, shop, do his laundry, and pay the bills while he sits on his ass staring at his phone.
DTMFA.
We say "give it time" like we have some other option—I mean, whatever you decide to do, BAM, you're gonna be given time. It, whatever it is, gets time whether I think time is a good idea or not.
Okay, okay: I know what you mean, BAM, I'm just being an insufferable little sophist; someone needs to come into my office and lightly slap me and pull my hair when I get like this. You mean, "Do I need to take some action now? And if so, what action should I take? Or do I wait and see if this problem doesn't work itself out in a few weeks/months/years?"
The answer to your question is yes, BAM, you should give it time. There's been a lot of upheaval and betrayal and drama in your lives over the last six months—the arrival of the baby, the exposure of the affair, the dragging out of the affair, the end of the affair—and while you're feeling a lot more open, forgiving, and sexual than the average victim of the affair/mother of the newborn might, your husband's tentativeness is perfectly understandable. If he's not a monster, BAM, your husband has to be struggling with all sorts of contradictory emotions—primarily guilt (hopefully guilt!) about what he did and when he chose to do it, BAM, and two different flavors of regret; regret over the hurt he caused you and the other woman (readers, please note: other women are also capable of feeling pain), and regret at what he's lost and without a doubt misses (the relationship with the other woman and the sexual connection he shared with her).
Summing up: What he was doing to her with his dick nearly blew up your marriage and could've screwed up the life his newborn child and now he's a little self-conscious and hesitant about what he's doing to you with his dick. Makes sense, right?
So, yeah, give him time... but how much time? Well, that depends on two things I can only guess at: Why your husband sought a kinky sex partner instead of taking his D/s interests to you and what's going through your husband's head when he's having sex with you now. We can only speculate...
Some kinksters have a hard time opening up about their kinks with people they hope to marry and start a family with. The emotional stakes are high and they don't want to risk getting dumped over something they've been told is "trivial," e.g. their kink(s). So they keep their mouths shut and a decade later they wake up married to someone—and often raising kids with that someone—who doesn't know who they are in one very important way. Only now the emotional/financial/familial stakes are so high that telling the truth feels impossibly dangerous. So they go online and meet someone who shares their kinks and have an affair because cheating seems less risky than revealing their kinks. Telling a spouse about your kinks ten years in is going to feel like—and will most likely be experienced by their spouses as—a deception and/or a very long con.
Or...
Your husband feels shame about his kinks and it was easier for him to be open with this woman because she knew who he was sexually before they'd even met (she'd read his profile). Since their kinks were shared, BAM, his shame was neutralized.
Or... 
Your husband could have a VanillaMadonna/KinkyWhore complex—he could be one of those kinksters who can't do the degrading/rough stuff he fantasizes about with someone he loves, the mother of his children, someone who belongs up on a pedestal with his own mother. Light slapping, bondage, and verbal abuse are for casual partners, not spouses.
Or...
Your husband could be one of those kinksters turned off by the thought of being indulged. Being with someone who's going through the motions to please them—or someone they worry is going through the motions to please them—is a boner killer. They can only explore their kinks with others who share them. If this is the case, your husband could be reluctant to have kinky sex with you even now because he's worried about what's going through your head. Are you judging him? Are you doing it just to please and/or keep him? Are you turned off or annoyed or angry?
Or...
Your husband could be a cheating piece of shit who can't be trusted.
Blah blah blah. I could go on. I did go on. Now let's get to the advice section of the program, shall we?
Here's what you should you do while you give it/him/you two some time: You keep pushing your husband to open up about his kinks with you, BAM, while opening up to him about your kinks, if you have any. You take him at his word about his enjoyment of the sex your having (and initiating) now, BAM, while chalking up whatever awkwardness you perceive to guilt and regret.
You book a few sessions with a kink-positive marriage counselor—you can start looking for one at AASECT.org—so you can keep talking about the sex you're having while gently pressing your husband to open up about his kinks and fetishes and conflicts and issues. You do some reading about kink and you give some thought to getting a sitter down the road and going to some kinky events/readings/parties with your husband. And finally, BAM, you ask yourself what it will mean for your marriage if your husband is one of those kinksters who needs to explore his kinks with other kinksters.
Good luck.
You're making a lot of assumptions there, SHH.
First, you don't know your husband's clients think he's straight. As any in-the-closet kid who's been called a faggot can testify, straight people have a way of knowing things. Also, your husband doesn't know his clients will interpret his omission of the whole truth as a trust issue. His clients, if they haven't been living and clienting under a rock, are likelier to view this omission as less trust issue and more non-issue.
And it's 2017, SHH! People shouldn't assume—the way people once did (gay people included)—that wedding ring = straight. If his clients and coworkers saw a wedding ring and thought, "This man is married to a lady person," they made a dumb assumption.
Another faulty assumption on your part: the politics of your husband's clients. Even if all of them are raging, cuck-hating conservatives, that doesn't necessarily mean they'd stop doing business with a man if they learned he was gay—and not just gay, but precisely the kind of gay raging, cuck-hating conservatives are always saying they prefer, i.e. the kind of gay who doesn't make a "big deal" about it, who doesn't "rub their noses in it," who doesn't say things like, "Hey, in case you noticed my wedding ring, which is right here on the ring finger of my left hand, I wanted to let you know that my spouse is a gentleman person, not a lady person, and we enjoy gentleman-on-gentleman sex, up to and including gentleman-on-gentleman buttsecks, gentleman-on-gentleman anilingus 69ing, etc." It's 2017, SHH. Conservatives know gay people exist. Hell, one of the biggest gay stories of the past year has been the rise and fall of troll and shitstain, Milo Yiannopoulos. That cretin showed us even the most radical conservatives can embrace a gay dude—even a flamboyant gay dude—so long as that gay dude is willing to throw immigrants, Muslims, women, trans people, people of color, lesbians, and other gay men under the bus.
While I do tell LGBT kids who are dependent on their parents for financial support that it's okay to hold off on coming out until they're able to support themselves, that advice doesn't apply here. Nothing changes—families, workplaces, nations—if people refuse to come out until doing so is risk-free. You're right: sometimes honesty hurts. But progress always requires risk and sacrifice. You're both adults, you can get other jobs if shit gets ugly, and your husband can update his resume in advance of the retreat if you're really worried. But you should go, SHH, and risk being your husband's husband publicly. While you're there, be interested but unassuming, don't scan the room for stink-eye (because you'll wind up seeing it whether it's there or not), and retreat to your room and online porn when you need a break from all the straightness. And, hey, if you're able to meet and befriend one of your husband's coworkers (or their spouses) in advance of the trip, you'll go into the retreat knowing you have allies.
Finally, SHH, your question reminded me of the speech ("Never Doubt") that Sen. Tammy Baldwin (D-WI) gave at the Millennium March on Washington in April of 2000...
Never doubt that America will one day realize that her gay, bisexual, and transgendered sons and daughters want nothing more—and nothing less—than the rights accorded every other citizen.
But we must make it so—by daring to dream of a world in which we are free. So, if you dream of a world in which you can put your partner’s picture on your desk, then put his picture on your desk... and you will live in such a world. And if you dream of a world in which you can walk down the street holding your partner’s hand, then hold her hand... and you will live in such a world. If you dream of a world in which there are more openly gay elected officials, then run for office... and you will live in such a world.
And if you dream of a world in which you can take your partner to the office party, even if your office is the U.S. House of Representatives, then take her to the party. I do, and now I live in such a world.
You wanna live in a world where a man can take his husband to a company retreat? Go to that retreat, SHH, and you live in such a world.



Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Welcome to Savage Love, GIBG. We generally don't disguise swear words with asterisks around here ("sh*t"), as you'll see if you stick around, but I appreciate your tact and sensitivity.
Okay, my thoughts on how this played out...
Hindsight being 20/20, GIBG, it's obvious now that you should've had that conversation—the one you had in the car right before you left town—a whole lot sooner. You liked this boy, you liked spending time with him, you liked fucking him, and he liked spending time with and fucking you. But he was hurting you all the while, GIBG, and, putting the most generous gloss on his behavior, he wasn't aware he was hurting you. Your pain may have seemed obvious to you and everyone else at those parties—the way you slipped away when you saw him making out with other girls should've been a clue—but nothing disables the emotional IQs of straight college boys quite like beers and boners. And by the time he knew and/or was made consciously aware that he'd been treating poorly, i.e. by the time you spoke up about your pain, you were pretty much gone—you were out of town before he had a chance to show you he could stop being such an entitled, inconsiderate jerk of a dog.
And now, after your recent visit, you know he's still into you—he spoke to you all night, you work up next to him one morning and possibly two, and he asked you to move back to town.
What could it mean? Maybe it means the easy come/easy blow nature of your relationship before graduation led him to take you for granted. Maybe it means he only realized how strongly he felt about you once you were gone. Maybe it means he wants to be with you. Maybe it means he wants to get serious about you. Maybe it means things would be different. Maybe it means his dog days are over.
Or it might not mean any of that, GIBG. But there's only one way to find out: give it and give him a chance. There's obviously a connection here, and a strong one, but you weren't making demands or setting conditions back in college. To see if things might be different this time, GIBG, make some demands and set some conditions.
You say you don't want any sort of "official relationship" with him, GIBG, but I don't think you really mean that. And if you do mean it, you need to rethink it. You weren't in an official relationship before and it didn't make you feel very good about yourself or about him or about the you two as a unit. So tell him you're not gonna be his FBP, aka "fallback pussy," anymore. That ended with college and day drinking and blackouts. You're gonna be in a relationship with him—and not a casual one or an FWB arrangement/relationship. You're gonna be his girlfriend and he's gonna be your boyfriend and those roles are going to come bundled with a negotiated and mutually agreed to set of expectations and obligations.
If he's down, great—you can start fucking and hanging out once you're back and after you've hashed out those expectations and obligations. If he's not down, GIBG, don't fuck him or hang out with him anymore. No falling back into old patterns, no riding him like a bike, no waking up next to him. This relationship gets a title and a promotion or it gets the sack.
And finally, GIBG, on the dog issue...
Maybe he's done being a dog or maybe he's always gonna be a dog. Ask yourself what you're willing to settle for, ask yourself what price of admission you're willing to pay to be with him, ask yourself if his doggishness wasn't something that attracted you to him initially (answer that one honestly), and ask yourself whether sexual exclusivity is something you want for yourself from him or from anyone else, right now or ever—answer that last one honestly too.
Then hash out those expectations and obligations. Good luck.
P.S. If you can sign me "Rhett," she'll know I'm the writer when I show her your response.
Columbia University’s Mailman School of Public Health released the results of a study on closeted bisexual men earlier this summer. Researchers asked closeted bi men why they're afraid to come out to their female partners about their sexual orientations. Zachary Zane summarized the results in a post at Bi.org:
[Dr. Eric Schrimshaw] found that many men aren’t “confused” about their (bi)sexuality. That’s not the reason for their non-disclosure to their female partners. They know they are attracted to both men and women; however, they aren’t open about their (bi)sexuality because they fear stigma, ridicule, and being outed to others. They also fear judgement and being left by their female partners because of their previous same-sex sexual actions. The study is groundbreaking and influential for a couple of reasons. It is contrary to the popular belief that bisexual men aren’t coming out because they are unsure of their identity.... The fear of ostracization, of excommunication from a religious community, and of having your wife or girlfriend leave you because of your past sexual encounters with men all work to keep bisexual men in the closet.
Double standards are definitely in play when it comes to bisexuality over in Opposite-Sex Land. While most men are only too happy to date bi women, most women are wary about dating bi guys. While female bisexuality is welcome and celebrated in public sex spaces that cater to opposite-sex couples (swingers clubs, parties, conventions, etc.), male bisexuality is unwelcome and stigmatized. And while bisexual-but-heteroamorous women (women like your wife, RHETT) rarely view their own bisexuality as evidence of secret/latent/metastasizing lesbianism, many view male bisexuality as evidence of secret/latent/metastasizing homosexuality. (I have two letters in my inbox from bi guys who were dumped when they came out to their bi girlfriends. Also: there are double standards around bisexuality over in Same-Sex Land too, but they're not relevant to your question, RHETT.) 
So, yeah, you're right to be nervous about coming out to your bisexual wife as bisexual yourself—just as so many other bisexual men are nervous about coming out to their female partners—but I gotta admire how you've already committed yourself to coming out to her as bi, RHETT, which she'll learn when she reads this letter. I also admire the fact that you'll be coming out to your wife about just how important having a same-sex experience is to you. It's so important... you've already contemplated cheating on your wife in order to have it, something else she'll learn when you show her your letter. ("I could make time to have fun with this couple and my wife would never know.") You didn't cheat on her, and that's good, but you were tempted—and that's how bad you want this.
Hopefully your bisexual desire/identity/curiosity won't be a problem for your wife—hopefully she's not a hypocrite who views her own bisexuality one way (exciting!) and her male partner's bisexuality another (distressing!), and hopefully she'll sign off on you playing with that other couple. I would suggest playing with that other couple together, RHETT. If the other woman is also bisexual, and if everyone is attracted to each other, you and the wife could have your first bisexual encounters at the same time, in the same bed, with the same couple.
Sadly I didn't get your email until after I filed next week's column—which is really too bad. Because if your email had arrived earlier and if I were inclined to take advice from random anonymous haters and if I didn't have a loving husband to go home to, VLAD, I might've offed myself before lunch and thereby saved myself the trouble of banging out another one of the unhelpful, degenerate, shameful advice columns that made me rich and famous. As things stand now, though, I've already written next week's column so I might as well hang around at least until it's published.
In the meantime, VLAD, I hope you'll forgive me a degenerate aside: this song has been stuck in my cesspool of a mind all damn day...

...and I blame you, NPR!
This is an easy one.
Your girlfriend—a woman you've only been dating for eight months—is prioritizing her violent-when-drunk ex-boyfriend's housing needs over your physical and emotional safety. So, yeah, you're right to feel apprehensive. And while you say you love this girl, KNIFE, and love is lovely, and I love love, I would argue that you didn't really know this girl until today. And I would encourage you to to reevaluate your feelings about her light of this new information: your girlfriend lives with an ex who's obviously still hung up on her and who can't be trusted not to murder you in your sleep.
Liz Lemon has a catchphrase for that:

For the record: Liz Lemon is wrong about bisexuality and bisexual erasure is not okay and Tina Fey should be ashamed of herself for thinking that was funny and bisexuals absolutely do have a sense of humor and I never really liked 30 Rock and one of the above is a lie. (Spoiler: the last one is a lie.)
As for you, KNIFE: DTMFA.
Twenty five years ago, at the height of the HIV/AIDS epidemic, when people were literally dying in droves, very few people—very few queer people—used condoms when giving blowjobs or dental dams when eating pussy, despite the best efforts of HIV/AIDS orgs to get everyone to use latex barriers for oral sex. Sucking cock and eating pussy was low risk for HIV and people seemed to conclude, en masse, that the relatively small risk contracting HIV through oral was worth the immediate pleasure of latex-free oral sex. And we're talking about steps we were being urged to take in order to protect ourselves from what was, at the time, a deadly virus that was cutting down tens of thousands annually. Even so, very few people used latex for oral. (Fun fact: I was one of the few—one of the ten or eleven gay men who used condoms for oral—and I was treated like a circus freak by my peers.)
Neither of you mention HIV in your questions, PITCH & BI, and it doesn't seem like you're particularly worried about HIV. You're worried about STIs generally—so here's something I told another reader about oral and STIs generally...
Oral sex is less risky. But you can contract and spread syphilis and gonorrhea and herpes and other STIs orally. Striking a reasonable balance between rewards and risks is something adults do all the time, POLLY, and it's certainly not unreasonable to conclude that the rewards of unprotected oral sex are worth the lesser-when-compared-to-unprotected-vaginal-or-anal risks of contracting a sexually transmitted infection. But don't make the mistake of hearing "no risk" when someone says "less risky." There are still risks. And the more people with whom you're having sex—and the more people the people with whom you're have sex are having sex—the greater your odds become of contracting a sexually transmitted infection.
The only way to eliminate any and all risk of contracting an STI—the only way to be completely safe—is not have any kind of sex save phone or cyber, with anyone, ever. Not even a monogamous relationship can eliminates the risk of contracting an STI:
Being in a serious relationship has a lot of perks, but protection from sexually transmitted diseases (STDs) may not be one of them. According to a recent study, couples in monogamous relationships are just as likely to get an STD than those who openly have multiple sexual partners. The reason for this surprising conclusion? Infidelity.
So in answer to your question, PITCH: By giving head "bareback" you risk exposure to all the awful STIs out there. Don't want to risk contracting an STI? Use condoms for oral or be stay home and jack off. But if you love giving head and hate sucking on condoms... accept the risks and suck the dicks. (And get tested regularly.)
And in answer to your question, BI: If you don't want to use the dams and if your partners are okay with not using dams and if you're comfortable with the risks... you don't have to use dams. So long as you're not pressuring anyone to go latex-free, so long as you're really asking and really listening and really willing to cheerfully use dams when requested, you aren't being shitty or patriarchal by putting your preference for dam-free oral on the table.
You too trusted the wrong person, OAU, and you don't have anything to say you're sorry for. Look people in the eye when you speak about it—when you speak briefly about it—then change the subject.
Finally: Check to see if you live in a state that has laws against revenge porn. If you do, lawyer up, call the cops, and press charges.
My response after the jump...
Perhaps I should've said that threesomes rarely happen naturally, GGT, while emphasizing that individual results may vary. But a relationship is far likelier to survive an "unnatural" threesome—one that has been planned in advance—than it is to survive a spontaneous threesome. Unsexy negotiations about limits and boundaries, hashing out what is and is not okay, and discussions about STIs and birth control are nearly impossible to have as your clothes are coming off. So threesomes that people drink, massage, or strip-poker their way into are likelier to result in the kind of hurt feelings that lead to breakups and make all threesomes, spontaneous or planned, look dangerous and risky.
My response after the jump...
Asexuality is a real thing, PAUSE, and your daughter could be an intelligent and phenomenal example. That said... for some, asexuality has functioned as an opt-out-of-this-sex-stuff-until-later thing. But just as some gay men identifying as bisexual before coming out as gay doesn't mean bisexuality is a phase (or nonexistent), the fact that some people identify as asexual before ultimately coming out as—here we go—heterosexual, homosexual, bisexual, pansexual, graysexual, demisexual, autosexual, antisexual, hyposexual, etc., etc., etc. isn't proof that asexuality isn't a real thing.
Keep listening to your daughter, PAUSE, and learn more about asexuality at the Asexuality Visibility and Education Network (asexuality.org).
My response after the jump...
You can certainly negotiate a "one-and-done" agreement, WAW, but if you find the idea of pissing on your boyfriend upsetting—if the thought doesn't just leave you cold but actually revolts and/or traumatizes you—then you don't have to go through with it. (You're not trapped in some piss-fetish version of The Merchant of Venice, WAW. You don't need a Portia to rescue you from this verbal contract.) As for sexy, safe, and sanitary: You don't have to find it sexy, he's not going to drown, droppeth your gentle rain upon him in the tub.
Thanks for sharing!
I passed your letter along to some super smart, super helpful folks who've opened, who own, or who help to run sex-positive shops all over the country, ASOMO.
Evy Cowan and Jeneen Doumitt, co-founders and co-owners of Portland's SheBop:
Evaluate your focus, while education is a large part of what we do as a sex positive business, it is still ultimately a business and you need the skills to manage and run that business. The first thing you need to do is write a business plan. Your business plan is essential to keep you focused on your mission and goals. As a sex related business, you will most likely experience discrimination from banks, landlords, and other people and organizations you may not expect. Even as a sex positive shop, finding a brick and mortar location can be more challenging than you think and location can make or break any business.
Jennifer Pritchett, owner and founder of Minneapolis's Smitten Kitten:
1. I was 25 when I opened Smitten Kitten! You can do this! But you'll need help. Line up a business advisory team that includes a lawyer who specializes in helping entrepreneurs and an equally small-business oriented Accountant. I didn't have this—rookie mistake!
2. Funding your start up will be extra challenging and typical ways of raising capital (bank Loans and, more recently, crowd-funding) won't be available to you due to the perceived risk of adult retail business. Don't fret though, you can get this off the ground with as little as $35,000.
3. Open in a neighborhood that you are intimately familiar with and know your municipal zoning laws better than the people who wrote them!
4.  When in doubt, reach out for help! Smitten Kitten's mission to make ethical, safe and top quality adult retail and sex education accessible to everyone INCLUDES helping new entrepreneurs like you!
Before you inhale your new beau's dick—or suggest inhaling his dick—check to make sure this surgical procedure that for now prevents him from engaging in intercourse doesn't also preclude blowjobs. If your new beau can guarantee you, a la Donald Trump, that there’s no problem down there, HUNGER, then you can make your move.
A move you will make with your words, HUNGER. You're going to open mouth and words are gonna fall out before dick falls in.
And this is not going to be a difficult conversation to have, HUNGER. No man wants to act like his current GF's shitty ex-boyfriend, HUNGER, and most men like blowjobs. So open with something along the lines of, "My ex was a sex-shaming asshole who made me feel bad about something I really liked to do in bed. I hope you're not like my ex. I hope I can be open with you about my desires and that you won't make me feel bad about them." Your current beau will insist he's nothing like your ex, he'll assure you that you can be open with him, and he'll promise not to shame you—and then he'll have to live up to those promises.
And since you're talking about wanting to suck his cock here, HUNGER, and not wanting to shit in his muesli or tear out his toenails, he'll most likely jump at the chance to live up to those promises. Because, again, most men like blowjobs and the women who give them. The odds are definitely in your favor.
There is a male equivalent to unicorns, ODDS. They're called "men."
Straight and bi men who are willing to sleep with a couple, or sleep with the woman while the male half of the couple watches, are relatively easy to find. There's nothing all that special about them. Women who are into swinging or open to sleeping with established couples, on the other hand, are a hell of a lot harder to come by, come on, and come in. They're so hard to find, in fact, that swingers and couples looking for a regular third long ago began joking about how these women are mythical beasts, aka "unicorns." And the term stuck.
What accounts for this disparity?
Well, women open to sexual adventure have a lot working against them—from the very real threat of sexual violence to slut shaming and other forms of social conditioning that leave many women feeling less in touch with their desires and even more women feeling less entitled to act on their desires.
As for the "no single men" rules at almost all swingers parties, ODDS, your boyfriend is right: a swingers party that allowed single men to attend would quickly be overwhelmed by single men. Even if the club enforced rules against groups of men surrounding single women or MF pairs or MFF triads and jerking off while they watch—or, worse yet, single men clumsily attempting to insert themselves into the action—most women wouldn't feel comfortable attending a party where there were three hundred men and thirty women. Too much male energy—too many single men without the social skills to find (or rent) a female friend or lover who wants to attend a swingers party with them—would result in women fleeing the swinging party/club/scene en masse.
So while it may seem like an unfair rule, ODDS, and while it may indeed be an unfair rule—unfair to single men, unfair to women who might like a 300/30 ratio of male-to-female party attendees—the organized swinging scene would collapse without it.
Finally, ODDS, not allowing single men to attend swingers parties isn't about perpetuating "a patriarchal view of the sexes." It's about controlling for those patriarchal views. Single men* at swingers parties often misbehave because, like men in so many other situations, they feel entitled to be there, entitled to touch, and entitled to take what they want... because, you know, patriarchy and patriarchal views and toxic masculinity and testosterone is a derp serum.
* Not all single men. I realize. There are good, respectful single guys out there who could be trusted to behave themselves at swingers parties. But the ratio thing would still be a problem, as would misbehaving/clueless/entitled single males.
P.S. A related issue. He has only had one other partner himself, who he was with for nearly five years and in all that time they didn't use protection. He told me the last time he and his ex had sex was six months ago, and they ended the relationship because he found out his ex cheated on him and that the ex had a cocaine addiction. He said he's never been checked for STIs so my fear is that there's no telling how many times his ex cheated on him or what STIs he could have passed him, considering they didn't use protection. Should I insist that we both get checked together before doing anything? We've only been on three dates, and this all feels like it's moving so fast for me, which is one reason why I think I'm freaking out so much. I would really love any advice you can give.
Welcome out, T34YOV—out of the closet, most importantly, out from under whatever sex-and-reality-phobic "faith" you had the bad luck to be born into or the misfortunate of falling prey to. There is no heaven, no hell, no salvation, no damnation. There's only life and time and good works and, if you're lucky, some love, sex, and punschkrapfen along the way.
Anyway...
Definitely find a therapist—discussing your fears around sex with someone who isn't trying to climb on your dick might be helpful—but keep seeing Mr. Coffee too. Keep talking with him, keep making out with him cars, and keep being honest with him.
And keep taking it slow—even once you start having sex, T34YOV, you can take it slow. Instead of "biting the bullet" and powering through every last gay sex act in a single night, tell Mr. Coffee that you wanna masturbate together the first few times you have sex. You've watched some gay porn, I'm guessing, and porn makes gay sex look like extreme spelunking. Well, I'm here from the gay future with an important message: You can have intimate, satisfying, sack-draining, kick-ass sex without disappearing his dick down your throat or up your ass or disappearing yours up or down him. As an added benefit, T34YOV, rolling around, kissing, and masturbating together (to be clear: you jerk yourself, he jerks himself, you jerk each other) is extremely low risk for the truly worrying sexually transmitted infections. Keep it non-penetrative, keep spunk out of and off each other's holes, and you should be fine.
That said, T34YOV, some STIs can be transmitted through skin-to-skin contact, such as HPV and herpes. You can be vaccinated against HPV (if your doc tells you you're too old, tell him you're a virgin and insist on being vaccinated), but there's no such thing as a risk-free non-solo sex life. The CDC has a good fact sheet on STI risks, treatments, and prevention strategies for gay and bi men. But at a certain point you have to accept that there will be always be a degree of risk. We accept a certain degree of risk every time we go for a drive or eat chicken salad. We wear our seat belts, we cook those chicken breasts thoroughly... but some of us are going to be taken out by car accidents and salmonella birds just the same. That doesn't stop us from enjoying the chicken salad. Because it's delicious.
Same goes for dick, T34YOV. Take steps to mitigate risks: you should both be tested (he needs to be tested, you should get tested in solidarity and to get into the habit), use condoms when you decide you're ready to do some gay spelunking, and consider getting on PREP.
But at a certain point, T34YOV, you have to let yourself enjoy the dick. Because it's delicious.
* I was using condoms and on hormonal birth control.
** I was in a volatile relationship with a charismatic, manipulative and controlling POS, and I ignored it until I was faced with being tied to him for life.
Thanks for writing in, TFL, and seriously: fuck that guy—if your version of events is accurate, I mean, then fuck that guy.
One of the limitations of this tawdry sub-literary genre—the wrench in the works, the turd in the punchbowl, the sand in the lube—is that the person giving advice only has the version of events provided by the person asking for advice. Sometimes advice givers can spot an advice requester's self-serving lie/lies and call them on it/them, TFL, but we usually have to take the details we've been given at face value and dish out advice accordingly. Every response could and perhaps should begin with a qualifier like, "If the version of events you've provided me with is accurate, advice requester, then my advice to you would be..." (Or in this case: "I'm going to assume you haven't been sleeping with sex workers throughout your marriage and also that you're not a complete asshole...")
But the sad fact goes like this: If a advice requester omits pertinent and/or incriminating details and their bullshit/bullshitting isn't obvious or spottable... well, omniscience isn't one of the qualifications for this gig. But rest assured, TFL: my advice for NCA would've been very different if your letter had come in at the same time, or if I could've subpoenaed and deposed all involved before writing up my response (my fondest wish), or if, indeed, I were omniscient.
Knowing what I know now... and taking your version of events at face value... I would tell NCA that he was, indeed, a CPOS, and I would encourage him to refrain from making monogamous commitments he cannot keep and to remain in counseling until he gets a handle on his issues around sex, honesty, and assholery—and also to apologize to your friend, TFL, his soon-to-be/well-rid-of-him ex.
So... your mooch-in girlfriend—sorry, your live-in girlfriend—didn't let you know about the deadline for moving back into the dorms until after it had passed.
How convenient.
And forgive me, PIKACHU, but how do you know she can't afford to find a place of her own? Presumably because the same person (that would be her) who misled you about moving back into the dorms is now telling you she can't afford to go to college and pay rent too. So you have that from a highly unreliable source. And while I'm on a suspicious tear: Have you personally called the university to see if the deadline for moving into the dorms has really has come and gone? If not, you should. And while you have the university on the phone, PIKACHU, ask if there's a late-admissions process for students who need to get their asses into a dorm room ASAP.
You're being taken advantage of, PIKACHU. She's been living with you rent-free for months and somehow she's broker than she was back when she paid to live in the dorms? Yeah, no. It's time to start prioritizing your mental and physical health over the needs of someone who sounds to me like manipulative POS—a judgment I'm making with the limited info I have on hand. But good person in a fix or bad person playing you, PIKACHU, either way she has to go. Pick a date three weeks from now and tell she has to be out by then.
If her family can't help her with the rent, PIKACHU, she can take out a student loan—but I bet you anything she suddenly finds a room she can afford somewhere once she has no choice.
Your husband, the sexual basket case who wears a condom to prevent your pussy from getting his dick dirty, and your lover, the sexual superstar whose poorly self-moderated "jealousy and paranoia issues" will only get worse if he abandons his family so you two can start your lives over together, are not the only two men on the planet. You mentioned friends with benefits—friends, plural. I would suggest you give your longterm affair partner a call and tell him it's over, WIFE, and give some of your old FWBs a call and tell them your benefits are once again available.
Then drag your husband back to counseling and insist on talking about your sex issues—you didn't get around to it last time because you didn't bring it up—not with the goal of fixing them. Your husband sounds hopelessly broken. No, the goal here is to obtain your husband's permission to do what you're already doing. Your marriage is not about a sexual connection and never has been—and your husband knows it. Your marriage is about comfort, ease, and team, right? Celebrate what works and then tell your husband, with your counselor's assistance, that you wanna keep the team together but on one condition. (If keeping this team together is what you really wanna do, WIFE. I'd pull the plug if I were you.) You can both fuck other people—he has your permission to get his dick-dirtying needs met elsewhere and you require his permission to dirty other dicks. And, again, it's not a negotiation: openness is a condition for you to stay in this marriage.
And if you find yourself tempted to run back to/run off with your current long-distance lover, WIFE, please look up at the red flag he's waving over his head. Jealousy/control and paranoia issues rarely improve with the passage of time—and I'm concerned that you're already making excuses for a guy whose issues (repeat after me: they're his issues) have already made you a few kinds of miserable. You say his jealous/paranoid outbursts are "not completely unwarranted as we did start out as an affair." Nope. All humans experience jealousy. Insecurity is fine and human and understandable and, given the circumstances, a need for some reassurance is also fine and human and understandable.
But when jealousy and insecurity are expressed in "flare ups," which sounds to me like a face-saving gloss on "explosive rage," it's not about jealousy or insecurity. It's about power and control—and it usually ends in abuse, emotional and sometimes physical. Stop offering excuses to him and making excuses for him. There are other GGG guys out there that you'll click with, I promise.
Sell the fucking house—even if you lose money, which you probably won't (the market is nuts right now), sell that fucking house.
Zooming out for a second, DTMFA...
I urge people to exit relationships without bitterness or regret, DTMFA, whenever possible. People have it in their heads that Things Must End Ugly—that if there aren't hard feelings and recriminations and drama then there were no strong feelings there in the first place—but amicable partings are doable in situations where all involved have conducted themselves mostly honorably, strived to treat each other with respect, and made a good-faith effort to avoid inflicting gratuitous pain. It's harder to do—it's harder to part amicably—when someone has behaved badly, shabbily, inconsiderately, etc., and inflicted shitloads of pain on their way out. Such would seem to the case here. Even if your ex knew she wanted out, DTMFA, she behaved badly on her way out—she was inconsiderate and inflicted gratuitous pain. But I don't have to tell you that, right?
A little more outward zooming...
A secondary relationship overtaking the primary relationship is a fear in a lot of open and poly relationships. It's feels crappy to spend six months "working on your fears and jealousy issues" only to see your fears confirmed. (Point of order: monogamous commitments don't immunize people from jealousy and people in monogamous relationships leave their partners for other people every damn day.) I don't know if this will come as a comfort to you or not, DTMFA, but your ex may have been seduced by the honeymoon phase of hew new relationship, something the poly crowd calls "new relationship energy" or NRE. Poly people who don't see NRE for what it is—who don't see it and can't see past it—wind up flitting from one new partner/love-of-their-life to another. That sure sounds like what happened here, DTMFA, and if that's what happened... your ex's new 2.5 month relationship isn't likely to last. Regardless, DTMFA, it's time for you to move on.
It's perfectly acceptable for you to be jealous and angry and even briefly bedridden in the wake of a traumatic breakup. Go ahead and feel the shit out of your feelings. Give yourself some time each day to stay in bed and/or rage a little bit—but set a time limit. When your daily rage/stay-in-bed time is up, make yourself get out of bed and leave the house to do something constructive. (Like, oh, meeting with a real estate agent about listing your house?) Exercise can give you a routine that helps you get back on your feet, DTMFA, and be sure to eat something over the course of the day. Eventually, slowly, you'll get out of this funk, but it'll take time. Maybe a lot of time.
As for the friendships you allowed to whither over the last eight years, my recent-ish advice to GAYMAN applies...
Reach out to friends you lost touch with over the last five years, apologize for letting these relationships go, and ask if they'd like to reconnect. Not all will, GAYMAN—some might be too angry to reconnect right now (you may hear from them later), some might not have any available friendship bandwidth right now (ditto). Focus on friends who want to reconnect, and don't be bitter about friends who don't.
You're right to still believe in open relationships, DTMFA, as open relationships are a thing that exists and there are plenty of examples of successful open relationships. (Examples of successful ones include both those that are ongoing and those that ended amicably.) And as you get some distance from this relationship—physical distance (SELL THAT HOUSE) and chronological distance—you'll have a better perspective on the eight years you spent with your ex. It may hard to see anything of value in the immediate wake of this breakup, DTMFA, but as the pain subsides you'll be able to recall the good times and personal growth. The day may even come day when you're able to appreciate the good in your ex.
You may never be friends, DTMFA, but that doesn't mean you have to be enemies.


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
I'm on vacation*, KIDNAP, and I'm trying to take it easy this week. So instead of lining up some docs for you—which would be difficult** from this time zone—I fired up the Google instead.
Take it away, Toxipedia: 
Chloroform was discovered in 1831 and was a widely used anesthetic first employed by James Young Simpson, a professor of midwifery at Edinburgh University and doctor to Queen Victoria (#Baskerville, 1911). He used it first on himself on November 4, 1847, but it soon became clear that there were very serious side effects associated with its use, and it caused death in a number of instances (#Wawersik, 1998 and #Duffy, 2007).... Chronic exposure to chloroform is associated with effects on the liver, kidney, and central nervous system. There is little evidence that chloroform has negative effects on the reproductive system. The International Agency for Research on Cancer has listed chloroform as a possible carcinogen.
Knocking someone out with chloroform isn't as easy and quick as they made it look on Dukes of Hazard and Batman and The Hardy Boys and Charlie's Angels and Wonder Woman and all the other classic kink-inducing television programs. So you're gonna have to just say no to the chloroform your kinky buddy found on the Internet. This fantasy is best explored through role play, KIDNAP, and pretending to be knocked out isn't that hard. That's how they did it on Dukes of Hazard, Batman, The Hardy Boys, et al.
* Jill Stein offered to put me up in a nice villa in the Bavarian Alps if I would leave the country and stay off the Internet while I was gone.
** I thought about calling Jill, because she's a doctor, but I wouldn't trust your health and wellbeing, KIDNAP, to a "doctor" who panders to anti-vaxxers. 
1. Meet, have drinks, and talk, FUNGAL—and be sure to tell that nice, funny, attractive couple everything you've told us. And then do what any sane person would do: Fuck 'em if it feels right, don't if it doesn't.
2. Refuse to accept money in exchange for sex—don't let the nice couple pay you—and you won't be a sex worker. (Not that there's anything wrong with being a sex worker.) And if you've only ever had sex in the context of a relationship, and if you want it to stay that way, then make that clear to the nice couple: Developing a relationship with you is a requirement before you can all jump into bed together. And they'll probably be up for it, FUNGAL, as most couples who are out there looking for unicorns—which is hard work—are seeking a regular, reliable third, i.e., someone they see again and again, someone they can get to know better and come to trust and rely on. A couple with a regular third that they're emotionally invested in may not be what comes to mind when people hear the word "relationship," but it is a relationship, and it can be a fun and rewarding one.
3. Again, tell this couple everything you've told us. The only reason you hesitate, FUNGAL, is that you fear rejection. Your fear is thoroughly common, completely understandable, and totally irrational. I mean, think about it: The reason you're hesitating to tell them that you're not bisexual—that you have no interest in putting your face in a twat (but you're up for having her face in yours if she's cool with no-recip oral)—is that you worry you'll be rejected. What if you're not what they want? But if they have their hearts set on a unicorn that wants to go facedown in twat,then you're the wrong unicorn for them. More importantly, FUNGAL, they're the wrong couple for you. Better to have a nice, clean, honest rejection over cocktails—a mutual recognition that you're not a match—than to find yourself in bed being pressured to do something you don't wanna do.
In your fifties, married 30 years, still having sex 2-3 times a month — and sometimes more than that, in hard-to-predict bursts over the course of a weekend, when the planets are all aligned correctly or whatever? Most long-married couples your age are having a lot less sex than that, if they're having sex at all. So that seems like a pretty good foundation on which to build, ROSIE. 
But the sex you're having isn't great — it's not getting her off and it's not knocking your socks off. But despite the underwhelming nature of the sex you're having, and despite the underwhelming amount of sex you're having (or what feels to you like an underwhelming amount of sex), your wife is clearly invested in being perceived to as a sexual being — by your friends and acquaintances, by your grown kids, and by you (so she grabs your dick, grabs your ass). A frustrating state of affairs — but what can you do about it?
Well, ROSIE, you're going to have to talk about it. You're going to have to use your words.
In all honesty, ROSIE, I think you and the wife should get some strong pot or get your hands on some good MDMA and have a no-holes-barred conversation about your sex life stoned or rolling. What you're doing now — which, reading between the lines, seems to focus entirely on (or default entirely to) on PIV intercourse — isn't working for either of you. So blow it the fuck up. Open up to each other about your fantasies, ask her what's going through her mind when she grabs your dick, talk about scenarios, kinks, and people that get you both going. Agree to take PIV off the menu for a while and pledge to find new ways to get off together — including masturbating together. Present her with a selection of vibrators during that convo, get yourself a few toys too, and swear a blood oath to put them to use.
And, yes, tell her you're frustrated by the disconnect between her sex talk and your sex life. Ask her what she's trying to communicate when she grabs your dick or your ass — and tell her, from now on, when she does that... you're going to go jack off and she's welcome to join you. Then do it.
Good luck.
Dan Savage would get his siblings on the phone and propose a plan: holiday hosting duties for mum on an annual rotation. Each sibling takes a year/one for the team, the other siblings get a break, the kids get to enjoy a majority of their Christmases until mum finally croaks. Since there are at least three surviving siblings in your family, CWL, you would get to enjoy two-thirds of your Christmases—if you can get your siblings on board.
As for this year, you'll either have to tell mum she can't come—no room? no patience?—or you'll have to put up with her shit. Train yourself to tune out her hurtful comments, refuse to be drawn into conversations on topics that allow mum to get her digs in, and practice aggressively changing the subject, CWL, so that if and when mum starts in on your housekeeping/parenting/cooking/whatever, you'll be prepared.
Make sure there's plenty of wine and pot in the house—and dropping by this handy website can help keep your current familial conflicts in perspective while also making you feel optimistic for the future.

DTMFA.
It's been a kinda week here at Savage Love, Inc.
I promise to dig through the mail next week, dear readers, and find some LWs whose relationships might be salvageable—with a little of my advice, and some of yours. But some weeks there's nothing in the mailbag but DTMFA situations and this has been one of those weeks.
Anyway, DRUNKS, the bell knells for thine marriage presently—but it's gonna be knelling for thee soon, if thee don't get out of there. Your wife may be a lovely person, but you're going to die of alcoholism, alcohol poisoning, and/or the enabling of one alcoholic by another if you don't pack up your liver and leave.
You know what you need to do—it's clear in your letter that you do—and now you have my permission to do it. That is what you wanted, right? I thought so. Let's hope it's enough to get you out of there.

DTMFA.
Your partner has control issues, BLIND, just like TBE's partner.
And just like TBE, BLIND, you're going to have end this relationship. I lost count of the number of red flags that flapped past while I was reading — but slogging through your long letter felt like watching a May Day parade go by in Moscow in 1981. Controlling behavior? Check. Unverifiable tales of woe that make him sound like the victim? Check. Going through your phone? Check. Vague threats? Check. Moving to isolate you from family members? Check. Physically abusing you, i.e. doing things he knows cause you physical discomfort? Check.
Of course he's charming. Of course the sex is good. Of course there's a "now for the good" section to your letter. Letters like yours always come with a "now for the good" section. No one would get involved with an abuser if there wasn't an upside, some redeeming qualities, a long list of seemingly good reasons to stick around and hope for the best. The problem, BLIND, is that by the time you realize you've gotta get out—by the time he hits you or his jealously makes your life unbearable or both—you'll be married to this man, living in another city, isolated from your friends and family, and you'll be tempted to give him another last chance because getting out will seem impossible.
So get out now, while it's possible.

DTMFA.
Your partner has serious control issues — he's manipulative and emotionally abusive — and you need to grab your kid and go. Read this first, all the way through, and maybe spend some money on a lawyer. And document, if you can (copy emails, save texts), your partner's consent, encouragement, and assistance in the sex work you've been doing, TBE, as he may try to use that against you in a custody dispute.
This guy is an asshole. You deserve better. Get out of there.

Did you look at porn when you were 13, POPS?
Probably. Scratch that: definitely.
So what would you have wanted your dad to do if he stumbled over the porn you were looking at when you were your son's age?
Do that.
Also, now you know your son could be gay or bi. He could just be straight and curious, POPS, but the gay or bi odds are better. So how do you approach that? Directly through indirection.
You have to make sure your son knows you love and accept him regardless of his sexual orientation. This is something parents should do early and often in the lives of their kids, POPS, because the failure to do so can lead to tragedy. The time to tell your closeted kid that their coming out would be met with a "wealth of love and acceptance" is before that kid attempts suicide, not after. And since we can't tell—or can't always tell—which kid is queer and closeted, parents need to err on the side of telling all their kids that they would be showered with love and acceptance if they should ever come out as gay, lesbian, bi, or trans.
But running up to 13-year-old boy and saying, "Hey, saw your porn on your phone, kiddo, it's totally cool if you're into dudes!" might drive him deeper into the closet. So, again, best to address this one, at this time, with a little indirection. Let your son overhear you condemning homophobia—a national election affords many opportunities—and if you have gay friends, POPS, invite them over to dinner. If your son hears you voice your support for equality for LGBT people and sees you treat LGBT people with love and acceptance and then, POPS, he’ll know he can safely come out to you when he's ready.
You can consider the above advice null and void should you stumble over evidence that your son is doing something dangerous — cruising hookup apps, posting pictures of himself online, arranging to meet someone. Then you'll have to set indirection aside, tell your son what you already know, and have a nice, long talk about his sexuality and his safety.

If the culprit isn't the underwear or pants you're wearing—and it almost certainly isn't—you may have a condition known as a "buried penis." (Trigger warning: Googling "buried penis" yields some harrowing results.) Dr. Van Ginger, a urologist at The Polyclinic, explains:
"While not harmful, a 'buried penis' can be uncomfortable. As you have noted, the appearance of a buried penis can look like a turtle hiding its head in the buried shaft skin. One can be born with this condition with detachment of skin from the underlying penile shaft. Gaining weight will make it worse. Certain positions such as leaning over during biking can further bury the penis. One surgery, known among urologists as a 'wacker tacker,' can fix this condition. However, if it is just a buried penis, it is perfectly fine to live the rest of your life this way without surgery. But if it bothers you, go see your local urologist." 
So, HIP, you could look into surgeries like the unfortunately named "wacker tacker," but that's only necessary if the frightened turtle in your pants is causing you pain. ("Wacker tacker," by the way, is safe to google and mostly results in tools from Home Depot.) It doesn't seem like your buried penis is causing you too much trouble, but you should ask a urologist to take a look at your cock if the problem gets worse.
Like you said, HIP, your penis works fine for sex and pissing. Doctors aren't concerned, and it doesn't seem like your sex partner/partners is/are complaining. The real issue is how new and strange this is for you. And sure, it may be a late in life surprise, but remember: there's no standard penis. From micropenises to monsterdongs to ones that point up or point down or ones that are pierced or split, penises are... varied. But if it's a real issue, there's always the wacker tacker!


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
When you first started dating him... he was "available," CANDID, after 20+ years of marriage. And unless your girlfriends are conspiring to destroy your happiness for shits and giggles, CANDID, he behaved then in ways that made your girlfriends uncomfortable. Your girlfriends were right to share their misgivings/discomfort with you—and it would be foolish of you not to ask other girlfriends if a man you're thinking about marrying did anything to make them feel uncomfortable.
Then what? 
Speak to him about it. This is a perfect topic to address during a counseling session. Frame the convo like this: What exactly happened, what exactly was he thinking, and when exactly did he come to realize this kind of behavior was a problem and when exactly did he resolve to knock it off? If indeed he has come that realization and has knocked it off. Ask him about boundaries and respect and be completely honest about the impact these revelations had on you: they caused you to have some doubt about your future together.
If this wonderful man reacts with anger, rationalizations, or accusations ("Your friends have always had it in for me!"), then he doesn't get the benefit of the doubt. You'll need to stay in counseling until he pulls through, i.e. until he understands why his behavior was a problem, or until you give up and pull out, CANDID, whichever comes first.
But if he reacts with contrition and self-awareness—if he knows he overstepped boundaries and feels bad about it, if he had already come to understand that his behavior was a problem and resolved to do bette  (which would explain why nothing untoward has happened since we got back together)—then maybe he gets the benefit of the doubt.
Either way, CANDID, some additional intelligence gathering, a few more counseling sessions, and some blunt talk are all in order.

DTMFA.
Your current girlfriend, however amazingly sweet she seems when she's not wishing a painful death on a person she's never met and who hasn't harmed her in any way, is not a well woman. What your soon-to-be-ex-girlfriend needs a therapist, CHE, or a team of therapists. What she doesn't need is a boyfriend.
You're not doing her any favors by sticking around. Quite the opposite. Your soon-to-be-ex-girlfriend has no incentive to get well—she has no reason to work on her shit, to get over those painful expectations heaped on her in childhood, to stop blaming her race or her upbringing for her anger issues—so long as that shit, pain and anger all continue to work for her. And every time you go running back to her, every moment you spend reassuring her, attempting to soothe her, trying to mollify her, CHE, that's her shit and her pain and her anger working. It working on you, it working for her.
As for you, CHE, blaming or hating your ex doesn't just sound irrational. It is irrational. So it would appear that whatever your girlfriend has, whatever ails her, it's catching.
Your girlfriend isn't healthy enough to love you or anyone else and you described your relationship is a nightmare. Wake up and get out.

P.S. You are one of the reasons that I finally decided to start having a sex life. I heard you being interviewed on CBC once and I started listening to Savage Lovecast, as have my children. They have heard me agree with you about open marriages. You helped me accept my unconventional marriage and to see that although we don't have a sexual relationship we have had a good marriage. Thanks for that.
Years ago my mother sat me down for a little talk.
I had come out to her, but not to my father. I had come out to one of my siblings, but not the other two. I had come out to some of my aunts and uncles, but not to all of them. My mother was having a hard time keeping track of who knew and who didn't know and this was putting her in some extremely awkward situations. The final straw: I was in a play in high school where my character got married and my parents came to opening night. And when I came on stage in a tux and stood next to a girl in a wedding dress and another one of the actors pretended to marry tuxedoed me to bedazzled her... my mother burst into tears. It was a comedy but all you could hear during the last ten minutes was my mother sobbing her eyes out.
My father kept asking her what was wrong. And my mother couldn't say, "Danny is a gay homosexual and I'm crying because he's never going to get married* because he's a gay homosexual," as that would mean outing me to my father, something I had made her promise not to do.
A few days later my mother sat me down to tell me I hadn't really come to her or anyone else. "When you told me you were gay and then swore me to secrecy, Daniel, you didn't come to me. You yanked me in with you. You pulled me into the closet too." The secret I struggled to keep from her had become a secret she was now struggling to keep for me, and she hated secrets—and closets—just as much as I did.
"So come out if you're going to come out," she said, "but stop playing games. You're not being fair to me."
Your husband isn't being fair to you, MOM.
What your husband did to you and is still doing to you — coming out to you, swearing you to secrecy, doing "what he wanted" while you were raising the children and running "a very gay-positive household" — wasn't and isn't fair, MOM, and you've found yourself in an extremely awkward situation as a result. (And probably not for the first time.) One of your sons thinks his mom is cheating on his dad... or maybe he thinks that text was meant for his dad and his parents kinkier than he ever needed to know. Or, hey, maybe he thinks you're cheating on your dad with a woman. (I don't know exactly how revealing/incriminating your text was, but it's a long way from "I have some new sexy lingerie and stockings for you to model for me" to "mom is cheating on dad with some woman who can't afford to buy her own lingerie.")
The real issue, as I see it, is this: Your children are grown and your marriage is sexless and companionate, MOM, and has been for more than two decades—sexless, companionate, and successful! And now that you have the time and space in your life for some independence, now that your libido is back, you shouldn't have to sneak around or live in fear of being discovered, shamed, or judged by your own children. You also don't want your children to think ill of you or—contra your husband's example/preference—to believe something about you that isn't true.
Try my mother's approach—meaning: take a stab at guilting your husband into coming out to your kids already (two-thirds of whom are gay themselves!). But if he won't come out, MOM, go ahead and tell the kids your half of the truth. Your sex life with your husband ended more than two decades ago—through no fault of your own—and you stayed because you genuinely loved your husband and you wanted to keep your family together. Your marriage was about parenting and mutual support, not about sex (much less sexual exclusivity). Your husband sought sex outside the relationship with your knowledge and consent (you don't have to say "with dudes") while you focused on taking care of the kids and running the household. And now that your kids are grown and out of the house... you're doing some exploring of your own with your husband's knowledge and consent. You don't have any intention of getting divorced—you still love each other—but you wanted them to know that no one is being betrayed. (Well, I'd say it was a betrayal for your husband to marry you 28 years ago, knock you up three times, and then announce he was gay. We're talking about 1988 here, not 1958.)
Apologize to your straight son for the stray email and whatever mental images it may have conjured up. Warn your kids not to pry or snoop, lest they discover things they don't want to know and can't unknow, and remind them that parents have a right to privacy too. Then go have as much fun as you possibly can Femdomming the shit out of your lingerie-modeling foot fetishist playmate. You deserve it, MOM.
* This was long before marrying a dude was an option.

You could try Adult Friend Finder or BiCupid—and, hey, Christian Mingle is servicing queers now.
But you live in what the United States Census Bureau calls, “the largest and most sparsely populated U.S. state,” a state long known for “wide-open spaces, mountains, [and] forests,” ALASKA, and recently known for its idiotic ex-half-term governor and her feral children. The odds that you'll find an Alaska-based playmate on some other site seem long. Alaska has a population of just 737,625 people, fewer than half are women, and only a tiny percentage of that already tiny number of women are going to be queer, looking, open to being your “playmate,”  attracted to you and vice-versa. Your best bet is a move to a more densely populated part of the country/world. If you have to stay put, ALASKA, expand your search to include cities like Vancouver, Seattle, Portland, and San Francisco, and fly south if an opportunity for adventure presents itself.

I have some thoughts—I always do—but in your case, FIFOCFB, the thoughts of actual sex workers should carry more weight than mine and would doubtless have more value. So I tossed your question on Twitter, tagged some smart and insightful sex workers I know, and sat back and listened as they kicked your question around on Twitter. I've edited their responses for pace and clarity, FIFOCFB, and you'll find them below. If you're interested in sex work—as a profession, as an issue, as a cause—you should be following these folks. (Some names I don't recognize jumped into the conversation, FIFOCFB, so not everyone on this list may be a sex worker. But everyone was smart and helpful and you should follow them all.)
@MistressMatisse: My answer to @fakedansavage's reader letter is: I personally do not accept people as clients if I've been friends with them socially. But that is partly because I'm a dominatrix and some fantasies and D/s rely on a certain level of mystery and distance. Definitely via email, NOT in person. Tell her it's cool if she doesn't feel comfortable. And accept it will change things.
@BringMeTheAx: "How's business? Are you taking new clients? Would you be open to seeing me professionally?" Best approach I can think of. As mentioned, the prior relationship could make it awkward. As any client should, if she declines to see him, LW should accept that graciously.
@MissLaraBelle: I would choose one of the zillion other SWs where boundaries are not an issue. The question can be broached: "Are you open to seeing clients who are part of your personal life," etc., but don't even go there at all if he expects her to keep it a secret and have a whole range of new pressures forced upon her with her other friends/acquaintances.
@MistressMatisse: He said he only bumps into her a few times a year. That seems manageable.
@MissLaraBelle: She might study with his sister or something though, it happened to a friend.
@MistressMatisse: So she can say no. And he should be very cool about that.
@Maggie_McNeill: It's a delicate one. If they had never dated I'd say it was pretty straightforward. But as it is she could conceivably feel awkward. My advice: He should tell her he'd like to see an escort and ask if she has any recommendations. Then IF she's comfortable, she can volunteer her own services, and if not he'll get a very good recommendation to another.
@RosemaryLashes: I had a friend ask this of me when I came out and frankly I find it insulting. For me, I want compartmentalization. I do not mix business/clients w friends. It complicates too much, and $ creates power dynamics regardless of intention.
@AvaGraceVIP: Definitely don't surprise her with a booking without notice. But considering the history of the friendship you can always ask the question. If she's not ok with it she will say no. And you need to be prepared for and ok with accepting that no if it comes. Good luck.
@strangerswmandy: Every SW is different but to me the "used to date" part gets a little dicey, there are plenty of other pros to seek, always
@melodienelson: Sex—paid for or not—can change relationships. But he should ask simply. No more stigma 1 day.
@ConnerHabib: Yes, he definitely has the right to ask! But I want him to ask himself why he's asking, too! I'd ask: Out of all the escorts in the world you can hire, you chose one whose boundaries may be problematic for you and would need negotiation. What does that tell you about yourself? Self-investigate & move on.
@MistressMatisse: He wants a situation where he feels safe. He may/may not get it but asking seems OK.
@ConnerHabib: I guess I'd need to know more about their relationship. I can imagine a situation where that seemed right. Not reading it here though. Biggest problem for me is I read an "I'd get special treatment" vibe. But maybe that's not the case. That's why I'd like to know more.
@MistressMatisse: Well, he would get special treatment. He'd get the "I know you're not a cop, and I'm PRETTY sure you're not a serial killer" treatment.
@SensualMuse: IMO no on this—personal life is separate from work. To mix risks never having down time. It's personal. I think. Just my boundary preference. No clients in personal spaces.
@Joy_deVive: Refer them to colleagues, it's the professional thing to do.
@SensualMuse:  Exactly.
@MistressMatisse: Let's remember times are tough for some ladies. She might LOVE a vetted new client.

DAN SAVAGE: You've worked with a lot of couples who are confronting and trying to work past infidelity. Do you think HAD and his wife are doomed to divorce?
ESTHER PEREL: No, I don’t. I never offhand think of it as a yay or nay. I think that what you’re writing to me, dear man, is that you have just learned about facts. Those facts have been very surprising to you because they were utterly not part of the way you had envisioned your relationship and what you thought reality was.
Now, in order to know where this will land, the next thing is to actually understand the meaning of what happened. Ask your partner, your wife, what does this represent for her? What draws her there? What does she find there? Does it have anything to do with the two of you? Or is it utterly not related to you or to the two of you but is much more something about her? And if so, what is it about her? Is there a quest for a certain recklessness, a certain unknown? And how has she been thinking about you while she was doing this? Did she feel like she was betraying you? Did she feel like she was transgressing? Does she feel like she was responding to a call for an authentic search of her?
At this point what really will help you know where you go is to understand the layers of this experience. It is kind of switching from the detective questions to the investigative questions. From the ‘what’ to the ‘why’ to the ‘what it means.’ And then, if you find out that this is about the two of you, you may have to do certain changes. And then the question is, can you make these changes? What do they involve? You have a good relationship, from everything you tell me, and the question is always, does one discovery topple an entire relationship, an entire history? DS: After discovering an affair people often say, ‘Everything was a lie, everything I thought was true about my marriage was a lie—because of this infidelity.’ And I don’t think that’s always true. But this wasn’t a one-off. This went on throughout the course of their marriage. A constant drumbeat—a constant dickbeat—of other men. And what I find myself getting hung up on is introducing her lover to their children. It’s just so humiliating.
EP: You have a lot to be angry at. You felt special and you are demoted, one of many. That alone is crushing. There is what she did, and then the fact that she hid it. Both hurt and not always in the same way. She has to be accountable. And accountability and betrayal repair always goes through a step one, which is acknowledging her wrongdoing first. Acknowledging how what she did was a betrayal and hurtful. The second step is acknowledging what it did to you. So step one is ‘what I did,’ the second step is ‘what it did to you.' Even if she doesn’t feel guilty about it for herself, she definitely needs to demonstrate remorse for what it did to you. And the third step is 'what is she prepared to do to reengage with you, to regain your trust, to reaffirm the value of your relationship, your importance, her love.'
DS: Should he expect her to be faithful in the future? From here on out?
EP: No, I think you have to be realistic. And maybe that will involve —
DS: — an accommodation?
EP: —it’s both. Some people who have been unfaithful their whole relationship one day stop. And some people may continue their extra-marital involvements but now they do so without it being in secrecy.
The interesting part is that you are telling me a story that is gender-reversed. We are used to hearing those stories in the other direction. And so, in this case, we are hearing it from point of a view of a woman who has a certain kind of fetish and pursues reckless or not reckless situations—and, yes, also introduced you [to her lover]. I’ve heard this so many times, the introduction. Before I can tell you anything about that, I would ask her, 'What were you thinking?' What was on her mind when she was doing this? Was it a way to deceive you? Was it a way to make you think that nothing is going on between them? To pull a one over your head? Or was it that she actually had a fantasy that one day you would all be in the dungeon together? What was she thinking? You can’t really make a decision until you understand where people were at.
You have so much riding on this. Separate the feelings about what you’ve just discovered from the feelings about the marriage. They’re not one in the same. The marriage has accomplished a tremendous amount. You have children, you have dealt with you parents’ illnesses and perhaps even deaths, you have weathered economic turnarounds together. With so many marital tasks in your hands, this does not necessarily redefine an entire relationship. This doesn’t say, ‘Everything else was a lie and this is the truth.’ This says, ‘There was a lot of truth and then there was a whole other closet in which stuff took place that I had no idea about and now I need to find a way to understand it, cry over it, experience acute pain, but also make meaning of it, and potentially integrate it — and in the end, I may choose that it is too big for me to integrate and then let go.'
But this is not a decision that you make on the spot.
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Follow Esther Perel on Twitter, check out her website, order a copy of Mating In Captivity, and watch her TED Talk: Rethinking Infidelity: A Talk For Anyone Who Has Ever Loved.


I'm trying to picture someone who is pro-choice, pro-LGBT-equality, and pro-animals who could even entertain the idea of voting for Donald Trump, BOLD, and I'm coming up blank. Surely an slightly irrational attachment to firearms (they won't keep you safe) isn't enough to drive an otherwise sensible, pro-choice, pro-equality voter into the arms of a ranting, raving, anti-choice, anti-LGBT, anti-Semitic lunatic like Donald Trump.
Anyway... 
This is out of your hands, BOLD, and it's out of mine. It's up to her. But even if your relationship is over, even if this “break” is her way of easing you out of her life, you can walk away without bitterness and without regret — you conducted yourself honorably (so far), you treated your girlfriend well (so far), and knowing her inspired you to make better choices and get a better job. She was good for you, BOLD, even if she wasn't always for you.
You can also walk away hurt, BOLD, and you can walk away confused. But if you start lobbing grenades at her on your way out — if you act like "a cruel piece of trash," if you lash out at her, if you use what you learned about her personally to retaliate against her — then you can't walk away without first surrendering your Decent Human Being Card and a sizable chunk of your humanity. (And, if we had sensible gun laws, your firearms as well. Men who menace, threaten, or attack their romantic partners shouldn't be allowed to own guns.)
People break up with people all the time — if, indeed, she's breaking up with you. My hunch is that she is, BOLD, and it might be better to accept the worst case scenario (she wants out) and be pleasantly surprised if the opposite turns out to be true (she wants in) than to sit there staring at your phone, waiting for her to call/text/DM/snap/whatever. And if you're wondering why she would ask for a "break" instead of just ending things, well, you might wanna re-read the second-to-last paragraph of your letter. The prospect of being dumped has you contemplating — and, to be fair, rejecting — retaliatory acts of emotional violence. It's possible she may have sensed you wouldn't take being dumped well, BOLD, and concluded it would be safer for her to back away slowly then to end things abruptly. (Domestic violence and intimate partner violence are both so prevalent, BOLD, that women can't be blamed for erring on the side of their own physical safety.)
Let this line from your own letter be your mantra, BOLD: "She made me a much better person, and I don’t want to lose that." Be grateful to her for making you a better person — or, more accurately, be grateful for how she inspired you to make yourself a better person — and don't be an asshole. Because being asshole means forever forfeiting your "better person" cred. You definitely "lose that" by lashing out.
Zooming out: You met a girl, you hit it off, you spent some time together. That's called dating, BOLD, and dating is about figuring out who we are and what we want — and when it comes to dating a specific person, it’s also about figuring out whether this person is who and what we want. Early on, when we're smitten, we sometimes fantasize about a future — we talk about the longterm and/or listen as the other person talks about the longterm — that isn't destined to be. Being open to the possibility of a longterm relationship with someone, imagining a future with that person, etc., doesn't obligate us to stay in the relationship eternally, BOLD, and it doesn't mean we lied or misled someone if the relationship should end. Fantasizing about a life together is not the same thing as committing to a life together.
You may have been dumped; you will most likely dump women yourself in the future, BOLD, if you haven’t dumped some already. Sometimes people get dumped for good reasons — control issues, unforgivable betrayals, drinking/drug problems, pro-Trump tweets — and sometimes we get dumped because the other person likes us fine but doesn't feel as strongly about us as we do about them. That doesn’t mean we were lied to or misled. It just means it didn’t work out.
Take a deep breath, get out there, meet other people. Eat some ice cream, go to the gym, see a movie. Hang with friends, go on hikes, binge watch S4 of OITNB. If you hear from her again, BOLD, and you’re still single, great — you can pick up where you left off. And if you don’t hear from her again… well... then be grateful for the time you had with her, BOLD, and the ways she helped you grow.
And vote for Hillary Clinton.

You can rest assured that men reply to w4w ads all the time. Know any lesbians who've dated online, M4W? Ask one of them. Don't know any lesbians who've dated online? Send a few messages to women who've posted w4w ads on Craigslist (or anywhere else) and ask them if they ever get responses from men. They'll tell you—if they bother to respond—that they get responses from men constantly. Even worse, M4W, they get responses from guys who pretend to be women, send them pics of women they've grabbed off Facebook or Instagram, and lead them on (while having a wank or two) without any intention of actually meeting up—and no meet ups are possible for obvious reasons, right?
Men have a bad habit of feeling entitled to whatever they want—straight men, bi men, and gay men. Sex with lesbians? Sure, straight dude, you should be able to have that. A straight dude's dick down your throat? Sure, gay dude, you should be able to have that.
I can see why these messages would annoy you, M4W, and it may be rude and/or presumptuous for gay and/or bi guys to respond to m4w ads. But I wouldn't describe it as sexual harassment. I don't think it rises to the level of sexual harassment—it certainly doesn't meet the dictionary definition of sexual harassment: "Inappropriate behavior of a sexual nature, such as repeated sexual advances or offensive remarks, that occurs usually in a workplace, school, or other institutional setting, especially by a person in authority with respect to a subordinate or a student."
Why do gay and bi men respond to your ads? For the same reason some men send unsolicited dick pics to women: because every once in a while—every once in a great while—it works. The chance, albeit small, that an unsolicited dick pic is going to get a guy some pussy leads jerky straight and bi men to behave like entitled dick monsters. Similarly, M4W, the chance—and it's a somewhat greater chance—that a guy looking for women on CL might be up for a blowjob from a dude leads some gay and bi men to send unsolicited offers of no recip oral. Some guys posting in the M4W section are bi, some ascribe to the "a mouth is a mouth" theory or oral sex, and some guys are so desperate or horny that they figure a blowjob from a dude is better than no blowjob at all.
You're not one of those guys, M4W—you're not bi, you're not a mouther (like a truther but for blowjobs), and you're not so desperate or horny that you'd let a guy blow you. But don't waste your time getting mad, M4W, and don't think you're the only one who has to slog through unwelcome responses. Posters get responses from people outside their stated age ranges, vanilla people get responses from kinksters, gay men get responses from women (oh yes we do), lesbians looking for relationships get responses from opposite-sex couples seeking one-off threesomes, etc., etc., etc.
Ignore and delete.

How'd that happen?
You did it, TUTTUT, that's how it happened. In the moment and under the influence—not just of booze, but of lust, and opportunity as well—you and your boyfriend and this woman chose to have a threesome. And you and your boyfriend chose to have a threesome with not just any woman, not with some randogirl, but with an old friend whose boyfriend is also a friend, and whose wedding you'll likely be attending. And she chose to have a threesome not with a couple of randoboys she'd never have to see again, but with two dear old friends who are coming to her wedding. Messy!
Does that make you a bad person? Well, that depends. Do you do this regularly? I'm guessing not, TUTTUT, otherwise you wouldn't be wringing your hands about this one. So odds are good you're not a bad person, just your run-of-the-mill, mostly decent-ish person who occasionally does a bad, bad thing.
I would advise you to go ahead and feel awful and guilty and to introspect the shit out of yourself—go ahead and feel those feelings—because that will make less likely to do this bad thing again. (You'll do other bad things in future, of course, but they'll be different bad things.) Whatever you do, TUTTUT, don't compound the largely hypothetical harm you've already done to your male friend (what he doesn't know can't hurt him) by unburdening yourself to him or anyone else because that could do actual harm (what he does know could hurt him—and her). Take comfort in the thought that Mr. Monogamy could be out there sowing a few wild oats of his own—maybe he's got a bucket list too—and resolve to keep your mouths shut.
And finally, TUTTUT, here's a bonus thought/rationalization you can comfort yourself with: You two may have done a mitzvah with your dicks (a dicksvha?). There was something your friend wanted to experience before vowing to "forsake all others" and now, with your help and the help of both your dicks, she's done that thing... or she had it done to her... and you've upped her chances of being effortlessly and flawlessly monogamous for the rest of her long, long life. At least in theory.
As I was recently saying...
We need someone's consent before we kiss them, suck them, fuck them, spank them, spoon them, marry them, collar them, etc. But we do not need someone's consent to leave them. Breakups are the only aspect of our romantic and/or sexual lives where the other person's consent is irrelevant. The other person's pain is relevant, of course, and we should be as compassionate and considerate as possible when ending a relationship. (Unless we're talking about dumping an abuser, in which case safety and self-care are all that matters.) But we don't need someone's consent to dump them.
I'm was tempted to rattle that off to you—you don't need your girlfriend's consent to dump her—but you aren't her boyfriend and haven't been for a long time and she isn't your girlfriend and hasn't been for a long time. You're her landlord, she's your tenant. While you didn't agree on any rules, sign a lease, you own property and she's currently living in that property. Look up the landlord-tenant laws in your area. Depending on the state, you may be unable to require her to leave this weekend, but you could provide a 30 day written notice. Regardless, set a strict timeline and let her know when she needs to be out. Go to her close friends/family members/persons-she-is-likely-to-squat-with-next and let them know she needs someone—someone else—to step up for her. Because you're done. Organize for her personal property to be removed from your home. Draft an official tenant eviction letter with your local courts if she refuses to leave.
If all of that sounds too harsh, and you're up for more weeks of DTMFA'ing, then put the ball in her court. Make her give you the date she expects to leave. Ask her how you can help. Make your offer literal and factual, not figurative and emotional. "Being my boyfriend" is not on the table. Helping her apply for jobs could be. And she have refused the money you offered her when doing so made you hesitate, GO, but she's unlikely to refuse a loaded up cash card when her shit is on the porch or in a storage unit you've generously paid the six month's fees on.
Finally, GO: You can't DTMFA someone four times in three weeks. Because you can't DTMFA someone after you've already DTMFA'd them because the D'ing was done—or should've been done—the first time you DTMFA'd them. By allowing your soon-to-be-ex-tenant to veto your DTMFA, be buying into the bullshit belief that you can't break up with someone without their consent, you've essentially gotten back together with your ex-girlfriend/current tenant four times in three weeks. Stop.
DTMFA it for good.



I'm afraid my answer is gonna be a lot like Donald Trump's fingers—short and unsatisfying.
Will this relationship work out or is this end? I couldn't tell you, POLY. The only thing I can tell you for sure is this: it's out of your control and it's out of your husband's control. You've both made it clear to this woman that you wanna be with her and she's responded by moving away and pulling away. Maybe she had an emotional reaction to your pregnancy, POLY, or maybe she worries about being in a relationship she has to hide from her family and not getting the time she needs from her poly partners once their parents. Or maybe she's cited those two things because they're outside her control. Maybe she may wants out because this isn't what she wants—or you two aren't what she wants—and she tried to spare your feelings by blaming outside forces and/or extenuating circumstances.
Why would she say she can't imagine her life without you? She could be saying that because it's true, POLY, or she could be saying it to be nice. You and your husband are obviously in pain about this relationship ending—or potentially ending—and she wants you to know that she's hurting too. But a person can want to end a relationship and still hurt and still have difficultly imagining who or what comes next.
My advice: tell her what you to be with her, explain how you could see this working, attempt to address her fears (family's reaction, time constraints), and then back the fuck off and let her make up her mind—both of you back the fuck off. It sounds like your pregnancy is somewhat difficult and your husband should be focused on your needs at the moment, POLY, not endlessly arguing with a girlfriend he's known for less than a year and has been with for less than four months.
And forgive me for this, POLY, and I hate to close on a sour note... and I don't want to pour poison in your ear... but do you think it's possible this woman is trying to force your husband to choose between you two? People have done worse things.
So, yeah, if you two are package deal—now and forever—make that crystal clear.

Listen to my podcast, the Savage Lovecast, at www.SavageLovecast.com.
Thanks for the letter, SFO, and you can tell your priest I enjoyed his homily too (or your recounting of his homily). But I'm not ready to slap the ally label on him. Where does he stand on civil marriage rights for same-sex couples? Adoption rights for same-sex couples? Anti-discrimination protections—and restroom access—for lesbians, gays, bisexual, and transgender people? And what is he willing to say to his congregation about those issues? It's fine to espouse tolerance for those people but it's not worth much—and it doesn't get you off the bigot hook—if you simultaneously oppose equality under the law for those people. I'm glad he isn't, like some Christian pastors, celebrating the deaths of LGBT people. But where does he stand on our lives?
Please note: I'm not talking about theology or who gets into heaven, SFO. I'm not asking about imaginary people or imaginary places. I'm not asking whether your priest is willing to marry same-sex couples. But you can't claim to be an ally to queer people—or claim to be loving and tolerant—while opposing civil equality for queer people. Not liturgical equality, not theological equality, civil equality. That I would ask him about.
The pope makes tolerant noises about LGBT people once in a while ("Who am I to judge?"), SFO, before circling back to, "Oh, but homosexuality is still wrong." Lord knows the pope enjoys palling around with rabid anti-gay bigots and issuing anti-gay pronouncements. And don't get me started on the United States Conference of Catholic Bishops.
But Lord also knows there are decent priests out there:

Some priests are cool and loving... but none of those priests ever get to be bishops, much less popes. (This process is rigged, too, apparently.) It sounds like your priest might be one of the good ones, like Father Tom. Let's hope he's an ally too.

My enumerated (and unasked for) observations...
1. Your plan for avoiding drama — getting engaged before moving in together — seems to be generating a fair amount of drama.
2. Getting engaged before moving in together doesn't breakup-proof your relationship. You could get engaged, move in together, and experience a relationship-extinction-level event (you could cheat on him, he could cheat on you, one or the other of you could vote for Trump) or you could become fatally estranged for totally mundane reasons (he pees in the shower, you're a complete slob, he won't shut up about how the Dem primary being "rigged") or for no reason at all (sometimes longtime couples wind up feeling like roommates whatever they do). You say you're not religious, and that's nice, but it would appear, on the subject of engagement least, you're prone to religious-ish magical thinking.
3. Is your debt an issue for your boyfriend? Perhaps you should speak with a financial advisor—together—about what his liability would be if he married you, how it might impact his credit, etc. Perhaps he has fears that are unfounded and could be laid to rest.
4. You could always pretend his new house is in another city. 
My enumerated (and asked for) responses to your enumerated questions...
1. You are not being silly—you want what you want—but you're definitely overthinking this.
2. Here's how you have a constructive conversation about this: you ova the fuck up and issue an ultimatum. Stop listing all the reasons why he should want to propose to you, CAC, stop trying to explain to him why he's wrong to feel the way he does. Just tell him you're not moving in with him officially until you're engaged. Period. Spare him—spare us—the rationalizations and the magical thinking. You've been together 4.5 years, he's buying a house, and you require a move toward formalizing your commitment prior to moving in together. Period. Reassure him that an engagement isn't a wedding announcement—an engagement is easier to call off than a wedding; an engagement is easier to end than a marriage—and that you're looking forward to a nice, long engagement. Years long. But if he wants to keep you, he'll have to propose to you. (Under duress, CAC, so don't expect a flashmob.) If he doesn't want to propose to you, he loses you.
You, of course, have to go into that conversation prepared to lose him. Good luck.
Listen to my podcast, the Savage Lovecast every week at www.savagelovecast.com.
I'm trying to imagine why a man would lie about smoking weed to a woman who uses weed herself, WEED, and "fears an irrational reaction" is the only reason I can come up with. So if you've demanded he disclose his weed use and then blown up at him when he disclosed... his reluctance to disclose shouldn't come as a surprise.
I'm not saying that's what you've been doing, WEED. I'm just gaming this out.
And now let's zoom out: You say love this guy, you say get along well, you say have a good sex life. It sounds like you campsite-rule/Pygmalion'd the shit of him — you got him into therapy, you got him on anti-depressants, you got him to stop engaging in acts of self-mutilation. I hope he appreciates all you've done for him. You also say that he's doing really well — actually, you said "he's amazing now." Amazing is pretty good. We should all be so lucky as to have amazing spouses.
Well... he's amazing, you say... except for one thing: you say he lies to you about smoking weed.
You know what you don't say? You don't say smoking weed is a problem. You don't say smoking weed makes him lazy or unemployable, you don't say smoking weed interferes with the progress he's made, you don't say he's any less loving or any less sexual or any less amazing when he smokes weed. From where I'm sitting, WEED (Ann Landers' desk), it looks like the only problem with his secret weed use is that he's keeping it secret... and that's only a problem because it bothers you. It's not like you even noticed he was smoking weed until you stumbled over/snooped for the evidence. Seeing as the weed use itself isn't really a problem, WEED, your insistence on disclosure, your snooping, and your efforts to inflate his dishonesty about something that really should be a non-issue into a DTMFA-level offense seems controlling, punitive, and conflict-seeking.
That said, WEED, your reasons for wanting him to disclose — your shitty parents lying to you about their drug use, your lingering trust issues — are valid and accommodating your insecurities seems simple. So I'm not trying to pin the blame on you, WEED. But if your amazing husband can't bring himself to disclose non-problematic weed use then he's either struggling with some unexplored issue (a desire for some degree of autonomy and privacy in a relationship where he's felt more parented than partnered?) or the issue here is yours (this is about control or, again, you've demanded disclosure and then punished him when he did disclose).
You say you want to trust him. Maybe he could make a one-time, now-and-forever disclosure: "Honey, I like to smoke weed now and then."
Would that restore your trust?
You could pursue people with low libidos—there are lots of them out there (I get letters daily from their frustrated/heartbroken partners)—or you could find yourself a nice asexual person who wants intimacy, companionship, and someone to watch Game of Thrones with, but not sex. Or you could work on your jealousy issues and try to win your ex back with assurances that her sexual needs can be met by others—men and women—without you getting jealous or sad all over her.
Or...
You've got a high-stress job and a stress-/tension-related medical condition that has destroyed your ability to enjoy sex and the collapse of your sex life led to the demise of your otherwise loving relationship... and now, LOST, on top of that stressful job, you're stressing out about how or whether you'll ever find intimacy again.
Have you considered changing jobs? I don't mean abandoning the legal profession, LOST, but perhaps going into some other area of the law? Sex, romance, and intimacy are important—you wouldn't have written if they weren't important to you—and maybe they're worth prioritizing over arguing cases in court. Get your resume together, get some professional help, and get out of trial racket.
Finally, LOST, we're all dreaming here.
Read the whole thing. You're welcome.
First and foremost: I hope you and your husband, in the midst of all this chaos, are still managing to find the time to feed, mind, hear, hug, and just generally be there for your kids. Mom and dad can get divorced, and mom and dad can date other people, but mom and dad have parental responsibilities. I'm gonna give you and your soon-to-be-ex-husband the benefit of the doubt and assume your kids haven't been left to fend for themselves, PASSIONS, while dad is off with his new girlfriend and mom is negotiating the terms of her surrender with her "poly" boyfriend. I'm gonna assume that your complicated romantic relationship(s) and your husband's new girlfriend aren't consuming all your free/waking/parenting time.
Okay...
You despise drama, PASSIONS? Great: then dump your controlling boyfriend, tell your old friend you want to be friends again (just friends, not friends-with-benefits-who-share-a-controlling-boyfriend), and get your ass on Tinder and date other guys — remembering, of course, to give your kids the time, attention, and support they need during what is surely a difficult time for them too. Don't worry about breaking the hearts of your old friend and your time-share/shitty boyfriend: people get dumped every day, people go into polyamory knowing it means higher-than-average dumpings, and people can and do get over being dumped.
And, again, what you describe above is less "polyamorous relationship" and more "drama-generating, misery-inducing Rube Goldberg contraption." And one set of rules for him and another set of rules for you? Um, that's bullshit — unless that kind of power imbalance/exchange turns you on, PASSIONS, which it doesn't seem to. So, yeah, it's time to pull the plug. DTMFAs all around.
Finally...
Someone—someone other than me (I'm swamped right now)—needs to write something about straight men who say they want polyamory when what they really want is a harem. Not all straight poly guys are like this, of course, but I get letters on the regular from women whose supposedly poly boyfriends/husbands can sleep with/collect as many women as they like but the women aren't allowed to touch other men — and, in some cases, they're only allowed to touch other women in the presence of their boyfriends. Seems to me that there's some old-school/Old-Testament patriarchal shit out there being passed off as hip-and-liberated polyamory.
Personal trainer exhibitionists are my favorite kind of exhibitionists.
That said...
Open relationships require boundaries—clearly defined boundaries. Because boundaries can't function properly if people don't know where or what they are. I'll go further than that: unless they're clearly and explicitly defined, your open relationship boundaries don't actually exist.
But failing to spell out the rules of your open relationship, i.e. failing to clearly and explicitly define those boundaries, is the only fuck-up you're guilty of, B&I;, and it was a mutual one. And you can easily rectify this fuck-up by having a long overdue conversation with your lovely, sweet, slightly depressed pansexual guy about who is and isn't allowed, what is and isn't out of bounds, etc.
Stop beating yourself up over your attraction to B, an attraction that your lovely, sweet guy shares but feels conflicted about for obvious and understandable reasons. (Old friend, feels like a brother, important part of his support system, doesn't want to risk losing B to relationship and/or sexual drama.) You've handled everything so far with grace, B&I.; When B confessed his attraction to you, you said the feelings were shared but you couldn't act out them. You've been loyal to your partner and considerate of his mental health. And, good news, B doesn't want to tell his partner, either! Plus, nothing much happened between the you and B without your partner present—besides a little ill-advised, quickly-terminated jacking off. While it's commendable that you want to be honest and tell your partner everything, there are times when keeping ours mouth shut and protecting our partners from truths they can't handle is the most loving thing we can do. This is one of those times.
Most of the things you're worried about, B&I;, are beyond your control. You can't help it if your partner loses B as a friend—provided you don't embark on an affair with B—and you're not responsible for a potential depressive episode. What you can do, B&I;, is create distance between you and B while you work out the specifics of your open relationship with your partner. If you feel compelled (and who could blame you?), you could gently broach the subject of playing with B again, either as a couple or on your own. ("I thought that threesome between you, me, and B was hot. Would you ever want to do that again? If not, would you object to me playing with B on my own? It won't bum me out if you're not okay with that, and I won't bring it up again if you nix it.")
Finally, B&I;, B is an important aspect of your partner's support system and an ongoing sexual connection between you and B or all three of you could threaten that. If you three continued to play and things got awkward and ended (or exploded), or if you and B played and things got awkward and ended (or exploded), your partner could wind up without a girlfriend, without a best friend, or without both. I promise you that B isn't the only hot submissive exhibitionist out there who might wanna be touched, kissed, and spanked by a hot poly couple with clearly defined boundaries. So just because it can't be with B, B&I;, doesn't mean it can't be.


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
It isn't true that your boyfriend's actions can "only be described as cyber infidelity." They could be described as "harmless online flirtations." But you've chosen to slap the "infidelity" label on his actions, SOCI, and now you feel compelled to have a full-blown my-boyfriend-cheated-on-me meltdown.
Try looking at it this way: If your boyfriend regularly stopped at a bar to have a cocktail, and people flirted with him, and he flirted back—and that's all he did—would that constitute an "appletini infidelity"? If some guys looked him up and down in the locker room, and he looked those guys up and down back, would that constitute a "cardio infidelity"? No and no—and a boyfriend who flipped out about those sorts of interactions would be regarded as jealous, insecure, and controlling. So what difference does it make that your boyfriend did a little online flirting? Is it that your boyfriend jacked off thinking about these other guys? You jack off thinking about other guys when you watch porn. Is it that he jacked off thinking about and interacting with guys he could actually have IRL? Lots of guys in monogamous relationships—gay, straight, or bi—jack off about people they flirted with in bars and gyms, i.e., people they interacted with and could have IRL.
Here's what you should do, SOCI: Ask your boyfriend to knock this shit off because it goobs you out. But don't round this "online flirtation" up to "cyber infidelity" unless you want to make yourself miserable, and don't police your boyfriend's online activities—snooping is the only way to "make sure it stops"—unless you want to get dumped.
You know what's awkward? Being cut out of someone's life without explanation—so if it's awkwardness you want to avoid, LOST, don't stop talking to the friend you have a crush on.
Zooming out for a moment...
You're a twenty-year-old lesbian, LOST, who basically just came out of the closet. Based on what I know of lesbian sex-and-dating culture, I'd say odds are high that you'll wind up dating the friend you have a crush on, the girl she's with now, the girls both of these women will date after dating you, and at least two of your future ex-girlfriend's future ex-girlfriends. Lesbian love lives are like that. I also predict that all seven of these women—your current GF, your crush buddy, her current GF, their subsequent GFs—will come to your wedding someday. You might even wind up marrying one or more of them.
So take a deep breath and enjoy the girl you're with now, the time you get to spend with the girl you have a crush on (whose relationship could very well be open too—have you asked?), and all the possibilities coming your way.
First things first: You shouldn't assume (contra your sign-off) that Potential New Boyfriend (PNB) is pooping his diapers. Most guys who are ABDL — "adult babies/diaper lovers" — are only interested in wetting themselves, if that. (Some just like to wear 'em, not fill 'em.) It sounds like PNB is already struggling with kink- and/or sex-shame, DIAPER, and the assumption you've made about the extent of his diaper play... well, let's just say it might put him on the defensive. Even if it's accurate, DIAPER, which it most likely isn't.
Moving on...
You have a hard time believing PNB when he says there's nothing sexual about his interest in diapers, DIAPER, and that makes two of us. Seeing as he's already succumbed to shame where his kink is concerned — or it might be more accurate to say he hasn't dug himself out from under the shame almost all kinksters struggle with initially — he very likely struggles with the sex-negativity that comes bundled together with kink-shame. So he may have told you there's nothing sexual about his thing for diapers, DIAPER, because he thinks that makes his thing for diapers seem less sordid and objectionable.
That said, DIAPER, "this make me feel safe" and "this makes my dick hard" aren't mutually-exclusive phenomenon. Both can be true. (And if diapers really do make adults feel safe — we're going to need some data on that — we could rebrand them as "portable safe spaces" and make them available at our better universities.)
Another clue there's something sexual about this thing for diapers: not wanting you around while he wears them. Maybe diapers are private and something he enjoys alone... or maybe the sight of him in diapers makes the sexual aspect hard to deny. ("Is that gun in your diaper or are you just happy to see me?")
I would advise you to say some vaguely affirming things ("Your diaper thing doesn't bother me, PNB, and wouldn't even if it were sexual") without pressuring him to include you at diaper time. Don't rush things — relationship-wise or diaper-wise. Focus on satisfying him sexually in other ways for the time being.
Your letter brought back fond memories of one of my first boyfriends.
Jonathan was short and slight, with a gorgeous mop of blond hair, a dazzling smile, big blue eyes—and, boy, was I ever surprised when his pants dropped. That boy was hung like the proverbial horse, if you’ll forgive me for mounting a cliché (it's Friday, it's late, I'm zonked). He often joked that the energy and stardust others guys' genes sank into building bones and muscle, his genes sank into building cock.
And you know what he wanted more than anything? To be taller, to be more muscular, to have a bigger frame. Because it was way easier for bigger, taller, more muscly guys to get laid, and to be taken seriously as tops. Guys made assumptions about him based on his short stature and his slight frame—must be bottom, must not have much downstairs—and it drove him nuts. He would’ve gladly sacrificed three inches, or a little less 30% of his dick, to be six inches taller and a lot more muscular.
Anyway, PENIS, I'm not what I can do for you besides... maybe... send you some of the hundreds of letters I've received in the last few months from distraught guys with micro-penises maybe? Reading their letters might help put your "problem" into some sort of perspective.
So you're average in the cock department, dude—at "maybe 6'," you're technically above average—and, yes, you might have to deal with a moment's awkwardness when you drop your pants and it turns out your dick isn't quite to scale. But there's no sex without a little awkwardness. Power through that moment of awkwardness and show all that new pussy what that dick of yours can do. And if the sight of your dick really does disappoint, the sight of your thick frame and all those natural muscles and your height should more than compensate.
Something can be off and you can overreact to it.
But you were right and they were wrong: not all gay men like to fuck ass and/or have their asses fucked, as a quick web search confirms. (I'm surprised no one at that gathering thought to pull out a phone and Google this shit.) And ass fucking isn’t even the most likely sex act to occur when gay men who do like to fuck ass fuck.
There's more out there—lots of studies have found that not all gay men fuck ass and/or have their asses fucked, not all gay men who fuck ass fuck ass every time they fuck (ass fuckers enjoy blowjobs, mutual masturbation, and humping ottomans too). So, yeah, empirically speaking, the gay dudes at that gathering were wrong when they insisted all gay men fuck ass and/or get their asses fucked. But a majority of gay men do fuck ass and/or get their asses fucked — in fact, a supermajority of gay men fuck ass and/or get their asses fucked. And people often "round up” in cases of supermajorities in order to make a point that feels broadly true (all gay men fuck ass, all Trump supporters are racist shits, all Walmart heirs are despicable welfare queens) or to make a joke (like the guy I met this weekend who loudly told me in a room full of guys from Minneapolis that all gay men in Minneapolis are bottoms — it wasn't true, but everyone laughed, because it's nearly true). 
There were doubtless other men at that gathering who felt the same way about fucking ass that you do — no ass for them, thanks — but who laughed along with the others. It was, as you say, a missed opportunity to broaden the scope of discussion about gay male sexuality.
There’s no way of knowing whether your point would’ve been taken more seriously if you were cis gendered. It’s possible that the cis gay men in the room felt they were “schooling you,” and it’s possible they believed (in error) that they were being helpful by clueing you in. But it's possible the guys at that gathering were just joking around — not trying to be mean malicious or exclusionary, just trying (and perhaps failing) to be funny. It’s also possible they would’ve made the same joke if you had been cis — again, gay men like to joke around and take the piss out of each other (sometimes literally), so in a way their actions, while annoying, could be read as inclusionary rather than exclusionary. They were treating you like one of the guys. Which is what you are — not one of the gay guys, as that's TBD. But one of the guys regardless.
Also, too... you don't have to have a biodick to fuck ass.
My response after the jump...
You can accept your sexuality, FEET, but for a host of reasons—shame and fear being the likeliest culprits—you refuse to. And where has your refusal gotten you? You haven't freed yourself from your harmless and common kinks. By choosing to view your desire for kink and your desire for love as mutually exclusive—someone can love you or they can humiliate you, but they can't love and humiliate you—you have succeeded in creating a crippling case of performance anxiety.
And now you're working with a Freudian therapist—they still make those?—who believes kinks can be cured with couch time and moving vans. Your therapist is wrong. Jesse Bering is a research psychologist, a science writer, the author of Perv: The Sexual Deviant in All of Us, and one of my go-to guest experts. Here's what he told the dad of a teenager with a far rarer kink than yours: "If it's true that Pokémon lights this boy's fire... there's not much [this dad] can do about his son's 'pathetic' orientation. By age 17, his son's singular erotic profile is pretty much fixed, like it or not... Nobody knows why some people are more prone to developing unusual patterns of attraction than others. But whether it's a penchant for Pokémon, feet, underwear, or spiders, the best available evidence suggests that some people—mostly males—have a genetic predisposition for being 'sexually imprinted' during development."
So, FEET, at some point during your sexual development, you imprinted on feet and erotic humiliation. You can pathologize your kinks by viewing them as rooted in the violence you were exposed to as a child, or you can take comfort in the fact that there's no proven link between abuse and kinks. The violence you witnessed/suffered at home as a child may be an unpleasant coincidence, not a root cause, and either way, it shouldn't prevent you from reconciling the two parts of your adult self—the guy who wants a woman to love him and the guy who wants a woman to order him to lick her feet.
And here's how you're going to do that: You're going to get online and find the kink personal ads in your country, and you're going to post ads and respond to ads. I know kink personals exist where you live, FEET, because I managed to find some in two minutes. If the fetish scene in your country isn't big enough, or if you're worried about exposure and mockery, get your ass to London or Berlin and explore the booming hetero fetish scenes in those cities. Want to gain some experience and some confidence? Find a nice pro-Domme where you live (lots of those) and become a regular. A business relationship with a pro-Domme is unlikely to blossom into love, FEET, but a few sessions with a pro-Domme you like—and who likes you back—will help you see that affection and SM can go together.
Finally, FEET, I don't know what your financial/work situation looks like, but spending a few months in a city with a large kink community—a summer in New York or Berlin or Seattle—could be a transformative experience. Throw yourself into the kink scene, go to the munches and parties, and you'll meet kinksters who are open, unashamed, and capable of loving their partners even as they humiliate or are humiliated by them, aka "role models."
Shit—it's after six already and I haven't posted a SLLOTD yet. And, hey, I'm old and gay and I really don't know where to tell this young and bi person to go. So I'm tossing this one to you, Slog. Help WSS out with some recommendations: places to go, things to do, where she might meet some like-minded people. Thanks.
Take yes for an answer.
Stop worrying about how you're going feel a quarter of a century from now.
Things that are important to you at 50—like having your ass fucked on the regular—may not be so important to you at 75.
Your boyfriend could predecease you and you could wind up spending your final years alone—or, hey, you could die together in a fire or a car wreck or a plane crash or chariot fisting scene gone tragically wrong. We Catholics call that, "Looking on the bright side."
Your boyfriend could be done with sex at 50—a chronic medical condition or anti-depressants or carbs could crater his libido—and you could be the one banging hot fuckbuddies on the side.
Watch this movie:
Listen to James Baldwin:
Love him and let him love you. Do you think anything else under heaven really matters?
My response after the jump...
You didn't mention seeking professional help, AAA, and maybe that's because you fear being smarter than the shrink in the room. But cognitive behavioral therapy is supposed to be an effective treatment for people with psychopathic tendencies. The goal isn't to change you or rewire your brain, as that's most likely impossible, but to change how you approach and interact with people. Also, AAA, a lot of people who are in relationships—even people who find it easy to interact with others—struggle with feelings of isolation. That's not uncommon. And there are tons of people out there who aren't psychopaths (or on the scale) who can describe their romantic histories in the same apocalyptic terms that you do. Get help and keep things in perspective. Live your life, do shit, go places, even if you have to go alone for now.
Divorce.
People have a right to discuss their experiences — and that includes their sexual experiences — with their friends and confidants. People should be discreet, honor the "Tea and Sympathy" rule ("When you speak of this in future years... and you will... be kind"), they should avoid making assumptions, err on the side of non-drunken non-disclosure, etc., etc., etc. But unless that FMF started with the signing of an NDA, SHUTUP, the female half of the couple you un-friended/cut ties with doesn't owe you her eternal silence.
And demanding her silence — contacting her to say "SHUT THE FUCK UP ABOUT THAT THREESOME!" — could inspire her to found an online to campaign ostensibly to de-stigmatize threesomes (#shoutyourthreesome), SHUTUP, but really designed to punish you. Because she's angry and she's hurt — obviously.
She doesn't know what she did wrong, she has no idea why you distanced yourself from her, and she seized the twin opportunities of 1. time alone with a mutual friend and 2. the disinhibiting effects of alcohol in the moment ("I can talk about this — I am drunk!") and the responsibility-obviating effects of alcohol after the fact ("I'm sorry I talked about that — I was drunk."). My best guess is that she drunkenly blurted it all out — the threesome, your actions — in the hopes that your mutual friend either knew the reason why you cut them out of your life (and might share it) or would run and blab to you about their conversation. And this would prompt you to share the reason — with the mutual friend, who would report back to her, or to her directly.
So what to do? That depends, SHUTUP. There's no course of action that doesn't risk creating drama — potentially lots of drama — and it's impossible to predict which choice will generate the least drama. Let's game them out...
1. You call/email/text the wife and tell her what her husband did and said the day he dropped by. She believes you and blows up at her husband — maybe he apologizes to his wife, SHUTUP, maybe he apologizes to you. Or maybe he lies to his wife ("That never happened, she's nuts!") and gets his revenge by running around town talking shit about you.
2. You call/email/text the wife and tell her what her husband did and said the day he dropped by. She doesn't believe you, she sides with her husband, and they both run around town talking shit about you.
3. You don't contact the wife — or the husband — and hope she gets over it someday and stops talking about the threeway she had with you.
I'd go with option 3.
The laddie doth protest too much, methinks.
By which I mean to say: Any 69-year-old man who presses his boner into his date's hand and then offers, apropos of nothing, that Pfizer had nothing to do with it... well, that guy probably has a Pez dispenser full of Viagra in his pocket. Because why bring drugs up at all? You're on the couch, you're swapping spit, you're hard, she's into it — why bring up boner pills? Whether or not someone popped a pill is literally the least interesting thing about a boner on a 69-year-old man. Or any other man.
As for the other time he brought up drugs... it's wonderful to be in good health, of course, but there's no shame in needing an assist from a pharmaceutical company to restore or sustain good health. And this guy may not need drugs now (for boner-related or non-boner-related reasons), but odds are good he'll need drugs at some point. If he doesn't get hit by a car or felled by a heart attack — or expire from a terminal-but-natural boner — drugs are in his future. Aspirin, if nothing else, but probably more powerful stuff.
All that said, DRUGS, you didn't lie to him — not even by omission. He's not entitled to a full medical history on a first date. Let's say he started talking about his retirement savings instead of his health — that wouldn't obligate you to share your financial statements wit him. Go ahead and keep dating him, DRUGS. See if you like him, see if you like that (supposedly) drug-free boner of his, and see where this goes. You can have a convo about your medical condition if and when you get serious about each other — a medical condition that is is under control thanks to the doctor you're fortunate enough to have access to and the drugs you're fortunate enough to be able to afford.
Finally, DRUGS, he's 69 years old — this "healthy as a horse"/"drug-free boners" business could be about his own insecurity, i.e. he worries that you may think he's too old for you. He may worry that a 53-year-old woman might not want to get involved with a man who's about turn 70, lest he prove to be too old or too frail to keep up. Your eventual disclosure of your own frailty may free him to acknowledge his own.
Block Mike's number, block Mike's email address, block Mike on Twitter, Facebook, Instagram, Snapchat, LinkedIn, Periscope, Kik, FuckStick, WhatsApp, CumDump, etc., etc., etc., ad infinitum.
And stop talking about Mike — there's no reason to discuss him up with random coworkers, casual acquaintances, or friends you've made in the fifteen years since you dumped the bastard. If you absolutely, positively must discuss him with someone you aren't intimate with, i.e. someone who has no need to know about your relationship history and the abuse you suffered in the past, you can be a good ally to your abusive transgender ex other trans people by carefully using nouns and descriptors in place of your asshole ex's preferred pronouns. Instead of saying, "I met him when I was still a teenager," you say, "I met the abusive piece of shit when I was still a teenager." Instead of saying, "It took me eight long years to get away from him," you say, "It took me eight long years to get away from that asshole psychopath."
What I'm gonna say next will get me crucified on Twitter, MHL, but I've learned not to read my @s, so here we go...
If using male pronouns when referring to your ex is gonna complicate your life — really complicate it — if the "trans" part is likely to get dropped during a game of interoffice telephone, if the qualifier about your ex having identified as a woman the entire time you were together is likely to get dropped during that same game of telephone, and if either of those drops could lead coworkers or casual acquaintances to assume something about you that isn't true, i.e. that you're into dudes and therefore gettable by dudes, and if that erroneous assumption could result in your having to deflect awkward and/or unpleasant advances from confused males (cis and trans) who don't actually have a chance with you because you're not into dudes at all, or if it would traumatize you to have your status as a Gold Star Lesbian questioned or induce some sort of orientational dysphoria...
I don't see the non-theoretical harm in you — and you only — misgendering Mike on the hopefully rare occasions when he comes up. You don't live near him, no one you know knows him, and the misgendering is unlikely to get back to him. The adage "no harm, no foul" would seem to apply here. (The adage would not apply, however, if people in your orbit know Mike to be trans; you referring to Mike by improper pronouns would offend good people and potentially be taken as license by bad people to do the same to other trans men and women.)
But it would be simpler, easier, and ally-ier if you sidestepped the issue by not speaking to anyone about your asshole ex ever again.
My response after the jump...
Ask yourself which conversation will be more difficult:
A. After a frustrating and protracted search, your boyfriend finally manages to find a woman who's interested in being your "friend and lover," JWTBM. At that point, you tell him you're no longer interested in a third, regular or otherwise, and he needn't have bothered.
B. You tell your boyfriend today—now—that you're not interested in bringing a third into the relationship, regular or otherwise.
It's the same conversation either way, JWTBM: You're gonna have to tell him you're not interested. Don't count on him dying before he manages to find someone; he may be too old for the women on the websites he's haunting now, but sooner or later, either he'll find his way to a website where his age isn't an issue, or a bi woman into older men will stumble over one of the ads he already has up. So you're going to have to tell him the truth, JWTBM, the only question is when.
I would argue that having the conversation now would be preferable to having it after he's set up a date for drinks with a potential third. He may be disappointed to learn that you're not interested in a third anymore, JWTBM, but he's less likely to be breakup-level angry/hurt if you didn't stand there silently while he wasted time searching for a third.
And who knows? An honest and open conversation about the state of your relationship—including the fact that you're dissatisfied with the once-a-week routine and the waning of D/s—may ignite an interest in a third. Would you feel differently about a third if it turned out she wasn't for him (so nothing to be jealous about), JWTBM, but for you? He's getting older, he has health issues, and he may want someone else around so that you won't leave him to get your needs met. It's also possible that a third would reignite the D/s dynamics that you miss. D/s is performance, it's play, and nothing invigorates a pair of performers quite like a new audience.
I'm not telling you that you have to agree to the third—if it's monogamy you want, then it's monogamy you should ask for—but keep your mind, your options, and those lines of communication all open.
Hm.
Normally I would advise someone in your position to do three things: mind your own damn business, assume your neighbors caught an intense new groove and are happily and consensually exploring varsity-level kinks;  put on headphones and blast some music when you need to pee in the middle of the night. But the fact that you're hearing strange new noises from next door (not necessarily a problem) coupled with the fact that these noises don't sound exactly pleasurable (pleasure is subjective so, again, not necessarily a problem) and throupled with the fact that half of this couple seems to have disappeared... well, that triad tips me out of the mind-your-own-business camp and into the do-some-meddling camp.
Your first move: The next time you see the male half of this couple gardening in the yard, NVN, ask after his female partner. "Hey, we haven't seen Marge in a while." Maybe Marge is laid up with a non-sex-related injury and the noises you're hearing in the middle of the night are, I don't know, the sounds Marge makes when her moonlighting physical therapist drops by. See what your neighbor has to say, gauge how truthful you think he's being, and if you sense that he's lying or up to something...
Call the police and ask them to do a welfare check on your missing neighbor:
What is a Welfare Check?
Friends, family and neighbors are important social contacts. They may regularly check in with loved ones to see how they're doing. When a loved one fails to respond, the police can be called in to conduct a welfare check.... No court order is required for the police to conduct a welfare check. Essentially, as long as they have reasonable grounds to believe that an inhabitant in a residence in endangered, they can legally enter the premises.
Your missing neighbor isn't a loved one, NVN, but if you're really and truly concerned for her well-being after speaking to her partner, ask the cops to drop by and check in on her. Because sometimes freaky and non-consensual shit is going on right next door.
My response after the jump...
It sounds like you and the wife had different ideas about what your open relationship would look like. What you were doing with your former coworker sounds like poly-style openness—you had an ongoing emotional and sexual relationship—while what your wife is doing with her best friend, her best friend's husband, the neighbor, and her coworker sounds more like fuck-whoever-you-want openness.
Reading between the lines, OPEN, it seems that what really bothers you about your wife's explorations—"sleeping with everyone in the neighborhood"—is the potential for gossip. Not everyone in an open relationship is comfortable being out about it; some people who aren't sexually monogamous nevertheless wish to be socially monogamous, i.e., perceived to be monogamous, because they fear being judged or even discriminated against. Or perhaps the issue is this: If people know your wife is sleeping around but don't know about the open relationship, you may look like a foolish and fooled husband. Those are legitimate concerns, and your wife needs to take your feelings into consideration, and you two need to reopen negotiations. The best compromise may be for your wife to dial it back—fewer partners, more discretion—while simultaneously shifting to a DADT arrangement or, as you put it, ending your agreement to share info about your outside partners.
Frankly, DUI, I think the must-have-poppers and no-can-top issues are likely to be bigger problems for you than those two DUIs in your rearview mirror. You still have your license, it seems, so it's not like you'll be asking your dates to do all the driving on top of all the fucking, right?
Zooming out...
No one gets to 40 without baggage. Sensitive, sane, smart guys—the kind of guys you'll wanna date—score people on generous curves, curves that allow for some past screw ups. So long as lessons were learned and those particular screw ups are not going to be repeated, a relatively common-if-serious-and-always-regrettable legal issue is likely to be taken in stride. Of course a DUI might be an absolute dealbreaker for some guys (guys who've lost relatives to drunk drivers, for instance, or guys who have vacation homes in Canada). But since you can't control how guys are going react to the news you'll need to calm down about it and be strategic about it.
It's up to you to decide when or whether to disclose your driving record to a new guy. But when you order your first round with Mr. Promising New Guy You Met On Grindr, DUI, there's no need to blurt out, "Hey, on the subject of booze, I want you to know I have two DUIs and I won't be driving myself home tonight so bottoms up!" Because that would be equal parts odd and unnecessary, and consequently a total buzzkill. Because in addition to telling him a potentially off-putting fact about your driving record, DUI, you would be telling him some definitely off-putting things about your judgement. ("I have no common sense, crappy interpersonal skills, and poor impulse control!")
Bring up the DUIs when you have to, need to, or you reach the point where sensible people who might be getting serious about each other start to disclose their baggage—a point that typically comes right before or shortly after you start introducing each other to friends as your "boyfriend." By that point, DUI, he'll have seen you drink responsibly. He'll know you're the sort of person who would never get behind the wheel of a car impaired because he seen you impair yourself a few times and then Uber your ass home. He'll be better able to weigh the person he knows you to be now against a fact about you from your past.
And when you bring up your DUIs, DUI, keep it simple, be honest, and be direct. Don't be dramatic, don't apologize endlessly, don't beat yourself up—and don't be flippant either. Talk about your experience, let your new boyfriend react how he will, and then continue sharing all the other great and awful things about yourself.  


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
You don't have to tell him about the problem—he's already aware of the problem—you just need to broach the subject so you can discuss the problem.
And here's my best guess at what your problem is...
Sex with him is consequential. The stakes are high—or you perceive them to be high—because He Could Be The One. (No one is "The One," as you know, since you listen to the podcast. But, hey, he could totally be the .64 you've been looking for.) So it’s not just sex. You’re good at “just sex.” It’s sex that could be or lead to something more. 
What you need to tell yourself is… it’s just sex. Give yourself permission to fuck him like he's "someone else," i.e. just another hookup or rando. And you'll be able to that if you can accept—and I mean really take to heart—a few simple/obvious things: sex isn’t going to make or break this relationship (make that your mantra); he may or may not be The One/The .64 (odds are better he isn’t); and every relationship you're ever going to be in is going to "fail" (until one doesn't). Force yourself to stop seeing this/him as a high-stakes prospect—stop thinking MY WHOLE FUTURE IS AT STAKE when you're getting naked with him—and see him instead as someone you dig, someone you enjoy spending time with, and someone you can fuck without the rest of your life on the line. Because that shit is a boner killer, as you know. And it’ll help you get there if you can laugh about this with him, if you guys can shrug your nerves off together, and if you can both acknowledge that, hey, this is great—but who the fuck knows where it’s going? And in the meantime, let’s fuck! (And you can and should fuck around even if your dick isn't joining the fun.)
Finally, SOFT, there's a chance you just don't click sexually or chemically. If that's the case... well, then you're destined to be good friends, not boyfriends. If you manage to calm down about The Future and you still can't get it up for this guy, SOFT, then you should listen to your dick and part ways (but stay friends).
Full disclosure: I'm running your letter because that's a pretty epic sign-off you created there, FLACCID, and I wanted to honor the effort that must've gone into it.
Give it a few weeks. If you don't hear from her, write her and ask for another go. If she seems hesitant... bring up your performance non-problem and Occam's razor that shit: "I jacked off pretty much right before you called that night. I didn't want to assume anything—I didn't know why you wanted to grab a drink—so I said yes to drinks. If I had known earlier that we would be getting together, I wouldn't jacked it. But, hey, I really enjoyed everything we did and way too much of what passes for straight sex revolves around the dude's dick. I had fun focusing on you and I hope you had fun being the center of attention."
Don't mention the lack of sleep, the booze, or your nervousness, FLACCID. Because whether you're talking about boners, infidelities, late rent, or the Democratic primary: a single plausible excuse will sound like a credible explanation while a basket full of excuses—even a basket stuffed with equally legitimate, plausible/probable excuses—will sound like a desperate/unbelievable lie.
If you hear from her sooner—if she booty calls you back—then she obviously didn't regard your flaccid cock as an insult, a referendum, or a deal-breaker. Hell, she may have enjoyed having your undickstracted focus on her that night. If she comments on your hard cock being hard this time around, FLACCID, offer up the same explanation: jacked it earlier that evening, not a mistake you'll make again—so long as you have notice.
You can—and you should—follow Cameron on Twitter @cameronesposito.
Thanks for sharing, DADS.
I'm kindasorta tempted to blow up at your wife, DH.
Because I did the math. You've been married eight months and your sex life has been "non-existent for nearly eight months." Eight months subtracted from eight months is zero months. So your wife waited until the day after the wedding to inform you that 1. she finds vaginal intercourse painful and 2. she doesn't much enjoy having sex generally. (Followup question for the wife: Would she feel the same way about sex if vaginal intercourse wasn't painful? Because there are people out there who can help her with that problem. She also has a husband who's willing to enjoy other forms of sex play.)
Those are both things your wife should've disclosed to you before the wedding, not after—but, hey, maybe your wife feared rejection, as so many people do, and put on a brave face and got through as much vaginal intercourse as she could stand before lowering the boom/gloom during your honeymoon. And maybe she never intended to lower the boom/gloom at all; maybe she thought she could pretend to enjoy sex—and pretend to enjoy fucking you—for decades. That's also not uncommon; lots of people marry people they're not attracted to, or accept monogamous commitments from people they don't wanna fuck/don't enjoy fucking, hoping to muddle through... only to discover they can't take it and they can't fake it. 
But something about the timing of your wife's announcement—something about the math—has me doubting the "she went in hoping she could do this" theory. Announcing that she hates sex and that it's painful shortly after the wedding, and being willing to accept foreplay-style attentions from you without demonstrating any desire to reciprocate, and then blaming you the miserable state of your sex life... well, all of that has me wondering whether your wife married you under false pretenses and isn't now gaslighting you, DH, i.e. trying to convince you that you're the problem when she knows the problem is hers.
If she wants to have a sex life that's nothing but foreplay-style revving up (revving up to full release)—and there's nothing wrong with that, sex is more than PIV intercourse, plenty of people enjoy satisfying sex lives comprised of nothing but activities others consign to foreplay—she needs to say so. And if she's not willing to reciprocate because she's lazy or selfish or not into you, she needs to say so. And if things continue on as they are now indefinitely, DH, if nothing changes, then she said so. And if that's what she's saying... you may want to be going.
A typical divorce takes anywhere from three months and a year to finalize, IW, but some can take years. It all depends on the complexity of a given divorce, i.e. the amount of property to split up, the needs of the kid(s) involved, the level of contentiousness, etc. Your boyfriend's divorce sounds complicated—debts, retirement accounts, lotsa kids, some real estate—but it doesn't sound particularly contentious. It also doesn't sound like his "hopefully-soon-to-be ex-wife" is trying to drag things out because she wants his ass back, or that she's dragging things out to punish him (or you). Instead it sounds like your boyfriend and his net-yet-ex-wife aren't into paperwork and/or aren't in a hurry.
I don't know why his net-yet-ex-wife isn't in a hurry, IW, and unless you're in communication with her—or unless you've seen some other form of proof (emails, letters, messages)—you don't know for a fact that she's playing tricks or drawing out the divorce.
Given the amount of time this is taking, and given your boyfriend's angry response when you bring the subject up, it's possible your boyfriend is either drawing this out himself or is fine with his net-yet-ex-wife drawing this out. Not because he wants to remain married to her forever, IW, but because he can't enter into a new marriage until his first marriage is dissolved.
So...
If you're expecting him to marry you the instant his divorce papers are signed—if that's what you've communicated to him, if that's what he's previously agreed to—that could be a huge disincentive for your boyfriend to get his divorce finalized. Because if he doesn't want to marry you (worst-case scenario), if he's not sure he wants to marry you (not-great-but-not-disastrous-case scenario), or if he wants to marry you but not until, say, sometime in 2017 (best-case scenario (and a nice, long engagement is always a good idea)), not yet being divorced gives him an out.
So...
If you're content to be his girlfriend for the foreseeable future—despite what you've sacrificed to be with him, despite the promises you two may have made each other—and if you're a fan of long, languid, luxurious engagements, IW, communicating those facts to your boyfriend may speed the divorce process along.
I should probably do some Googling before I post your letter, LILLY, just to make sure you're not recounting the plot of a British romantic comedy I didn't see or summarizing a leaked treatment for an as-yet un-produced Julia Roberts film. But it's late on Friday and at least three cocktails (and one more work commitment) are calling my name.
But I am going to forward your letter to Rob Delaney. I think your story, if true (or false), would make an excellent plot for season 3 of Catastrophe—with Sharon Horgan playing the ghost of Sharon Morris, of course. It's Catastrophe meets Blithe Spirit: Sharon dies tragicomically, Rob stays in London to raise his Anglo-Irish-American kids, he falls in love with a mature escort with a family of her own, the escort divorces her husband and marries Rob, and then Sharon (insanely jealous, Irish temper) returns to haunt Rob and his new wife, ultimately orchestrating the untimely deaths of Rob, his second wife (that would be you, LILLY), and Fran too because Fran is horrible. (Let's have CAA set up a meeting, Rob, and make this happen.)
Anyway, LILLY, I honestly don't no what to tell you to do.
Your sprawling, unconventional family arrangement—three homes, two husbands, two sets of children (one biological set, one affectional set)—seems to be working well right now. I would hate to upset the delicate emotional/sexual/obligational balance you've managed to strike. All involved are happy right now, LILLY, other than those jealous bitches (and fuck them), and there's no guarantee all involved will remain happy if you decide to upend your current living/loving arrangements. On the other hand... there's no guarantee everyone will remain happy if you don't upend those living/loving arrangements.
So, yeah. Like I said: I don't know what to tell you to do.
But here's one thing to consider: You say nothing would make Barack happier than being able to marry you. And how do you know that? Because presumably Barack told you that. But did he mean it, LILLY? People have been known to tell their married lovers that they really, really wish they could marry them without really, really meaning it. Sometimes people say, "I really, really wish I could marry you, married lover, and be with you all day, everyday, for the rest of our lives!" because they're trying to be really, really nice and they think that's what their married-to-someone-else lover really, really wanna hear. So ask yourself—and ask Barack—if the sentiment he expressed was meant sincerely or whether it was meant as a compliment. Because like a long-distance relationship that works due to geographical distance, it's possible your relationship with Barack works due to the logistical distance, i.e. he not only doesn't mind sharing you with your other/original husband and family, LILLY, but he prefers it that way.
Just saying you might want to double/triple check with Barack on the whole marriage issue before you ask your husband for a divorce.
Or, hey, maybe he wants to marry you—like I said, I don't know what to tell you to do. But here's your letter, published despite the red flags, the stereotypes, the taboos, and the doubts I have about its veracity.
We have an expression in English, TOB, that you might want to employ (in this situation) and popularize (throughout Italy): "Shit or get off my face*."
Tell this girl she's gotta shit or get off your face already. By which I mean to say: Tell her she's got to pick because you're not going to wait around anymore. It's either the long-distance/short-fucking/big-trouble boyfriend she's got or the close-by/lotsa-fucking/less-trouble boyfriend she could have. But she's going to have to pick because you're not willing to wait around anymore.
Here's the trick: You've really got to the mean that "not willing to wait around anymore." Don't see her again until she breaks up with her BF... a guy she's probably telling some of the same things she's telling you (the right person for her, someone she can see a future with, etc.).
* Actually, TOB, the expression is, "Shit or get off the pot." It's an expression, "used to convey that someone should stop wasting time and get on with something," aka make a fucking decision already. Long ago a coworker used "my face" in place of "the pot" and it was, at the time, the single funniest thing any of us had ever heard. (I believe we were stoned.) Now it's the only version of the expression my friends and I use—even at the risk of sounding like a bunch of scat queens to anyone within earshot.
We say size doesn't matter, GIRTH, but that's a lie.
That doesn't mean bigger is better. Or always better. A dick can be too big; I've received scores letters over the years from guys desperately seeking ways to make their yuuge dicks smaller. Having a bio dick that's too big to suck and too big to fuck (someone with) is a curse. (Sadly there are no "natural male dehancement" pills for sale online, no effective penis-shortening/de-girthing surgeries available.) Some people straight-up prefer average-to-smaller-to-small dicks; some guys even get off on the "humiliation" of having small dicks. It takes all kinds.
And you need the girthy kind. Not all women do; the dick on the dude you just hooked up with may have been the wrong dick for you—it couldn't get you off all by itself (more on that in a moment)—but it might be just the right dick for a woman who needs a nice, solid, sustained external grind in order to come. The lower portion of his taught rectus abdominis pushing against her clit and labia might be exactly what she needs to get off. But you need that filled up feeling, GIRTH, and the reason isn't a mystery.
Take it away, @AdviceFromMsM:
The majority of the clitoris is actually within the pelvis—that is, it’s far more internal than external. Even most of the women I coach, women who are generally worldly and well-informed about their own bodies, react with a combination of fascination and confusion when I explain that their clitoris extends deep within them.
The scientific name for the external “little button” or “bulb” is glans. Not to be confused with glands, glans simply refers to a small circular mass. This little structure contains approximately 8,000 sensory nerve fibers; more than anywhere else in the human body and nearly twice the amount found on the head of a penis! From reading her work, it’s clear that Marie Bonepart mistakenly thought that the clitoris was completely comprised of the glans; and because it is super sensitive and all anyone can see of the organ, her confusion is mirrored by most women today. The fact is though, that most of the clitoris is subterranean, consisting of two corpora cavernosa (corpus cavernosum when referring to the structure as a whole), two crura (crus when referring to the structure as a whole), and the clitoral vestibules or bulbs.
The glans is connected to the body or shaft of the internal clitoris, which is made up of two corpora cavernosa. When erect, the corpora cavernosa encompass the vagina on either side, as if they were wrapping around it giving it a big hug!
That part of your clitoris that's wrapped around your vagina—the majority of it—gets the stimulation it needs (the stimulation you need) when you've got a girthy penis stuffed in your vagina, stretching it, pushing and pulling at it, putting just the right kind of pressure on the subterranean, internal majority of your clitoral tissues.
Watch a lot of guys jerk off, as I have (strictly for research purposes), and you'll notice some work the head furiously while ignoring most of the shaft; others work the shaft almost exclusively, paying scant attention to the head. Neither group is doing it wrong; both are doing what they need to do in order to get off—they're focusing on the part of their penis that requires the most stimulation to get them there.
Just as some guys are shaft-of-the-penis guys, GIRTH, you're a shaft-of-the-clit girl. And a girthy penis stimulates the shaft, aka the corpus cavernosum, of your clit, the same way a just-so positioned fist stimulates the shaft of some guy's penis. A thick dick applies stimulation and pressure right where you need—which, again, is internally, inside along your vaginal canal and along the internal structure/bits/shaft of your clitoris. That's what gets your off.
So what to do about this boy? That's a tough one.
You say he lacked "abilities in bed" and couldn't get you off, GIRTH, but that's not fair. This boy didn't know what you needed to get off. He couldn't get you off during vaginal intercourse using his penis alone—but sex isn't just PIV alone and a cis man brings more to the sack than just his penis, two totally truthful points emphasized in the otherwise excellent OWL sex ed program that misled you about penis size.
So his dick isn't girthy enough to get you off during PIV. Okay. How girthy are his forearms? How girthy are the crazy big dildos and other toys you two could purchase together if you became an item? You say you want him to be able to fuck you until you come? There's a toy for that!
Some will say that honesty would be cruel—better to do the fadeaway and hope the next girl he bones is an external grind girl. Hearing that his dick isn't enough to get you off all by itself could shatter his ego and his dick, which is a highly ego-dependent organ. He may be too young and too insecure to hear, "I really like you, and there's all sorts of ways I can get you off, but we're going to have to bring in silicone reinforcements to get me off." But if you tell him you like him, if tell him how hot you think he is, and if tell him you really want to make this work... maybe he can hear what it's going to take to make it work (PIV for him, TIV for you) without shattering into a million skinny pieces.
Your boyfriend is probably cheating on you, MOB, but he's definitely making you miserable. And my gut is telling me... well, my gut is telling me a lot of things right now. (Bad clams for dinner last night.) Among the things my gut is telling me is that your boyfriend's "make the girlfriend" miserable routine is intentional—subconsciously, if you want to look at it/him charitably, or consciously, if you want to look at it/him realistically.
Plenty of people settle for partners who "don't have the kind of sexual chemistry [they] might prefer." Settling down requires some settling for, no two people are perfect matches chemically, sexually, aspirationally, blah blah blah. "Less-than-ideal sexual chemistry" is one of the prices of admission that some have paid—and paid willingly—to be with their partners. But here's the thing: Only an asshole tells their BF/GF/NBF that they're paying this particular price of admission to be with them. Only an asshole constantly reminds his BF/GF/NBF girlfriend that they're deficient in this particular way and always will be.
This isn't not an absolute rule, of course; no rules are absolute. But the exceptions are few. Person A may be able to be honest with Person B about deficient sexual chemistry if...
1. They're in a purely companionate relationship that meets the emotional and social needs of both parties. 
2. Neither are particularly sexual.
3. They're in a relationship that's emotionally satisfying and somewhat sexually satisfying but the relationship isn't sexually exclusive and both partners are free to get their other/outré sexual needs met elsewhere.
Your relationship doesn't meet the criteria for an exception: it's not companionate, you're both sexual, it is (or it is supposed to be) sexually exclusive. And again, and most importantly, it's making you miserable. By which I mean to say, he's making you miserable. 
DTMFA.
"Persistent dick monster" is putting it lightly, QUEEN.
This guy sexually assaulted you and physically assaulted your boyfriend. Assault's a crime, and even though you don't know his last name... even if he was a complete stranger... reporting the night's events to the police may help prevent this from happening to someone else in the future. (Maybe he's already known to the cops? Maybe they can ID him based on your description? Maybe he assaulted someone else on the way home and they're already holding him and they'd be happy to add more charges to the ones he's already facing?) I'm not saying you have to report it. It's estimated that only 15 to 35 percent of all sexual assaults are reported to the police, and only 9 percent of all rapists get prosecuted. That's totally fucked. But while recognizing that some folks have legitimate reasons for not going to the cops, rapes and sexual assaults that aren't reported can't be prosecuted.
That being said, QUEEN, I'm happy to hear that this shitty encounter hasn't put you off future threesomes, moresomes, etc. But since we unfortunately live in a society that enables "persistent dick monsters," taking precautions in advance is essential to a safe (and fun) party.
Advance planning—or familiarity among the participants—is the best way to ensure safety. Spontaneous is fun but it's difficult to pull off safely with groups; spontaneous and safe fun can be difficult to pull off with one other person. Another lesson to be learned from this encounter: getting a new group together when the participants are shitfaced/shtoned/shwasted may not be the best plan. It's often the worst plan, in fact. Being fucked up is rarely a recipe for good sex even between people who fuck regularly. Plus, it's easier to ignore red flags when you can barely shee shtraight. Having to remind someone about consent is a major red flag, QUEEN, and one you're likelier to ignore or fail to spot when you're shwasted. In a situation where you're receiving unwanted touches, your polite dismissal of them should be enough. If this reminder has to be repeated twice, that participant should have their party pass to moresome mountain revoked immediately.
Two final takeaways: people are often terrible about taking hints—especially when doing so means getting cut out of a drunken fuckfest—so don't hint. Tell. And if you're going to drink and group in the future, QUEEN, hew to a strict BYOB policy. Because you don't ever again want to be in a position where you hesitate to show someone the door because they bought the booze.


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
It won't be a problem so long as you tell your old friend about it in advance, COCK, and discuss it without hesitation or shame. If you want to do it via email, COCK, feel free to copy and paste...
"Hey, I wanted to let you know that I've been dealing with ED for a while. My flesh-and-blood cock isn't very reliable at the moment. I just learned, after a long-overdue trip to the doctor, that my testosterone levels are really low. I'm getting treated for it now, which should help, and I'm getting myself back in shape, post-divorce, which should also help. I'm confident my cock will be back in action soon. In the meantime, though, I'm borrowing a page from the lesbian playbook: I got myself a strap-on that I'd love to use if vaginal penetration is on the menu. I'm excited to try it and I think getting to fuck without having to worry about losing my erection (silicone cocks never go soft!) will give me and my flesh-and-blood cock a good psychological boost. But I'd also be totally happy with mutual masturbation and/or oral if you'd rather not use the strap-on. I'm down for anything you're comfortable with, basically, but I wanted to let you know that, even if my cock isn't 100% right now, PIV is very much on the menu. But a stunt double will be standing in for my cock if we go for PIV."
I promise you it won't be a problem, COCK, regardless of her reaction. If she freaks out and doesn't want to sleep with you, COCK, no problem—you won't have to sleep with her and consequently you'll be spared the hurt and/or confidence-dinging humiliation of an in-the-moment PIV disaster (she takes one look at your strap-on and freaks out; you're too embarrassed to break out the dildo and your cock fails to rise to the occasion), and you'll be free to find a partner who isn't freaked out by it and/or finds it sexy.
And if she doesn't freak out about it, COCK, you'll get to fuck her and she'll be extra committed to making it work.
Good luck!
Sex workers, discretion, compassion.
My go-to example of permissible Secret Perving is the foot fetishist who works in a high-end shoe store. He really loves his job, he gets to look at feet all day long, and he moves a lot of shoes. So long as the shoe store salesclerk with a foot fetish is good at his job and so long as his secret perving is undetectable—no spotting, no bulges, no heavy breathing, no creepy compliments—there's no harm. If the foot fetishist/shoe salesclerk goes home at the end of a long day and jacks off about the feet he saw and, yes, handled during his shift—and the people he sold shoes to are none the wiser—he's not hurting anyone. The secret pleasure he takes in his work shouldn't disqualify him from being a shoe salesclerk.
Or a podiatrist.
Important note: it's not just about how the foot fetishist/secret perv/shoe salesclerk/aspiring podiatrist perceives himself, but how he is perceived by others—by his customers and his coworkers. He may think he's playing it cool, he may think his perving is secret, but if his customers are creeped out by his behavior, demeanor, bulges, spots, heavy breathing, etc., or his coworkers are creeped out by him, then his perving isn't a secret and he should be fired and/or go into another line of work. (My other go-to example of permissible Secret Perving: the business guy at a business meeting who's secretly wearing panties and a garter belt and pantyhose under his business suit. Yes, both of my examples of Secret Pervs involve male pervs. Because misandry.)
What Gerald Foos did does not qualify as Permissible Secret Perving.
It's not just the timing of his announcement; it's not just that Foos wanted "credit" during his lifetime (and the lifetimes of the people he spied on) for his "research"; it's not just that some of the people he spied on may still be alive and were possibly mortified and humiliated to learn that they might have been observed by Foos decades ago. (For the record: I can't remember the name of the hotel I stayed in three weeks ago; I'd be hard pressed to name a hotel I stayed in three decades ago.) It's that people in motel rooms have a reasonable expectation of privacy. They're purchasing privacy.
Someone who goes to the kind of high-end shoe store where retail salesclerks wait on them hand and foot—and slip the shoes on and off their feet—knows their feet will be seen and touched by a salesclerk. Their privacy is not being violated. The social/commercial compact in force at the shoe store allows for the customer to expose their feet and for the clerk to observe and touch their feet. The exposure and touch is consensual. The small chance that someone might be sexually aroused by some element of this commercial transaction—the salesclerk could have a foot fetish, the client could have a shoe fetish, the whole transaction could be an act of financial domination—can never be ruled out. (I'm pretty sure someone is secretly perving every time a pair of Wesco boots is sold.)
So buying a pair of shoes in shoe store—and not, say, online or at a garage sale—carries with it a small-but-unavoidable risk of someone involved deriving a secret thrill. And we all kindasorta know it or we would all realize it after a moment's thought.
Checking into a motel room is... different. Because, again, hotel guests have a reasonable expectation of privacy, because they're purchasing privacy, because they haven't consented to being exposed or observed once in they're in their rooms. The people Foos spied on over the years may not have known they were being perved on, just as the customers of a discreet foot fetishist may not know they're being perved on—but that's where the similarities end. Gerald Foos' secret perving required the invasion of his guests' privacy and that fact renders his secret perving impermissible.
So your wife can unilaterally open your marriage—aka cheat on you like crazy—for completely self-serving, bullshit reasons, and risk exposing you to a whole host of STIs in the process, but you're expected to go without sex for the rest of your life because the prospect of formally (and honestly!) opening up your marriage makes her feel feelings?
Yeah, no. Jesus Christ. Fuck that noise.
It's ultimatum time, CLAP: The wife either accepts reality—yours is a companionate marriage and you have no claim on each other sexually—or she accepts alimony.
Yes to everything you tossed out there, PPP—be patient, find some low-pressure/low-stakes ways to reconnect physically, keep on masturbating.
One additional suggestion...
Your husband is working full time and then doing "as much as he can" with your son when he's at home. You're at home with an infant, and parenting is work, but you've been able to find time in your day to masturbate, sometimes more than once a day. So there's some give in your schedule, PPP, some time for you to unwind. If there isn't any give in your husband's schedule—if he's killing himself all day at work and then coming home and relieving you of all parenting duties and killing himself all night—you might wanna urge the husband to take it a little easier.
Full-time parenting is work and full-time work is work. You're both working all day long. So your husband shouldn't be taking on all parenting duties when he's home—you two should be splitting the parenting duties at night. Encourage him to do his fair share, of course, and encourage him to spend time caring for his son. But also encourage him to have a drink now and then, to relax a little when he gets home, to take some time to sit and read or space out in front of the TV. Allow your husband to have a little downtime too—tell him there's downtime in your day and he needs to have some downtime too—and see if that doesn't help revive his sexual appetite.
At the height of the AIDS crisis—a time when gay neighborhoods were filled with guys who were very clearly dying, a time when weekends began and ended with memorial services—gay and bi men pretty much refused to wear condoms for oral sex en masse. Guys did a risk/reward analysis where blowjobs were concerned and most concluded the comparatively low and longterm risk of contracting HIV through oral sex was worth the real and immediate reward of latex-free blowjobs.
If guys weren't using condoms for oral sex then, BLOWS, you're gonna be hard-pressed to find guys who'll use condoms for oral sex now—despite all the other nasty shit out there, most of which can be contracted and spread orally.
But if condoms are a must for you—and I respect your choice (I was one of the few guys using condoms for oral sex in the 1990s)—you might wanna get off Craigslist and Grindr. Instead of looking for cock on sites/apps where guys seek random/anonymous hookups, BLOW, you'll have a better chance finding a guy who'll wear a condom for oral if you hook up with a guy you know or with a guy you've rented, i.e. make a friend or hire a sex worker.
My longstanding advice to kinksters has been to roll their kinks out a few weeks in, no more than three months in—you know: early in the relationship, not in the middle of the relationship. I've been urging people to "lay their kink cards on the table" early—before a huge emotional investment has been made—since 1994, the first year the expression "lay your kink cards on the table early" appeared in my column. 
And here I am, more than twenty years later, scolding a closeted crossdresser and wannabe pissboy for failing to disclose his kinks early on to the woman he married: 
But you held your two biggest kinks back from the new woman in your life, PUNT, and now you're sweating the reveal because the stakes are so high. This is precisely why I urge people to lay those kink cards on the table early. The longer you wait, the more emotionally invested you become in the relationship, the higher the stakes. Because what if your kinks aren't just things your second wife isn't interested in exploring, PUNT, but attraction-killers?
And here I am scolding a pantyhose fetishist with homoerotic fantasies for failing to disclose his kinks early on:
If you had followed my advice, BPG, your girlfriend would already know about your pantyhose/foot/cock fetishes. Your kinks aren't first-date conversation topics—no one's kinks are—but a woman has a right to know about kinks like yours, BPG, before she's invested two years in a relationship with you. Start the conversation like this, BPG: "Honey, I'm a much kinkier boy than I've led you to believe." Be upbeat, kink-positive, and unapologetic—well, unapologetic about your kinks. You should be somewhat apologetic about waiting two long years to lay all your kink cards on the table.
I'm actually on your side when it comes to disclosure, 1FOV. But I have disagree with you about kinksters being unhealthy. Active kinksters are emotionally healthier than vanilla types (and apparently a lot less bitter), says SCIENCE. More bad news for you: kinksters are actually in the majority. 
So, hey, maybe it's you freakish vanilla types who should have to disclose early?
Thanks for writing, ALS, and for providing an example of the kind of affair we rarely hear about: the one that saves a marriage and preserves someone's sanity. (This affair may have preserved the sanity of two someones; your husband is probably relieved you're not bothering him for sex anymore.) And I'm as pleased to hear you're happy as I am to hear you got retroactive permission from your husband to do what you were already doing anyway.
I am, however, shocked to hear that Ashley Madison is still up and running after, ahem, the recent unpleasantness. Here's hoping your letter, like so many accounts on Ashley Madison, isn't fake.
Eat ice cream. Take a walk. Watch a movie. Get a bike. Go for hikes. Hit the gym. Have some donuts. Read a book. Get some distance. Binge on Bee. Leave the house. Hang with friends. Hit the clubs. Drink faggy cocktails. Fuck other people.
Repeat as necessary.
There are so many reasons to have a wavering faith in humanity—reasons like this, this, this, this, and this—but porn (and those porn-aided/-enhanced orgasms) shouldn't be among them. The pleasures of porn can and should be respite from all the terrible/terrifying shit flooding your newsfeed. But I agree: the Internet can be a spooky place and there's definitely some porn out there—not going to assign a percentage here—that isn't created with much concern for the performers, and a trip down the wrong clickhole can scar a person for life.
That said, PORNO, there's plenty of sex-positive, alternative, and feminist porn out there, porn you can enjoy zero guilt, porn created ethically and sustainably. Carlyle Jansen, the producer of the Toronto International Porn Festival (formerly the Feminist Porn Awards), agrees with me about ethical porn (it's out there) and had some suggestions for you (content you might enjoy):
"Erika Lust is popular, more so among straight folks. She has storylines and erotic depth without the long up-close-genital shots and with more interesting cinematography. Alternatively, you can find many smaller independent productions by folks such as Ovidie, Ms. Naughty, the Madame, Jennifer Lyon Bell, Petra Joy, Lucie Blush, Shine Louise Houston, and the feministpornawards.com website. You can view awarded feminist films and categories such as kink, queer, straight, romantic, etc depending on interest."
Follow people like Erika Lust on Twitter, pay attention to who they follow and interact with, read the stories they link to, watch the porn they signal boost, and you'll keep discovering more and more good, ethical, guilt-free porn.
And it's important to note that if we wanna see more feminist porn in the world and on the web, we have to support that kind of porn—and by "support," of course, I mean "consume," PORNO, and the only kind of consumption that matters here is the kind that creates a viable market, i.e. paid consumption. Paying for porn downloads and helps finance projects and create careers for filmmakers and performers we like (and get off to). If you gets all your porn from Tumblr and/or the various tubes, you forfeit your right to complain about the porn that's out there. Buy the kind of porn you like and more of the porn you like will be made.

Finally, PORNO, wanna see some great, truly indy, ethically-created porn? Get to a screening of HUMP!, which is currently touring North America. (Check here for tour dates and tickets.) And if you're inspired to make some great, indy, ethical porn—be the change you wanna see in your porn!—the HUMP! 2017 call for submissions is here!

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Happy to help get the word out, TATMAFA—and I'm going to urge all of my readers and followers to take your advice. Please bombard Visit North Carolina with messages, burn up their Twitter feed, and sign every petition you can.
For anyone who hasn't been paying attention: Dominic Holden has two great pieces up at Buzzfeed about the hateful law North Carolina's legislature passed in a special session on Wednesday. Here's Dominic on the passage of the law itself, and here's Dominic on the growing backlash against the law.
But the law—which was motivated by anti-LGBT animus—doesn't just target trans people or all LGBT people for discrimination. Caitlin MacNeal at TPM:
North Carolina Gov. Pat McCrory (R) late Wednesday night signed rushed legislation that, as is widely known, eliminates local governments' ability to pass anti-discrimination measures to protect gay and transgender individuals. But what received less immediate attention was that the new law guts workplace discrimination protections for virtually everyone. A section of the new law alters the state's law that had allowed private sector employees to sue their employers under state law discrimination on the basis of of race, religion, color, national origin, age, sex or handicap. "It takes away a right that people have had for 30 years," Bill Rowe, the director of advocacy at the North Carolina Justice Center told TPM on Friday. "It’s a pretty big change that caught us all by surprise."
The law also targets veterans:
The bill would also end anti-discrimination protections for veterans. At least two North Carolina jurisdictions—Greensboro and Orange County—have anti-discrimination ordinances in place banning bias based on military or veteran status. Under the new measure, cities and counties would be prohibited from passing protections for veterans or service members.
And, finally, the law prohibits local governments—counties and cities—from raising the minimum wage.
There have been loud and crowded street protests since the passed—they're loud, crowded, and growing—but David Graham at the Atlantic argues that the quiet and menacing backlash from big business is likelier to have an impact:
Liberal protests against Republican initiatives in Raleigh have been par for the course for four years, with little effect. But the business backlash could sting. On Wednesday, as the bill was being considered, Dow Chemical, Biogen, and Raleigh-based software company Red Hat all opposed it. Others have since added their voices, including IBM, American Airlines, PayPal, and Apple. (Apple’s CEO, Tim Cook, is openly gay and graduated from Duke University’s Fuqua School of Business.) As my colleague Gillian White reported this week, North Carolina has sought to make itself a hub for tech companies and startups. Democrats in the state say the law could endanger federal Title IX funding for schools.
The NBA, in a statement, suggested it might reconsider plans to host the 2017 All-Star Game in Charlotte. The NCAA also suggested the law might cause it to change plans to hold elements of its annual college-basketball tournament and other events in the Old North State—a move that could resonate in this hoops-crazed state.
These business statements do carry sway in the state—the question is how much.
Finally, TATMAFA, it's kind of ironic how you linked to the Human Rights Campaign when pointing out how we still don't have federal LGBT civil rights protections and, consequently, it's perfectly legal to discriminate against LGBT people in most states. Here's Michelangelo Signorile on that bitter irony:
In the past 24 hours, the Human Rights Campaign (HRC), the nation’s largest LGBT group, has come under intense fire on social media, including from many transgender people, for its lack of a strategy in combating the rapid passage of a heinous anti-LGBT law in North Carolina which strips existing LGBT anti-discrimination ordinances in the state and bars transgender people from using public restrooms that correspond with their gender identity. But that criticism has followed an even more intense, week-long pummeling of the group on social media as well as from pundits and commentators, because of the group’s very curious endorsement earlier this month of Senator Mark Kirk, an Illinois Republican whose defeat in November is critical to the Democrats winning back control of the Senate.
Kirk, in a very tough re-election, has come out in support of The Equality Act, a sweeping federal anti-discrimination bill protecting LGBT people, and had voted to end “don’t ask, don’t tell.” But Kirk has only earned a score of 78 percent out of 100 percent from HRC, while his opponent, Democratic House member Tammy Duckworth, has a score of 100 — in addition to a real shot at taking the seat and handing Democrats the Senate. David Nir, political director at Daily Kos, called the endorsement as “appalling as it is embarrassing,” and “pathetic and stupid.” Mark Joseph Stern at Slate acknowledged the “long game” HRC may be playing in backing GOPers who vote pro-gay, but nonetheless drew the line at allowing the terribly anti-gay GOP leadership to retain the Senate this year, observing that HRC “does not seem to grasp...simple reality.”
And while we're all talking about what these assholes just did in North Carolina... the fucking Republicans go and do this in Indiana.
Sexual compatibility is important. It should be established early, guarded jealously, and sustained continually. And sexual compatibility is absolutely crucial in what is—or in what's supposed to be—a sexually exclusive relationship. I know, FUCK, I know: You realize all of this now, after spending the last twelve years with a woman with whom you never clicked sexually... a relationship you somehow managed to rationalize your way into but can't seem to rationalize your way out of.
So... should you stay or should you go?
You should go, FUCK, as you've stayed too long already—and going will be easier than you think, seeing as you're already gone. Your partner has already moved out and she's already given you permission to move the fuck on. You are "allowed" to have "sexual and romantic relationships with others," FUCK, so long as you inform your soon-to-be-ex about seeing/fucking/romancing someone else. So tell your partner you're seeing someone else and tell her it's more than just sex—and if your wife can't handle that particular truth, if the news precipitates a final and unambiguous breakup, if it causes her to utter the words "divorce” and “separation”, GOOD.
And if the news doesn't prompt her to utter those two magic words, FUCK, utter them yourself.
I might've suggested telling the wife you'd be willing to remain married if you could open the marriage and enter into romantic relationships with others—if you could be poly—but it doesn't sound like you want to be with your current partner anymore, FUCK. It sounds like you're afraid to be without her... and fear is a terrible reason to stay with someone.
So, yeah, restructure your relationship: a friendship, not a marriage; business partners, not life partners; someone's wife, maybe, at some point in the future, but not her wife anymore.
My response after the jump...
On the one hand... a man who demands "rapey" sex on his schedule for 18 years, makes his wife feel bad about her genitals, and isn't open to trying new things is begging to be cheated on. So go ahead and get some enthusiastic oral from those sub males, DOMME, you more than deserve it.
On the other hand... you say your rapey, pussy-disparaging, sex-shaming husband is your best friend (baffling!) and you don't want to lose him (equally baffling!). And without a doubt, a guy with his retrograde attitudes about sex, gender roles, and "wifely duties" would divorce you if he found out you cheated on him—and some days it feels like most people who cheat wind up getting caught—so you probably shouldn't take this into "real life," as it could wind up nuking your marriage.
But on the other other hand... your husband sounds like the type of guy who would regard your secret online life as cheating—the hundreds of e-mails, the phone calls, the hours lurking on domination websites—and divorce you just the same if he found out. So you might as well go ahead and fuck those subs, DOMME, because if you get caught—and you probably will—you'll be in the same trouble whether or not you got some enthusiastic oral from a sub male in "real life."
That seems like the best option to me.—[Name of Trusted Friend Redacted]
You don't have to get an abortion, FSA. If you want this baby, have this baby. But have it a single parent, not as a broodmare for an existing triad. (Having it means your boyfriend is going to be a part of your life for the next 18 years, which is something you should take into consideration while you make up your mind.) Your boyfriend—who you haven't really known that long—clearly hasn't been honest with you about his intentions. And now that you're pregnant... he's suddenly presenting you with a long list of demands/ultimatums/faits accompli, under the apparent assumption that pregnant = trapped. Not just mated, FSA, but checkmated.
Pregnancy isn't a trap. It's an option.
I fear you're being manipulated here—no, wait. You're obviously being manipulated here. I fear you've been lied to, I fear you were lied to all along, and I fear there's a Foot Locker full of shoes still to drop. DTMFA today, FSA, discuss all your options with trusted friends over the next week or two.
Good luck.
1. Um... I usually read a letter through a few times before I respond, BULLET, but I'm not going to be able to do that in your case because I have a plane to catch.
On Sunday night.
I don't know if this rises to the level of "emotionally abusive," but it certainly qualifies as "emotionally unpleasant/manipulative." You don't have to see yourself as the victim of emotional abuse, which is a specific kind of psychological abuse, just to to indict your ex or exonerate yourself or rationalize the collapse of this relationship. He was kinda shitty (except in those ways he was completely awesome), you were kinda insecure (except in those ways you were completely secure), you two weren't right for each other ultimately, and it's a good thing it's over.
2. The two choices aren't mutually exclusive—you could want different things and have dodged a bullet. And the bullet you dodged could be "wanting different things." Or that could be one of the bullets you dodged. Other potential bullets: mountains of debt, a useless law degree, wonky genes, his desire to procreate, his willingness to mooch, his inability to take "no, never" for an answer on the threesome question, etc., etc., etc.
3. Maybe don't invest a whole bunch of time and emotional energy in guys whose ultimate fantasies revolve around D/s threesome scenarios or other forms of group sex? Since you're clearly not down? As those fantasies sandpaper your insecurities? And you have a jealous streak? A jealous streak you're both cognizant of and in control of? But why inflame it needlessly?
4. You seem fine. A bit up your own ass, and a bit longwinded, but those aren't disqualifying dysfunctions.
5. Don't pick at scabs.
6. It wasn't Stockholm Syndrome. The sex worked, the rest didn't. You hung in there a little longer than you should have, perhaps, because the sex worked—and that's understandable. I get a lot of mail from people who are fucking miserable because the sex doesn't work at all. Finding someone you click with sexually is major. That's not something you toss aside lightly, BULLET, as the potential benefits of making it work, if you can make it work, are huge. So you gave it a go. Stop beating yourself up about it, stop reviewing the tapes with your friends, and stop writing letters to advice columnists about it.
My response after the jump...
Here's what you should say to your boyfriend: "You've got some growing up to do, and I've got some eating pussy to do. I don't want to end our relationship, but I'm moving out when our lease is up." If your boyfriend breaks up with you, IQAH, it's probably for the best—and it may not be forever. If he does dump you for purely defensive reasons, then he didn't really want to dump you at all, right? So once the shock wears off and his anger subsides, your boyfriend may decide that having you in his life is more important than having you all to himself.
First and most importantly: If we should ever meet, WTHYD, don't hug me. I'm not a promiscuous hugger. Or a slatternly huggee. I often consent to hugs, when offered, to avoid looking unfriendly, but my consent falls short of "enthusiastic" and is therefore not meaningful.
Alright, WTHYD, half way through your letter I was thinking, "The woman he thinks he's talking to? This butterfly nutjob? She doesn't exist—that's a dude with an incest fetish who gets off on convincing people his fucked up fantasies are actually someone's lived and deeply fucked up reality." Then I got to the part of your letter where the story turned into an incesty parody of the Pina Colada Song. ("So she waited with high hopes and I walked in Star-bucks/I knew her smile in an instant, I knew the curve of her face/It was my own lovely sister and she said, 'Bro, it's you?'/Then we laughed for a moment and I said, 'Ew, ew. EW!'") And that's when I realized you were the dude with the fucked up fantasies, WTHYD, fantasies that may not be incesty at all. (Most people lying about their crazy fantasies online don't cast themselves as heroes who block the consummation of their fucked up fantasies.)
But incesty or not, WTHYD, I'm not buying your story. You most likely have parents, WTHYD, and you may or may not have a sister. But I don't think anything you described in your letter actually happened. Still... it's definitely the most compelling letter I received today. Totally SLLOTD-worthy. Congrats.
Let's say I know some good places to fuck outside in Seattle. I'm not saying whether I actually know some good places to fuck outside, DEET, I'm only saying "let's say" I do. If I named those places here in the SLLOTD... they would soon be flooded with horny exhibitionists, cops, and assholes with iPhones looking to upload videos to Instasnapfacechatgram. So you don't want me naming names (of places), DEET, unless you're looking to turn this into a group project, get arrested, go viral, or all of the above. 
Speaking of getting arrested: although laws vary from state to state, sex in public is usually a misdemeanor (for straight people), but that can lead to small fines (if you're straight) or even actual jail time (if you're queer, poor, a sex worker, etc.) or life on a sex-offender registry (if you're queer, poor, a sex worker, etc.). That being said, you can apparently type "best places for public sex" into Yelp and it'll give you a (flawed) list. Seattle's Volunteer Park sits right at the top, mostly thanks to this this review:
I lived next to this park for a year and I never saw a single instance of public sex. I knew that public sex was HAPPENING, but the minute I would get to the park everyone threw their clothes back on and acted like they were there to walk their dogs or do Shakespeare in the Park. I feel robbed.
Wherever you choose to fuck publicly, public sex requires some creative problem-solving. I don't mean creative like trying to recreate the train scene in Risky Business. (I'm talking about the scene on the Chicago L train that helped make Cruise famous, not the kind of train scene a straight person like Tom Cruise has no interest in at all.) The key to successful public sex is anonymity. So don't look like or be Tom Cruise. Appear forgettable. Seattleites generally prefer to their clothes to match the color of the omnicloud, so avoid bright jackets or colorful patterns. Additionally, ditch the underwear and skip standard foreplay. (Finding the right spot to fuck? That is the foreplay.) Unless you have a rolling Italian hillside all to yourself, you'll want to keep things quick and focused. For efficiency, it's better to do it standing (again, unless you own your own hillside), in a spot where there's something stable to lean up against (trees, boulders, maybe a museum). And be careful at Discovery Park. There are cliffs.
Oh, and regarding the dates you mention: May 8th is National Outdoor Intercourse Day, also known as NOID. Popular in the 70s and 80s, it's now less popular than May 1st, which is May Day all over the world and Anarchist Shit Show Day here in Seattle. Technically, the first of May is International Workers' Day—and what better way to celebrate than by blowing off work to go fuck around? Added bonus: the police have their hands full on May 1, so you're less likely to get caught banging in or under the trees.


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
You might wanna apologize to your friend—the one who knows you fuck other people but apparently wasn't prepared to meet (or know she was meeting) other people you've fucked—but you don't gotta apologize to your friend.
An apology for the "uncomfortable position" your friend found herself in at your party will help smooth things over and may save this friendship. But more importantly, HI, the convo around the apology will give you an opportunity to discuss your friend's flight response.
You don't mention how many people were at the party... but after realizing you guys had fucked this other couple... and then realizing this other couple brought along someone else they're fucking... and then after the PDA broke out... your friend may have leapt to the conclusion that this "party" was about to turn into an open/poly fuckstorm.
If your friend tells you she fled what she thought was a coming fuckstorm, HI, your good-humored, breezy, upbeat assurances that no fuckstorm was planned that night—and, indeed, no fuckstorm broke out that night—will hopefully set your friend's mind at ease about your intentions and the invitation to this particular party, i.e. you weren't trying to recruit her into your open/poly/fuckstorm "lifestyle." You'll be able to address your friend's misconceptions about open and/or poly folks (we typically don't invite monogamy muggles to our open/poly fuckstorms) and get your non-fucking friendship back on track.
But if the issue was merely knowing she was in the presence of other human beings you and your husband have fucked—if her friendship is really that conditional (condition: she wants to able to pretend you guys are not in an open relationship)—then fuck getting this friendship back on track. Close-minded people make lousy friends generally, HI, but they're particularly lousy friends to people in open relationships.
There is a term for guys like you: bi. You're variation on the bisexual-but-heteroamorous theme we explored a couple of years ago—let's call you bifunctional but heterosexual/amorous—but I'd say you're bisexual in theory as well as practice.
Backing up...
Think of sexual identity/orientation as a three-layer cake. The bottom layer: who you wanna do. The middle layer: who you are doing. The top layer: what you tell people, aka how you self-identify—straight, gay, lesbian, bi, asexual, etc. The more neatly aligned your layers, the less messy your cake.
Remember Ted Haggard? Used to be a big figure on the religious right, headed up the National Association of Evangelicals, was a spiritual counselor to George W. Bush. Let's take a look at Ted's layer cake: Who did Ted wanna do? Guys. Who was Ted doing? Guys (male sex workers) and gals (his wife). What did Ted tell people? He told people he was straight—and that gay people were sick and sinful perverts who were gonna go to hell for destroying the country. That man's cake was a meth. 
Now let's take a look at your cake, CHLG. Who do you wanna do? Women in general, your wife in particular. Who are you doing? Men, lots of them, in all sorts of ways. What do you tell people? You tell people you're straight.
And you know what? You can continue to tell people you're straight, if you wanna/hafta keep rounding yourself down to straight. But there's no need to lie to yourself about this stuff, CHLG, or to me: you're not straight. Straight guys don't suck cocks or come when other men fuck them in their asses. Now "situational/circumstantial homosexuality" is a real thing—"sexual contact between members of the same sex due to absence of the opposite sex, e.g., military, prison, rather than desire or predisposition"—but it's not your thing. A sexless marriage is a circumstance, but it's not literally a prison. Members of the opposite sex aren't absent, just a little harder to come by/on/in, and you are definitely experiencing desire—not for men, per se, but definitely for dick.
And you know what? You're not that uncommon. Think of all the straight-identified guys out there who hire trans women sex workers. Most of those guys want dick, CHLG, just like you do, but they're not into dudes, just like you aren't. But while you're down there on your knees sucking and compartmentalizing ("Just down here for the cock, thanks!"), these other cock-hungry "straight" guys employ a workaround that gets them to a similar place ("A trans woman can give me everything I need!").
Regardless of whether you agree with me on this layer cake business—you don't have to ID as bi if you don't want to—you are having lots of sex with lots of men. So gay, straight, or bi... you better be using condoms, CHLG, and you should be on Truvada.
I could respond to your question—like the others in this week's column—in just four words: mind your own business.
But I'll expound for a moment.
Your say your sister is in her mid-30s and "still isn't quite ready for children." That's a thing that makes me go hmmm. Something else has me hmmm'ing: You seem to be in a bigger panic about your sister's impending non-motherhood than your sister is. Which has me wondering if your sister still wants kids or really wanted kids in the first place. Maybe she's been telling you (and other members of her immediate family) that she wants kids because she's supposed to want kids (all good  and decent women want kids, right?) or maybe she's been saying she wants kids because some members of her immediate family seem really invested in her having kids someday and she didn't want to deal with/disappoint them. But instead of telling you to mind your own business, SHIT, or instead of telling you she doesn't want kids now/didn't want them ever and risk being judged or lectured or shamed, running out her biological clock and pinning the blame on her husband was the plan all along.
Or, hey, maybe she always wanted kids and still wants kids—but she's reassessing what she wants or is willing to settle for now, in light of her husband's decision not to have anymore kids of his own. If your sister decides she'd rather be childless and married to the man she's with now than a single woman in a hurry to find some man who wants kids (or a single parent), SHIT, you'll just have to respect your sister's decision.
"Respect your sister's decision" is just another way of saying "mind your own business."
You have my permission to break up with this guy.
Lots of people wonder about what could have been—about the guys, girls, and non-binaries who got away—and most fantasize about loving relationships and rocking sex lives and other rosy scenarios. But a shit outcome is just as likely as a loving/rocking/rosy one—no, scratch that. Most relationships fail, MITP, so a shit outcome is far likelier than a loving/rocking/rosy one.
You've had a shit outcome and it's time to pull the plug. The coming all over the bedspread is unforgivable all by itself—he can't use socks or tissues or come rags?—to say nothing of the neglect, the laziness, and the mooching. You aren't obligated to stay with/pay for this guy for the rest of your life just because he moved across the country to be with you.
You can do better. DTMFA.
Nothing in your letter screams DTMFA situation—this would be a DTMFA situation if he refused to remove his PA—and nothing about requiring him to remove his PA requires you to turn in your GGG card. You're having great sex with a great guy who's considerate enough to remove a beloved piece of jewelry for your comfort and sexual satisfaction. Take "yes" for an answer from him, NJHEAP, take "this is not a problem" for an answer from me.
And from the Department of Too Much Information: I was with a guy for more than a year who had a PA and I never cracked a tooth. But if you're concerned... have him remove his PA for oral too.
Your friend is full of shit. There's nothing sex-negative about not wanting a stranger handling your sex toys—but that's not the real issue. This man violated your space and your toys and your phone and your sense of personal safety. There was nothing harmless about what he did: you were made to feel unsafe in your own home.
Delete your full-of-shit friend along with that app.
The police wouldn't be able to do anything about this—it doesn't sound like any laws were broken (it's not against the law to be a fucking creep)—but I wouldn't blame rape culture for that. You paid someone to clean your house and he wound up cleaning the inside of a box he had no business fishing out from under your bed. He was creepy, he was inappropriate, he was unprofessional, and he made you feel duped and unsafe. For those reasons should be fired. But he didn't commit a crime and unless he's continued to contact you—or resumes contacting you—he can't be charged with sexually harassing or stalking you. But if he should contact you again—via text or email or by showing up at your apartment—go to the police, report him for stalking, and file a restraining order against him.
Finally, NOTE, you should take this story to a reporter in the city where you live. The people behind this "Uber for Hoovers" app need better vetting protocols—if they have any at all—for the cleaners they're sending into people's homes. A call to costumer service is unlikely to result in an internal review, heads rolling, and effective screening protocols being put in place. That's a job for bad publicity.
I don't know if this will help, CB, as it's just a little something I yanked out of my ass. Meaning, no data, no research, no psychological experts weighing in.
You typically watch porn when you masturbate, projecting yourself into the fantasy scenes and scenarios on your computer or phone. (Who watches porn on the teevee anymore?) Or you lay back and fantasize about the sex you'd like to be having while you use a vibrator. Your fantasies—whether augmented by porn or entirely your own creation—remove you from your current reality. You don't watch porn featuring your shitty soon-to-be-ex-husband, you don't lay back and fantasize about that married jerk you need to stop fucking.
And then you come.
The fantasy ends, the orgasm(s) subside(s), and it's back to reality. Your current reality, CB, which ain't so great. You're already feeling a little emotional as your not-that-great marriage ends and this not-that-great affair continues—those tear ducts are primed—and the combo of those already heightened emotions and the contrast between your sexual fantasies and your current sexual/marital/relational realties is just too much. So you have yourself a nice, cleansing little cry.
My hunch: once you're no longer married to your not-so-nice husband, CB, and once you're out from under your selfish prick of a lover, the contrast will be less stark and your masturbatory sessions will no longer end in tears.
Well, gee.
So for folks who use meth... only 5% will become "dependent" within two years?
Sorry, PAY, even with the facts at hand—always happy to learn from my readers—my feelings about meth are the same: there's no using meth, only abusing meth. Considering what a meth addiction means, and having seen the damage that drug can do, a one-in-twenty chance of becoming addicted is simply too risky. I've known high-functioning alcoholics and daily pot smokers who had their shit together. But I've never met a daily user of meth who wasn't on his way out, PAY, and most were taking others with them.
But thanks for the download.
Lenore Skenazy had a great post up at Free Range Parents a few weeks back about yet another high school full of teenagers who may face criminal charges for sexting. Police were searching through kids' phones looking for sexts and threatening to bring charges against anyone found to be in possession of a nude picture of a minor—even if the minor in question was the kid whose phone the picture was found on. These kids, like so many others, could wind up facing felony child pornography charges and land on sex-offender registries.
Skenazy writes...
I have no idea if the authorities will go in that awful direction. But the fact that other young people have been prosecuted for the same behavior just means that young people are in danger of ruining their lives NOT because their naked pictures are out there—at some point, even employers won’t care, because these will be so common—but because the cops swooped in and declared the kids deviants. How about we decide that taking nude selfies is not a crime, nor is possessing them if they were sent to you. Any state legislator with a kid or grandkid should be able to understand that this law will PROTECT rather than ENDANGER their children’s futures.
That bolded part is for you, NN. You're only twenty, your high-powered/businessy career in a mathy field is a long way off, and nearly all of your peers have nude photos of themselves floating around out there. The time is quickly coming when a few nude photos or videos floating around online will present no more of a threat to an adult's career than the admission that you smoked pot in high school or college or last weekend or all three. So send those pictures—hell, release a couple into the wild (slap 'em up on Tumblr), NN, and you'll help create the world we all want to live in, i.e. a world where one or two nude photos or videos isn't a big deal, much less a career-threatening/-ending scandal.
And while we're on the subject of teenagers and sexting...
Robby Soave at Reason does a great job covering the real teen sexting scandal, i.e. the prosecution and persecution of teenagers who get caught sexting. In a post about a sexting panic at yet another high school, Soave writes...
Police Detective Mike Mohney told WBST.com that sexting is a serious crime because [when teenagers sext it can lead to] “bullying,” and “real severe things like people committing suicide or violent crimes against others because they're so embarrassed about it.”
Mohney’s statement is a perfect example of the inherent contradiction of ruining kids’ lives for sexting. If the goal is to avoid “severe consequences,” why would they pursue charges in the first place? If sexting-induced embarrassment is a source of violence and suicide, certainly the risk of embarrassment is made much worse by branding the offender a pedophile—for abusing no one but himself—and sentencing him to the sex offender registry.... Authorities warn that the consequences for the underage are just too dire, but the most awful outcome is the one the authorities themselves impose on perpetrators: criminal charges. Can you imagine being a 14-year-old, trying to get your life back on track, after being socially stigmatized, expelled, charged with a crime, and publicly branded a sex offender? All because you took a picture of yourself?
Teens who create and share sexy photos aren’t child pornographers. They are teenagers. To pretend the law can suppress their natural curiosity about their own bodies, and each other’s, is to subscribe to vindictive madness and paranoia about human sexuality. These kids aren't hurting themselves—we're hurting them.
Let's protect our kids—and their future career prospects—by legalizing sexting already.
Thanks for the feedback, LELL, and I'm delighted you found a blowjob technique that worked for you when you were first getting into cock (although I imagine your husband was considerably more delighted), to say nothing of finding erotica that helped you get into full-blown blowjobs.
But a quick clarification (although I think this was clear enough on the show): My advice about sucking just the head was directed at someone who was nervous about taking a very large cock in her mouth, not at someone who wasn't sure she was into sucking cock. I suggested she wrap her hand(s) around the shaft and just take the head in her mouth—or just the head and change—while assuring her that her big-dicked partner would be unlikely to notice the difference. So long as her hands were wet (employing your lick/mouth the shaft technique prior to taking the head in her mouth would be a good way to get the shaft wet), her fingers weren't bony, and her grip wasn't too tight, the guy she was blowing might not notice the difference—and, if he did, he'd enjoy the blowjob regardless.
As for butt toy recommendations, LELL, I forwarded your question to Jeneen at SheBop, Portland's awesome/progressive/feminist/educational sex toy shop. Jeneen wrote back... 
I'd love to give a quick recommendation!
To touch on: "What (if anything) is the difference between anal vibrators made for men and those made for women?"
Toys (anal plugs) that are curved at the end are designed to target prostate (as well as G-spot). However any body really can use either a straight or curved toy. The most important thing for anal play is that you use a toy that has a flanged base or handle so that it can be easily retrieved. Silicone is also a great material for a plug since it is non-porus and easy to clean and phthalate free.
Any of our Fuze brand anal plugs Arrow, Quattro, Triton, Hero (you choose the size that seems to your liking) can accommodate a bullet vibrator and be small enough to not interfere with other activity.
Realizing her fantasies about double penetration could also progress to her husband using a double penetration harness such as the Menage a Trois or Deuce in which his penis and a vibrating dildo strapped on him can actively penetrate simultaneously.
We also have a great guide on our blog on How To Choose An Anal Toy that she may find helpful for more insight.
One suggestion.
Don't plan on having just one MMF threesome, AWNCBTMAWF, plan on having two or more MMF threesomes—assuming there's mutual interest after the first one, of course, and assuming your friend's health is good enough to be making plans for the next few months.
Here's why you should frame this MMF threesome as the first of a possible set or a possible series: so long as this threesome is hyped as a one-time, one-off, one-shot deal, both of your male friends—your dying friend and the friend you've tapped—are gonna go in feeling like they've gotta cram every last gay thing into this one threesome. Dude-on-dude kissing, two dudes giving and receiving blowjobs, dudes taking turn topping each other and bottoming for each other: that's an awful lot of man-on-man action for one night. Not only are you placing a lot of pressure on both men to perform, AWNCBTMAWF, you're not leaving much time for you, your needs, or your lady bits/butt/mouth.
You don't want your dying friend to feel rushed or pressured to do everything—what if ass isn't in buttfucking gear on the big night?—or to leave feeling like his first MMF threesome was a failure because he didn't tag every gay base or fill every manhole. Even if a second or third MMF threesome doesn't happen—if there isn't time or mutual interest—the one that does will feel easier, breezier, and more successful if both guys are free to enjoy what comes without having to worry about what doesn't.
And just for the record...
People with sexually transmitted infections aren't unclean. They have an infection—some treatable, some not, some a big deal, some not. And remember: "expose" does not necessarily/always equal "contract." You can have safe/safer sex with someone who has a sexually-transmitted infection and risk exposure (your partner might be shedding the herpes virus, your HIV+ partner's condom might break) or even wind up being exposed (your partner was shedding the herpes virus, your HIV+ partner's condom did break) without actually contracting the particular sexually transmitted infection you were exposed to.
Your friend with cancer may have a compromised immune system, though, and a herpes outbreak—a first one—could be very aggressive and very unpleasant. So do your best to be stay safe. But keep the risks and rewards in perspective. For example, I can't imagine your friend who's dying of cancer is too concerned about contracting HIV just now.
Good luck!
P.S. Thank you for your column.  Growing up as a bi male in Wyoming with an interest in kink was a sometimes bizarre experience, but your work helped the world feel a little friendlier and a lot less lonely.
Maybe it's the Theraflu and the Sudafed and the six other cold medications—I'm not really thinking very clearly right now—but I'm having a hard time seeing the issue here. Why exactly is your ex-girlfriend (of several months) upset-to-the-point-of-needing-the-emotional-support-her about this particular miscarriage?
All miscarriages are unpleasant, I realize, and many are deeply traumatizing. But your ex didn't want to have a baby with you and she would've aborted the fetus if the pregnancy had continued long enough for her to realize she was even pregnant. It's not like she wasn't trying to decide whether or not to have an abortion and was leaning toward termination when she had a miscarriage—which would've deprived her of her agency and control—she literally didn't know she was pregnant until a miscarriage ended a pregnancy she never wanted. 
Or even noticed.
Again, all miscarriages are unpleasant—including, I suppose, the welcome ones. But I'm not sure what's required of you in this circumstance, on the emotional support front, besides "I'm sorry," "That's too bad," "I hope you're alright," and, "I'm glad you called." Unless you remained silent throughout phone call, JEB, I'm guessing you said all those things. Because, really, what else is there to say?
Sigh.
I don't have a problem with people giving other people blowjobs—wherever they happen to be—and I didn't describe Mike In Portland OR as the history's greatest monster. I merely pointed out that blumkins—as a concept/meme—are discussed, joked about, and defined in a manner that is, by any honest reading, objectively sexist.
Because, once again, a blumkin isn't a blowjob given to a nice man who just so happens to be sitting on a toilet. That's a blowjob. To qualify as a blumkin the blowjob must be performed by "your woman" while you're "taking a very stinky shit." It's a different thing entirely.
And while I have given helpful pointers to a woman who wanted to stick a metal rod up her husband's dick—something he wanted to experience—I've never taken a position on toy-Hulk-hand fisting sessions or homeless-gangbang-facial-bukkake-mass-transit scenes. And I would probably draw the line south of both (that means before both, right?)—because God only knows what those Hulk hands are made of, SLYT, and a crowded subway bukkake scene would annoy, inconvenience, or trigger other passengers. 
Sorry about another blumkin post, Slog, but I'm dying of a cold and decided to respond the first email in the ol' inbox. And this was it.
How strange that your letter should come today, MIPOR, just moments after I filed a second column about blumkins. That column will be published on Wednesday.
I'm sorry/not sorry to report that I once again declare blumkins to be bullshit—stupidly sexist bullshit—and I will continue to do so, MIPOR, despite your letter. Because your story could be bullshit. I don't know you, you could be anyone, there's no way to independently confirm your account. And even if your girlfriend did stroll over to the toilet after you "dropped a deuce," as the kids once said (the kids "rally for Trump" these days), and proceeded to suck your cock, technically speaking that was no blumkin. UD:
The term blumkin is when a man is sitting on the toilet taking a shit. And has his woman come in and give him head during the act of shitting.
The deuce had already dropped by the time your girlfriend got to bathroom, MIPOR. That was a blowjob in the wrong place at the wrong time—in the bathroom, right after deuce was dropped—but it was not, once again, and technically speaking, an actual blumkin. Dubious achievement not unlocked.
And finally, MIPOR, I speak for everyone out there reading when I say...
WHAT THE FUCK IS WRONG WITH YOU?!? Have you never heard of a COURTESY FLUSH?!? You probably could've flushed the toilet twice in the time it took your then-girlfriend to get out of bed, walk to the bathroom, get on her knees, and get your cock in her mouth. A gentleman would've flushed the toilet—a true gentleman would've risen from the toilet—thereby preventing his girlfriend from blowing him with "a turd floating just 9" below her face."
...and it doesn't make much sense.
I'll try to knock it off, EID. I can't imagine I'll succeed. But I'll try.
My response after the jump...
A quick dip into Wikipedia for readers who aren't familiar with the term "vore": "Vorarephilia (often shortened to vore) is a paraphilia wherein an individual's sexual arousal occurs in response to a fantasy of themselves, another person, or an object eating or being eaten... The fantasy sometimes involves the victim being swallowed whole, though on some occasions the victims are chewed up, and may or may not include digestion."
Makes you wonder how many of the people who were furious with the Discovery Channel after that guy wasn't "eaten alive" by a snake were secretly vore fetishists.
Anyway, VORE, you're not the only person on earth whose sexual fantasies revolve around or are completely dominated by something impossible or unrealizable. The lady centaur fetishist is not and never will be a lady centaur, the guy into giant women has not met and will not ever meet a 50-foot-tall woman on the subway, you are not and never will be a monster capable of swallowing another monster whole. While most people with unrealizable fetishes or fantasies enjoy "regular stuff" all by itself, a great many do not. The latter type—kinksters who can't get off to regular stuff—allow their impossible/unrealizable fantasies to play out in their heads while they enjoy the intimacy and physical sensations of non–vore/centaur/giantess stuff. Most aren't "checked out" during sex: They're enjoying regular stuff and irregular stuff simultaneously—they're fully present, getting into and getting off on their partners, all while their impossible/unrealizable fantasies play on a loop in their heads, sometimes in the background, sometimes in the foreground.
So while you may be "doomed" to go through life with this fetish, VORE, you are not doomed to solo sex. You can have your fantasies and partnered sex too.
But I don't think you've been at this sex stuff long enough to conclude that you're incapable of enjoying regular stuff on its own. Everyone has their go-to fantasies, and years of solo masturbation can carve a deep groove in a person's erotic imagination. Since vore was where you always went when you were aroused prior to your boyfriend coming along, your brain may have automatically gone there when you got aroused with your boyfriend. Don't mistake what may have been force of habit for complete dependence, or what you seem to fear most—complete dependence on your vore fantasies—could become a self-fulfilling prophecy.
As for your shame about your kink ("a really warped, messed-up fetish"), you gotta shake that shit off. Take it from Tynan Fox, a kinkster and public speaker: "We don't choose our kinks—our kinks choose us." You didn't choose your kink, VORE, your kink chose you. So give yourself a break, okay? Stick with sex- and kink-positive partners (like your current boyfriend), incorporate your kinks carefully and consensually, and don't neglect your partner's interests and possible kinks. You also might want to explore the furry/scalie community, a space where you can be (or meet) the anthropomorphic monster and/or dragon of your dreams.
You suspect she may have enjoyed fucking those other men?
I fucking hope she enjoyed fucking those guy—and you should too, CINOVA. Because even if cuckolding wasn't her fantasy, even if she was only doing it to save her marriage, even if she would rather have been strictly monogamous, anyone who cares about this woman (and you care about her, right?) should hope the experiences she had with those other men weren't negative, traumatizing, or completely joyless.
And, yes, people will sometimes broach the subject of their own sexual interests/fantasies in the passive voice or in a negative frame, CINOVA, because they're afraid of rejection and want an easy out. ("My ex was into this kinda extreme thing and I did it to because I felt I had to." "Oh, that's gross." "Yeah, I totally hated it.") But cuckolding is almost always the husband's fantasy, rarely does the wife initiate cuckold scenes/relationships, so odds are good your girlfriend is telling you the truth about the whole thing—all those other guys—being her ex-husband's idea.
As for whether she's testing you: That's a pretty easy test to fail, CINOVA. All you gotta do is open your mouth say, "Yeah, no. Cuckolding isn't something I would ever want to do. The thought of you with another man isn't a turn on for me. Not at all."
What should you do? 
If you can't let this go, if you can't get over the sexual adventures your girlfriend had with her ex-husband, if you can't hope she had a good time regardless, if you can't take "Oh, honey! I'm not interested in cuckolding you!" for an answer—if you can't do all of that, CINOVA—then you should do your girlfriend a favor and break up with her. She just got out from under a shitty husband who pressured into "cheating." The last thing she needs right now is a shitty boyfriend who shames her for "cheating."
Bisexual erasure plays a critical role in reducing access to the resources and support opportunities bisexually oriented people so desperately need.
The sad fact that most bisexuals remain closeted is one thing—one among many—that helps to perpetuate bisexual invisibility/erasure:
Bisexuals are much less likely than gay men and lesbians to say that their sexual orientation is an important part of who they are. Only 20% of bisexuals say being bisexual is extremely or very important to their overall identity.... Bisexuals are also much less likely than gay men or lesbians to have “come out” to the important people in their life. Only 28% of bisexuals say all or most of the important people in their life know they are bisexual. By comparison, 77% of gay men and 71% of lesbians say the important people in their life know about their sexual orientation.
Remaining closeted does have certain perks... 
Relatively few bisexuals report that they have experienced discrimination because of their sexual orientation. When we asked about six specific types of incidents—ranging from being subjected to slurs and jokes (the most common experience among all LGBT respondents) to being treated unfairly by an employer (the least common), bisexuals were significantly less likely than gay men or lesbians to have experienced most of them.
Things aren't going to change for the better—we're not going to defeat bisexual invisibility/erasure and the harm it does—until more/most bisexuals are out. And that includes bisexuals in opposite-sex relationships, TLTL. I mean, think about it: if bisexuals aren't picked on as much as gays and lesbians (per Pew), if bisexuals don't encounter as much discrimination (ditto), why do bisexuals suffer worse physical and mental health outcomes? I have a theory: Because it's hard to access the services and support you need if you're closeted, yes, but lying about who you all your life is fucking stressful too. And while encountering a bigot isn't fun—slapping 'em down when you can, getting the hell away from 'em when you can't—it would appear that being out and dealing with the occasional bigot is better for the mind and body than remaining "safely" closeted.
Now let's take your questions one at a time....
1. "So how does a socially monogamous, bi, married-to-a-dude lady without a lady-loving past to refer to, go about coming out?"
The socially monogamous, bi, married-to-a-dude lady opens her mouth and says, "I'm bisexual," as often as circumstances allow/demand. For example, the socially monogamous, bi, married-to-a-dude lady is at dinner with her girlfriends and someone says something about "us straight gals." ("It's so much fun to get together—just us straight gals!") At that point the socially monogamous, bi, married-to-a-dude lady clears her throat and says, "Actually, I'm bisexual."
2. Or does it even matter at this point?
It matters very much.
3. Should I just let people assume I’m straight and keep on keeping on eating pussy in private?
Nope.
Nope.
I'm tempted to leave it there, HALF, but I'm way too Catholic to leave it there. So let me see what I can scrounge up for you...
The ideal boyfriend for you two—the perfect source of oxytocin—would be a fully programable sex robot. Your requirements are that specific. But it's going to be a few years, if not a few decades, before the lifelike sexbots come online. So what to do in the meantime, HALF? You do what everyone else seeking a partner is doing: You put yourselves out there, you get on OKCupid and other websites, and you make an effort to be open, honest, and breezy about who you are and what you want.
Most guys aren't going to be interested in such a complicated package deal, HALF, so your search may be a long and ultimately fruitless one. But there are definitely guys out there who are or wannabe poly. And while the odds you'll find a guy equally attracted to you both are long, HALF, they're not impossibly long, particularly since he'll only need to be fully intimate/do all the sex stuff with one of you.
And, hey, your particular brand of codependency may be a selling point. There are guys out there who find it difficult to function on their own, HALF, and lots of them. A triad relationship grounded in mutual support and focused on emotional security could be just what some of those guys are looking for... even if they don't realize it until after they've met you.
Good luck.

"Rule of thumb: someone could always be offended," said Bailey Jay, after I shared your email with her. "My opinion: this is harmless and super common on OKC."
Other rules of thumb: Simply stating that you happen to be interested in and that you're actively seeking a certain type of person—particularly when that statement is framed positively, not negatively (no need to rattle off a list of who/what you aren't seeking)—doesn't make you guilty of felony fetishization/objectification. It's how you treat people from your preferred romantic/erotic target groups that matters. If you treat them only as objects—if you treat them like human Fleshlights, there to be used and discarded, without any consideration for their feelings, desires, or agency—then, yeah, you're an asshole who's objectifying/fetishisizing people in a dehumanizing way.
Don't be an asshole.
If you take care not to treat people as objects only—people are objects also ("anything that is visible or tangible and is relatively stable in form")—then you're free to ignore the PC thought/dick/pussy police who insist any mention of traits and/or types amounts to felony objectification. On the other hand, PENIS, if you think you're being careful not to treat people as objects only but the people you've met with the traits you desire tell you that you made them feel objectified/fetishisized, well, then you're doing it wrong. Try harder and do better.
Last word to Bailey Jay: "Have fun and thanks for having sex with trans people!"
He shouldn't have to change who he is to be with you, TOBS, but what if he wants to?
It's unlikely he'll morph into an always-quietly-tittering, always-kink-discreet introvert, just as it's unlikely you'll ever morph into a braying, oversharing extrovert. But if making an effort to dial it back now and then is the price he has to pay to be with you—along with reserving convos about his kinks (and, by inference, your kinks) for fetish clubs and play parties—why not let him decide if that's a price he's willing to pay?
You're gay and kinky, TOBS, as you're well aware. Presumably you're also aware that gays represent a tiny percentage of the general population, and kinky gays represent a not-so-tiny-but-still-small-ish percentage of the gay population. I don't think you should have to marry this man, regardless of his flaws, just because you're gay and your kinks align. But you should think twice about discarding a guy who's gay and kinky and attractive and whose company you enjoy most of the time just because he gets on your nerves now and then. (I'm pretty sure I get on my husband's nerves now and then.) At the very least you owe it to yourself, just as you owe it him, to be specific about the reasons you pulled the plug.
Because he might want to make an effort to win you.
There's a lot that's good here—your kinks align perfectly (so rare!) and you enjoy spending some-but-not-all of your time together (so common!)—and there are workarounds for the bad. A quick example from my own life: Terry is way more extroverted than I am. So sometimes he goes to movies, restaurants, clubs, parties, and concerts without me. I stay home and read or sleep or clean. And then, when he gets home, we have something to talk about: how the movie was, whether the restaurant was any good, who was out at the club, who got messy at the party, if there were any cute boys in the band he saw. He doesn't make me go out, I don't make him stay home. It's a workaround that works for us.
With some effort, TOBS, you could find the workarounds that work for you: he makes an effort, when you nudge him, to dial it back; he goes to comedies with his friends, dramas with you; if he's working a room, you slip into another room. Give it a chance.
Programming note: Terry accidentally set his alarm clock for 4 AM this morning. (He meant to set it for 8 AM, but his finger slipped or something.) He woke up, turned the alarm off, and went right back to sleep. Not me. I couldn't get back to sleep. So if you're wondering what my advice is like when I've had less than three hours of sleep and I'm majorly annoyed with my husband... you're about to find out. Grain of salt for most readers, shaker of salt for the LW.
The moment someone's insecurities become weaponized—the moment they become tools used to dominate and control a partner, not emotional vulnerabilities requiring understanding and compassion from a partner—is the right moment to call that someone's bluff.
Your wife, after cheating on you with multiple people, has taken a secondary partner. You've made sacrifices both emotional and sexual to accommodate her needs—you let her gay boyfriend move into your home—and now it's her turn: She's gonna get a grip on her jealousy and her insecurities, with the help of a professional, because you're going to start dating other people too.
Period.
And to be clear: You're not gonna wait until after she gets a grip on her jealousy and insecurities to start dating other people, GRIPPER, as that creates an incentive to never get a grip. You're gonna start dating other people now. As a concession to her jealousy, her insecurities, and her hypocrisy, promise her you'll be discreet for the time being. But you're not seeking her permission, nor are you waiting for her permission, to get out there, to get poly, and to get your needs met.
And if that blows up your marriage—if it ends your marriage—so be it. You don't want to spend the rest of your life married to a selfish, hypocritical manipulator. I'm sorry there's a kid involved, of course, but parents aren't hostages, GRIPPER, and husbands aren't either.
Good luck.
So... two young children, an infant in diapers, and an angry husband who wants to be diapered, breastfed, dominated, humiliated, and spanked. Even if he was content to have you do the diapering, breastfeeding, dominating, etc., MOMMY, even if you enjoyed doing all of that for him, do you really have the time and the energy?
If I were you, MOMMY, I would be thrilled—ecstatic—to be divorced by this man. Or I would be only too happy to see him take his needs and his nappies elsewhere. Rather than feeling threatened by all these other women apparently anxious to role-play mommy/baby scenes with my husband, I'd be sending them chocolates, flowers, thank-you notes, and cases of wet wipes.
But I'm not you, you're not me, and your husband ain't my husband. (Thank you, Jesus.) So what to do...
Your husband sounds like a selfish asshole, MOMMY—a selfish asshole with lousy timing. He could've prioritized his fetishes/fantasies and made these demands before you two married and/or after your kids were older and you two had more time on your hands for elaborate role-play scenarios. But he didn't do that. Maybe he was struggling with shame, maybe he wanted to trap you at home with kids before making these demands, maybe your sex-/kink-negativity shut him down and his needs and resentments finally boiled over. But whatever happened, however this went down, what happened next doesn't leave me feeling particularly sympathetic to your husband's plight: he somehow managed to convince you—with the help of a counselor—that it's your fault he feels compelled to get his baby on with other women.
That equal parts bullshit and gaslighting. I think your husband wants to explore his kinks with people who share them—and that, by itself, is not unreasonable. It can be dispiriting/deboning to be indulged by someone who isn't into your kinks, no matter how patient and/or desperate to please they are. But instead of honestly owning up to that—"I know you're willing, honey, but it doesn't work for me when we do it because you're not into it"—he put the zap on you head. He's convinced you that you're entirely to blame for his wanting to get diapered elsewhere.
I could be wrong, of course, and I only have your version of events to go on. And there's really only one thing we know for sure, MOMMY: Your husband has issued an ultimatum. You either give him permission to get diapered/breastfed/oral'd elsewhere or he's going to divorce you. Your loving and (taking your word for it here) lovable husband presented you with two bad options and you have to choose between them. Your marriage, if it continues, will not be monogamous.
Again, MOMMY, if I were you, I wouldn't wait around for guy to divorce me. I would hire a really good lawyer and divorce him first.
Do what you gotta do to stay married and stay sane—if you actually wanna/hafta stay married, that is. If not, get a divorce regardless of what Mr. Guy From Work decides to do.

My sample is skewed—or maybe I should say that my samples, plural, are skewed.
I don't get tons of questions from people who are happy and/or content. Straight or queer, married or not, monogamous or non-monogamous—happy people don't send me a lot of questions about the problems they don't have. But letters do come in from happily married hetero folks, HMHFHM, and their letters regularly appear in Savage Love. Take the first letter in this week's column:
Down to business: Christmas came and went, and every present I bought for my extraordinary husband could be opened in front of our children. He deserves better, and I have a particular gift in mind for Valentine's Day. My husband has expressed an interest in sounding, something we've attempted only with my little finger. He seemed to enjoy it! But the last thing I want to do is damage his big beautiful dick. So is sounding a fun thing? Is sounding a safe thing? Recommendations for a beginner's sounding kit? Or should I scrap the idea and just get him another butt plug?
Safety Of Sounding doesn't say her marriage is monogamous, HMHFHM, but I would bet my hardly-earned money that she and her husband are monogamous. (Straight couples who aren't typically mention that fact.) And SOS and her husband appear to be just as blissfully happy as you and your husband are, HMHFHM. But don't take my word for it. Here's the first paragraph of SOS's email, which was edited out of her letter for reasons having to with space and Catholicism, which really drives the blissful shit home:
First I want to thank you so much for all that you do. I would not have the happy, healthy, exciting, sexy marriage that I do if I hadn't spent years reading your columns and listening to your advice. What you do is awesome and I hope you never stop!!!
And SOS's letter—a letter from a happily married hetero!—isn't some once-or-twice-per-annum rarity. Perhaps you missed this column from late December: 
After spending some years in the doldrums after having kids, my husband and I are now enjoying hot kinky sex and the occasional free pass to fuck other people. We couldn't be happier. I have a friend who was extremely keen for me to cage his cock with the same kind of locking male chastity device I got for my husband—a fixed-ring stainless-steel type....
Married! Hetero! Couldn't be happier!
So the question here isn't, "Why won't you print letters from happily married folks, Dan?!?," but rather, "How did you miss all the letters I've printed from happily married folks, HMHFHM??"
My best guess: Since happiness isn't the issue/problem/point of contention for those happily married hetero couples who do write in (and whose letters do appear in the column), HMHFHM, these couples don't emphasize their happiness the same way miserable couples emphasize their miserableness. But happily married hetero folks are represented in Savage Love—they're all over the column and the podcast—you're just too distracted by the sounding rods and cock cages to see them.
P.S. Oh no, and now he's started sexting me because we're away from each other a lot this year because of a job. We were both into this when we started dating. And now I just don't know how to respond. I really don't want to do the wrong thing here.
You don't wanna fuck your manchildhusband anymore. You can't bear his niceness. Sexting with him pains you. I'm inclined to tell you to put your marriage out of its misery, IAMHORNYDAN, because even with work, time, and patience, it's unlikely you'll ever wanna fuck your manchildhusband again. I'm sorry if that's bleak, IAMHORNYDAN, but this is a pretty bleak situation—and I won't be much help. Because there's really nothing I can do or say that'll make someone wanna fuck someone they don't wanna fuck anymore. Avoiding this kind of bleakness is why I urge people to put off marriage until after they've dated/slept around a little, to put marriage off until after they've really learned what gets them off, something most people can't do before their 25th birthdays. (Full disclosure: My husband was 23 when we met and so far, so good. So individual results may vary, screw as I say, not as I screw, etc.)
But to play devil's advocate....
Maybe this will pass—maybe you'll come/work through this, just like you came/worked through your depression. Maybe the real problem isn't your lack of attraction to your baby-faced manchildhusband, but a deeply rooted confidence issue that's manifesting as you thinking your husband is icky/gross/kiddie. Maybe there's a good therapist in your area who can help you work through these issues. And maybe, just maybe, after working through your shit you'll realize you're madly and passionately horny for the twink you married and you'll wanna fuck your manchildhusband again and all will be well.
That could happen. Anything could happen. But it probably won't.
I'm sorry, IAMHORNYDAN, but the simplest answer—the answer that doesn't come packed with maybes—is that you two aren't sexually compatible. Youthful horniness and affection papered that over when you were younger. Not so now. More bleakness. Let's set aside the maybes and list your realistic options:
1. Ending your marriage.
2. Issuing an ultimatum. ("Our marriage is sexless but our lives shouldn't be—from here on out, honey, you're free to fuck other people and so am I.")
3. Cheating on your husband with big and strong manly men with adult faces, living with the guilt and fear of discovery, and, if you get caught, the likelihood of divorce.
If I were in your sheets, IAMHORNYDAN, I would open with option #2 but brace myself for the option #1. And  don't despair it your marriage ends: You and your husband are still young. Most millennials aren't choosing to marry until well in their thirties. You gave it a good shot. Fifteen years is something to be proud of, IAMHORNYDAN, and if you can part amicably—if you can stick the dismount—you don't have to regard your marriage as a failure.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
I'm only running your letter, JOACLA, because it allows me to post another letter that came in from a reader today on this same subject. But quickly: do what you need to do to stay married and stay sane, sometimes cheating is the least worst option, consider asking your wife for permission to seek sex elsewhere. 
And now a long letter from someone who, like you, was trapped in a sexless marriage and refrained from cheating when her spouse refused to okay her seeking sex elsewhere.
I read the letters from people in sexless marriages asking for your advice. It seems like it’s the a big recurrent question. Knowing that it happens to so many couples brought me comfort four years ago when I started reading your column. I felt I wasn’t alone. The circumstances and the stories are always different, but the result is often the same. Sexless marriages bring deep unhappiness for the partner whose sexual needs are not met.
My husband and I had a "happy" marriage; no major fights, supportive of each other, went through ups and downs for fourteen years together. But half of our marriage was sexless. My husband stopped having sex with me. We had fertility issues and I ended up in depression, for which I got therapy and recovered. But gradually he stopped having sex with me and stopped being intimate. Even a cuddle was too much asking sometime.
I thought we had a great relationship, we were good friends and partners in life, we had the same values and we had built a pretty good life together. All these things that make you stay because… because you are afraid that you will not have it as good somewhere else. The French have a saying: “You know what you leave behind, but you don’t know what you will find next." Meaning, be grateful for what you have and stop dreaming you could have it better. So what if the price for a good life partnership is no sex? It’s not that important after all?! Is it? (That’s what I hear!)
For me it was. Every now and then I would bring up the sexless situation to my husband's attention. I tried many different approaches. Each time my husband said he loved me, had nobody else in his life, he was just not that much into sex. He was happy in our marriage and promised to make some efforts.
I thought I might go insane. Monogamy was/is very important for me, so taking charge of my sexual desire and having sex with somebody else was an impossible dilemma for me. After reading your column, I finally brought up the subject of open marriage. If we entered in an agreement, it would ease my dilemma. But he was shocked. An open marriage wasn’t an option for him. But continuing living in a sexless relationship wasn’t an option for me. We had hit a wall. I started to wonder: Do I leave a good relationship, a great partner, a life we built together for fourteen years just in order to have sex?
Now looking back at it, I wonder how it could ever have been difficult to stop putting my needs aside and not choose me. Choose my happiness. Maybe the patriarchal environment, maybe my naivety, maybe my fears of being lonely, maybe my lack of self-confidence allowed me to collude with my husband and let him drag me along in a sex-deprived marriage that was making me unhappy. Most of all, I think I was a coward. I found lots of excuses not to leave. It was obvious that the sex deprivation had destroyed my relationship and yet I couldn’t stand up for myself and allow myself to leave and potentially be happy without him. 
I was stuck in this sexless marriage. I was stuck in my head. I denied myself happiness and a satisfying sex life.
Then one Sunday evening I found out that my loving, supportive, not-that-much-into-sex husband had been cheating on me. For years. With many women. That he had acted on sexual fantasies I did not know he had. That he caught an STD and never told me about it and therefore put my health at risk. And even got one other woman pregnant. So many lies.
By Thursday, we were through. It will be two years next week. Looking back, I mostly blame myself. It would be easy to cast myself in the victim role: he denied me sex for so many years and cheated on me. “Poor me." But I blame myself. I was the one who made the choice to stay. I was the one who denied myself sex and happiness. He didn’t force me.
Two years ago, I promised myself that from now on I would always choose me, my happiness. And I promised myself to not let fear influence my decisions—this has been the most powerful life lesson for me. We are taught that it would be selfish and shallow to leave a "good" marriage for something so meaningless as sex.
“What are you? A sex depraved addict ready to through away a good life for a few hours of pleasure?” .
To which I respond: “This is my life. I only have a limited time to enjoy it. I am already in my forties and I’m too young to give up on sex. I choose me. I choose to be happy”. 
I will finish with a happy ending. 
Once you stop being scared, once you stop holding on to something that’s not good for you, once you start listening to that voice screaming inside that things are not how they should be and then actually do something about it, then you are able to see all the goodness waiting for you. Seven months ago I met a man. It’s still early days but things are going very well. He communicates openly on all subjects. He’s into sex and doesn’t make me feel like a sex addict. He likes sex as much as I do. (Kinky too!) He also has great life values. He has a great personality. He cares about people. He cares about me and my happiness.
But he is not in charge of making me happy. I am. And I am happy with myself. But he surely makes me happier.
So... my point is: thank you for your column. Thank you for all the letter about sexless marriages. I know you must feel like you are repeating yourself. But sometimes, one needs to hear the same thing a 1000 times to finally act on it. I needed to read all these letters to finally chose me.
W.
You're welcome, W. But it seems like you had to read all those letters and find out your husband was cheating on you. Still, I'm glad the letters helped.
Get your newly out gay friend one of these to practice on.
I'm completely serious, NGF. Your 30-year-old buddy might have an easier time building up to partnered sex—he might be more confident in his abilities/erections—if he went for a few rides in what amounts to an assfucking version of a flight simulator. (But do a little digging around online and see if you can't find a silicone one.)
What's his issue? I dunno. He may be distracted by concerns about your pleasure, NGF; he looks in your eyes, he sees expectation and excitement in them, he starts to worry about whether he'll be able to do it this time, he starts thinking about the last time he failed and... pfffft. His dick deflates. Or he may have some hangups about assholes and cleanliness. Or he may be worried about hurting you. Or he may have some other concern(s). Blowing a few loads in something that looks like ass but isn't—a couple of sessions with a partner (or a part of a partner) he doesn't have to worry about disappointing—may help him keep focused, cool, and boned the next time he's getting close to penetrating you.
And for the record: It's awfully nice of you to help your newly-out, much-older gay friend in this way, NGF, but letting a guy practice on your ass is... well, it's both a little dehumanizing (which can be hot) and a little above and beyond the call of duty/friendship (which can be nice). If you're into the guy, or into the sex, and you wouldn't mind getting off with him, well, okay then. You can keep playing Mother Bottom Theresa. But if you're not into him, if you're only letting him take these practice runs at your ass because you pity him, stop letting him fuck attempt to fuck you and share this link with him instead.
You can also direct him to this column about ass play for Beginner Gays. And the next time you two hook up (if there is a next time), NGF, tell him the sex continues whether or not he loses his erection. Because M/M mutual masturbation and oral sex aren't tragic consolation prizes, they're hot, hot, hot gay sex. And a few successful JO and/or oral sessions should help build his confidence too.
UPDATE: The first two commenters—Ricardo and Reverse Polarity—make a great point. Your newly out friend, NGF, may not be a top:
Also, maybe the friend only says he's a top because he sees that as less gay than being a bottom, which he fundamentally is but can't bring himself to accept just yet. I'd say he's still a few steps away from being totally at ease with his desires.
For some guys, being a top is perceived as more masculine and less gay. They can tell themselves that at least they aren't a swishy bottom, they are a macho top. A newly-out insecure gay may be very tempted by this logic.
The SLLOTD is the exception to the never-read-the-comments rule. Always want to read the comments on the SLLOTD!

My podcast about sex and dating: LIVIN' AND LOVIN' IN NYC.Available at iTunes.
You really screwed the pooch there, AYR, and I'm not confident this pooch can be unscrewed.
You have two ex-girlfriends. Ms. Name probably wanted out a long time ago and the existence of Ms. Heart gave her the push/grounds/victim status she needed to end things with you. Ms. Heart, your other ex-girlfriend, was no doubt wounded when you ran after Ms. Name despite your protestations of love for Ms. Heart and the obvious dysfunction/disconnect that characterized your relationship with Ms. Name.
Why did you pursue Ms. Name after she dumped you? Probably for the same reason you stayed with Ms. Name after it was clear your relationship was doomed: you wanted to be supportive and you wanted to be kind, i.e. you're invested in being perceived as a good and decent guy. I'm thinking it killed you to know that Ms. Name was at home complaining to anyone who would listen about what a fucking two-timing piece of shit you are. (Ms. Name most likely neglected to mention the fact that you two hadn't fucked in a year, that she wasn't really that into you or attracted to you, and that you might have grounds to cheat.) Only by winning her back could you redeem yourself in the eyes of Ms. Name and her family.
But let's suppose you had won her back. What then? In time you could reclaim your good-and-decent-guy status, I guess, but at the price of re-trapping yourself in a passionless, urgency-free, sexless relationship.
So what do you do now that you've realized Ms. Heart—sigh—is the woman you wanted to be with all along? (Something you only realized once Ms. Heart ran off with someone else.) Do you cling to hope—most likely of the false variety—or do you try your luck with someone else?
Yes, AYR, you do that—you do both of those things. Live in hope you might hear from Ms. Heart someday ("Would you like to grab a drink and catch up?") while at the same time getting out there and dating other people. You may never hear from Ms. Heart again, AYR, you may be with someone else and completely over Ms. Heart when she calls/DMs you, or you may be between girlfriends when she calls DMs/you.
In other words: don't rule out the possibility of getting back together—if she calls you (you shouldn't call her)—but don't wait for her either. 
Good luck, dude.
P.S. He would be coming to my home each week. And, is it a bad sign if I don't think I would ever want to tell anyone that I took money for sex?
Taking money for sex makes you a sex worker, TTT, and a vindictive ex-husband is a good argument against doing any form of sex work—even sex work of the bank-shot, GGG-ish, indulging-the-kink-of-a-NSA-FWB variety. Also arguing against this arrangement: your gut. You don't know this guy—you've never met him—and he may be a perfectly lovely, perfectly trustworthy person who's simply turned on by the idea of paying for sex. But you have a lot at stake here, TTT: your kid, that custody agreement, and your desire to keep this quiet. What if this guy turns out to be controlling and vindictive? What if the reason he wants to pay you for sex is so that he can use the threat of outing you for taking his money to manipulate and control you?
The risks for you—not for all people who take money for sex, but for you in particular—seem greater than the potential rewards.
And did you read the advice Mike Crawford had for SOTEMPTED a few weeks ago? Like you, TTT, SOTEMPTED was approached online and offered money—a great deal of money—for sex. Mike's advice for SOTEMPTED included this:
One last piece of advice from Mike Crawford: "There is a pretty glaring red flag here: $3,000 is a really, really steep price for a single date. I'm not implying that SOTEMPTED isn't worth it, but the old 'if it sounds too good to be true' adage definitely applies in sex work. Should he decide to do this, he needs to screen carefully before agreeing to meet in person. The safety resources on the Sex Workers Outreach Project website (swopusa.org) are a great place for him to learn how to do just that."
This guy didn't offer you 3K, TTT, but he did offer to pay you for something you're willing to give him for free—and that trips the "sounds too good to be true" wire. Pass on him, TTT.
This probably won't be helpful, it's probably not what you need to hear right now, and it's certainly not what either of your partners would want me to tell you. But it's Friday night and I need to get home and all honesty it was the first thing that came to mind when I read your letter. It's something I've told other people—it's something I say on my podcast so often my listeners probably chant it along with me—but I happen to believe it, SOFT, so here it is... 
If you're with someone for thirty or forty years—if you're with someone until death does you part—and they only cheated on you once or twice in all that time... then they were good at monogamy, not bad at it.
That little gem is for people who've discovered they've been cheated on—just once or with just one person—in the context of a committed longterm relationship that involved a monogamous commitment. I'm basically telling the "wronged party" to take the long view, to give their partner some credit for decades of perfectly executed monogamy, and not to let one assignation/affair/happy ending destroy a relationship or, if death done already parted 'em, their memories of it. Most people agree we shouldn't let the perfect be the enemy of the good and I'm just applying that standard to monogamous commitments.
So as far as I'm concerned, SOFT you could go ahead and fuck that guy from work—you could even have an affair with him—and if still think of yourself as good at monogamy. Or goodish at it. I can't guarantee that your partner or your work friend's wife will feel the same way if you two turn out to be bad at cheating, i.e. if you're careless and get caught.
But without a doubt the safest course of action—the ethical course, the respectful course, the perfect at monogamy course—is for you and your friend from work to get the hell away from each other and stay the hell away from each other. Then you don't have to worry about getting caught or catching a worse case of feelings than you already have.
A few questions to ask yourself before you decide what to do: Do you wanna fuck this guy because he's wonderful and fuckable or do you wanna fuck this guy because on you want out of the relationship you're in and having an affair is the quickest way out? If this guy goes away—if your coworkers exiles himself to some other firm—what are the odds some other guy is going to come along? You've been with your partner for 10 years, and that's lovely, but is he the guy you wanna be with for the next fifty?
I seem to recall swearing off answering letters from people trapped in sexless relationships/marriages—I distinctly remember saying something to that effect once or twice—but there's no escaping this question.
Instead of answering your question myself, however, I'm going to share an email I received from another reader, SHH. Read it carefully and you may spot a potential solution for you and your girlfriend...
I wanted to thank you. I have never requested advice from you, but you had a hand in helping me handle a very big change in my marriage. My husband and I have been married for almost eight years and for the past five my sex drive has been in the toilet. To his credit my husband has been extraordinarily patient with me and understanding: he has never demanded sex, whined about it, or guilted me about it.  This entire time I have been racking my brain about what is wrong with me. I went to the doctor and had hormone levels checked, got back on anti-depressants, and scoured the internet for help. There were no answers, I was just completely uninterested in being intimate with him or anyone else.
Two weeks ago we went to lunch. As we got into the car he said that we needed to talk. I was sure he was going to divorce me—I have been waiting for this conversation for a while and was steeling myself for it. To my shock (I have known this man for almost 30 years) he came out as bisexual, and as it turns out had been having a fling for a few months with a man. The bi part wasn't the issue for me, it was the lie. To make a long story short we are two weeks days into this new chapter in our lives: we've been communicating, we have decided to open our marriage, and we've begun couples therapy. We have also started the process of joining a group in town that will hopefully allow us to meet other, like-minded people, people who can help us along this new chapter in our lives.
What I want to thank you for is this: You mention the "price of admission" quite a bit in your podcast. I never really had a perspective on this until 13 days ago.  The price of admission for me is accepting my husband's bisexuality and allowing him to explore this part of himself. What I have discovered within this is that I am also free to explore and meet new people. This thought is exciting and it has reignited my sex drive. What I realize now is that my sex drive didn't go away because I wasn't attracted to my husband. I am. But strict monogamy somehow extinguished my sex drive.
So, I want to thank you for giving me information that I never thought I would need. I am thankful that I had you in my ear throughout this and made sure that what I said to my husband was tempered with love and not judgement. Thank you, thank you, thank you.
You didn't consent to an erotic massage, MANUFM, you consented to some work being done to your chest—your pecs, not your breasts or your nipples.
There's no way to massage your chest muscles—your pecs—without touching your breasts, of course, so this massage came with a built-in risk for a "positive side-effect," i.e. your becoming aroused. And arousing you was either your LMP's intention all along... or your arousal was an accident... and your accidentally-/unintentionally-induced arousal prompted your LMP to become aroused... and his arousal prompted him forget his training and his professionalism and take this massage in more explicitly erotic direction (stroking, squeezing, tapping)... and by the time you sensed things were headed to a place (or had already arrived in a place) that made you uncomfortable... it was too late. The damage had been done by the time you pulled the plug/pulled up the sheet.
My money is on the former—arousing you was his intention all along—because Occam's Razor and shit.
A few quick thoughts...
1. I'm so sorry you were sexually assaulted. I so want to live in world where no one is subject to sexual violence—or any other kind of violence.
2. Again, I don't think this was an innocent chest massage that spun out of control. I think your LMP put the moves on you when you were vulnerable—when you were nude, when the two of you were alone in the clinic after hours. Now there are probably some men and women out there whose LMPs have put the moves on them and who have nothing but good things to say about the experience. But in those cases I'm guessing the LMP was either honest and direct—they asked, "Wanna happy ending?" or "Wanna fuck?", not, "Would it be okay if I worked on your chest?"—or the LMPs took a potentially career-ending risk and lucked the fuck out, i.e. the client was only too delighted by the unexpected place their massage went. (For the record: LMPs are much, much likelier to be hit on by clients than vice-versa, and almost all LMPs regard passes made by clients as workplace sexual harassment, not as a perk.
3. This strikes me as a slight, mild and sex-negative double standard: If becoming aroused while receiving a massage can be seen a "positive side-effect" for a client... then becoming aroused while giving a massage has to be viewed as a "positive side-effect" for an LMP. A client's arousal or an LMP's arousal only becomes a problem when the client or the LMP telegraphs their arousal in a way that makes the other person in the room feel uncomfortable or unsafe, makes assumptions that aren't true, makes moves that aren't welcome, or obtains consent for one thing ("work on your chest") and then convinces themselves or pretends they've obtained consent for something else entirely ("stroking and squeezing... [tapping on] nipples").
So what should you do?
Say something to the clinic—even at the risk of derailing this LMP's career.
If he had worked with you for a year, MANUFM, if you two had an established professional relationship and a friendly rapport and he misread things/signals/vibes/desires somehow—yeah, maybe he might deserve a pass. But the fact that 1. he pulled this shit on you during your second session, 2. he pulled it on you in a deserted clinic, and 3. he manipulated you on the matter of consent means he doesn't deserve a pass. I wouldn't be surprised if he's pulled this shit on other clients and either gotten away with it or gotten lucky. If you were the first client he pulled this shit on and he gets away with it, MANUFM, he will try to pull this shit again on other women.
Speak to his boss.
If you sucked him off, you gave him a blowjob. If you sucked him for ten minutes before PIV or PIB, you blew him a little. If you sucked him for 30 minutes and he never came, you tried to give him a blowjob but had to give up because he was too drunk or too coked up and the sun was coming up and sucking his dick isn't the only thing you have to get done in a day. But whether we're talking completed blowjobs, attempted blowjobs, or a little blowing-as-foreplay, SUCK, it all counts toward your final score.
But that's just my expert opinion, SUCK. You and your coworkers are free to define "blowjob" for yourselves.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
It should be okay to walk around in your own apartment naked, FLASH, but here's a thing that happened to a man in Sweden—and I once dated a guy who was arrested for being naked in his own apartment in Seattle. (His windows, without blinds, faced a school.) That said, a lot of people are naked in their own homes a lot of the time and arrests are few and far between.
Zooming out... exhibitionism is fairly common, FLASH. There are also different degrees of exhibitionism—it, like so much else, exists on a spectrum. But in your case, FLASH, you have a budding interest in exhibitionism, specifically posing in your window for a passerby to "accidentally" see you like some free artistic porno and/or masturbatory moves. You can indulge this desire—that's what desires are there for—but you're gonna want to indulge it in a way that won't get you in trouble, annoy/scandalize the neighbors, or make someone else feel unsafe looking out the windows of their home.
Zooming further out... legally, exhibitionism is usually described as the stimulation of your genitals in front of an unsuspecting stranger. That's also how the psychologists see it:
From a psychological standpoint, the defining characteristic of an exhibitionist is a strong urge to expose one’s genitals to an unsuspecting stranger. Such exposure usually occurs in public places where there is an easy escape route (e.g., parks and subways). The goal of this exposure is to evoke a shocked reaction from the other person, which is what the exhibitionist finds to be sexually arousing. In fact, exhibitionists usually fantasize about this shocked reaction afterward when sexually pleasuring themselves. Exhibitionism is classified as a disorder when these urges cause psychological distress or when the individual begins to act upon them and starts victimizing others.
It's one of the most common sexual criminal sexual offenses, but the laws around indecent exposure and exhibitionism dramatically vary between states (and countries, depending on where you live—Sweden, it seems, takes a hard line). So it's difficult to give any legal advice, since it's perfectly legal to run around naked in some places while others define indecent exposure as being nude in front of anyone other than your spouse. Google your local laws, FLASH.
But I gotta say no to masturbating at the window. There's the little matter of consent to consider here, FLASH. Those killer thrills could be fun for you but scar someone else—someone who's easily scarred, yes, but still. It could also potentially make someone's year. It's a gamble, in other words, and it could be a costly one for you—the cops could come, you could get evicted, etc. But you know where exhibitionism is totally legal and consensual, FLASH? Swingers clubs, where you'll meet plenty of people who like to watch. Single women go to swingers and sex clubs, too. Just like a church, finding the right club can take some time, but managing your desire in a healthy, legal, and consensual way will help you (and others) get off without sans creepiness.
And, hey, the next time you're in New York City, you'll want to book a room here.



I'm gonna make a numbered list...
1. "I shouldn't have gone to the party in retrospect." I hope that doesn't mean you blame yourself—even in part—for what happened in the tent. You are not to blame and bear no responsibility for your friend's actions that night. Consenting to being hugged by this friend, allowing things to get a little touchy-feely during a party with a friend, even sharing a sleeping bag with a friend—none of that makes what he did next your fault. You may already know that, LBAAG, and you may not have meant "shouldn't have gone" in that way. But just in case—and if only to emphasize the point to others—I wanted to address it.
2. "Sometime during the night my friend, being very, very drunk, tried to shove his hand down my pants." Your friend may have been very, very drunk, but his very, very drunkenness in no way excuses his actions—and you may not have dropped "being very, very drunk" into the middle of that sentence to excuse your friend's actions. But just in case... I wanted to emphasize the point.
3. "He never did anything to me." Your friend did do something to you—he tried to shove his hands in your pants, he attempted to finger you, and he didn't stop with the attempted fingering until you nearly broke one or all of his fingers. I'm not a lawyer, LBAAG, but I'm pretty sure that meets the legal definition of sexual assault and/or attempted sexual assault. (Both count as things.) If hadn't done anything to you that night, LBAAG, you wouldn't be writing to me four years later about the nothing that didn't happen.
4. "He never remembered doing this after the fact, I assume, because he never brought up the subject." That's a big assumption, LBAAG. Your friend may have been too embarrassed or ashamed to bring it up; he may have figured that you weren't troubled by what happened since you didn't bring it up; or he may have actually blacked out and not remembered what happened in the tent that night. The only way to find out which: bring it up.
5. "He was drunk and I don't think he wanted to hurt me." He may have been drunk, and he may not have wanted to hurt you, LBAAG, but he hurt you.
And now I'm gonna try to your answer your questions...
A. "Should I forgive him?" 
Maybe. But regardless of whether you decide to forgive him, LBAAG, please resolve to stop making rationalizations for his actions (he was drunk, he didn't mean to hurt me, he probably doesn't even remember) and resolve to stop minimizing what happened that night (he never did anything to me).
B. "Should I forget it?"
If you could forget it, or were even inclined to forget it, you probably would've forgotten it already.
C. "Should I ignore him?"
I don't think you should ignore him.
You seem torn between feelings of hurt and anger and feelings of affection and gratitude, LBAAG, and if you ask me (and you did ask me) there's only one way out: talk to your friend. Get together with him—for coffee, not drinks—and ask him tell him about that night. Tell him you've always been troubled by what happened his actions that night and tell him how what happened his actions that night negatively impacted you and your friendship with him—you never felt safe around him again, you weren't even sure you ever wanted to see him again, you're still troubled by the memories of that night.
I suspect you'll know the answer to your first question—should you forgive him—after you see how he reacts. He may remember exactly what happened, he may feel terrible about it, he may express genuine remorse and come through with the kind of no-excuses/no-blame-blurring apology 1. you need to hear and 2. may make it possible for you to forgive him.
And if he doesn't remember what happened that night?
He needs to know he's capable of hurting people he cares about—or professes to care about—when he's drunk. By confronting him, LBAAG, you won't just be doing him a favor—he could wind up expelled or imprisoned if pulls something like that at college or ever again—you'll be doing a favor to any other women he winds up sharing drinks, tents, or sleeping bags with in the future.
I don't mind. Thanks for asking. Once all of the baby stuff settles, I will contact you for more advice about how to go about talking to my boyfriend about his bisexuality. I feel bad how I kinda made him come out to me. On one hand, I think he was kinda ready for it. He does seem a bit relieved and we are actually closer than we have been.—D
UPDATE: What Sarah said:
I've lost a baby mid pregnancy. 24 weeks, I don't know if that's about where the writer is. At any rate, the grief is mind numbing. The physical pain is life altering. The hormonal turmoil is unfathomable. The emotional devastation that you may be about to experience is, well, devastating. Basically, there is a good chance that nothing you do or say or think, will make sense for a few weeks (at least). There's a very good chance that things will be just as bad or worse, for your partner. Now is a really good time for you two, to love and support each other. All the other stuff about relationships with a capital R, or all the woulda shoulda coulda about your past.... let it go for now. Worry about it in a month or three, if you have the energy and the need.
Sometimes the best advice you'll find in the SLLOTD... is in the comments threads.
Answer: Size of Asshole (SOA) is very much in the eye of the beholder, MSR, and the beholder's subjective, personal experience will largely determine their SOA estimates. Your ex-girlfriend/fiancé—LDG—would doubtless classify you as a huge asshole, MSR, because how dare you meet Someone Else and how dare you change your mind about spending your life with her after you two had already discussed who to vote for, where to live, and—details, details—after you'd gone and proposed to her. Your current girlfriend—SE—would come in with a very different SOA estimate; earlier in the relationship she may have classified you as a tiny asshole or even a rare-to-nonexistent non-asshole. Now, of course, some months into the relationship, she should be able to see you for the asshole you are—not too big, not too small, just right.
And for the record...
When we make a marriage proposal—when it's made, when it's accepted—we've taken a big step toward making a lifetime commitment. But the proposal by itself isn't that lifetime commitment. Proposals, unlike marriages, are relatively easy to extricate ourselves from. By design. So...
"We're engaged!" = "We're planning to get married and at our wedding we will commit to spending the rest of our lives together... if everything goes well during the engagement and, of course, during the marriage."
"We're engaged!" ≠ "We've already committed to spending our lives together and the actual marriage ceremony is just a tacky, expensive formality!"
So as painful as it might be, and as likely as it is to inflate your SOA average, we have the right to back out of a marriage proposal. Hell, we have a responsibility to back out of a marriage proposal if we think we've proposed to the wrong person. (We also enjoy a hard-won right to back out of the marriage itself, lifetime commitment notwithstanding, if we make the mistake of marrying the wrong person, if we grow apart, etc.)
Looking on the bright side, MSR, your ex is young, there are other men out there, men who may have an easier time sharing a bed with someone who wouldn't vote for Donald Trump but would vote for Cruz, Rubio, Jeb!, Huckabee, Christie, Santorum, or Fiorina. She may look back one day, perhaps after she's fallen in love with Cruz supporter, and be able to see that you made the right decision. At that point your SOA average will shrink.
And... wait: your new girlfriend is less empathetic than your Republican ex-girlfriend? How is that even possible? And how is that a selling point?
Ask yourself which scenario seems likelier:
1. Your wife has always been comfortable with how close her husband and sister are because—as she sees it—her sister is "safe," i.e. her husband's relationship with her sister doesn't threaten her marriage because decent men don't fuck their wives' sisters and loving sisters don't fuck their sisters' husbands and she's always seen you as decent and her sister as loving so... nothing to worry about, you two can be trusted together, neither of you would ever betray her, etc.
2. Your wife would so totally be into the idea of sharing you—sexually, romantically, intimately—with her sister. In fact, there's nothing your wife would enjoy more than the scent of her sister's sex funk all over her husband's cock.
I'm gonna crawl out on this large, sturdy limb, AMILE, and say scenario 1 seems far likelier. I've met plenty of M/F/F poly triads, and heard from scores of them through my column and podcast, but I can't recall a single instance of an M/Sis/Sis poly triad.
So if I were in your shoes, AMILE, I would stuff that one passionate kiss down the ol' memory hole while gracefully distancing myself from my spouse's sibling. I certainly wouldn't bet my happy, loving, stable marriage on the unlikely chance my spouse would not only be into the idea of opening up our relationship after ten years, but also into the idea of bringing her sister into it and onto my cock.  (AMILE, Occam's Razor. Occam's Razor, AMILE.)
Also, AMILE, you could put yourself in your wife's shoes: How would you feel if she wanted to fuck your brother? Or enter into a poly triad with you and your dad? 
But if you simply must sound the wife out on the concept of polyamory—because you never know and you know your wife better than I do and the heart wants what it wants and nothing venture, nothing gained, etc.—you could trick the wife into watching a few episodes of Polyamory: Married and Dating, AMILE. Tell her someone at work was raving about it or someone you went to college with was in it. Then you can have a general discussion about Polyamory, The Concept. If the wife says she could kinda sorta maybe see herself in a poly triad someday, AMILE, go ahead and ask her what kind of woman she could kinda sorta maybe see you two possibly dating together.
Oh, look: another large, sturdy limb: Your wife's answer to that last question is not gonna be, "Definitely a relative of mine."
My response after the jump...
You may very well be alone for the rest of your life, LASS, but you're already doing everything I urge lonely people to do: You're getting out there and living your life, you're being yourself, you're doing shit, you're going places. Happy, active, and self-actualized people are more attractive and likelier to attract mates—so put up a few personal ads and see if there's anyone in your area who wants to join you for dinner, snowboarding, horseback riding, whatever. But more importantly, LASS, always remember this: It's better to be a happy, active, and self-actualized single person than a miserable, sedentary, and the-opposite-of-self-actualized-whatever-that-is partnered person.
My response after the jump...
A Tinder-like app to hook up random people who are about to hook up with other random people so the randos who met via the Tinder-like app can verify neither was murdered by the randos they met via Tinder itself? Sounds a little complicated, SDCS, and I'm not sure the market for your proposed app is big enough to attract investors. I also don't think introducing a second potentially unreliable and/or sinister stranger into the mix is going to make your hotel hookups appreciably safer.
Here's a better idea/simpler life hack: Schedule a wake-up call for an hour or two after your Tinder rando is due to arrive. You can schedule wake-up calls for any time of day, SDCS, and in nicer hotels you can even ask the front desk to ring you personally instead of scheduling a robocall. Just tell the receptionist you're a heavy sleeper and you need them to verify that you're awake/alive in time for your big meeting.
Or you could take a risk and confide in a friend about your open marriage, your flings, and your need for a safety buddy.
I'm not sure what speech your husband gave you, SAD, but it doesn't sound like one of mine.
Yes, under certain circumstances I believe a person can and perhaps should unilaterally open a closed marriage—a person can cheat to stay married and stay sane—but most of the speeches I've given on the subject have addressed unhappily sexless marriages, i.e. marriages in which one spouse has unilaterally ended the sex life of the other and no amount of working on it, counseling, listening, dishwashing, etc., is going to change things and divorce would create hardship for all involved. Your marriage presumably wasn't sexless, SAD, it was merely dickless—or bonusdickless.
And, yes, I've argued that someone who makes a monogamous commitment and only cheats once or twice over the multi-decade course of a successful marriage—with "successful" here defined as "loving, emotionally fulfilling, mutually gratifying"—can and should be viewed as having been pretty good at monogamy, not bad at monogamy. But there's a difference between cheating once or twice over thirty or forty years and unilaterally imposing a new relationship model on a partner who didn't want to be in that kind of relationship in the first place—particularly if that partner isn't free to walk away because kids, economic interdependence, social and emotional inertia, whatever the fuck, etc.
So for the record, SAD: I take dim view of what your husband has done. He made a monogamous commitment to you fifteen years ago—monogamy was the price of admission he willingly paid to be with you—and at some point he realized he couldn't do it anymore. He could've and should've raised the subject of opening your marriage up at that point instead of running out and jumping up and down on dicks.
You want a monogamous marriage, he wants an open marriage—and an open marriage is what he's got right now, whether you like it or not. Seems to me a textbook example of "irreconcilable differences," SAD—unless being in a non-monogamous marriage is the price of admission you're willing to pay stay married to this dude.
Hello there, Urban Dictionary: 
don't stick your dick in crazy
A relatively recent but perennially true maxim, advising one to refrain from sexual congress with the unbalanced.
Some people, e.g. people like your boyfriend, object to this maxim due to its highly problematic gendering or whatever—because not all crazy people are women—but I would argue that those who make this objection need to check their heterosexism or whatever and promptly cease erasing millions of dick-stickable sexual minorities. Lots of people who aren't women enjoy getting dicks stuck in them: gay men; bisexual men with same-sex partners (or opposite-sex partners who enjoy pegging them); men who have sex with men but do not identify as gay or bisexual; male-bodied agender persons who enjoy being penetrated (singly or doubly); bigender persons who experience their gender identities in a non-concurrent fashion and who also enjoy being on the receiving end of penetrative sex when they are experiencing their male identities, etc.
I would further argue that the maxim "don't stick your dick in crazy" can be used by anyone of either/any gender in reference to anyone of either/any gender. (See also: "suck my dick." Citation: "Broad City," Season 2, Episode 8. Illana: "Why don't you suck my dick!") That said, this maxim is easily adapted for use by cisgendered straight women in reference to cisgendered straight men: "Don't let crazy stick its dick in you."
In summation, NFS: Your boyfriend is crazy and you shouldn't let him stick his dick in you anymore. DTMFA. 
P.S. It was wrong of me to assume NFS's boyfriend has a dick; not all men have dicks. My apologies. It was likewise wrong of me to assume NFS doesn't have a dick; not all women don't have dicks. My apologies. Also: the word "crazy" is ableist AF. My apologies. And yes, bartender, I will have another.
This comes to us courtesy of the National Conference of State Legislators:
Twenty-five states prohibit marriages between first cousins. Six states allow first cousin marriage under certain circumstances, and North Carolina allows first cousin marriage but prohibits double-cousin marriage. States generally recognize marriages of first cousins married in a state where such marriages are legal.
First cousin marriages are totally legal in half the United States and legally recognized in all fifty states—and you guys are second cousins, CSCWS. So you two shouldn't let "OMG COUSINS!" stand in the way of fucking around or, if you can work through your other issues, shacking the fuck up or getting the fuck (re-)married. There's nothing to feel conflicted about here. Yes, it might squick out some family members... but I didn't let that stand in the way of my happiness, CSCWS, and I don't see why you should let it stand in the way of yours.
And, hey, here's a list, courtesy of Wikipedia, of people who were married to their cousins. Bach, Darwin, Einstein, FDR—all married to cousins, as were seemingly half the signers of the Declaration of Independence. And, hey, here's a website with info and message boards—a website that doesn't seem to have had a design update since the early 1990s—just for cousin couples.
Share those links with your towering hulk of a cousin and see if that doesn't make him feel more comfortable with the idea of the rest of the family discovering your hugely boring secret.
But you do need to ask yourself if you want to be a guy who happens to be an asshole over the longterm, CSCWS, which is a much bigger issue than being with a guy who happens to be your second cousin. Your cousin may be the only way-bigger guy you've been with, but he's not the only way-bigger guy on the planet.
I'm Dan Savage and I approve this meme.
Let him crash and let him burn, HELP, and don't feel bad about it.
Consciously or subconsciously, crashing and burning is what your brother wants—his recklessness is proof that. And if he wants to slam his hand down on the self-destruct button, HELP, you are not obligated to spend your days tackling him before he reaches it. So tell your brother you're leaving the company, tell him why, if there's someone over him (a board of directors? a group of investors?) tell them why. Then tell your brother you're not going to lie or cover for him anymore. His wife obviously knowns something's up—hence the texting and cornering—and while you shouldn't provide her with names and dates, you (and your parents) should provide her with the kind of non-answers that function as answers when she asks vague, open-ended questions ("Do you think he's cheating on me?" "That's something you need to talk with your husband about.") and direct answers when she asks questions about lies your bother has told to her that directly involve you ("He says he was at your house last night." "He was not at my house.").
Cheating is no one's business but the persons involved, HELP, and the email that came in immediately after yours—someone stumbled over evidence that a relative might be cheating—is a good example of "mind your own business" scenario. But your brother, by putting your job and the company you co-founded at risk, and by putting you in a position of having to lie to his wife on his behalf, has involved you in his cheating and thus his cheating is your business too.
My response after the jump...
When someone says, "That's so gay," but means, "That's so stupid," they're being homophobic. Obviously. But a straight guy who says he's gay for musicals isn't saying he's stupid for them, TCJ, he's saying, "I love something that many gay men are passionate about—and I'm not talking about cock." Not all gay men are passionate about musical theater, of course, just as not all straight men are into football. But a man with a passion for musical theater is likelier to be gay; if not, he'll at least be comfortable around gay people. I've heard gay guys who avidly follow the NFL describe themselves as straight for football. Likewise, a man with a passion for football is likelier to be straight.
You saying, "I'm gay for musical theater," or a gay guy saying, "I'm straight for football," amounts to a humorous acknowledgment that the majority of people interested in musicals or football are gay or straight, respectively. In neither case is it an insult or a put-down. But while I think you can continue to say that you're gay for musicals, TCJ, some gay men (or some of our more annoying "allies") may take offense. You don't have to pay attention to those people—they're just gay for taking offense.
My response after the jump...
First answer: technically, yes. But a case could be made that you're reusing and recycling. If there were a Green Building Certification program for kinks, SNIFF, yours would qualify.
Second answer: Chester the Molester was a comic strip about a guy, Chester, "who was interested in sexually molesting women and prepubescent girls," says my old friend Wikipedia. This vile comic strip, which ran in Hustler (of course), made child rape look like harmless and hilarious fun. Dwaine Tinsley, the creator of the strip, wound up going to prison for molesting his daughter—I'm guessing she would argue that child rape was neither harmless nor hilarious.
Since you are not interested in prepubescent boys, SNIFF, I don't think you're a pervert in the Chester the Molester mold. But a case could be made that your actions have a whiff of the nonconsensual about them—your coworkers would most likely object to how you're reusing and recycling their abandoned underpants—and you should probably knock it off. There are plenty of guys selling their used underwear and jocks online, from college athletes to porn stars, and if you work at a place with a private gym, SNIFF, you can presumably afford to buy a few pairs.
My response after the jump...
I'm pro maintenance sex, MSS.
Sometimes I sex my husband when I'm not feeling it; sometimes he sexes me when he's not feeling it. But maintenance sex is not the same thing as enthusiastic sex. The person asking for maintenance sex—the horny partner who's being indulged/milked/sexed by the non-horny partner—shouldn't expect mind-blowing, toe-curling, sheet-shredding sex. Maintenance sex is mellow sex, it's low-impact and low-stress, it's sex that requires minimal effort, and it's likely to be non-penetrative sex—and gratitude is the only appropriate response.
Another important note: Being pro maintenance sex doesn't obligate a person to have sex whenever their partner wants it. Proponents and practitioners of maintenance sex still get to say no. There's a difference between indulging your partner when you're not feeling it—when you could take it or leave it—and forcing yourself to have sex (or being guilted/pressured) when you're too exhausted, too sick, or too angry for sex.
And as you've discovered, MSS, and I can also attest, sometimes you go into sex "not wanting or needing it" and then you start to enjoy it, too, i.e., not in the mood when you started but definitely in the mood before you finished. Those are the times when low-stress maintenance sex turns into mind-blowing sex. I would hate to think of how much great sex I would've missed if my feminist principles didn't allow for maintenance sex.
P.S. to my readers. Don't you want a "Fuck First" or "GGG" coffee mug? Of course you do!
You're welcome, NLF, and thank you for the lovely email.
Thank you @fakedansavage for the "tough holidays" episode. Great advice on how to keep moving forward, even in tough times.
            
          
            
            — Eric Carvalho (@ericjcarvalho) November 26, 2015
Thank you @fakedansavage for the "tough holidays" episode. Great advice on how to keep moving forward, even in tough times.
You're welcome, Eric. That episode is here... for anyone who needs it.
Here's an idea: keep having this woman over for bondage and consensual/erotic "torture" scenes—but stuff the ball gag in your own mouth, PIT, at least when you feel the need to discuss mono vs. poly.
You consider yourself poly (because you have a broad definition of sex), she considers herself monogamous (because she has a narrower definition of sex). I'm with you, PIT, as I think all sorts of non-penetrative stuff counts as sex. But I don't see why you're so invested in persuading this woman, a woman who's just as casual play partner, that her definition of monogamy is all wrong isn't the same as yours. If you browbeat her into recognizing kink play as one form of sex—and I'm not suggesting that you are browbeating her, PIT, only that you may have to start if you're gonna convince her that She's Wrong and You're Right—there's no detectable upside for you. She's not going to play with you twice as much or twice as hard if she embraces the poly label. And there's a definite potential downside to browbeating her in to accepting your definition of monogamy: she might stop seeing you due to the browbeating—she doesn't come to you to get her brows beat—or she might stop seeing you because being monogamous is more important to her than playing with her kinky not-actually-fucking fuckbuddy.
Here's a better plan: you agree to disagree, you go right on identifying as poly, she goes right on identifying as monogamous, PIT, and you keep playing and having fun and respecting each other's limits, definitions, safe words, boundaries, sexual identities, and self-conceptions.
I'd like to speak your boyfriend, SOT, so I could ask him the obvious followup question (OFQ): Why does it feel awkward? You either didn't ask him the OFQ... or you did ask the OFQ and didn't like his answer.
Assuming your boyfriend is actually into you and wants to keep seeing you, his answer to the OFQ went or would go something like this: "We've been seeing each other for less than a year and to me it feels like it's too soon to be spending the holidays with each other's families—it's also too soon for us to be calling each other 'partner.' So let's take a deep breath, stay calm and keep being wonderful to each other. If we're still together this time next year then, yeah, we'll do Thanksgiving with your folks or mine."
If you asked and your boyfriend the OFQ and he didn't give you an answer, SOT, then it's possible—and possibility ≠ certainty—that your boyfriend doesn't want to keep seeing you and is operating/dating under the mistaken-but-all-too-common belief that stringing someone along is less cruel than dumping someone right before Thanksgiving/Xmess/NYE. He may not want to spend Thanksgiving/Xmess/NYE with your folks because doing so will be held up as evidence of his lying jerkiness after he dumps you on November 27 or December 26 or January 2.
My advice: Take "it's awkward" for an answer (or whatever answer he gave to the OFQ), tell him you'd like to catch a movie or have dinner on Saturday, and don't make a BFD out of his reluctance to spend Thursday with at your mom's and Friday at your dad's. It could mean nothing at all or it could mean something pretty dire. But there's no way for you to know what it means, SOT, so you'll just have to wait and see.
What do you do? 
You ask yourself if you believe your boyfriend when he says it was a mistake, ATU, one he deeply regrets, and one he never intends to repeat.
If you simply can't be romantically involved with someone capable of such a terrible/Michael Caine-y thing, ATU, the question is a rhetorical one. You can't stay with him and you'll have to end the relationship. But if could stay with someone capable of doing such a terrible thing so long as it's not a thing they'll ever do again, ATU, and if you believe your boyfriend when he says it was a mistake, one he regrets, and won't happen again, then you stay.
And when your find yourself feeling squicked out by the knowledge that your boyfriend fucked around on a previous girlfriend with her own sister, ATU, you take a deep breath and remind yourself that good and decent people sometimes do shitty, indecent things... and then you pause to consider all the shitty and/or indecent things you've done, ATU, some or most of which your boyfriend presumably remains blissfully unaware.
It's too bad that suggestive photo is rattling around out there in the vastness of the Internet, ATU, but I'm a little curious about how exactly you "came across" it in the first place. If you went looking for dirt—if you were snooping—you found it. Congrats. Now I'm not against snooping in all instances. Sometimes we find out shit we had a both right and an urgent need to know: the BF/GF/NBF*/fiancé/spouse is cheating a way that puts you at risk; they're running up ruinous debts; they're hiding a secret second family; they're sending money to Donald Trump, etc. But just as often we find out shit we didn't need to know—something in the BF/GF/NBF's past, something they regret, something they'll never do again (do you even have a sister?)—and can never un-know.
You learned that your boyfriend is did something pretty fucked up once. Whether you decide to stay or go, ATU, know that you snoop at your own risk—sorry, know that you explore "the vastness of the Internet" at your own risk.
* Nonbinaryfriend.
While I can certainly appreciate what’s hot about this fantasy, CUMDUMP, I can’t sign off on your proposed remedy to your husband's inability to be in two places/holes at once. Sucking on a defrosted lump of come just sounds nasty. And while you've given off-the-shelf dildos a try and found them lacking, there's another dildo option you might want to consider.
“A timeless philosophical quandary: How can one person be in two places at the same time?” said Todd Jarnagin of Clone-A-Willy, makers of the in-home penis molding kit. “Or how can CUMDUMP get fucked by her husband while simultaneously having her husband come in her mouth? Two husbands would be the obvious answer but CUMDUMP ruled inviting others to join. And we can’t currently help her find your husband’s alternate-universe double. But I think we do have the solution for you: Clone A Willy.”
This is an unsurprising suggestion... considering that Jarnagin works for Clone A Willy, a sex toy company based in Portland, Oregon. But creating a replica of your husband's cock really is your only realistic/non-icktastic/monogamous option.
And you won't just be replicating your husband's cock, CUMDUMP, you'll be improving on it.
“The Clone A Willy kit allows a person to make a vibrating silicone replica of an erect penis,” said Jarnagin. “Using our product would allow CUMDUMP's husband to penetrate CUMDUMP while he was coming in her mouth. Hell, they could make two copies of his penis and use both while he came in her mouth.”
Hell, you could make three clones of you husband's cock, CUMDUMP, and stuff one up your husband's ass while the other two clones are stuffing your holes—or, hell, why not go crazy and make FOUR clones? Then you can toss one out an open window and onto your lawn while you're using the other three.
“The mold is a fast-setting alginate similar to what dentists use when making casts of teeth, so it captures every detail,” said Jarnagin, “and the silicone is 100% platinum cure, so the entire process is hypoallergenic and body-safe. It requires a little prep work, so CUMDUMP should plan on spending one night getting her husband hard for the purposes of making a mold and then waiting 24 hours for the silicone to cure. She can plan on spending the next night with a vibrating clone of her husband fucking her while he comes in her mouth! Philosophical quandary solved!”
I'm going to make an assumption that may not be fair and may be ageist as hell. If it's unfair and/or ageist, FCG, feel free to disregard the assumption—but my advice stands regardless.
You say you did sex work in your forties. You don't say how long ago that was, FCG, but I'm gonna assume you're in your late forties now or early fifties. Because I suspect there's a voice in your head telling you to settle for this man—settle for this piece of shit—because what other options do you have at your age? It's the only reason I can come up with for why you've stayed with him.
Here are your other options: A different man—one who isn't an a piece of shit—or being single.
There are roughly 3.5 billion other men on the planet—some your age or older, some younger and into older. And there has to be tens thousands of men out there (more!) who would be happy to be with you. But even if there aren't, FCG, or even if you can't find one of them, or even if you're not attracted to any of the ones you do find (or vice-versa), you would be better off alone than with this sadistic, slut-shaming, whore-phobic piece of shit.
With apologies to Maya Angelou: When someone tells you who they are—over and over again—believe them. This shit insults you to your face on a daily basis and then tells you it will never change. He intends to go on slut-shaming/whore-shaming and insulting you for as long as you're together. 
Fuuuuuuuuck that, FCG, and fuuuuuuuuck him: DTMFA.
If you insist on giving him one last chance—which I don't think you should do but this is advice not binding arbitration—then say this to him and fuuuuuuuucking mean it: "The sex work in my past is a fact about me and I have no regrets. It's not something I'm ashamed of and I'm not going to apologize to you or anyone else for it. You can either accept this fact about me or you can get the fuuuuuuuuck out of my life."
Good recommendation, GMTF. Thanks for sharing.
P.S. BTW... my littlest sister told me a little bit ago that she's JC from this column. Thank you for taking care of her at a time when I had moved away so I had no idea what was going on and she didn't feel comfortable talking to our parents about it. You do good work.
DTMFA.
That's not what you wanted to hear, I realize, but in my professional and personal experience, TOM, this isn't a problem that gets better with time. On some level your fiancée wants you to leave her—and she'll go on being shitty to you and unkind to other women, and she'll keep making scenes and running you through the wringer, until you both dump and vindicate her. Face it: she'd rather be right (about you) than with you. And when you do finally dump her—or divorce her (if you're foolish enough to marry her absent a profound and lasting change)—she'll tell herself (and her son) that she was right about you all along, that you were always planning to leave her, that you're still hung up on your ex, that you're attracted to this coworker or that female friend, etc.
There's a small chance that dumping her will bring her to her senses, i.e. she'll realize she has to get a fucking grip and she'll successfully work through her jealousy issues—a process that involves accepting that of course her boyfriend/husband is attracted to other women from time to time, just as she's attracted to other men from time to time. I've seen it work, TOM, but it's a long shot.
There's also the Shamu strategy. 
Good luck.
My response after the jump...
Wow, GRIND, your girlfriend is pretty fucking dense. I'm surprised she remembers to breathe in her sleep.
I mean, she actually heard you say, "I wanted to fuck last night—maybe you can wear one of your sexy bras and thongs one day soon?" and somehow didn't realize that what you meant was "Please initiate sex more often." And she's seen you smearing lotion on yourself after showering and somehow didn't realize that you wanted her to start initiating sex once in a while. Amazing. A boyfriend smearing lotion on himself—who doesn't know what that means?
Um. Yeah. No.
Sorry, GRIND, but you're the dense one in this relationship. The likely takeaway from "I wanted to fuck last night—maybe you can wear one of your sexy bras and thongs one day soon?" is "I wanted to fuck last night, but the granny panties/pajama bottoms/hazmat Spanx you were wearing were such a turnoff that I couldn't get it up. You suck at this girlfriend shit." And while seeing your boyfriend "lotion up" after a shower may inspire lust, it doesn't communicate a very specific need like "Please initiate sex more often." The only thing it communicates for sure is "My boyfriend isn't going to put up with dry skin."
You want your girlfriend to initiate sex more often? Tell her you want her to initiate sex more often. Trust me, GRIND, that straightforward request will display more sensitivity to your girlfriend's feelings—and will be less crazy-making—than a potentially confidence-shredding statement like "Hey, I wanted to fuck you last night but you were wearing the wrong panties" or the conspicuous application of skin moisturizer.
But even if you're straight with her, GRIND, things are unlikely to change. She initiates when she's horny/sexually frustrated, but she obviously has a lower libido than you do and gets horny/sexually frustrated at intervals that leave you frustrated. Your desire for her cranks her up, so she's good to go when you initiate. But she's unlikely to feel the urge to initiate as often as you would like her to regardless
I don't get letters like yours often, TOM—thankfully.
And, yes, I would describe this as an abusive relationship—and the abuse may be worse than you know. Abused women who stay with their abusers (because they're trapped by economic circumstance, because they're afraid to leave, because their abusers are threatening their children) will sometimes minimize the violence and abuse they're experiencing for fear of being judged or condemned for not leaving. So I worry that this woman's shitty 35-year-old BF was a more than "slightly physical" with her when she returned home.
And, yes, if it's possible for you to wreck this home, TOM, I think you should wreck it. Bearing in mind that it's no uncommon for an abusive ex-boyfriend or ex-husband to attack the ex's new partner. Look out for yourself too.
That said, if you think the prospect of being with you might inspire this woman to leave her abusive boyfriend—if she needs leverage and you're willing to play the lever—communicate your desire to be with her. But urge her to get counseling after she leaves him for you. She'll need professional help to process the emotional fallout, she'll need help recognizing unhealthy/dysfunctional/codependent warning signs and patterns, and she'll benefit from having an advocate in her life who isn't also in her pants. Tell her you have no desire to take possession of her, tell her you don't see her as some sort of rescue, tell her not to see you as a knight in shining armor. Then do what you can to help line up the resources (social, financial, familial) she'll need to stand on her own two feet—and then, if she chooses to stay with you, it's a free choice she's making, not a choice she's making out desperation or dependance.
Finally... that night she stayed over with you, after the show where you ran into some friends of her abusive boyfriend, you say her boyfriend called and called your number. How did her boyfriend get his hands on your phone number?
You can ask him to leave whenever you like/you're done with him, GTFO.
Your offer to put him up? Predicated upon the assumption that this romance would continue to blossom—or whatever—and, yeah, the bloom is off the rose, the rosebush has been dug up and mulched, the earth under it has been salted, etc. You didn't adopt him, he's not your dependent, you're not obligated to house him past the relationship's expiration date.
As for the awkwardness, GTFO, best to power through that shit. You know it's over (you're not fucking him), he knows it's over (he's not fucking you), but neither of you wants to acknowledge the over-ness of the situation because... what would that mean? You have to kick him out first thing in the morning? He has to ask mom and dad for more money before lunchtime? He has to head back to the UK after dinner?
There's another option.
Go to him and say, "Hey, we gave it a shot but it looks like an LTR isn't in the offing. Still, our STR—short-term relationship—was pretty awesome. Here's the thing: We could salvage a lifelong friendship out of this if we can manage to stick the dismount. But the more time we spend cooped up in my apartment together the greater the odds of things going from merely awkward to completely toxic. I don't want to force you to go home early but I have a ton of work to do and I need my space. So you're welcome to stay here but I'm going to need you—for my sanity and for the sake of our future friendship—to make yourself exceedingly scarce. Get out there, meet other girls, slay 'em with that accent, spend the night as often as you can... and, with luck, the next four weeks should fly by. Deal?"
Be a human being, PREP.
Reach out to Mr. Grindr, thank him for pounding some sense into you, and tell him you’re on PrEP now, per his kind and thoughtful recommendation. And don’t stop there: tell Mr. G you’re torn between What You Know and How You Feel. You know “undetectable” is another word for "uninfectious,” at least where poz guys who are on their meds are concerned, and that sex with poz-and-undetectable guys is less risky than sex with guys who are sure they’re negative but might not be. Like I told DADT in this week's Savage Love...
[A] positive guy with an undetectable viral load is less of a risk—at least where HIV transmission is concerned—than a guy who believes himself to be negative because he was the last time he got tested or because he doesn't think he could ever get infected and so has never been tested. Someone who was recently infected is highly infectious; someone who doesn't think he could ever get infected—because he doesn't sleep with older guys, because he only tops, because his ass is magic and he uses unicorn spit for lube—is a fucking idiot, and fucking idiots are higher risk for fucking everything.
Then tell Mr. G him how you feel, PREP: you're irrationally afraid of having sex with poz guys. You're more afraid of having less risky sex with poz guys than you were of having sex, pre-PrEP, with guys who thought they were negative but might not have been. You're afraid even now that you're on PrEP and the odds of you getting infected by an undetectable poz guy are effectively zero. You're afraid because after you came out your parents freaked out about—excuse me: your parents were literally only concerned about—you getting infected with HIV. Then ask Mr. G if he might be willing to meet up sometime to talk about the possibility of him maybe fucking some sense into you. You can start slow: instead of incredibly safe, no-risk fucking, PrEP, just go in for some JO and rolling around and maybe a little oral the first time you meet up. If that goes well and he wants to keep hooking up with you, build up to him literally fucking some sense into you.
This isn't something you would be doing for Mr. G, PREP. You'd be doing it for yourself. Because this guy—a guy who didn't flip out when you rejected him, a guy who cared enough about a complete stranger on a hookup app to spend a few minutes encouraging him to take care of himself—sounds like a good and kind person. Good and kind people make great boyfriends, PREP, and great boyfriends make great husbands. Even if it turns out that he's not the right guy for you, another good and kind poz guy could come along and that guy could wind up being the love of your life. It would be a real loss—a real loss for you—if your irrational fear of being with poz guys prevented that relationship from getting off the ground.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
What should you do, FUCK?
You should do unto others as you would have them do unto you—meaning, of course, you should make an effort to look past the superficial things you condemn other gay men for failing to look past, i.e. income, conventional attractiveness, dick size.
The key to your dilemma is packed into that vague parenthetical: You do the same thing you complain about other guys doing—meaning, guys who aren't hot and/or hung and/or loaded are just as invisible to you as you are to all hot and/or hung and/or loaded guys. I'm sorry, FUCK, but you either gotta be the change you wanna see in the world—you'll either have to start taking second looks at smart and funny guys who aren't handsome in the way guys need to be to get dates with guys who are handsome enough to get by without smarts or a sense of humor—or you'll have to hold out for a guy who may never come along, i.e. a guy who could take his pick of the washboarded and firm-pectoral'd on Grindr, Jacked, Scruff, etc. (some of whom, it must be said, are both smart and funny) but who chooses you over the buff and the beautiful. It could happen, of course, but the wait could be long, frustrating, and ultimately fruitless.
Before I let you go, FUCK...
I remember reading the results of a study—this was at least a decade ago—that compared gay male couples to straight couples; the researchers compared communication skills, sexual fulfillment, stability, and some other traits. (I tried to find the study without luck, FUCK, but maybe someone reading this will recognize the study and toss up a link in the comments.) There was one finding that really shocked these researchers: partnered gay men were able to be honest with partners who were not their physical ideals—and, yes, about the fact that they were not their physical ideals. (Or, in some instances, not their physical ideals anymore.) Needless to say, this wasn't something they saw in the straight couples they studied.
It seems like the guys in that particular study—a study I can't cite because I can't remember what it was called or who conducted it (but I didn't dream it up!)—might be good role models for you. Find a smart, funny guy you enjoy spending time with, maybe someone who isn't your physical ideal (just as you might not be his), and live together and love each other and think about whatever you wanna or need to think about when you fuck around. And maybe, every once in a while, as a treat, you rent yourselves a handsome and hung guy and go to town on him together.
Good luck.
1. Ignore the dumb fuck. And if you get (or already got) promoted over her, you could fire her. But since learning to ignore irritating people is a life skill that all adults who don't aspire to be spree killers must acquire at some point, SMQG, it might be better for all involved (all two of you) if you regarded this dumb fuck as a learning opportunity.
2. I don't think "the female body is icky," at least not objectively speaking. The female body is beautiful and luscious... to people who are into those sorts of bodies. Which I am not. But my disinterest doesn't make them not beautiful and luscious. Similarly, I think oysters are icky. But lots of folks love 'em, my husband included, and will literally put those subjectively disgusting things in their mouths.
And that sexual peak stuff? It's likely a myth and I'm doing my best to unlearn it and to stop repeating it. Why does it seem like men hit their sexual peak in their teens and women later in life? Well, maybe it's because boys are encouraged to think of themselves as sexual (horny boys are the heroes of teen comedies, for example, while horny girls don't exist in teen comedies and are slaughtered in teen horror flicks), boys aren't slut shamed, and boys are raised to feel entitled to go for whatever they want. Women, on the other hand, are discouraged from seeing themselves as sexual, they are brutally slut shamed as girls (and by girls), and girls are raised to defer, not demand. It stands to reason that women need time to dig themselves out from under all the crap heaped up on them in childhood—e.g., what all boys are encouraged to get out there and do by age 18 many women don't find the courage to get out there and do until after age 28.
Or as the sexologist Ava Cadell told Details: "As women mature, they become more comfortable in their own skin and gain sexual confidence to communicate their wants, needs, and desires."
For tips on exploring your lady parts, I recommend Dr. Debby Herenick's book Because It Feels Good: A Woman's Guide to Sexual Pleasure and Satisfaction.
3. Make time to see your mom—maybe when your husband is hanging out with friends. You owe her that. Be polite to your dad—you two don't click, but he wasn't a monster. It's possible your depression prevented you from bonding with your father in your teens or wore away the bond that was already there. He may deserve another chance.) Siblings tend to grow apart, so don't torture yourself about not being tight. But if your feelings toward them are "could take 'em or leave 'em" feelings toward your siblings, SMQG, you should err on the side of taking 'em every once in a while. Because once mom and dad are gone, your siblings are still going to be there. And if the shit ever hits the fan, if your marriage should (God forbid) should fall apart, or if you and your husband fall on hard times and you need help, it's your siblings you'll be calling.
My response after the jump...
While it's great that you're understanding of your girlfriend's sensitivities, LIBIDO, and while it's commendable that you view nonpenetrative sex as fulfilling, you're running the risk of "understanding" her into a relationship that makes you both unhappy. Because someone who wants sex multiple times per week will eventually be made miserable by someone who wants sex far less than once a month (which is what the "or so" at the end of "once-every-three-weeks-or-so" means), and vice versa—being with you will make your girlfriend miserable in the long run, too.
I get e-mails daily from miserable people on both sides of this divide, LIBIDO, from people with high libidos who married lows and from people with low libidos who married highs. The highs are miserable because years of sexual rejection have shredded their sexual self-esteem, or they feel like monsters after years of being "indulged" with going-through-the-motions sex by barely willing and clearly miserable partners. The lows are miserable because going through the motions makes them miserable or they're sick of constantly being pestered for sex and made to feel inadequate or broken when they pass.
You're young and straight, LIBIDO, and the culture tells the young and the straight that they must be monogamous (because sex is so important) and that they shouldn't take sexual compatibility into consideration when picking a partner (because sex is so unimportant). Other shit matters, too, of course—stuff like emotional compatibility, similar life goals, being on the same page about kids, etc. But basic sexual compatibility matters, too, and its absence will eventually undermine everything else.
By which I mean to say, LIBIDO: You've been dating this girl long enough to know that you're not a match—you're not sexually compatible—and that's reason enough to end this relationship.
My response after the jump...
This experience would seem to fall in the "right not to know" column, NIPPLES, but "right not to know" always has to be weighed against "likelihood of finding out."
You indicate that this couple—the girl with the lovely, direct, and inviting breasts (LDIBs), and the boy who witnessed the touching and sucking of said LDIBs—aren't just friends of yours, NIPPLES, but friends of "ours." If either of them makes a reference to this game of strip cribbage—or strip Uno or strip poker or strip Schnapsen—the next time the four of you hang out, the boyfriend could be blindsided. And it's not clear whether there were other witnesses to your drunken touch-and-suck. But if there were others there, and if you socialize with these other witnesses IRL or online, the chances that your boyfriend will find out increase exponentially.
You know your boyfriend better than I do, NIPPLES, so you'll have to ask yourself if finding out about the incident at a party or via a snarky Facebook post would leave him feeling twice as upset—because then we're talking about a crime and a cover-up, and learning about the LDIBs incident in a manner (from a friend, in front of other people) that leaves him feeling humiliated.
My response after the jump...
Closeted gay men don't use colored T-shirts to send messages to out gay men. They use Craigslist.
Look, PID, Jeffrey Dahmer—aka the Milwaukee Cannibal—ate a friend of mine. By which I mean to say: Some gay people are insane. I'm not saying you're in danger of being drugged, raped, butchered, and eaten by this guy from your writing group. But the guy is—if your account is accurate—more than a little unpleasant and a whole lot batshit. Confide in some friends in your writing group about what's going on and be prepared to leave the group and/or form a breakaway group if Mr. Red Sweater continues to detect clues in your wardrobe. Also: Do not spend any more time alone with this guy. Someone who would accuse you of making super-secret passes at him via red T-shirts is capable of making baseless accusations about much worse.
And finally, PID, a bonus pro tip: Writers don't need a writers' group to write. They just need to write.
My response after the jump...
I am sharing your letter, CC, in the hopes that doctors all over the world read it and promptly incorporate your "flared-base" advice into their practice. If they don't, well, then we will just have to conclude that flared-base advice isn't given to patients by doctors—ER or otherwise—because doctors secretly enjoy digging various foreign objects out of the variable rectums of various gentlemen.
Ugh.
I swore off answering questions like yours in this week's column, LOAC, and then I made the mistake of reading your letter. Just when I thought I was out... your tale of woe pulls me back in.
It's too bad your wife won't allow you to have a girlfriend on the side—I'm assuming the subject of getting your sexual needs met elsewhere was raised during those post-affair couple's counseling sessions—because this particular girlfriend sounds ideal. She's on the other side of the country and married herself, so she wouldn't be eating up all of your time and emotional energy, even as she ate up all of your sexual energy. And your wife isn't particularly interested in eating up your sexual energy—or anything else of yours—so why not outsource that?
I'm fucking mystified by people who aren't interested in having sex with their partners but who are nevertheless adamant that their partners not have sex with anyone else. Your wife would probably say the thought of you fucking another woman makes her miserable—miserable and insecure—but what about your misery? (And how would it make your wife feel to know that sexual deprivation has you looking forward to her death? Assuming that's what you meant by, "Can I just let time play out?") Our culture's simplistic, knee-jerk bias against "cheating" means the world will see you a horrible person who betrayed the woman you professed to love—and you'll see yourself that way—but the world is blind to your partner's betrayal of you. And it is a betrayal. If you make a monogamous commitment to someone, if you demand a monogamous commitment from someone, you are obligated to meet that person's reasonable sexual needs. If you can't meet those needs—if you're not a sexual person—then demanding monogamy (demanding celibacy) is a form of emotional abuse.
I probably shouldn't have picked your question for the SLLOTD, LOAC, and not just because I'm tired of telling people in loving-but-sexless marriages to do what they need to do stay married and stay sane. I shouldn't have run your letter because I can't help you. There are no good options here. You either betray your wife and feel like a piece of shit and spend half of every day worrying about getting caught or you betray yourself and feel like a piece of shit and spend half of every day looking forward to your widowhood or you leave your wife and lose your business and go broke. (Did you sign some sort of onerous prenup?) I  honestly don't know which lousy option you should pick. But if I were you, LOAC, I would rather be poor and free and than married and miserable.
There's also the option, of course, of starring in the lesbian reboot of Same Time Next Year.

Good luck.
I think you missed an opportunity—and I'm not referring to an opportunity to take a ride in a sex swing, SWING, which will hopefully come your way again. You missed an opportunity to educate these two about the risks of mixing oil-based lubes with latex condoms. Instead of cutting off negotiations at the first sign of ignorance about a basic safe-sex practice, you could've and should've clued this guy in on the basic error he was making and the risks he was running. Instead of assuming the worst—he wants to discard the condoms one way or the other (not use them at all, dissolve any that get used)—you should've given him the benefit of the doubt.
That a sexually-active adult might be unaware of the dangers of mixing oil-based lubes and condoms seems incredible, SWING, but if this couple got together young, and if they've been strictly monogamous (and condom-free) until very recently, it's possible that they're as new to swinging and as they are to condoms. Sex ed is really lousy in this country and people sometimes stumble into adulthood—even into middle-age adulthood—without knowing basics likes "don't use oil based lube with latex condoms."
If you had said, "That's not a good idea, dude," and he came back with, "Well, we don't really like to use condoms anyway," then you should've cancelled for sure. But if he had said, "Oh, my God. We honestly had no idea!", SWING, you could've safely tried out that swing safely and made it safer for all the guys who tried it out after you.
P.S. Yes, we both know she doesn't need my permission; no, I would not track or manage her videos; we are close, and all she wants is my feedback.
As I've said before, MOM, webcamming—aka camwhoring—is the safest form of sex work. Unlike strippers, escorts, pro-Doms, foot-fetish-party girls, etc., your daughter wouldn't be in the same room with her clients. Even better: cam girls (and boys) can block rude/annoying/creepy/aggressive men (and women). If choosy moms could choose one form of sex work for their kids—moms concerned about safety—choosy moms would choose webcamming.
That said, MOM, there are still risks—like a client taking screengrabs or recording videos and posting them online. Screengrabs and surreptitiously recorded videos can come back to haunt young cammers who want to become, say, teachers or politicians or movie stars when they grow up. And cam girls, like other kinds of sex workers, have been stalked and harassed by obsessed and/or vindictive clients. (Women who aren't sex workers have been stalked and harassed by obsessed and/or vindictive ex-boyfriends, former coworkers, complete strangers, etc.)
Sex work is hard work—the same can be said for waiting tables or flipping burgers—and webcamming can be a difficult gig to make profitable. Camming isn't the cash spigot many people assume it is. And while it may seem like it isn't all that time-consuming, MOM, camming involves actual physical labor and can involve way more emotional labor than your daughter might anticipate (or be prepared to do). If your daughter has any reservations, steer her first job towards something a little easier. Employees typically don't have to come—or appear to be coming—to get a paycheck from Shake Shack. If your daughter decides to do some camming, direct her towards resources like We Cam Girls and Camgirl Nation.
Finally, MOM, it sounds like you have a solid relationship with your daughter. Congratulations. That's rare. I have a similarly solid relationship with my son—in part because I don't answer hypothetical questions about him in this space.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Some people are assholes, some people are gay, some gay people are gay assholes.
I've met your brother's particular flavor of gay asshole before: confront him about his bullshit—like showing up to a child's birthday party high on speed and talking about sex—and he'll accuse you of being homophobic. The problem couldn't be that a kid's birthday party isn't the right place to yammer on about the cock(s) you sucked last night—no, no. It's homophobia! Call the ACLU! NOH8!
A quick example from my own life: Years ago I wrote that knowingly exposing someone to HIV was a shockingly immoral act—shameful even—and gay assholes accused me of being homophobic. Now "gay assholes" are not to be confused with "all gay people" or "the gay community," although many of the gay assholes who got in my face about this—"Each us is responsible for our own safety! It's not my responsibility to protect you!", the assholes howled (at a time when there were no effective treatments for HIV and an AIDS diagnoses was still a death sentence!)—nevertheless claimed to speak for "the gay community" while at the same time condemning me for claiming to speak for the gay community (which I didn't do, have never done, will never do). Ah, memories.
Anyway, ISYMUSCAFMIYRWIHYW, you have three options. Confront your brother's bullshit head-on, confront your brother's bullshit indirectly, or let time (and speed) sort your brother's bullshit out.
Head-on would look like this: Call your brother and tell him that you don't appreciate the lies he's been telling about you—it's his assholery you have a problem with, not his sexuality—and seize the next opportunity to raise the subject of your brother's assholery with the whole family. Why not say, "I'm not a homophobe, Ed's a liar, pass the stuffing," at Thanksgiving? Football games, food comas, and family drama—isn't that what Thanksgiving is all about? Or you can confront your brother's bullshit head-on but in a slightly less dramatic fashion: Call your brother and bitch him out, ISYMUSCAFMIYRWIHYW, then call only those relatives you're certain have distanced themselves from you as a result of your brother's bullshit and have a quick, polite, informative conversation with them about what's really going on.
Indirect confrontation would look like this: Make a point of posting pro-queer stuff to Facebook, Instagram, Twitter—I'm assuming that you, like most modern humans, keep in touch with your relatives via social media—and let your relatives weigh what Ed is saying about you (anti-gay!) against your social media (pro-gay!). Maybe one or two will work up the nerve to raise the subject with you.
Finally, ISYMUSCAFMIYRWIHYW, you could let time (and speed) do the heavy lifting for you. If Ed is the type of speed user who gets methy at children's birthday parties, it's only a matter of time before he burns the relatives he's lying to about his meanie big sister. Sooner or later—my money's on sooner—they're going to realize that Ed's the problem here, not you. This option is less likely to produce immediate results/relief, ISYMUSCAFMIYRWIHYW, but it has the best odds of preserving your post-meth/post-asshole relationship with Ed.
My response after the jump...
Some suggestions: Use a hormonal birth control method and a condom and pull out before you come. Don't have penis-in-vagina intercourse—you can stick to oral sex, mutual masturbation, and doing her in the butt (if being done in the butt is something your girlfriend enjoys). Deposit a few loads at a sperm bank, keep 'em on ice until you want kids, and get a vasectomy.
Or, hey, you could learn more about abortion while continuing to act responsibly, i.e., using birth control and condoms. Abortion is not a horrible, horrible thing. It is a medical, medical thing.
I'm gonna give it to you straight, SAD, and I'm gonna give it you quick—because I gotta rush home* to watch the Democratic debate on CNN.
Make a list of what you're willing to put up with and what you're not willing to put up with, SAD. Put the shit you'll put up with in Column A, put the shit you won't put up with in Column B. Then set the list in front of him—do it decisively—and tell him that the shit in Column B changes, finally and for good, or it's over.
Personally, SAD, I could put up with his introversion (so long as he didn't begrudge my going out with friends), I could put up with separate bedrooms (so long as he didn't jump out of bed immediately after sex), and I could put up with the frequency of sex (so long as "twice per month" was the exception and "2-3 times per week" was the rule). But I could not and would not put up with the vapouriser or the poor-dental-hygiene-induced skunk breath.
Give him six months to turn the vaping and stinking around (and tell him you're fine with twice-a-month-or-less until the breath thing is solved), SAD, and if he can't turn it around... pull the fuckin' plug. Decisively.
*Full disclosure: I'm rushing to a bar.
My response after the jump...
Are you such a slut?
Or are you a woman who loves sex, has a high libido, and has consensual sex with a lot of willing and grateful partners? Those are traits a sex-negative/misogynist culture conspires to make you feel conflicted about, GC, and then cons you into slapping a pejorative label on yourself—a label you wouldn't feel a need to slap on yourself if you were a dude, gay or straight.
Don't buy into the sexist double standards, GC. So long as your sex life isn't negatively impacting your relationship(s), your health, your classwork, or your career, GC, you aren't doing anything wrong. Don't let shitty, sexist people make you feel like you have to slap a shitty, sexist label on yourself for the crime of enjoying sex while female.
Have fun out there, GC, be thoughtful, be safe, be considerate. And remember: What works for you now—slutting around in the sex-positive/reclaiming-the-shit-out-of-that-word sense—may not work for you always. Don't look back on this part of your life with shame or regret if or when you elect to downsize your sex life, i.e., less sex, fewer sex partners/more sex, one sex partner. Do what's right for you, eliminate risks that can be eliminated, mitigate risks that can't be eliminated, and don't worry about what other people think.
I'm posting MFT's letter as the SLLOTD because I'm on an airplane, my battery is almost dead, there are no outlets at the seats, and the WifI is on this flight is spotty. A word of warning to readers: I wasn't able to check out the Tumblr MFT is plugging because I'm pretty sure the person sitting to my right doesn't want to see what MFT's friend's dick gets up to when MFT's friend is asleep. So caveat clicktor, kids.
Sexual compatibility is important and there’s nothing foolish about prioritizing it—there is, in fact, something deeply foolish about not prioritizing sexual compatibility and sexual satisfaction in a monogamous relationship. Your friends' comments are “a social construct,” i.e. the product of a deeply sex-negative culture that conspires to stuff two contradictory thoughts in our heads: sex is completely unimportant (how could you leave someone over something so trifling as sex?) and sex is profoundly important (seeking sexual satisfaction outside your relationship is the ultimate betrayal).
Give your boyfriend six months to start making progress on this problem. If his dick is up and down during sex, as some men's are, you can to work around that. If he needs to use his own hand to finish, as some men do, you can accept that this is just the way his dick works. But the rest of it gets better—he comes through with some foreplay, he successfully works toward getting his insecurities under control so you can mix it up a little, you'll continue to school him but he'll start to show some initiative—or you’re through.
Considering how the conversation about gender gets more jargon-laden, more opaque, and more impenetrable with each passing semester, HTH, anything that makes the gender convo more jargon-laden, more opaque, and more impenetrable would probably be regarded as helpful by the folks at the center of this particular conversational hyperspace. So… well done, HTH!
Nope.
Well... actually... I'm gonna walk that back. (One word into a response and I'm already walking it back—that may be a new record, even for me.) I should've said there's no way for you to salvage this relationship, B/B. It's out of your hands. If your girlfriend can get past it, if she can take her share of the responsibility for having poured this poison into her own eyes, if she can accept that no one loves every last thing (physically, emotionally, socially) about their GFs/BFs/husbands/wives/Dominants/submissives/whatevers, if she can will herself to forget the scalding shit she read in your fucking journal... then she may be able to salvage this relationship. But there's nothing you can do, B/B, besides what you've already done: apologizing (for what you wrote) and contextualizing (explaining when and why you wrote it).
If this isn't something she can get past—if she can't look at you looking at her without those stupid fucking journal entries thundering in her head—then this relationship is over.
Assuming this relationship ends, B/B, here's what you're not gonna do in the future: You're not gonna write down every cruel and/or shitty thing that pops into your fucking head about your future girlfriend(s). Just as some things can't be unsaid, some things can't be unread. And unless you're gonna carry your journal around in an aluminum tube that you stuff up your ass when you're not jotting down your cruelest and/or shittiest thoughts, it's a bad idea to put down on paper emotionally shattering things you would never say to your partner's face. Because people find shit and they read it. Yes, your girlfriend shouldn't have read your journal, you're right about that, but your own carelessness—leaving something so toxic in a place where she might find it and read it—was unforgivably thoughtless.
In regards to whether or not you were treated to chest and neck massage by a horny incubus in Mallorca, GHOST, I'm gonna say... no, you weren't treated to chest and neck massage by a horny incubus in Mallorca. 
Ghosts are one of those things adults make up, like Santa Claus and Mormonism or sapiosexuality. Make-believe can be fun, of course, and fantasies are for realizing. But we shouldn't make life choices based on star signs, moon cycles, or popes and other imaginary friends. My feelings aside, a lot of people are into incubuses: church people and Satanic cults and ghost-fighting YouTubers. (Like these lesbian ghost hunters on YouTube who help ghosts come out of the closet. Or this episode of Nathan For You, where a realtor confesses she was choked by an incubus in Switzerland.) Clearly, lots of people wish ghosts were real—because a world without ghosts is less interesting than a world with one—but I don't buy it. And neither does science:
The scientific explanation for the incubus attack is that the person experiences a state dissociation in which part of the mental apparatus comes to conscious awareness even as the rest of the brain is in the REM stage of sleep. The body remains paralyzed so as to prevent acting out the dream. The realization that it is not possible to move contributes significantly to the unpleasant and frightening quality of this event. In addition, a potential sexual aspect to the experience is provided by the physiology of REM sleep which causes erection in men and lubrication in women. Awakening from a frightening experience and subconsciously recognizing an erotic bodily feeling lends itself to seeing a connection between the experience, and the working of dark and evil forces.... It must be emphasized that for the person who has experienced an incubus or succubus attack, the rational, scientific explanation may lack the powerful emotional force of the demonic explanation. Even for trained scientists who have had these experiences, shaking the belief of having been visited by a malignant force is very difficult.
You were, however, taken advantage of in Barcelona by a real, live human being—or a piece of shit masquerading as a human being. You lost consciousness and woke up without your phone or panties, alone and dumped in a public space. You may never know exactly what happened that night after you blacked out, GHOST, but no "innocent" explanation can account for the what you do know/remember. I'm very sorry this was done to you—you didn't invite it, you didn't deserve it, and you should stop crafting rationalizations that get an asshole who at the very least stole your phone and abandoned you in a public place when you were unconscious.
People typically lean on friends and family after traumatic experiences, GHOST, but you're traveling and presumably cut off from the kind of IRL/face-to-face support you might need right now. Which means you're going to have to put effort into taking care of yourself. If you can, reach out to local friends or connect with other female travelers (Wanderful and Pink Pangea are good resources). If you haven't already, GHOST, I'd recommend reporting this experience to police. Additionally, your country's embassy may have programs to assist with rape and sexual assault cases that occur while abroad. And if you're back in the states and need to find support or resources, reach out to RAINN. You should also get a full STI screening as soon as possible.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
It sure doesn't sound like your husband can get past this—it actually sounds like your husband is determined never to get past this, SALT, which would explain why he insists on ripping the wound open at regular intervals. Because so long as he can keep torturing you for this nothing of an affair, so long as he can keep offloading all responsibility for the state of his marriage onto his wife's shoulders, he doesn't have to be intimate with you in any way (sexually and emotionally), he doesn't have to examine his own role in the breakdown of his marriage, and he never has to give up the "moral high ground" of being the "victim" of this, again, big fat nothing of an affair. (Like Esther Perel says: "The victim of the affair is not always the victim of the  marriage.")
Since you're not in a position to leave, SALT, what you should seek in counseling is some sort of negotiated settlement. Detente. Let go of old expectations, stop picking at past, failures, and focus on your responsibilities to each other and your kids going forward. You aren't lovers and haven't been for a long time. You are partners and you are parents—your kids need you, they need both of you, and it would appear that you can't provide the care they need if you divorce. So you're fucking stuck with each other for the foreseeable future, SALT, and you'll have to make the best of it. Tell your husband, in the presence of your counselor, that you're not seeking his forgiveness. This isn't an attempt to repair your marriage or to restore your relationship to the condition it was in before you married. You're there to put a cap on it—a cap like the one they put on top of the reactors at Chernobyl—and that means no more discussions, no more recriminations, no more fights about this. If not for your sake, then for your kids' sakes.
All you owe each other going forward is kindness, consideration, and respect. Period. He doesn't have to get over his anger about your long-ago sexual betrayal—which came in the wake his sexual betrayal/abandonment—but he'll have to eat it. Because you're not going to answer or apologize for it anymore.
Thanks for sharing, GTCTTWI, and congrats!
My response after the jump...
There are no nonsexual components to this, WKBFM, and if you've never heard of something like this before, well, you must be a new reader.
What we've got here is a rich guy attempting to manipulate his kids' former babysitter into doing sex work for him—no, scratch that. What we've got here is a rich guy who has already manipulated his kids' former babysitter into doing sex work for him, WKBFM, and that's pretty fucking creepy. (Your previous workouts with the blindfolds and the wrestling and the kicking? Unpaid sex work.) Don't get me wrong: I don't think his ball-busting fetish is creepy. It's extreme, as fetishes go, and there are definitely risks. But the risks are his. Paying you to kick him in the nuts doesn't put his wife at risk (swift-kick-to-sack is not a known mode of STI transmission), it won't take food out of his children's mouths, and, as he presumably has all the children he wants, ball-busting-induced sterility might be a blessing/vasectomy in disguise.
If you need the money, WKBFM, and you don't think you'll be scarred by the experience, tell the rich guy you'll consider doing this for him—you'll come over, remain fully clothed, and kick him in the nuts—but only if he levels with you: He's getting off on this. If he can't level with you, WKBFM, don't do this.
You don't want this rich asshole to think he's successfully manipulated you into doing sex work for him, because once the session is under way, you don't want him thinking, "Well, if I could get her to do this, I can probably get her to [remove her clothes, watch me masturbate, have sex with me]." If you go into a ball-busting session without both of you having acknowledged what you're actually doing—you're sorta selling sex, he's definitely paying for sex—and he does try to get you to remove your clothes or watch him masturbate or have sex with him, WKBFM, you may find it difficult to say no. Being direct with someone ("No, I'm not taking my clothes off, asshole!") after you've accepted a dishonest premise ("Sure, rich guy, this isn't about sex, you're just testing yourself!") requires you to admit that you were being dishonest, too. Most people are reluctant to admit to dishonesty, and a skilled manipulator will exploit that inhibition to get what he wants.
So tell him you'll play—you'll bust his balls—but you're not going to play along. He has to admit that this is about sex and he has to agree to honor your conditions: Everything that happens is agreed to in advance, no special requests during a session, he remains fully clothed, you remain fully clothed, no recordings are made, and you get the $150—make that $250—whether or not he bails.
My response after the jump...
Sane people can have extreme and/or violent sexual fantasies, NOPE, and extreme and/or violent sexual fantasies do not make sane people crazy. (Let's call them EVSFs for short, shall we?)
But you need to talk to a shrink—not because you're hopelessly damaged or the only person out there with EVSFs, but because you're troubled by your fantasies. And that's understandable. It's difficult to have EVSFs—or to find a healthy way to incorporate EVSFs into your sex life, or to figure out how to dial EVSFs way the fuck back if there's no healthy way to incorporate them into your sex life—when your erotic imagination is constantly dragging you to new and more disturbing places. And while most people's fantasies are relatively fixed, i.e., certain types of people or scenarios turn them on, your erotic imagination seems to be on the hunt for new "wrong" thoughts, images, stimuli, and scenarios. You need to seize control of your sexuality, and you'll need help doing that, or your sense of estrangement from your sexuality will only continue to grow.
That said, NOPE, you could be seeing causation where there is only coincidence. There are a lot of people out there who didn't suffer the kind of abuse you did—or any kind of abuse at all—but who nevertheless have EVSFs. Some people with troubling fantasies or interests have found relief with low-dose antidepressants; some folks with post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD) have been helped by novel programs that incorporate MDMA, aka ecstasy, into their treatment plans. You could be suffering from PTSD, considering your history.
A good therapist—one with whom you are completely honest—may be able to help you reshape and redirect your fantasies in the direction of still-intense, less-wrong, not- constantly-escalating stimuli that gives you the "wrongness" charge you need without nuking your mental health or your life. (Stay away from all pedo porn sites, NOPE, even "stories only" porn. Please.) And a good sex therapist can help you draw a clear distinction between your adult sexuality—whatever form it takes—and your history of sexual abuse. (I shared your letter with a sex researcher I trust, and she urged me to urge you to insist on seeing a reputable therapist who does sex therapy specifically, as they're less likely to be sex-negative and therefore less likely to react with prudish or panicked judgments when you disclose your EVSFs.)
Considering the abuse you suffered at the hands of your family of origin, NOPE, I trust that your adoptive parents are aware that you may need professional help throughout your life and that your asking for help is a good sign about (1) you as a person and (2) them as parents. At your very first appointment, ask your shrink to confirm that your sessions are confidential. If for some reason your shrink tells you he or she can't offer you complete confidentiality (which they can and, in most places, are required to do by law, unless you're a danger to yourself or others), thank the nice shrink for his or her time and ask your parents to make you an appointment to see a different shrink.
Please get help—not because you are or may be kinky, NOPE, but because you're struggling with doubt, you're confused about your sexual orientation, and you're rightly worried about the way your erotic imagination keeps upping the "wrongness" ante. And remember: Not all counselors or shrinks are created equal. If you don't like or click with the first one you see, tell your parents you want to see someone else.
My response after the jump...
He's done with sex, and you're not—so you get to fuck other people, and he doesn't get to say anything about it. Take a lover, CWYWF, take two. There are tons of men out there in sexless marriages that they don't want to end because they love their wives or they love their kids or they can't be bothered or all of the above. Get your ass online and find one or two. If your husband is against an open marriage in principle—if he insists that you remain "monogamous" to him—tell him what he wants to hear and fuck other men regardless.
My response after the jump...
Unless there are just two guys at your college—your ex and this dude with the Go Fuck Someone Else card—I would urge you to fuck someone else. This scenario has drama written all over it. Your ex will be pissed at you for fucking his friend, he'll be pissed at his friend for fucking you, the friend's girlfriend will be pissed at you for fucking her boyfriend—GFSE card or no GFSE card. Who needs that kind of grief? Find a hot student, RA, TA, or prof who isn't in your circle and fuck him instead.
My response after the jump...
Wear whatever you like, identify however you like, and refuse to engage with idiots who think they have a right to critique, dictate, or overrule your gender identity.
For the sake of urgency/brevity/wit: Be angry! Don't grovel! DTMFA!
For the sake of persuasiveness...
If your "great" boyfriend makes you feel undesirable, depressed, frustrated, lonely, and suicidal... you're better off alone. Yes, five years is a long of time and, sure, your kids might love this guy (when they get to see him), but 1. he makes you miserable and 2. he's made it clear that he's never going to move to the city where you live. You're not his priority, NOW, and it's time to scratch him off your list of priorities, too.
But! Five years! Long time! Massive investment! Sorry, NOW, but longevity is a terrible reason to stay in a bad relationship. Throwing good years after bad makes about as much sense as throwing good money after bad. At some point you have to decide to cut your losses and move on.
As for your Instagram account... how did your boyfriend find out about it? You only had 15 followers, so it wasn't your popularity that spoiled your privacy. Did you decide to tell him about it? That may have been a mistake—no, wait. These questions are entirely beside the point. Or points, plural. Point one: He's an asshole who makes you feel miserable and it's time to DTMFA. (And if telling him about your Instagram account helped you see it was time to DTMFA, then it wasn't a mistake to tell him about it.) Point two: You're allowed to have a sexy, artsy, private Instagram account. You're allowed to have a zone of sexual and erotic autonomy. Getting a few compliments from strangers ≠ betrayal, NOW, unless this account violated an explicit agreement between you and your boyfriend. But if you didn't swear never to have dirty Instagram account, you did nothing wrong. Even if it did violate an explicit agreement—even if you were in the wrong—you still need break up with this guy. Because he makes you feel bad. Because he's not there for you. Because he never will be.
And here's a bonus random thought: I'll bet he's got his own secrets—things he's doing that you don't know about while you're apart for months at a time—and his overreaction to your sexy little Instagram account is a fucking cliche.
If he hasn't arrived yet, tell him not to come. If he's already there, let this trip be his last—and feel free to dump him via text after he goes home, NOW, to avoid additional drama. And if you find yourself hesitating, NOW, just remember how good your artsy, sexy, private Instagram made you feel. You deserve to feel like that IRL, NOW, and you can feel that way with a real, live human being to be named later. A guy who loves and appreciates you! A guy who understands and even enjoys your mild exhibitionistic streak! And lives nearby! And likes your kids! And isn't an asshole!
 The world's best dirty little film festival WANTS YOU! For details on making and submitting a film for HUMP! go here!

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
Your boyfriend is essentially forcing you to pick between him or masturbation, and the choice is obvious: Masturbation is a pleasurable friend that doesn't judge you or shame you, and your boyfriend is an unpleasant, sex-negative, controlling, judgmental scold.
DTMFA.
Then after you've enjoyed a few dozen celebratory guilt-free orgasms, MOS, ask yourself why you wasted even two minutes of your precious pansexual time on a guy like him, i.e., someone with whom you're clearly not sexually compatible. You're pansexual! Somewhat sexually experienced! You masturbate! You enjoy porn! I could understand you dating a guy who was a virgin and wanted to remain sexually inactive for now—for religious reasons or otherwise—but dating someone you had to talk out of seeing you as the spawn of Satan? Dating someone you have to lie to about something as common and healthy as masturbation? Not worth it, MOS, not in the short run, not in the long run. You want to be with someone who likes you and wants to be with you, and this boy doesn't like you. Why on earth do you like him?
Finally: I hope that parenthetical in your second paragraph was meant sarcastically. But just in case: Being sexually active does not make you "impure." I think you know that, MOS, but I want you to get out of this relationship while you still believe it.
My response after the jump...
If you were my boyfriend, RING, and you told me—right after I had defeated you in a rimming contest—that you would marry me if you lost a coin toss, but not because marriage mattered to me, I would never rim your ass again. Because if my feelings, however contaminated they were by Catholicism, mattered less to you than a coin toss, well, then your ass would have to learn to eat itself.
Maybe it will help if you look at it this way: You've already lost the coin toss. You fell in love with a woman who wants to spend her life with you, and you want to spend the rest of yours with her. And the woman you want to spend the rest of your life rimming wants to marry the man she spends her life rimming. Since you would be willing to marry her if you lost a coin toss, RING, then clearly marriage isn't something you couldn't bring yourself to do. That means you're the one who should compromise.
My response after the jump...
So your regular third with the big cock is nice, open-minded, and STI-free. Sounds great, CREAMPIE, but how can you be certain about the STI-free part when you see him only three times a year? Unless he's abstinent the rest of the year, or unless you test before each of your threesomes, there's some risk here.
You also describe your regular third as "respectful," and that's great. We all deserve respectful sex partners. You do, CREAMPIE, your wife does—and so does your regular third. But referring to your regular third as BBC, or "big black cock," isn't respectful. It's dehumanizing. Now, his big black cock brought you all together, of course, and it's fine to be attracted to others for particular physical attributes. It's also fine to explore racially charged fantasies so long as everyone is up for it and no one feels disrespected or dehumanized. But since this big black cock is attached to a fun and trustworthy guy who you enjoy spending time with (and cleaning up after), maybe you could refer to him as your ABC ("awesome black chum") instead of as your BBC? Just, you know, to show some respect for him as a person. Which is what he is.
Anyway, CREAMPIE, as for your problem: A man's body releases the hormone prolactin when he comes. That particular hormone makes a man sleepy, it makes his boner deflate, and it temporarily renders him indifferent to and/or repulsed by sex. So something that sounded hot right before you came—eating your own come out of the wife's pussy—is going to be much less appealing right after you come.
It's a snatch-22, CREAMPIE, and there's no fix.
My response after the jump...
When someone says, "That's so gay," but means, "That's so stupid," they're being homophobic. Obviously. But a straight guy who says he's gay for musicals isn't saying he's stupid for them, TCJ, he's saying, "I love something that many gay men are passionate about—and I'm not talking about cock." Not all gay men are passionate about musical theater, of course, just as not all straight men are into football. But a man with a passion for musical theater is likelier to be gay; if not, he'll at least be comfortable around gay people. I've heard gay guys who avidly follow the NFL describe themselves as straight for football. Likewise, a man with a passion for football is likelier to be straight.
You saying, "I'm gay for musical theater," or a gay guy saying, "I'm straight for football," amounts to a humorous acknowledgment that the majority of people interested in musicals or football are gay or straight, respectively. In neither case is it an insult or a put-down. But while I think you can continue to say that you're gay for musicals, TCJ, some gay men (or some of our more annoying "allies") may take offense. You don't have to pay attention to those people—they're just gay for taking offense.
My response after the jump...
First answer: technically, yes. But a case could be made that you're reusing and recycling. If there were a Green Building Certification program for kinks, SNIFF, yours would qualify.
Second answer: Chester the Molester was a comic strip about a guy, Chester, "who was interested in sexually molesting women and prepubescent girls," says my old friend Wikipedia. This vile comic strip, which ran in Hustler (of course), made child rape look like harmless and hilarious fun. Dwaine Tinsley, the creator of the strip, wound up going to prison for molesting his daughter—I'm guessing she would argue that child rape was neither harmless nor hilarious.
Since you are not interested in prepubescent boys, SNIFF, I don't think you're a pervert in the Chester the Molester mold. But a case could be made that your actions have a whiff of the nonconsensual about them—your coworkers would most likely object to how you're reusing and recycling their abandoned underpants—and you should probably knock it off. There are plenty of guys selling their used underwear and jocks online, from college athletes to porn stars, and if you work at a place with a private gym, SNIFF, you can presumably afford to buy a few pairs.
P.S. Just remember, Dan, that if by some off chance he gets to be prez, I slept with him first!
As I read your letter, FCC, I was thinking... yeah, you slept with/beside Marco Rubio. Am I supposed to take your word for that? And then I scrolled all the way down and...
...you have proof.
So, hey, you shared a flight with a sleeping Marco Rubio. But before I answer your question—should you have engaged with him?—let's review my rules for flying. There are only three...
1. Shut the fuck up.
2. Close the fucking window shade.
3. Shut the fuck up.
Introductions are clearly forbidden by rules number one and three. There's no need or excuse for introductions after you're seated on an airplane. (If the person sitting next to the window doesn't know to tap, step over, and excuse themselves, FCC, they're too stupid to find their way on an airplane in the first place.) Introductions on airplanes accomplish just one thing: The fill the person to whom you've just introduced yourself with dread. Someone subjected to an introduction will spend the rest of the flight worrying about whether they've just sat down next to most feared people in the skies after terrorists and infants: talkers. And, I'm sorry, but it doesn't matter if the introducer shuts up after he makes an unnecessary and unwelcome introduction. Because someone who talked to you on a flight—someone who broke rules number one and three before the plane even took off—could at any moment start talking to you again. The introducer thereby forces the introducee to spend the rest of the flight worrying that even a stray moment of eye contact could suck them into a conversation about golf or grandchildren or CrossFit.
The only exception to rules number one and three? When you've been seated next to Marco Rubio.
Marco Rubio, like everyone else running for president, is constantly going on about what he's hearing from "average, ordinary Americans" as he travels back and forth between Iowa and New Hampshire, as he strolls down the hall from the greenroom of The O'Reilly Factor ("The No Spin Zone") to the greenroom of Fox and Friends ("The So Dim Zone"), and as his tongue flits from Charles Koch's asshole to David Koch's asshole and back again. If Rubio is going to talk about chance encounters with "average, ordinary Americans," then average, ordinary Americans who haven't been vetted by the Rubio campaign for some bogus "town hall" can go ahead and seize the opportunity of, say, a chance encounter with Rubio (or Bush or Cruz or Paul or whoever) on a long flight, at a cozy urinal, or in a funky sex dungeon in Berlin.
So in answer to your question, FCC: Yes, I think you should've engaged with Rubio. You could've told him that's he wrong about climate change and that his denialism is dangerous (Miami is sinking under the waves!); you could've told him that his jingoistic opposition to reestablishing diplomatic relations with Cuba was both stupid and "out of step with the mainstream, as they say (Americans back it by wide margins); and you could've told him that his retrograde/bigoted/indefensible position on marriage equality isn't exactly forward thinking (Rubio can't represent a "new generation" while pandering to the bigotry and fear of the old, fearful, and blessedly not immortal generation of GOP voters)
And most importantly, you should've challenged him on his position on abortion.
At the first GOP debate Rubio said he opposed abortion even in the cases of rape and incest. (Rubio pissily denied ever having supported an exceptions for rape an incest—despite having cosponsored an abortion ban that included exceptions for rape and incest—and Rubio also didn't object when Scott Walker said that he would "let a mother die" before allowing her to have an abortion.) Here's the question you could've put to Rubio (it's the question I'll put to him if get the chance): "You have two daughters, Sen. Rubio. If one of your daughters was raped and impregnated, would you deny her an abortion and force her to carry her rapist's baby to term? If one of your daughters needed an abortion to save her life, would you, like Scott Walker, stand by and let your own daughter die?"
If you had asked that question in a loud enough tone of voice, FCC, a mini-town-hall meeting would've instantly broken out in the first class compartment of your Miami-LAX flight. And if you or another passenger had the good sense to film Rubio's response, FCC, you would've made national news instead of just making the SLLOTD.
And finally, dear readers, I recognize the irony here: Marco Rubio followed all the rules on that flight: Rubio shut the fuck up, Rubio closed his window shade, Rubio shut the fuck up. But the rules don't apply to an average, ordinary American who find himself seated next to someone who's running for president.
P.S. Two pieces of recommended reading...
1. Open: Love, Sex and Life in an Open Marriage by Jenny Block.
2. And this informative interview with poly activist and frequent Savage Lovecast guest Diana Adams.
There's a lot more out there you could read—I'm sure that the commenters here on Slog will have some great suggestions—but a lot of it is about how to open your marriage, SM, and you're not interested in that. And I don't think this isn't something you really need to do a whole lot of homework about. Love and accept your son, respect his choices, don't blame his wife, be kind to any partners they wind up introducing you to. It's actually pretty simple.
I'm running out the door to go be on the teevee, ARMS, so this is going to have to be quick.
You can hold on to those fond memories, kiddo, without demanding face-to-face time from your ex-girlfriend. And the ex you admit to treating badly and basically driving off may be less interested in salvaging a friendship than you are. But I don't think it would be out of bounds for you to send your ex-girlfriend a letter* that makes three basic points...
• You were a dick to her and you feel bad about that. You wish you'd had the decency and courage to end things earlier, and more cleanly, instead of allowing it drag out. Instead of going the coward's route, ARMS, and making yourself completely intolerable so that she would dump you. Because that made things toxic at the end—wait, no passive voice: You made things toxic at the end. Take responsibility for "absolute prick" and treating her "like shit" and offer an unqualified apology, i.e. omit the shit about catering to her needs while neglecting your own.
• You are in a much better place emotionally—you're happier now—and you sincerely hope she's happier too.
• You wish her well and if circumstances should conspire to bring both together at the same time and in the same place, you hope you can be friends—or, if not friends, then at least friendly.
Close your short letter with a P.S. inviting her to follow you on Facebook or Twitter or Instagram—pick your preferred social media poison—if she should ever care to know what you're up to these days, ARMS, while pledging not follow her on any social media platforms unless she follows you first and invites you to follow her back. Because if she needs you out of her life permanently, ARMS, you will respect her wishes.
* Unless there was violence toward the end, ARMS, or a restraining order or a clear and explicit demand to never, ever hear from your ass again—in which case, ARMS, a letter would be out of bounds.
Here's how the convo went when I came out to my mom:
Me (after standing outside her bedroom door for an hour working up the courage): "Mom, I'm... gay."
Mom (after a short, excruciating pause): "Did you hear the one about the two gay guys who attacked a woman in Lincoln Park? One held her down while the other did her hair." 
And here's how the convo went when I came out to my biggest big brother:
Me (after hemming and hawing for at least a half an hour): "Billy, I'm... gay." 
Brother: "Are you sure?"
Not exactly portraits of "graceful support," huh?
One could argue that my mother and brother each said the wrong thing then I came out to them—although people can and do say far worse things when their children and siblings come out to them—but both my late mother and beery brother have been incredibly supportive. I honestly don't think I would've survived as an out gay teenager in Chicago in 19Fucking82 without their love and support. And it would've been incredibly churlish of me, to say nothing of colossally self-defeating, to have held against them the very first things that fell out of their mouths when I came out. (Hell, my mom's first, panicked reaction—telling her teenage son a mildly homophobic joke immediately after he came out to her—became a story we shared over and over and laughed about together for years. Fuck, we were laughing about it together later that same week.)
Here's something I want you to relay to your early-twenty-something cousin from me: If you're sulking about what your cousin said, stop. ("I know!" is a really common reaction and, again, there are far worse reactions.) And it has been my experience over the last few decades of being out that not everyone who says the right thing at first turns out to be the most loving and supportive person in the long run and vice-versa. You will find that some of the people who say all the right things wind doing all the wrong things and some of the people say all the wrong things wind up doing (and eventually saying) all the right things. There's no way of predicting who will do right by you until some time has passed.
Back to you, WORST: If your cousin is actually holding your initial reaction against you—if you're stressing about this non-issue because he's actually giving you grief about it—then your cousin may be one of those new-model queers who would rather have a boo-boo than an ally. And that's his problem, WORST, not yours. But if your cousin isn't stressing about this, if he laughed or shrugged it off and you're the one who's fixated on IKnowGate for some reason, stop.
And now, because it seems relevant and because I love this video...

That has to be the funniest "I know!" on the Internet.
Are we supposed to take your word for that, Anonymous, or are you sending photographic evidence in a followup email?


Make a five-minute-max film for HUMP!, America's best dirty little film festival! The call for submissions is here!
Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
I'm so sorry you're going through this. 
I have some advice for you, TAMHISFB, but first I'm going to share something from my past with you.
Once, a long time ago, I threw a glass at my husband. We were fighting. I honestly don't remember what about, TAMHISFB, and what the fight was about isn't important and it wouldn't excuse my behavior that night. I did it in a moment of anger, I'm not proud of it, and I've never written about it before. The glass didn't hit Terry. I didn't throw it straight at him, I wasn't trying to hit him, but that's irrelevant because in the moment he couldn't know that I didn't intend to hit him and the glass could've hit him (and possibly injured him) anyway. That was 18 years ago and I've never done anything like that ever again.
I'm not trying to excuse what your dad did. What your dad did was wrong. Some commenters will immediately (and needlessly) point out that what your mom did was wrong. That may be true—or it may not be true (there are, as I've written, cases where cheating can be justified, although we don't know if your mom's case was one)—but what your dad did was wronger. Throwing someone around in anger can never be justified. All I'm suggesting, based on my own personal experience, is that it's possible your dad will never, ever do anything like this to your mother or anyone else ever again. (It's also possible that the hole in the wall was created not by your mom's head being slammed into it, TAMHISFB, but by that heavy glass ornament being thrown across the room.) 
As for what to do about your parents...
Insist they talk with you about this. They have to talk with you about it—together and separately. And you have leverage: What you witnessed was a crime and reporting it is still an option. Go to each your parents separately and tell them—one adult to another—that you can't pretend not to have witnessed what you damn well did witness. Explain to them that you need certain assurances from them both. Is your mother safe? (This is a question you put to them together and to your mother alone.) Are your siblings safe? (Ditto.) What steps are they taking to work through this? Are they in counseling? Is your dad getting help he needs to control his anger? (Has your dad watched Esther Perel's "Rethinking Infidelity" TEDTalk? Insist that he does.) Does your mom have the support she needs? How exactly was that hole knocked into the wall? These conversations aren't about buying your silence. They're about holding your dad accountable and fulfilling your adult responsibilities to your mother, yourself, and your siblings.
As for forgiveness...
What your dad did was wrong. I'm with you. You will never see him in the same way again. Your dad will never see your mother in the same way again, TAMHISFB, and your mother will never see your father in the same way again. Still. I don't think you should, in the immediate wake of this traumatic experience, forever rule out forgiveness. Forgiveness would be an easy thing if it was always about small stuff—small infractions, small violations, small misunderstandings. Sometimes, though, forgiveness is about big stuff and that's when it's a hard thing and, consequently, that's when it's a meaningful and potentially transformative thing.
Forgiveness in an instance like this will come slowly and it must come with conditions attached—getting help (tell them you want proof that they're in counseling), making amends, demonstrating growth—because without those conditions it wouldn't be forgiveness, TAMHISFB, it would be enabling. And domestic violence obviously isn't something you, me, or any sane person would ever want to enable. But ruling out forgiveness now, in your anger, may prevent you from forgiving your father in the future—not when he wants you to forgive him, TAMHISFB, and not when your mom wants you to forgive him, but when you want to forgive him.
Now I'm going to turn you over to the commenters here on Slog—who can be amazingly helpful, insightful, and compassionate (please ignore the handful who are helpless, dense, and trolly). But before I turn it over to the them, TAMHISFB, I'm gonna give you the number for the National Domestic Violence Hotline: 800-799-SAFE. There's lots of great and helpful information at their website also: thehotline.org.
Good luck—and, yes, the Ashley Madison hack is such fucking bullshit.
I'm not convinced that loving yourself more will result in your finding these young white straightish jocks (YWSJ) any less attractive, FEW, but you go ahead and love yourself more anyway.
A good place to start: the language you use to talk about your interactions with YWSJs: they're not just letting you have sex with them, they're getting to have sex with you; you feel great when you're in their bodies, they feel great when you're in their bodies; you're entering their bedrooms and presumably their buttholes, you're not entering their "realms." (They're gay dudes just like you, FEW, not monarch. Their buttholes aren't wardrobes, their rectums aren't Narnia.)
As for learning to find other kinds of guys attractive: sleep with other guys, date other guys, see if anything/anyone clicks. I know that when I was young—when I was just out—I was only attracted to one very particular type of guy. Those guys were scarce and the ones I could find weren't interested in me (the hair may have had something to do with it), FEW, so I hooked up with and dated other types guys and—wonder of wonders, miracle of miracles—my spectrum of attraction broadened quickly and considerably. (I like to think I was attracted to other types of guys all along, FEW, I just didn't realize it.) 
But I was a teenager then, FEW, and you're a grown ass man now. The bullshit gay beauty ideal and/or your longing for the approval/butts of those cruel high school jocks and/or your failure to explore other types over the last 25 years may have carved a groove in you that's too deep to overcome. So perhaps a workaround instead? Find a non-YWSJ guy who's into the same type you are—someone you click with emotionally and intellectually, someone who is looking for a serious-but-non-monogamous commitment—and spit roast a YWSJ together on your wedding night.
There are lots of gay men out there in loving, committed, successful relationships whose partners aren't their physical ideals. But since gay men are much less hung up on monogamy, FEW, many of these men are able to have their loving, committed, successful relationships and the occasional hookup with the twink/bear/otter/daddy/Dom/sub/YWSJ/whatever of their dreams. (And people lucky enough to wind up with their physical ideals? One day they'll find themselves with partners who aren't their physical ideals—if their relationships last long enough.)
Why did he choose not to tell you? Read your letter—the snooping, the confrontations, the interrogations. It's a wonder he tells you anything at all. 
And all of this mishigas over what? Years ago, before you were married, before you were engaged, before he even proposed to you... your husband briefly flirted with another woman. And he flirted with her the way most people flirt today: text messages and sext messages. But when he realized that you were the one he wanted, when he decided that you were the .64 he could round up to The One, he knocked it the fuck off. He stopped flirting with this other woman, he stopped sexting with her, and committed himself to you. (I have no doubt that you scoured his phone and his email and found nothing else that was the least bit incriminating—no plans to move from sexting to sexing, no other women, no other nothin'.) Yes, he failed to delate the pics. (Maybe he forgot, maybe he liked them‚ maybe they reminded him that, yes, he was desirable and that affirmation made him feel better about himself.) And yes, he failed to punish this woman, a woman who didn't do anything wrong, by treating her like shit and driving her off after he ended the flirtation and proposed to you. So he committed the awful and unforgivable sin of—gasp—remaining cordial.
Here are my thoughts on your situation: 
1. He should be forgiven—and you should ask his forgiveness for snooping.
2. You can start by apologizing to him for snooping and end by growing the fuck up.
3. I think it's perfectly understandable—lots of people have private little rumspringas when they're making up their minds about whether to commit to someone for life; it's not uncommon for people to say (and sext) things to people they don't know well because the stakes are so much lower—and you have got to stop raking him over the coals about shit that went down before you were even engaged. Stuff it down the memory hole.
4. I do not think this was cheating. It was flirting, and it may have crossed a line (presumably you two were exclusive before you got engaged and he knew you wouldn't smile on this), but if your marriage can't weather a big nothing burger like this, BRIDE, it's unlikely to survive the kinds of conflicts, traumas, and, yes, betrayals that sooner or later touch every marriage. (Google "Ashley Madison" and think about how much worse it could be.) Forgiving him for this—really forgiving him, which means dropping it (no more interrogations!)—will be good practice (you'll probably have to forgive him for something else at some point in the future) and a good example (he'll probably have to forgive you for something at some point).
I think you should stay with him. I'm not sure he should stay with you.
I think it's possible for a married person in a closed relationship—or a long-partnered person in the same—to innocently flirt with a friend, a coworker, or a stranger. Ideally the married/partnered person plows the erotic charge they derived from that flirtation into their primary partner when they get home. I would go so far as to say that it's advisable for married/long-partnered persons to allow for flirtation with others, so long as its occasional and innocent, because the ego boost of being found attractive by someone who isn't required to find you attractive can redound to the benefit of both spouses/partners and make a marriage/relationship stronger.
But the operative word here is "innocent." It's one thing to flirt with someone—a vague and general flirtation, a vague and general acknowledgement of mutual attraction—but it's another to suss someone out in detail. When your husband asked his friend whether she found men in women's underwear attractive he crossed the line from innocent flirtation to actionable intelligence. Maybe he just wanted to privately enjoy a very specific masturbatory fantasy featuring his 22-year-old coworker and the stuff he likes best—wearing women's underwear—but the fact that he immediately agreed it was gross when she shot him down is a bad sign. It would be less concerning if after she said "gross!" he said something like, "Actually, my wife and I get into." That would sound like flirty friends swapping details about their sex lives. His immediate and, yes, turdish disavowal of his thing for women's underwear, however, leads me to believe that at the very least he wanted to preserve the potential for some IRL encounter down the road. He didn't want her to rule him out as a potential sex partner, he didn't want to disqualify himself.
Confront away, HNACPL, with my blessing.
You're welcome, ML—and here's hoping your levelheaded reaction to the news that your husband had an account on Ashley Madison isn't a complete anomaly.
My response after the jump...
Was your boyfriend having cybersex with an ex-girlfriend? Or did it only feel like he was? I would make a distinction, SAD, because while all porn constitutes a betrayal of the terms of your relationship, interacting with a stranger and, very likely, a professional online shouldn't feel quite so threatening.
Backing way the hell up: Your boyfriend shouldn't have lied to you, SAD, but you shouldn't have been so naive as to believe him. If you can't bring yourself to forgive him for lying—if you can't put yourself in his shoes and try to understand why he might lie about this (shame, fear, a desire to spare your feelings)—then this relationship is doomed. End it and find a new boyfriend. But when your next boyfriend tells you he doesn't watch porn, you're going to look at him and say, "Suuuuuure, you don't."
Ask your new boyfriend to be discreet and limit his porn consumption to an extent where you're unlikely to uncover any evidence of it, as porn upsets you. If your new boyfriend manages to do that for you, SAD, if he's considerate enough to cover his tracks, you should be considerate enough to turn a blind eye on those rare occasions when you do stumble over evidence that your new boyfriend watches porn—just like your old boyfriend did and all your future boyfriends will.
Remember, OTF, there is no "the one." There's no perfect person, no perfect person for you, no perfect match, no perfect fit, no perfect lid for your perfect pot, etc. You'll meet a .64 or two if you're lucky—if you're really lucky you might even meet a .72—and it's your job to round that motherfucker up to one. It's easy to convince ourselves early in a relationship that we've stumbled over a .92 or a .97 or even a 1.00, i.e. someone who it's either easy to round up or who doesn't require rounding up, but a few years in—no later than six years in—we can clearly see those .92s for the .64s they are and always were.  
So feeling less sure about him being "The One" isn't proof that he isn't "The One," OTF, because he never was "The One." (Is this making sense?) You're just seeing him for the .64 he always was and now you have to decide whether you're gonna spend the rest of your life rounding that motherfucker up.
Tell him what you're feeling. He may be feeling the same way, OTF, but even if he's not... tossing your of ambiguity and doubt on the table will force you two to have a different sort of conversation about your relationship. Up to now all of your conversations—with each other, with counselors, with your thirds—have been grounded in/framed by this question: How do we make this work? Telling him that you're feeling some ambiguity and doubt about your future together—telling him that you're not sure you have a future together—is going to force you two to have a conversation grounded in/framed by a very different question: Should we make this work?
If being with you means not having sex with men ever again—because you're not up for a lifetime of threesomes and you don't want him hooking up with guys on the side (or is that something you would allow?)—does he want to be with you? 
If being with him means marriage and children—if he wins both those fights—do you want to be with him? 
If being with you means forgoing marriage and children—if you win both those fights—does he want to be with you?
If being with him means having your professional ambitions constantly undermined—if the guilting you about getting your Ph.D. was merely the prologue—do you want to be with him?
There are lots of questions you two need to ask and answer—openly and honestly—as you make up your minds about whether you're going keep rounding each other up. Good luck.
I have a pretty good idea what your friend should say to her daughter, ADCF, but how she says it depends on the her daughter's unique sensibility.
If her daughter has a uniquely prim sensibility: "If being married to women who won't sleep with them turned straight men gay, half the men in the America would be gay—and half the men in America aren't gay, honey, not even close. The fact is this: your dad is gay, he's always been gay, but for a long time he wasn't able admit it to himself or to anyone else. Now he's out, and that's a good thing, but for some reason he feels a need to pin the 'blame' for his sexuality on someone. And it looks like he picked me. I'm not saying there's something blameworthy about being gay. There isn't. There is, however, something deeply messed up about the way your father refuses to take responsibility for who he is. What he's doing to you is completely unfair and kind of pitiful when you think about it. Just tune it out."
If her daughter had a uniquely ribald sensibility: "Your dad is fucking nuts. Straight men don't start sucking cocks just because their wives won't fuck them. The fact is your father was never interested in having sex with me and now I know why. Now we all know why. Gay adults stay in the closet for just one reason: they're afraid of being rejected by the people closest to them. Your dad is out now, and that's a great, but there's still one person he fears being rejected by, honey, and that person is you. So he tells you this is all my fault because he doesn't want you to be angry with him for the drama and chaos and mentee. He want you to be angry with me. The whole thing is just sad."
Your friend can memorize one or the other or both of the above speeches and deliver them to her daughter. Your friend can also take comfort in the knowledge that teenagers, particularly teenage girls, are acutely sensitive to adult hypocrisy and highly unlikely to take anything their fathers tell them at face value. Unless this kid is profoundly dim or overly trusting or both, ADCF, she already knows her father's is packed full of shit.
There are only two reasons why your boyfriend would be making jokes about your bedwetting problem: he is trying to be nice (he mistakenly believes these jokes put you at ease; he’s trying to make you feel less self-conscious, not more; he wants to make the bedwetting seem like no big deal, i.e. something you two can laugh off together) or your boyfriend is a giant asshole (he knows you’re sensitive about it and makes these jokes anyway because HE’S AN ASSHOLE; he makes jokes expressly to demean you because HE’S AN ASSHOLE; he is intentionally shredding your self-esteem so that 1. you'll think that no one else would ever want you and 2. you'll settle for this guy even thought HE'S AN ASSHOLE).
There’s just one way to figure out whether he’s a nice doofus who's accidentally hurting you or an giant asshole who actually does mean to hurt you: USE YOUR WORDS. Tell him the jokes hurt your feelings—no smile, no ambiguity, no gloss—and then see what happens. If he knocks it off, WET, he was a nice doofus and the relationship may be salvageable. If he keeps it up, if the jokes don’t stop, he’s a giant asshole and he actually does mean to hurt you and the relationship isn’t worth salvaging. (Please bear this in mind: an asshole might claim to be a nice doofus—he’ll tell you he was just trying to make you feel better about the bedwetting thing with humor—but if the jokes don’t stop… he’s not a nice doofus. He’s an giant asshole.)
The reason you’re afraid to say something is that don’t want to lose him. But you need to flip that on its head: If your boyfriend is a giant asshole—even if he's just medium asshole—you should be in a big fucking hurry to lose him. Say something.
Because he's an asshole.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Let's embrace the worst-case scenario: your husband can't and won't change. Your husband continues to cheat on you—just as he once cheated with you—despite the therapy and the "I'm a victim of a cruel and terrible sex addiction!" routine and the desire, perhaps sincere, to save his (current) marriage. What are your options?
You can divorce him or you can Duchess of Devonshire him:
Her marriage lasted 62 years, surviving Andrew’s long bout with alcoholism, as well as his discreet dalliances. “It was absolutely fixed that we shouldn’t divorce or get rid of each other in any way,” the duchess said. “It’s completely different to Americans, who all divorce each other the whole time. Such a bore for everyone, having to say who’s going to have the dogs, who’s going to have the photograph books.” Andrew was great company, she said, which went a long way, and he shared his wife’s facility for drawing humor from challenging situations.
I love that quote—I've worked into columns, I've linked to it into countless SLLOTDs, I even used it in my last book. Now I'm offering it to you, WITW. If you stay with husband you will, like the Duchess of Devonshire, have to put up with your spouse's philandering. (And he'll have to put up with yours—you're in an open marriage, WITW, and always have been. And now you know it.) If you can't put up with a husband who sleeps around—if that's not a price you're willing to pay to be with a man who is an otherwise kind, caring, stable, smart, etc., spouse—then you should absolutely divorce him now.
One caveat: he's cheated on you throughout your marriage and, by your own account, your marriage has been pretty good, he's been a pretty good husband, the cheating was discreet enough that you were able to suspend your disbelief and pretend that the man you married wasn't actually the man you married. But bringing that 23yo into your house, encouraging her to pretend to be your friend, allowing her to hold your child—that adds a layer of insult to the injury that most people (myself included) would have hard time getting past. But if you can get past it... if you stay married... turning a blind eye to your husband's future dalliances would be less exhausting than policing the whereabouts of his penis for the next 30 years.
I'm torn between urging you and your girlfriend to break the fuck up and get the fuck away from each other—any relationship that generates this much drama is doomed—and urging you to stay together if only to spare the innocents you'll both wind up dating after the curtain comes down on this shitshow.
A few quick points: You moved out, you blocked her on Facebook, you're not speaking—this isn't a break, it's a breakup. Maybe your on-a-break/soon-to-be-ex-girlfriend (OABSTBEG) shouldn't have brought that dude back to the house while you're still paying part of the rent (per her agreement), OAB, but you have absolutely no right to tell your OABSTBEG who she can fuck and where she can fuck him. (Your shit-stirring roommate sounds like a real winner.) If you don't want your OABSTBEG moving your stuff around the house, get your goddam stuff out of that house. If it bothers you that you're still paying rent while your OABSTBEG fucks some other dude in said house, stop paying rent. (Break the lease or sublet the whole place or sublet your part of the place; presumably a bed will fit in the room you had been using as an office.) And if it bothers you that your OABSTBEG is having sex with some other guy in front of the bedroom set you helped to pay for, ask your OABSTBEG to buy you out of your half of the bedroom set or—better yet—let her have the nightstand and the dresser and the chifferobe as lovely parting gifts.
And in answer to your questions:
1. Yes, you're doing the right thing by cutting her off. Not because the blame for this mess is all hers, OAB, but because you two are toxic together. Maybe you two can be friends one day—but you both have a lot of growing the fuck up to do before that day comes.
2. I think you're both at fault, OAB, but if being extremely angry helps you to end this thing, by all means wallow in your anger—just know that a lot of your anger is misplaced.
3. I don't know if your OABSTBEG was attempting to take advantage of you and your rent money or your emotional support, OAB, but she was definitely playing head games. Threatening to crash her car into a tree if you didn't take her call was emotionally manipulative/abusive; unilaterally reopening your relationship was a shitty thing to do; lying to you about where she was and what/who she was doing amounted to her slamming her hand down on the relationship self-destruct button. Doing everything you can to get someone to end a relationship and then freaking out when they actually move to end it—which is what your OABSTBEG was doing—is equal parts manipulation, aggravation, and cliché.
Finally, OAB, it is perfectly acceptable for someone to get on with her life—to do whatever she feels like doing—after a break up. That's exactly what people are supposed to do after a breakup. (It's also what people do when they're "on a break.") Your ex-girlfriend owes you nothing, she doesn't answer to you (or your shitty roommates!), and she doesn't owe you a flawless performance in the role of ex-girlfriend as scripted by you. And the only reason a guy would define "my ex having sex in her own bed, in her own room, with a person of her choosing" as an unforgivable, post-relationship-friendship-precluding betrayal is if that guy really wasn't interested in being friends with his ex in the first place. (You didn't like it when she played games, OAB, so don't play games yourself. Don't want to be her friend? Then don't be her friend. You don't have to justify it by pointing to the brutal way in which she violated the innocence of your bedroom set.)
This relationship generated plenty of drama while it was going on. There's no need to generate drama now that it's over... unless it was drama that you two loved, not each other. If that's the case, OAB, you should take each other back and stay together forever.
...and now I'm wondering if I have to go in to work today. I mean, is it true? Or did this person not flip through the paper and find my column (which used to be on the inside of the back page) in its new home (somewhere in the middle of the paper)?
Also, too: threatening to cease purchasing a free publication isn't a great negotiating strategy.
Your High Times source was right in saying that some people use MJ to self-medicate, and that it's harmless for many people—but he was entirely wrong in saying it's harmless for everyone, and it's actually incredibly dangerous and self-defeating to treat mental health issues (particularly bipolar, anxiety, and depression) with MJ, as it messes with natural hormone production, particularly dopamine and likely seratonin. People can get addicted. And like other drugs of abuse (including alcohol), withdrawal has real symptoms.
Anyway, her boyfriend's symptoms sound quite common. He might not be an asshole (though, of course, he might)—he might just be withdrawing every time he runs out of weed. What he needs to do is get clean—fully clean—either by significantly reducing his use or by completely abstaining until his head clears. That's never an excuse to treat your loved ones poorly, but I hope he finds his way.
Best, and thank you for all that you've written,
A.
Thanks for writing, A, and in fairness to my source at High Times—and in fairness to me—neither of us said that marijuana couldn't be abused or that its use was in all cases perfectly benign. I don't know what Dan Skye's position is on the addictiveness of marijuana, but I believe that people can become dependent on the drug in unhealthy ways; I also believe that pretty much any substance can be abused. I also know functional, happy, productive daily users of the drug... and I don't like to think of them as unclean any more than I like to think of my HIV+ friends as unclean.
Boy... it's shitty BF/GF week around here.
Okay, CATD, until my time machine comes online, there's not much I can do to help you. Without it, I can't stop you from selling your house to please a woman you've known for less than a year and I can't stop you from lavishing money and gifts on a 38-year-old who still lives at home with her parents... but who somehow managed to convince you that it's her ex who's the "deadbeat." And without a time machine, I can't prevent you from encouraging your daughter to form an emotional bond with a woman you've been dating for less than a year.
The only thing I can do for you, CATD, is this: I can encourage you to stop pining for this person—a woman who cashed a $300 check she made out to herself after making up her mind to dump you—and to resolve never to make this mistake this series of mistakes, or similar mistakes, ever again. And I can forbid you from introducing your daughter to girlfriends you've only just met and order you not to provide financial support for the online businesses of your new girlfriends.
And I can order you to go look in a mirror and repeat this until it sinks the fuck in: "I got conned by a charismatic user. The sex was great—the sex was amazing—but the rest of it was a lie. She didn't love me and, as it turns out, I didn't really love her. Because I didn't really know her. Until now."
You are going to walk away from the most beautiful girl you've ever dated, CATD, all the while thanking your lucky fucking stars that you didn't wind up married to this person. That would've made for a much worse mess.
And go get yourself an apartment.
I'm not buying your current girlfriend's rationalizations for her shitty, inconsiderate, game-play-y behavior, BLC.
Shitty GF #2 has managed to convince you that she's the victim here. She goes out her way to hurt you, she causes conflict and attempts sabotage things, but she only does that because she had her heart broken before you came along.
Yeah, no. Almost everyone has had their heart broken once or twice before their current BF/GF/SOPATGSF* came along. It's not excuse for intentionally causing conflict or choosing to sabotage a new relationship.
SGF2 has also managed to convince you that treating you like shit is proof that she really could love you and that you two really could have a future together—because SGF2 only attempts to sabotage things when they seem ideal, right? So your relationship is ideal, or it has the potential to be ideal, and everything could be great... if only poor, sad SGF2 could overcome her fears and just let you love her.
Yeah, no. That's bullshit. She's playing games, she's playing the victim, and she's playing you.
DTMFA.
Maybe it's time pressure... or performance anxiety induced by praise... but I'm blanking here. Your meeting, as I sit down to write this, is ninety minutes away. So I won't have time to think this through and I won't be able to take a second to reread/rethink my advice before posting to the blog... but fuck it... here we go...
I can't pick between options 1, 2, 3, or 4 with any certainty without first reading your boyfriend's mind, RNYHBISHT, and mind reading isn't one of my superpowers. But here's what I would've told you to do if your email arrived yesterday, RNYHBISHT:
Cancel the meeting. Text your boyfriend—text him so you don't go to pieces at the sound of his voice—and tell him you shouldn't have called and asked to meet. Then tell him what you told us: you love him, you think you're great together, you want to be with him. But if he doesn't know what he wants and he needs time and space to think about it, or if there's something he hasn't told you and he's gotta go on a vision quest to work up the courage to share it with you, RNYHBISHT, he should take the time, he can have his space, he can go vision questing. But he'll have to time/space/quest as a single person because you don't do holds. A relationship is either on or it's off. Emphasize—it's going to be a long text—that you're not asking for a lifetime commitment at eight months. All you're proposing suggesting is that you keep seeing each other with the understanding that it's a good relationship and it may last. (Or it may not. Just because you're crazy about him at eight months, RNYHBISHT, doesn't mean you'll be crazy about him at sixteen months. You could wind up dumping him.)
But your email didn't arrive yesterday, RNYHBISHT, it arrived ninety minutes ago. And canceling the meeting an hour before it's supposed to go down is gonna make you seem like the one who's playing games here. So here's what I'm going to advise you to do....
Go the meeting... and break up with him. Not because he's an asshole, not because he's done something terrible, but because limbo isn't for you. (It's not for Catholics anymore either.) Tell him you love him and tell him you think you're good together, RNYHBISHT, but don't tell him what he's feeling or thinking. Don't tell him that he thinks this is the best relationship he's ever been in even though he said that to you, RNYHBISHT. Because you can't read his mind either. Maybe he loves you so much it scared him and he needed three weeks off to recover from the shock. Or maybe he wanted to end it and he thought "taking a break" and then ending was the kinder way to pull the plug. You don't know what's up with him and you shouldn't pretend to.
Basically what I'm suggesting is that you go to the meeting and tell him what you're feeling—you're confused, you love him, but no limbo for you—without demanding any answers from him. Maybe he'll offer you an answer, maybe he won't, but don't go in expecting one.
You are not a whore, HAC, nor are you a cheater. You're a survivor—a woman who survived an abusive relationship.
My first bit of advice: stop thinking of your soon-to-be-ex-husband as a cuckold. He's not anything so benign as a fetishist. He's an abuser. He abused you emotionally and he abused you sexually. You might wanna spend some time on websites that list the traits of abusers, HAC, as it will help you see your soon-to-be-ex-husband for exactly who and what he is...
Wants to move too quickly into the relationship.
Pressuring you to have sex when you don’t want to or do things sexually you’re not comfortable with.
Withholding includes refusing to listen, refusing to communicate, and emotionally withdrawing as punishment.
Does your partner install spyware or other computer software to monitor your online activity?
There's plenty more where that came from—seriously, HAC, Google "warning signs that you're in an abusive relationship" and invest an hour reading the results.
Cuckolding is increasingly visible and, it seems, an increasingly mainstream kink—there's a story on it in Playboy this week—and while most of the writing out there amounts to Cuckolding 101 (informative, sex-positive, kink-positive), cuckolding can be an emotional minefield. I believe a man with cuckold fantasies has eroticizing a deep-seated fear (infidelity) in much the same way that a woman with rape fantasies has eroticized a deep-seated fear (rape, obviously). And while many readers have shared positive stories of their cuckolding experiences over the years, I've heard more than a few stories like yours—women who gave their husbands what they wanted, women who gave their husbands what they begged for, only to have their husbands turn on them, berate them, and slut-shame them.
Your husband didn't eroticize his fear of infidelity or his anxieties about his inadequacies—he weaponized them. And part of that weaponization—part of the abuse—was blabbing to everyone he could about the terrible things you supposedly did, aka "the things your husband asked you to do." You have nothing to lose by sharing your side of the story, HAC, including the story of how you were manipulated and abused by this man over a period of many years. He didn't hit with his fists, true, but not all abusers use their fists.
I'm glad you're in therapy, HAC, and I'm so sorry about what was done to you. As for the future...
Many people in the early, traumatic stages of divorce feel so damaged that they believe themselves to be incapable of ever having another relationship, casual or otherwise. But that's rarely the case, HAC. Give it time, give yourself time, stay in therapy, and you will be able to form new relationships. 
And I actually think it might be a good idea to start a blog, HAC. You could help other women whose boyfriends and husbands are turned on by cuckolding. Reading about your experiences might help other women determine what kind of man is asking to be indulged in this particular kink—a kinkster or an abuser?
If your fiancé won't take "not a lesbian" for an answer—to say nothing of great straight sex that just keeps getting better—I can't imagine anything I might say to him making a difference.
But there is something you can and should say to him, IGWS. The next time your fiancé asks/whines/insecures about the possibility that you're a deeply closeted lesbian, IGWS, blow the fuck up at him. In a controlled and strategic way, of course, and with your subsequent remarks already prepared and rehearsed. You could write your own speech or you can memorize the one I've written for you: "For fuck's sake, honey, I am fucking done reassuring you about this. I am not a lesbian. I'm a straightish woman, a slightly butchish woman, and I happen to be in love with you and your dick—that's highly unlesbianlike behavior, don't you think? I'm also sick of having to talk you off the same damn ledge three times a week. So I'm going to say this one more time: I am not a deeply closeted lesbian. From here on out, you're gonna have to reassure yourself on this point. Which means the next time you start feeling insecure about my sexuality, honey, you're going to reflect on all the head I've given you and engage in a little auto-reassurio."
The best reassurance that you're not a deeply closeted lesbian isn't the head you're giving him, of course, or the all the great straight sex. It's the passage of time. The longer you're together, the longer you go without coming out as a dyke, the more secure he can be that you are who you say you are. But the two of you are never get to that point—you won't experience the passage of serious time together—if his insecurities prompt you to dump his ass before or shortly after the wedding.
For those having trouble keeping track: 
Colleague A: Hooking up. Agreed to never tell anyone. Male. Friends. Almost went "towards something more real," but didn't (maybe because of Colleague B). 
Colleague B: Dated for a year. Fell in love. Broke up a year ago. Female. Might be in love with her again.
And for you, HR...
The as-of-this-writing population of Planet Earth: 7,492,344,008. The as-of-this-writing population of the United States: 325,818,391. The point being... you have casual sex and/or committed romantic relationship options other than colleagues A & B. There are billions of other people on the planet—and unless you're working at a research station in Antarctica, those billions of people are easily accessed. Go places, do things, swipe left, swipe right, make afterwork plans with people who aren't coworkers, etc. 
But if you wanna rekindle something with B, HR, you should definitely tell her about A. You all work together, and better B hears it from you than from a nosy coworker or an hurt or vindictive A. (If you think others at your place of employment don't already know about your complicated relationships with A and B, I'd bet you're wrong. People talk. They notice the way people look at each other. They get drunk and tell secrets they don't remember telling. And A may not be angry or hurt right now, HR, but you could have a falling out later.) And while you don't have to tell B everything—you don't have to share every detail about A with B—you'll wanna give B an accurate outline. Because in addition to not wanting B to hear about A from someone else, misleading B about A and/or lying by omission could come back to haunt you. If B finds out there was a lot more to A than you let on, HR, B may wind up feeling like she got (back) into a relationship with you under false pretenses. And if B would truly be devastated to learn about A, HR, you don't want that hanging over your head for the rest of your life. Because what if B finds out about A ten minutes before your wedding?
And in case things don't work out with B or A...
Wherever you work, HR, it's usually not the best idea to date colleagues. Maybe you know that already; maybe that's part of the reason why you and Colleague A kept your thing a secret. The heart wants what it wants, of course, and lust trumps hard-and-fast rules against workplace romances (personal or corporate). But even if your workplace is cool with intraoffice romance, you're regularly creating potentially messy situations for yourself and your colleagues. So if it doesn't work out with B, HR, don't get back together with A. Try fucking someone else's colleague from someone else's office, i.e. one or more of the other 7.5 billion people on the planet.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
You say you're trapped in this awful, loveless, sexless marriage, GIDI, but it doesn't sound like you're actually trapped. You aren't bedridden and dependent on your spouse for care, you aren't financially dependent on your spouse, you aren't nailed to the floor or glued to the ceiling. You cite only one not very compelling reason for staying: "We are 'home base' for so many lives and I feel I cannot leave my husband because of that." 
Not good enough.
You are not obligated to spend the next three or four decades of your life rotting away in house filled with your husband's junk and your husband's racist rants and your husband's secondhand smoke just so your kids can drop by for brunch on Sunday mornings and tap you for free childcare the rest of the week. Divorcing your husband may hurt your kids and grandkids—and it may leave some of your kids scrambling to make other childcare arrangements—but the short-term hurt it causes the rest of the family couldn't possibly come close to outweighing the hurt staying for even six more months is gonna cause you. 
So go.
Unless you really and truly can't go—unless there's a really, really good reason didn't share with me for staying—in which case stay.
But if you do stay, GIDI, there are a few things you need to say out loud to your kids:
1. "My marriage to your father is essentially over."
2. "Your father and I are going to remain married but, for my own sanity and his, we will be leading increasingly separate lives."
3. "I'm still mom and I'm still grandma and, yeah, I'm still technically a wife. But I am also my own person and I intend to enjoy the next few decades of my life."
And there are few things you need to say out loud to your husband:
1. "We haven't been intimate for more than a decade and we've obviously grown apart in other ways."
2. "Divorce, like the Duchess of Devonshire told the New York Times, is a huge fucking bore for everyone involved. So let's not get divorced."
3. "Even though we're not getting divorced—unless you decide to divorce me after hearing what comes next—we will be living together as glorified roommates, not as husband and wife. And we will, like our nation's Founding Fathers, show a decent respect to the opinions of mankind and not behave in ways that scandalize our children, our grandchildren, our friends, or our neighbors. But we are both free to do our own thing starting now—without permission and without apology. Oh, and I'm blocking you on Facebook."
Having to pretend—to your husband or your kids—that your marriage isn't broken and miserable is an additional misery, GIDI, but a single afternoon of radical truth telling can put an end to that bonus misery. And no longer having to pretend that a marriage isn't miserable and broken, being freed from the stress of keeping up appearances, can actually make being trapped in a miserable, broken marriage a little less miserable.
So what do you do after telling the truth? What comes after saying all those things that can't be unsaid?
You get to spend the next two or three decades—until you bury him or he buries you—doing whatever the fuck you want, GIDI. Roommates don't cook or clean for each other. Roommates don't eat all their meals together. Roommates don't take second jobs so they have an excuse not to hang out at night with each other.
And, hey, got the means to do some traveling? Go see old friends and family members in other parts of the country—even if you have to take the bus to get to them—and take your time coming back. Really loaded? Pack a suitcase full of great books—and a carryon bag full of great vibrators—and go on a couple of long, bi-annual round-the-world cruises. Got lots of money? Hire a contractor to turn your garage into a guest apartment while you're on that cruise—a guest room (and bathroom! and kitchen!) that will be yours and yours alone when you get back.
And finally, GIDI, see other men. Do it/them discreetly, do it/them without shame or guilt, and do it/them soon.
P.S. And I've just now been catching up on SLLOTDs and I see a recent question was somewhat similar, so I feel like you probably don't see a problem with how he acted as far as not discussing ahead of time, but the betrayal for me was more the ignoring my veto—how can I possibly trust that he will ever listen when I veto someone when he didn't with the very first one? Perhaps this question is too similar to the other one, but he sees no problem with ignoring my veto in this case and I was hoping you may have some insight.
I think you may have misread my advice for Stumped For Clever Name, the woman whose ex-boyfriend violated her One Simple Rule. I didn't tell her that it was silly to have a rule, or to discuss things ahead of time, or that (God forbid) there shouldn't be limits on their hookups with thirds. The problem was her particular rule, which was elaborate, unworkable, and seemed intentionally designed to trip her boyfriend up.
To recap: SFCN wanted her ex-boyfriend to tell her—in advance of a date with a third—exactly what would happen that night so she could "prepare [herself] emotionally." (For the devastation?) She got mad at her ex-boyfriend for smooching—only for smooching—two girls on two separate occasions without first warning her in advance that he might smooch the girls he was going out on dates with. SFCN said she would've been totally fine with smooching—she would've be totally fine with fucking—but only if her ex-boyfriend told her advance so she could, again, brace herself emotionally. That seemed like game playing to me: If she was fine with her boyfriend doing anything, from smooching to fucking, why not send him out the door with a simple "Have fun, honey"?
These three commenters may have done a better job of identifying the problem with SFCN's rule than I did:
What you wanted him to do is pre-emptively set a hard limit on a date with someone else. The practical effect of doing it your way was of you standing behind his left ear and clucking "Nuh-uh-ahhhh! Don't you dare. You promised." Sure, that's going to go over real well with his date. In other words, you were basically preemptively fucking up his evening—all the while claiming "Look how giving I am, see, you nominally have permission to go all the way!" That's pretty manipulative.
If you need to emotionally prepare for every kiss when your monogamish partner is out on a date—and in fact, if you need to get a report of every intimate activity after said date, in a not-a-turn-on kind of way, but to compare to the previously approved activities—then maybe, just maybe, you aren't emotionally ready for an open relationship.
What I don't understand is why these arbitrary rulemakers seem completely incapable of putting themselves in the position of the third person: You have a date. The date has gone well. You want to kiss the person. They say, "No, I can't kiss you, I didn't clear kissing with my partner beforehand." WTF? If I were this hypothetical "you," I'd conclude that, A, this person is a loser, and B, their partner doesn't really get poly and continuing to date this person is going to be a whole lotta drama from an immature metamour. So in other words, yes, SFCN, your "rule" is unreasonable.
So: you can have rules in open relationships—you gotta have rules—but when someone insists on rules that are silly and/or unworkable and/or essentially traps, that person is screaming, "I don't want to be in an open relationship at all!"
The rules you describe—obtain approval before fucking someone else, keep lines of communication open, respect the thumb, don't abandon your primary partner on a camping trip to run off with someone else—aren't silly or unworkable. Your rules, unlike SFCN's rule, seem perfectly reasonable. And it's clear that your boyfriend bent the rules that day and then added insult to injury by pretending not to understand the rules (a "thumbs down" is not hard to decipher). He selfishly prioritized his dick on that camping trip and he was clearly willing to risk doing permanent and perhaps fatal damage to your relationship to get with this other woman.
That's not okay. That's not how you earn someone's trust. That's not the way healthy open relationships function.
If he wanted to fuck her, he needed to ask you for your okay. When you found him fucking her, you let him know he didn't have your okay—and he fucked her anyway. He then justified his actions first by claiming not to understand what your thumbs down meant and then by insisting he only fucked her to spare her feelings—bullshit rationalizations.
My readers told SFCN that her insistence on her boyfriend adhering to her unreasonable rule may be evidence that she's not "emotionally ready for an open relationship." I would say that your boyfriend's inability to honor your reasonable rules may be evidence that he isn't ready for an open relationship either.
It's up to you whether you give him a second chance—I would, CETI, if he were my boyfriend—but definitely no third chance.
First things first, PST: I want to thank you—thank you thank you thank you—for making sure this boy would be in your classroom next year and not in the classroom of a transphobic colleague. The transgender suicide attempt rate is staggeringly high—over 40 percent (nine times the national average)—and hostile family members are a huge contributing factor to suicide attempts by trans youth and other queer kids. But the moral support of even just one understanding, empathetic adult can make all the difference for a trans, lesbian, bi, or gay kid who isn't getting any support at home. So thank you. (I wish I could personally thank all the students who ignored the shitty, bigoted, possibly illegal, and potentially traumatizing order to continue calling this boy by his birth name instead of his preferred/actual name. They're also making a difference for the boy.)
I passed your letter along to Chris Hampton, youth and program strategist for the ACLU LGBT and HIV Project, and she had a lot of great information and resources to share. I'm going to get out of the way now and let Chris do the big download...
Students at public schools are protected by the First Amendment. The school can’t restrict how they refer to each other during non-instructional time. As for the rule about only using nicknames that are approved by parents, that sounds like something the school couldn’t possibly be enforcing evenly. Do they call parents to ask trifling stuff like, “Hey, Thomas wants to go by Tom, is that okay with you? Can you fill out a written permission form saying so?” If they’re really requiring parental approval for all nicknames, that would be a huge inconvenience. So if the teacher can get a sympathetic ear with the administration, maybe they could be persuaded to relax that rule.  
The rest of it is pretty complicated and involves too many variables for us to be able to answer easily. We encourage folks to get in touch with us if they want to work through the details of any situations like this—they can request our help at this section of our website. If the teacher feels he can do so without putting himself at risk in his job, maybe he could at least at some point tell this student, “I want you to know I support you and I’m going to do my best to avoid pronouns and using your given name as much as I possibly can.” And find out if the kid has any positive support in his life. If the student is able to access the web at home without his parents seeing his browsing history, or if he can get some web time at the school or public library, he might want to check out these sites:  
• TrevorSpace: A social networking/support site run by the Trevor Project for LGBTQ youth ages 13 through 24.• WeHappyTrans: A website that provides a platform for trans people to share positive stories about their lives. They also have a blog that covers media, news, support, and legal issues.• GoodReads Booklist for Trans Teens: Maybe, maybe, maaaaybe some of these books are available at the school library. Maybe.• The It Gets Better Project—of course! A few sites the teacher or other adults who are interested in supporting trans youth in their lives might check out:
• Gender Spectrum: An organization that provides education, resources, and training to help schools, health-care providers, and family service agencies create a more gender-sensitive and supportive environment for all children including gender variant and transgender youth.• Gender Diversity: This organization provides family support, works with schools, and provides community-building services to improve the well-being for people of all gender identities and expressions.• Transgender Child: A website that provides extensive information, resources, and support for the parents of transgender and gender-nonconforming children.
Finally, there’s a really detailed national guide on supporting trans students in K-12 schools coming out very soon that will include some suggestions for educators working with trans students whose parents aren’t supportive. It’s being written by folks from the ACLU, Gender Spectrum, NCLR, and HRC, and the goal is to have it out by the beginning of the school year.
Dan here: The ACLU and GLSEN brought out a terrific informational brochure for trans and gender-nonconforming students a few years ago: Know Your Rights. I would urge you to pass the link to the PDF on to your new student along with the other links and resources Chris Hampton cites.
And finally, PST, I'm going to take the liberty of translating something Hampton said out of her gentle, professional legalese and into shit-talking, ass-kicking savagese: When Hampton says, "We encourage folks to get in touch with us if they want to work through the details of any situations like this," what she means is, "If you think the motherfuckers running your school are violating your civil rights, kiddo, you let us know—and if they are violating your civil rights, we will sue these motherfuckers faster than you can share your pronoun preferences."
UPDATE: When's the last time you made a donation to the ACLU? Go here and make one.
"A violation of the letter of law," I ruled in yesterday's SLLOTD, "not a violation of the spirit of the law."
You and your ex-boyfriend were in an open relationship, you were both allowed to fuck other people, and he screwed up by failing to notify you in advance that he might wanna kiss girls that he had asked out on dates with your blessing. That seems like letter-of-the-law violation to me, SFCN, not spirit of the law violation—and a mistake that someone new to monogamishamy might easily make.
Should he have anticipated that he would want to kiss both those girls and informed you "ahead-of-date" of his intentions? Yeah, sure, of course. You also could've anticipated that he would, at the very least, wind up kissing any girl he asked out on a date. But rules are rules: If he knew something was gonna happen on a date, your ex was supposed to tell you before the date, not after.
So why didn't he? Especially since he knew—and he did know, right?—that you were making assumptions about his ability to keep a big promise (always use condoms) based on his ability to keep a small one (tell me everything in advance)? Well... maybe because you were sending mixed messages, SFCN?
First you told your ex-boyfriend that you wanted a monogamish relationship—you told him that it was fine with you if he had sex with other women—and then you informed him that he had to tell you know exactly what he planned to do with these other women before he actually did anything with them so that you could "prepare" yourself for the emotional fallout. Do you detect the subtly contradictory message there? ("I'm totally fine with things happening, honey, but you need to give advance warning so I that can brace myself before any of these things happen.") Your boyfriend may have concluded—erroneously and perhaps subconsciously—that it was kinder to go with "nothing is going to happen" because there was no guarantee that anything would happen. Why needlessly torment his girlfriend by rattling off a list of all the things he might wanna do when he might not actually get to do anything at all?
Summing up, SFCN: Your simple rule was more emotionally complicated than you realized.
If I were your boyfriend, SFCN, I would've insisted on a much simpler rule, a rule that was grounded in perfectly reasonable assumptions and therefore less likely to trip either of us up. ("Most likely we'll wind up making out with the other people we go out on dates with—a smooching session is pretty much a given—but we promise to always use condoms with other people if the smooching progresses to sex.")
If that simpler rule was unacceptable to you, SFCN, then I would've erred on the side of telling you I planned to everything I possibly could with the any other girl I asked out—smooching, mutual masturbation, oral sex, PIV, PIB, PBR, PBJ, pegging, fisting, puppy play, scat, diapers, sounding, nullification—so that instead being upset to learn that I had smooched my date after I got home, SCFN, you would've been relieved to learn that my date didn't cut off my cock and balls.
Two hookups—two hookups that took place three years apart—could lead to a loving (for your friend) and complicating (for you) long-term relationship, SHIT, but odds are better that nothing will come of this. Your friend and this girl don't really know each other, and almost all new relationships fall apart early in the discovery process, aka the getting-to-fuck-you-on-the-regular process. So if you can trust your friend and his new girlfriend not to blurt out all the boozy details of the night they met in front your wife for now—if you can trust them to omit your rather limited participation in their first hookup—you might wanna wait a few months before coming clean, SHIT, as that night could wind up safely back in the memory hole.
But if your friend and his new GF wind up making a go of it, SHIT, you should get in front of the scandal and disclose what happened that night to your wife. You don't want her to find out from someone else—from them or from a mutual friend they shared the unabridged version story with—and even if that never happens, SHIT, you don't want to live with the stress of worrying about whether she'll find out for the next four or five decades.
And however angry your wife is when you let her know what happened—and we're both assuming she'll be angry—it's hard to imagine that she won't come to see your booze-addled behavior that night for what it was: a violation of the letter of law, not a violation of the spirit of the law. You made out with someone else—permissible under the terms of your monogamish agreement—but you failed to get the required okay from her in advance. If a monogamish couple, a couple that has three-ways and allows for some making out with other people, can't forgive a relatively minor violation like that, SHIT, what hope is there for all the monogamous couples working through the fallout of an actual affair? (And a lot of couples do manage to work though an affair—and many come out stronger for it, says Esther Perel.)
And who knows? After you disclose your transgression, SHIT, your wife may disclose one or two of her own.
My response after the jump...
You're not going to be happy having safe, boring, predictable sex with Mr. Long Term for the long term, right? Not after all that wild, passionate, unpredictable sex with Mr. New Guy. So if things don't improve, your relationship with Mr. Long Term is doomed. So you have nothing to lose by slapping your cards down on the table, MAS.
Tell Mr. Long Term the truth: The sex has to get better. Now, maybe Mr. Long Term is the problem (he could be lousy at sex) or maybe it's the combo of you and Mr. Long Term that's the problem (maybe you two just don't click sexually), and the relationship is doomed no matter what you do. But there's a chance your problem is a relatively common hang-up, MAS. It's possible that you, or Mr. Long Term, or you and Mr. Long Term feel inhibited during sex because you're in love, and people who are in love are supposed to have sex one way (you're supposed to make safe, boring, predictable love). But people who aren't in love—people like you and Mr. New Guy—are free to have sex another way (they're allowed to have wild, passionate, and unpredictable fucks).
Give Mr. Long Term permission to fuck you like he's never going to see you again. You should fuck him the same way. Fuck each other like the stakes are low—fuck like it's casual, fuck like it could end at any time. The "lovemaking" inhibition can be literally fucked to death, if it's indeed the problem here, and once you've fucked it good and dead, you'll see that you can have a happy life, a committed relationship, and wild, passionate, unpredictable sex—with the same person!
But you gotta want it bad enough to fuck for it.
I asked a doctor—Dr. Barak, a generalist physician at the University of Washington and a regular (if sometimes mortified) guest expert—if mono could damage and/or diminish a guy's libido, ability to stay hard, interest in sex, etc., for nearly a year. He e-mailed me back to say...
Mono is a viral illness for which there is no real treatment other than the tincture of time. Mono is a pretty insidious illness in that it typically causes really really severe fatigue which can linger for a long time. Other common symptoms are muscle and joint aches. Could this fatigue and muscle ache and joint ache slip into affecting mood and interest in sex? They could. Would not be typical, but they could. The duration of mono symptoms is typically around three months, but they can persist to some degree for 1-2 years in more severe cases. None of the effects of mono are typically considered "permanent." So it would be important to reassure someone that the effects of mono that are still present after 12-18 months could still likely resolve as more time passes.
You came down with mono 11 months ago, COMBAT, so you're still in that 1-2 year symptoms-could-persist window. You were also shipped off to a combat zone—which is stressful and potentially libido-impairing. The fact that morning wood is returning would seem to be a good sign, as is the fact that a few dirty texts from the girl back home and your regular FWB can crank you up. Be reassured, like the doctor said, that things—your dick included—will most likely right themselves in another 6-12 months. And come home safe!
I've never written, but I felt compelled to after reading DEHUMANE's letter and your response. Sorry, Dan, but you missed the most OBVIOUS point, in this scenario, in your response, in my opinion. I believe Recon guy not only tricked and decieved DEHUMANE, he broke the agreement. Recon guy agreed not to leave any marks and most people will argue he didn't, but it will be OBVIOUS to anyone who knows DEHUMANE that he is hairless. The absence of his hair is noticeable and is, therefore, a mark left by Recon guy. It's obvious Recon guy can't be trusted and DEHUMANE should obviously avoid future play sessions with him. But will DEHUMANE avoid Recon guy? I don't think so. It's obvious he wrote seeking your approval and permission to do so.
No Untrustworthy Tops, Seriously!
In defense of Recon Guy, NUTS, after DEHUMANE told him he didn't want to be "marked," Recon Guy asked him for a clarification—what exactly did "no marks" mean to DEHUMANE?—and DEHUMANE said, "No bruises, no welts, no red marks." Mr. Recon left no bruises, welts, or red marks. Shaving off someone's body hair is a limit-pushing dick move, that's for sure, but it's not as if Recon Guy cut off his pinky toes. Recon Guy pushed DEHUMANE's limits, yes, and that was probably too much, too soon, for a novice like DEHUMANE, but I don't think that means Recon Guy is an unsafe player.
I too got the impression that DEHUMANE wanted to play with Recon Guy again—which is why I recommended that he have a much more detailed conversation with Recon Guy about his limits, make it clear that only things that were ruled in were on the menu, and ideally bring his boyfriend along to any future play/dehumanization sessions.
Short and to the point: I would advise these people to divorce.
And if the "she" half of this he/she union is the half whose mind has changed, SATTP, I would advise the "he" half not to engage in vaginal intercourse until after this conflict is resolved and/or the divorce is finalized.
One other thought...
If the person who suddenly wants a child is okay with being the non-custodial/part-time parent of a child who lives full time with one or more other parents, being a known sperm donor and the spare dad for an oppo-sex couple's kid or the only dad for a same-sex couple's kid (if it's the "he" half of this he/she union whose mind has changed*), or being a known egg donor and/or gestational/surrogate and the spare mom for an oppo-sex couple's kid or the only mom for a same-sex couple's kid (if it's the "she" half of this he/she union whose mind has changed**) are options these days.
It's a highly complicated option, of course, and one that would require trust and trailblazing and lawyering up. (The lawyers would be there to hammer out agreements in advance of conflict, SATTP, thereby making conflicts easier to resolve if or when they arise.) It's a uniquely modern path to parenthood that would allow the person whose mind has changed to have a kid and hold on to the still-child-free person they married. All he/she would have to do is find a couple, same-sex or oppo-sex, who were open to triad parenting as a concept and whose values and ideas about parenting closely aligned with his/her own.
Divorce would be way easier.
* Assuming the "he" half of this he/she union is a cisgender man.
** Assuming the "she" half of this he/she union is a cisgender woman.
Thought #1: I wish guys wouldn't log onto dating apps to scold guys—for lying or any other reason. Well, unless they're JMP gays. Scold them, sure. But there's no need to scold people for shaving a few years off, adding a few years on, for being overweight or femme or whatever else. If someone isn't for you, move the fuck along.
Thought #2: Fucking someone much younger than you is fine, COFFEE—so long as the guy you're fucking is of a legal age, so long as he wants to fuck you too (or get rimmed and/or fisted by you), so long as you're following the campsite rule, and so long as the younger guy seems likely to honor the Tea and Sympathy rule. And while relationships don't have to be lifelong or open-ended to be worthwhile—longevity shouldn't be our only metric for relationship success—there are certainly some fantastic examples of lasting intergenerational gay love out there and plenty of examples of fleeting intragenerational gay love.
Thought #3: I've met some really smart guys in their early twenties, COFFEE, and I've met some really fucking stupid guys in their forties and fifties. You could make the case that flakiness correlates more strongly with youth (and wisdom with age), but staying in your chronological/demographical lane isn't going protect you from ghosting, flakiness, or mishigas. Trends are trends, yes, but every individual is a data point.
Thought #4: The fact that this guy is 22 is the least your problems, COFFEE. Let's review:
• He demands exclusivity and then disappears• He's "obsessed" with being rimmed and fisted• You don't find his ass attractive  • He's canceled on you three times  • He texts like an id3it
You don't like him for all sorts of reasons that have nothing to do with his age. He's flakey. He's inconsiderate. He's sexually selfish ("he came, and then he did nothing to make me come")—hell, you don't even want to fuck him the way he wants to be fucked, COFFEE. So why on earth would you agree to see him again? What are you getting out of this? What's he getting out of this? Why are you bothering me about this? My advice: DTMFA ("dump the motherfucking adolescent") and go find yourself a guy—nearer to your age or further from your age—who isn't a flakey ghoster whose sexual obsessions you don't share.
Thought #5: Work on your attitude. Thirty-somethings and forty-somethings and fifty-somethings also ghost on people, suffer from panic attacks, lose things, flake on dates, want their unappealing butts rimmed and/or fisted, and t3xt lyke l0s3rz. Twenty-somethings are probably likelier to be flighty and flakey—maddening traits that can somehow make a younger man more alluring—but no one wants to date a nitpicky dude of any age who comes with a style guide for texting. Chill out. Your hookups don't have to check all the right boxes. But if no boxes are being checked, COFFEE, be friendly (no scolding) and move on to the next dude.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Let me get this out of the way first: Monogamy is right for some. And while it's not natural—we're not a naturally monogamous species—not all natural things are good things and not all good things are natural. Take chlamydia. Natural? Of course. Good? Ask your oozing, itchy penis.
Back to your girlfriend, DRIP: She fucked up when she fucked that stranger, DRIP, and she let a sexually transmitted infection do the disclosing for her—even worse, she initiated a disingenuous conversation about opening up your relationship in order to secure some sort of retroactive blessing of/absolution for her vacation fuck up. Do you toss aside "the main interpersonal project of the past six years" or do you forgive her for cheating? (It's so often the most adamant advocates for monogamy and honesty who cheat first!) Do you forgive her the hypocrisy and embark on an honest open relationship, fully aware of the risks and rewards. (I would list "sexually transmitted infections" under the risks of a non-monogamous relationship but—what do you know—you contracted an STI in a monogamous relationship, DRIP, and you weren't the first. In fact, people in monogamous relationships are at just as high a risk of contracting a sexually transmitted infection as people in ethical non-monogamous relationships. Because lies. And vacations.)
Back to you, DRIP: I don't think a one-time slip-up reason enough to end this otherwise good relationship, especially if you never truly valued monogamy in the first place. Like chlamydia, your jealousy and anger will clear up. (Well, unless you have "super chlamydia," but that doesn't seem to be a real thing... yet.) The question then isn't whether you should continue in this relationship, but under what terms. Unless your relationship actually sucks, DRIP, and you don't know it. It's possible your girlfriend intentionally sabotaged your relationship by fucking someone else because she couldn't bring herself to admit she's bored or fed up or no longer sexually attracted to you. Do did she honestly screw up and does she sincerely regret it and the relationship is as strong and rewarding for her as it is for you? (Cheating doesn't always mean something is wrong with the relationship.) Or was she slamming her hand down on the self-destruct button? You'll have to ask her then make your move.
As for the choices you presented, do you push hard for a...
Threesome? Well, your girlfriend cheating on you doesn't mean she wants a threesome, and her infidelity doesn't entitle you to one. Do you want a threesome? Then bring it up with her. If she says no, that doesn't make her a hypocrite, it only means she doesn't want a threesome. But you could have one with two other human beings to be named later, if you both decide to open your relationship or if you end it.
Multi-use cheat pass? Maybe, DRIP, but an eye for an eye—in this situation—gives the whole world itching and oozing. And while you may not believe in monogamy, you know how shitty it feels to be lied to.
Full-blown polyamorous relationship? Polyamory requires both/all partners to have healthy communication and trust, two things you're lacking at the moment. And being open isn't the same as being poly—your girlfriend might be open to fucking around with other people (like, say, on vacation), but not into romantic connections, entanglements, and obligations. Figure out what you both want and set some ground rules. It's also possible your girlfriend still wants to have a monogamous relationship and only "wanted to talk about the possibility of being less exclusive" to assuage her post-vacation guilt, not because she wanted to keep fucking other people or ever wanted you to fuck anyone else at all. If your girlfriend isn't interested in opening your relationship—if she prefers an unethical non-monogamous relationship to an ethical one—you'll have to decide if that's a dealbreaker for you. 



My answer, BORING, is threefold...
1. A few years ago I interviewed a doctor who works with people with dangerous and/or distressing kinks. The kink in question was totally different—ball busting scenes involving "erotic-target override" (it's complicated)—but this bit is relevant:
"These problems are often highly treatable," said Dr. Paul Fedoroff, who is a neuropsychiatrist, a forensic psychiatrist, and the director of the Sexual Behaviors Clinic at the Royal Ottawa Mental Health Centre. "Typically, a low-dose SSRI works magic." SSRIs, or "selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors," are a class of drugs that are usually prescribed as antidepressants. SSRIs can crater a person's libido, as is commonly known, but they can also, according to Fedoroff, help a person overcome an unwanted sexual interest or compulsion. "I had one patient who used to tie his testes with rope and then hit them with a hammer," said Fedoroff. "He was referred to me by a urologist when he asked for surgical castration. I prescribed an SSRI, and a month later he told me, 'That [was] the craziest idea I ever had.' He had no further interest in 'ball busting' and said his life would have been different if he had found this medication earlier." 
So, yeah, antidepressants could be responsible for your FWB's sudden disinterest in ropes, whips, and toys. (For the record: I do not support "treating" kinks with meds.) The impact antidepressants can have on a person's libido—they can completely obliterate a person's libido—is well known, and most docs are willing to tweak dosages and/or prescribe different antidepressants so that their patients don't have to sacrifice their sex lives for their mental health.
2. It could be the drugs—either the antidepressant your FWB recently started taking or the drug he recently stopped abusing. Booze may have helped him overcome sexual inhibitions (where his kinks are concerned) and/or crippling sexual self-consciousness (the kind that can derail boners and induce premature ejaculation). It's also possible that your FWB associates "good, hard poundings" with his out-of-control drinking, BORING, and consequently doesn't feel comfortable engaging in that kind of sex at the moment. Here's hoping his desire to pound you reemerges once he's passed out of the early and delicate stages of his sobriety.
3. Some people can't end their love affair with booze without a new love to take its place. And while I don't think there's a nice way to tell someone that their happiness is destroying your sex life, BORING, I do think you should tell him you miss the intensity and the kinks—then urge him to ask his doctor about adjusting his meds. (Due to the rampant kink-phobia in the medical community, BORING, your boyfriend might not get a good response if he tells his doctor he wants to tweak his meds so that tying up and whipping his casual sex partner starts making his cock hard again. He should speak to his doc in more general terms.) And push back gently when he says he's totally in love with you—tell him you like him, tell him you're going to be there for him as a friend, but don't allow him to assume the feelings are mutual.
While the LGBT community is wildly, beautifully, and sometimes exhaustingly diverse—we have our religious groups too (some of them oppose gay sex and gay relationships!), we have our Americans and foreigners, we have our racists (sadly), we have our crazy gun nuts (ditto), we are a part of every culture in the world, and many, many Deaf people are a part of the queer community—the rainbow flag does not symbolize diversity.
Not technically.
The rainbow flag represents a diverse community—as does the rainbow windsock and the rainbow dog collar and the rainbow board shorts and the rainbow detachable pony tail butt plug—but the rainbow stands for other stuff:
In 1974, Gilbert Baker’s life changed forever when he met Harvey Milk, who showed him “how action could create change.” Three years after they met, Milk was elected to the San Francisco Board of Supervisors—making him the first openly gay person to hold a high public office in a major American city. Milk, once known fondly as the Mayor of Castro St., had campaigned on a positive message of hope for young gay people, saying, “The only thing they have to look forward to is hope. And you have to give them hope.” After winning the election, Milk challenged Gilbert Baker to come up with a symbol of pride for the gay community—a positive alternative to the pink triangle. The pink triangle, once imposed by Nazis to identify and persecute homosexuals, had been reclaimed in the 70s as a bold symbol of remembrance and action against persecution. It is still widely used, often alongside or superimposed upon the Rainbow Flag.
Inspired, Baker began working on a flag. He dyed the fabrics himself and, with the help of volunteers, stitched together eight strips of brilliant color into a huge banner that spoke volumes: hot pink stood for sexuality, red for life, orange for healing, yellow for the sun, green for nature, turquoise blue for art, indigo for harmony and violet for spirit.
“It all goes back to the first moment of the first flag back in 1978 for me. Raising it up and seeing it there blowing in the wind for everyone to see. It completely astounded me that people just got it, in an instant like a bolt of lightening—that this was their flag. It belonged to all of us. It was the most thrilling moment of my life. Because I knew right then that this was the most important thing I would ever do—that my whole life was going to be about the Rainbow Flag.”
As you now know, DAHLR, the adoption of the rainbow as a symbol of the LGBT community/movement was not a decision made by all queer people everywhere. There was no constitutional convention where the flag was adopted, there were no other candidates, there was no queer nationwide vote. The brilliant and creative Gilbert Baker created the rainbow flag and it was an immediate hit. Perhaps there was someone else out there who could've come up with something better, flag-wise, but he/she/they didn't. Gilbert got there first, no one has come up with anything better since, and we're still waving his rainbow flag four decades later. Other communities within the wider LGBT community—BDSMers, bears, trans people, asexuals, etc.—have created pride flags of their own that riff on Gilbert's original creation—another measure of its genius.
And seeing as this went down in Seattle today...

A project that will cover six intersections of Pike/Pine between 11th Ave and Broadway with rainbow crosswalks as a symbol of Gay Pride was unveiled early Tuesday morning. Mayor Ed Murray, Seattle’s first openly gay mayor and a Capitol Hill resident, said the new rainbow crosswalks represent the neighborhood as “a place where we are tolerant and accepting.”
...I don't think there's any chance of yanking the rainbow flags/windsocks/dog collars/board shorts/butt plugs back from the queers. That cruise ship has sailed. I'm very sorry, of course, that you are unable to display the rainbow without attracting the unwanted attentions of bigots and/or Larry Craigs, DAHLR, and it may come some comfort to know that you're not the only person who is annoyed by the queer community sneaking off with the rainbow. But the rainbow is queer now. You'll just have to get used to it.
UPDATE: Of course this iconic performance by this iconic icon had a lot to do with the queer community's thing for rainbows:

Somewhere out there, someplace that it may be impossible to actually get to, there's gotta be a better place—a happier place, a safer place, a place where I can create my own family and wear fabulous red shoes. That image resonated with millions of gay people when the Wizard of Oz first came out in 1939 and it continued to resonated with gay people down through the 50s and 60s and 70s. With so many LGBT people still having to flee from homophobic and transphobic churches and families and communities to be free, the a metaphor continues to resonate with LGBT people today.
And this next song has nothing to do with the queers—proving that you can sing about rainbows without everyone's minds going here—but I like the song...

"Once a cheater, always a cheater" does seem to be a thing—although it may be more accurate to say "once a cheater, somewhat likelier to cheat than someone who was never a cheater." HuffPo:
University of Denver psychology graduate student Kayla Knopp studied 484 unmarried adults aged 18 to 35 to find out if people who stray in one relationship are more likely to do so in the next. Her findings were presented at the annual American Psychological Association convention in Washington D.C. Knopp and her fellow researchers asked participants questions such as, "Have you had sexual relations with someone other than your partner since you began seriously dating?" and "Has your partner had sexual relations with someone other than you since you seriously began dating?" Those who admitted to having sexual relations outside their relationship were three and a half times more likely to do so in their next relationship as well, Knopp explained to The Huffington Post in an email.
The study didn't include same-sex couples, HuffPo notes, so your odds may be the same, higher, or lower. But "likelier to cheat again" by whatever multiple does not mean "destined to cheat again."
The likelihood of a cheater cheating again, in my opinion, depends on the reason(s) for the cheater cheating in the first place. Someone who cheats because she's easily bored, aroused by risk-taking, or to punish her partner seems a highly likely candidate for future cheating, HOPING. So you'll have to contemplate why she did it, HOPING, not just that she did it.
And, yes, your potential new girlfriend may deserve a pass since she was cheating "at the end of a relationship that really wasn't working anyway." But if cheating is how she breaks up with people—if that's how she gets out of relationships that aren't working—that's not a good sign.
So ask yourself: Being cheated on is a violation that you can aid and abet, it seems, but is it one you can forgive and forget?
If your boyfriend were my friend—not my boyfriend, just my friendfriend—and he confided in me about this mess, TADID, here's what I would say to him:
Let's pretend you don't have a girlfriend. You're totally single. You stopped fucking damsel-in-distress girl for a reason, right? You didn't want to be with her and now she's got a new boyfriend. But she says she's still in love with you and her new boyfriend is deeply shitty and she's really unhappy—and so you swap texts with her all day long. Because you feel sorry for her. Because you're a nice guy. Because she's unhappy. And you know what? She knows it. She knows you pay attention to her because she's unhappy. Because her boyfriend is shitty. So...
As long unhappiness and shitty boyfriends are the key to getting attention from the man she loves—that man would be you—what incentive does she have to get happy? Or to get herself a better boyfriend? None. Her unhappiness may be genuine or it could be a stratagem—she may actually be miserable or she may just be claiming she's miserable to keep you in her life. Either way, friendfriend, you're not doing her any favors when you text with her. If she's manipulating you by pretending to be miserable, she's not being nice to you. If the attention you're giving her, limited though it may be, is keeping her in a miserable spot (because subconsciously she's realized that being miserable is the only way to win your attention), you're not being nice. Either way: this isn't nice. So stop it.
That's how you should frame your objections from here on out, TADID: by expressing your concern for her (you don't want her to stay miserable just to keep him texting) and by expressing your concern for him (you don't want her manipulating him just to keep him texting).
Get it off your chest once or twice, TADID, then back the fuck off—trust your boyfriend, let this thing run its course, and bite your tongue until either your boyfriend comes to his senses or his sadsack and/or manipulative ex comes to hers.
P.S. I also wanted to say thanks. I grew up in a super conservative Catholic family/community in the rural midwest. I was introduced to you about ten years ago by a college friend from Seattle, and because of you I have turned into a sex positive and proudly out queer adult. And my life is so so so so so much better than I ever envisioned it could be!
First things first: Congrats on your upcoming wedding! That's wonderful. And to know my column helped you pleases me more than I can say, PPPH, but for the record: That out-and-proud, sex-positive, loved-and-capable-loving person you are today? You built her.
Now about your shitty family...
You are not going to absorb your shitty family's rejection personally, PPPH, because you are not going to call each and every shitty member of your shitty family to personally ask each individual shit in your shitty family if they're coming to your wedding. The shits aren't coming—adjust your seating charts accordingly—and you know what? You don't want these shits at your wedding. You don't want to see your shitty sister-in-law's sour face when you look out at your guests. You don't want to see your shitty brother's face—the shitty relative who throws you non-committal shitty scraps and then fails to invite you to his own wedding—when you cut the cake. You don't want any of these shits at your wedding. You want people at your wedding who love and support you, who love and support your relationship, and your shitty family has made it abundantly clear that they are incapable of loving and supporting you.
It's worse than that: Your shitty family had made it clear that they will seize any opportunity to wound you. Stop creating those opportunities. Don't send any more invitations, don't make any more phone calls, unfollow the fuckers on Facebook. Devote a week to grieving your loss—this kind of rejection is painful—and then resolve to focus on your wife-to-be, your education, your friends, and your career.
Focus on the life you and your fiancée are embarking on together. She's your family now.
I'm so sorry for your loss, MIA, my heart goes out to you.
As for your horrible, terrible, no good, really bad sister-in-law... send her the fucking note.
Don't put the note at the bottom of a box of photos; there's always a chance the box will sit unopened for months or years, MIA, and you don't want that note to go undiscovered until after your SIL croaks and her next of kin finally get around to opening the box. And don't send the note to your SIL via her truly nice daughter/your late partner's truly nice niece. Your late partner's niece (she's your niece too) is most likely aware that her mother is an awful person and she's probably had to make apologies for her awful mother in the past. You should spare her from having to make another one now.
Send the note directly to your late partner's cruel and unusual sister—hell, send it registered mail and make the hateful old bat sign for it. And for what it's worth, MIA, your note didn't strike me as angry. I've been sitting here composing the note I would write if someone sent a that "condolence card" to me after the death of a loved one and it's a web of death threats held together by strings of F-bombs. Your note is a model of restraint and composure.
Finally, MIA, keep talking with your late partner's niece—she's your niece too—and don't allow her mother's actions to pollute this new connection to your late partner's extended family. (You were his immediate family.) At some point down the road the subject of her mother may come up, MIA, and then you can calmly express your disappointment (not your anger) with the way her mother treated you immediately after your partner's death. If your truly nice niece tries to apologize, MIA, stop her; she's not responsible for her mother's shitty behavior. Hopefully by then you'll be ready to share a mordant/morbid laugh with your niece about the whole thing—the best possible revenge you could have over her mother.
I'm not going to yell at you.
I'm also not gonna crawl into your boyfriend's head and attempt to articulate his feelings about his ex, NTBYA, and I'm not gonna tell you to leave him so he can work through this shit. I'm going to tell you to keep dating this guy—say yes to the great sex and the divine pork butts—and then I'm going ask you a simple question:
What's the worst thing that could possibly happen, NTBYA?
He could dump you. That's the worst thing that could happen, right? Getting dumped is what you're worried about. You could date this guy, really fall for him, and wind up alone. He could very well dump you because he's still hung up on his ex—or it could be something else. He might dump you because your personalities don't mesh or he might dump you because you want kids and he doesn't or vice-versa. He could get completely over his ex and still wind up dumping you. He could have no exes at all—you could be his first girlfriend ever—and he could still wind up dumping you.
So let's say he dumps you. What do you have left? Besides a broken heart, which people acquire and get over every day (not the same people on the same day), what do you have? Let's make a short list...
1. Your youth.
2. Your friends.
3. Your career.
You're going to be fine, NTBYA. Even if the worst thing happens—even if he dumps you—you'll be okay. And you know what? He might not dump you. You might dump him. Or you might not ever dump each other and you'll be eating his divine butt for the rest of your life.
It's like this, NTBYA: There's no dating, there's no falling in love, there's no nothin' without risk. Everyone out there who's in a relationship or a marriage or a slave collar has run the risk of being dumped and still runs the risk of being dumped. You're not special in that regard, NTBYA, there's nothing out of the ordinary about the stakes here or the risk you're running. If you can't bear the risk of being dumped—because of an ex or some other issue—you'll have to be celibate.
Here's a better option then celibacy: Calm the fuck down. Enjoy this guy, enjoy his butt, and tell yourself that you'll be fine—if this relationship works out, if it doesn't work out.
Either way, NTBYA, you'll be fine.
Sorry, BADACRONYM, but I don't see a "both win" solution/compromise/scenario here.
It could be that stress and overwork and insecurity are behind her request to close the relationship, BADACRONYM, and maybe she'll agree to open the relationship back up once she's done with law school and after she's lost the weight and/or started to feel better about her body. But my hunch is that she's discovered, after making a good-faith effort, that nonmonogamy just isn't for her—at least when it comes to sharing you with other women. So staying with her means either you're gonna be in a monogamous relationship* (which will make you miserable) or she's going to be in a nonmonogamous relationship (which will make her miserable). And guess what? You'll both wind up miserable in the end if you stay together. Eventually the frustration of the miserable person who caved on the monogamy/nonmonogamy issue will curdle into toxic resentment and consciously or subconsciously that person, i.e., the person who was miserable first, will set out to make the other person miserable too.
So, yeah, no. Just as there's no compromise win/win position when one person in a relationship wants to have kids and the other person doesn't, there's no compromise win/win position when one person wants monogamy and the other doesn't. You're either parents or not, you're either monogamous or not.
And you're a monogamous not, BADACRONYM. You were clear about that from the start—you were clear about who you are, what you need, and the kind of commitment you're capable of keeping. Mathilda is now asking you to make precisely the kind of commitment you know you can't keep and you've told her you can't keep, BADACRONYM, and you would be foolish to make that kind of commitment and she would be foolish to believe you if were foolish enough to make it.
Let's pause here to play let's pretend for a quick second: If Mathilda had told you back when you first got together that she wanted a monogamous commitment and you agreed to be monogamous and then you unilaterally informed her—after moving in together, after adopting a rescue dog together—that you not only wanted to open the relationship up but that you insisted on opening it up right now, BADACRONYM, no one would hesitate to identify you as the bad guy.
So should you end it? No, BADACRONYM, you shouldn't. Mathilda helped you get started and now she's in school and she needs your support. But you should, for your own sanity, and to avoid "cheating" on Mathilda, remind her that you never made a monogamous commitment to her and inform her that you will not have a monogamous commitment imposed on you by ultimatum. If she ends this relationship as a result—if she leaves the nonmonogamous relationship she entered into with you—then leaving was her decision, BADACRONYM, not yours.
* I predict that her offer to let you suck all the dick you want will be rescinded the first time you suck a dick.
Take it away, Wikipedia...
Cousin marriage is marriage between cousins (i.e. people with a common grandparent or people who share another fairly recent ancestor). Opinions and practice vary widely across the world. In some cultures and communities, cousin marriage is considered ideal and actively encouraged; in others, it is subject to social stigma. Cousin marriage is common in the Middle East, for instance, where it accounts for over half of all marriages in some countries. In some countries outside that region, it is uncommon but still legal. In others, it is seen as incestuous and is legally prohibited: it is banned in China and Taiwan, North Korea, South Korea, and in less than half of the United States. Supporters of cousin marriage where it is banned may view the prohibition as discrimination, while opponents may appeal to moral or other arguments. Worldwide, more than 10% of marriages are between first or second cousins.
What's that, Slate?
A new group is struggling for acceptance. The group is people who are married to their cousins. These people note that 20 percent of marriages around the world are between first cousins, that Albert Einstein and Charles Darwin married their first cousins, and that first-cousin marriage, while prohibited in half the United States, is legal in Canada and throughout Europe. Now a study by the National Society of Genetic Counselors says that having a child with your first cousin raises the risk of a significant birth defect from about 3-to-4 percent to about 4-to-7 percent. According to the authors, that difference isn't big enough to justify genetic testing of cousin couples, much less bans on cousin marriage. From this, the media have concluded that marrying your first cousin is "OK." Is it?
Slate's William Saletan goes on to conclude that marrying your first cousin isn't okay—which is easy for him to say, since he's already married, and the woman with whom he fell in love wasn't a cousin. (Or was she? "No two people are more distantly related than 50th cousins," says the fact sheet at CousinCouples.com.) But still, INCEST: seeing as it's perfectly legal for first cousins to marry in 26 states, and seeing as first-cousin marriages are recognized in all fifty states (and in Europe, Canada, and elsewhere), your reaction to a couple of cousins doing a little D/s on the DL seems a bit over the top. If a polyamorous bisexual girl can marry her cousin—and she can, INCEST, and that's not news to you ("I know it's legal in some states")—why the fuck can't a polyamorous bisexual girl mess around with her cousin?
That said, William Saletan isn't the only person on earth unnerved by the thought of first-cousin relationships—there wouldn't be a need for pleading websites like CousinCouples.com ("The world's primary resource for romantic relationships among cousins") if cousin couplings didn't freak some people out. But there's no need for mental health professionals or ultimatums, INCEST. Chill, cuz.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
National Child Abuse Hotline: 1-800-4-A-Child (1-800-422-4453)
UPDATE: A followup question for Meghan Fagundes:
DS: Do juvenile sex offenders who are taken in for treatment—or reported to the authorities—wind up on sex-offender registries for the rest of their lives?
MF: Generally speaking, no. The overall sentiment is that juvenile registries are more harmful than anything, and some sexually abusive youth never go through the legal process, so that would not be the outcome for them. However, there are some that do have to register. This is another one of those things that depends on so many factors, one of them being that different states have different laws about who is required to register as a juvenile: http://www.csom.org/train/juvenile/7/7_4.htm.
That said, even if you live in a state without juvenile registration requirements, if you are adjudicated for a sex offense as a juvenile, but don't complete your probation requirements by the age of majority, you are often then required to register as an adult. I've known kids who sexually abused someone at the age of 14, who, by the time they went through the legal process, found an opening at a treatment facility and completed the program, and/or served their time in a detention facility, were well over the age of 18. At that point, if they were still on probation, and then, for example, violated their probation requirements (even with an unrelated charge), it would be possible that they would have to register for life as an adult sex offender.
I hate to be the one to break this to you, FAP, but your ability to appreciate all forms of pornography isn't evidence that you're more highly evolved than the rest of us poor motherfuckers or that you've forsaken or seen through or outgrown or escaped MALE and FEMALE.
So what's up with you?
You can't have M2M sex, that's true, but let's take a second to think about why you might enjoy M2M porn. Thinking... thinking... GOT IT: you're a bi woman and you're attracted to guys. You're into guys and there are guys in M2M porn so M2M porn works for you because there are guys in it and you're into guys. Make sense? F2F porn works for you because you're attracted to women and M2F porn works for you because you're attracted to men and women. Whatever kind of porn is available, whatever you pull up on XTube, there's something/someone in it for you.
Straight guys, on the other hand, generally don't enjoy M2M porn because... thinking... straight guys aren't attracted to other guys. There's nothing in gay porn for them. Likewise, most gay men aren't into F2F porn because there's nothing in F2F porn for us. And while some gay men enjoy straight porn, APFAP, it's not because these gay guys are into M2F sex. Gay guys who watch straight porn almost always focus/perv on the guys, projecting themselves into the action and the girls out of it. ("I predominantly watch straight porn," Raziel Reid wrote at the Daily Xtra, "imagining I’m the lucky bitch." Ironically the piece is about the small handful of straight guys—or straight-identified guys—who actually do watch M2M porn.)
Lesbians screw up my neat and orderly porn universe, as there are tons of lesbians out there who watch M2M porn. Some of these M2M-porn-watching lesbians have called into my podcast to explain that since most F2F porn is terrible (fake lesbians having fake lesbian sex for straight male viewers) they watch gay porn instead because the guys aren't fake and they're really fucking and they're obviously into it. Two things: a lot of the guys in gay porn aren't into and are faking. And if the converse were true—if M2M porn was terrible and F2F porn was amazing—I wouldn't watch F2F porn instead. So... something else is at play, I'm thinking, with lesbians who watch gay porn, even if I'm not sure what.
Summing up, FAP, you're attracted to men and you're attracted to women and so you like all kinds of porn. You haven't forsaken male and female—you're into both male and female. And that's fine, that's great, it's not fine to fault people who are incapable of enjoying all forms of porn the same way you do. You're essentially saying, "There's something wrong with people who who aren't just like me and don't do sex and gender the same way I do it." It's not okay when straight people say shit like that, FAP, because it's not... what? It's not respectful.
Saying "I would so totally fuck the shit out of you if you were single," or some variation on that theme ("I would so thoroughly enjoy an FWB arrangement if you should find yourself single again..."), seems like dick move. But anyone who would end the relationship they're in after hearing something like that—a guy who would dump his girlfriend for some NSA sex with an old family friend—isn't in any sense committed to their person they're with now.
If your old friend's commitment to his girlfriend is so flimsy that he would dump her for NSA/FWB sex with you, WTFTF, he would be doing his girlfriend a favor by dumping her. And you would be doing her a bank-shot favor.
Make the offer.
Probably not a question I should answer in a rush to get on an airplane. But here goes...
Gender identity, unlike marrying a pillow or pushing "realistic dolls" around in prams, is not an affectation or an eccentricity or plain ol' batshittery. Gender identity goes to the core of who we are and how we wish to be—or how we fundamentally need to be—perceived by others. Take it away, Human Rights Campaign:
The term "gender identity," distinct from the term "sexual orientation," refers to a person's innate, deeply felt psychological identification as a man, woman, or some other gender, which may or may not correspond to the sex assigned to them at birth (e.g., the sex listed on their birth certificate)... Transitioning is the process some transgender people go through to begin living as the gender with which they identify, rather than the sex assigned to them at birth. This may or may not include hormone therapy, sex-reassignment surgery, and other medical procedures.
Unlike amputating healthy limbs (which some doctors will do, if only to prevent "transabled" people who may have "body integrity identity disorder" from amputating their own limbs) or thin people starving themselves to death because they think they're fat, transgender people who embrace their true gender identity and take steps toward transitioning are happier and healthier. That said, transitioning is not a panacea.
You seem pretty concerned about the surgical removal of healthy body parts. To which I would say...
Other people's bodies—and other people's body parts—are theirs, not yours. And if someone needs to change or even remove some part(s) of their body to be who they are and to be happy and to be healthy, they should have that right. That said, NSFM, not all trans people get surgery, top or bottom, and many trans people change everything else (they take hormones, they get top surgery) but opt to stick with the genitals they were born with. (The ones they were born with tend to work better than the ones that can currently be constructed for them.) But unless you're trans yourself, currently sleeping with a trans person, or about to sleep with a trans person, NSFM, it's none of your business what any individual trans person elects to do with their genitals.
For me it boils down to letting people be who they are and do what they want. Sometimes people do things for what can seem like silly and/or mystifying reasons (marry pillows, vote Republican, grow beards), while sometimes people—sometimes even the same people—do things for very serious reasons (come out of the closet, alter their bodies to bring them into alignment with their gender identities). Unless the choices being made by other people impact you in some immediate or material way—unless someone wants to marry your pillow or wants to sleep with you or wants to persecute you politically or economically—there's no conflict for you to resolve. All you gotta do is strike the right balance between minding your own business and embracing/celebrating the infinite diversity of the human experience.
Dilemma? Put up two profiles, HTIT, one for
My response after the jump...
Your letter confused me, CUCK. Here's why: You describe your relationship as open, then as poly, then as a "cuckolding thing."
First things first: Polyamorous relationships and open relationships are two different things. Some poly relationships are open, but many poly relationships are closed—that is, three people (or more) are involved with each other exclusively, i.e., no randoms, no romancing potential fourths, fifths, or sixths. The reverse is also true: Not all open relationships are poly. Two people in an open relationship may allow fucking around with other people with the understanding that there will be no dating or—God forbid—falling in love with anyone else.
And then there's cuckolding. The whole "cuckolding thing" is about the female half of a heterosexual couple breaking the rules and then rubbing her partner's nose in the evidence of her cheating. (Some cuckolds get off on literally having their noses rubbed in the evidence.) Cuckolding is eroticized betrayal, CUCK, and you spent months fantasizing with your girlfriend about being betrayed. All that dirty talk, all those made-up stories—remember? But when it came time to turn your fantasies into reality, CUCK, you laid out the rules for what sounds like a fairly standard open-not-poly relationship: She could fuck other people and so could you. Once again, I'm confused: The cuckold in a "cuckolding thing" typically doesn't get to fuck around. He gets fucked around on.
If your discussions with your girlfriend were as confusing as your letter, CUCK, it's possible that she was likewise confused. It's possible that she thought the rules applied to you and not to her. It's possible that she figured she was free to break the rules because betrayal turned you on. Now she knows that betrayal turns you on as a fantasy and not a reality.
I'm giving your girlfriend the benefit of the doubt here, CUCK, but seeing as you love her and want to make this work, and seeing as girlfriends who are open to cuckolding are hard to come by, on, and in, I think you should give her the benefit of the doubt, too. Time will tell if she's an honest "cheater" who can be trusted or a lying cheater who must be dumped.
My response after the jump...
I'm going to take your problems one at a time, NCWTD, in ascending order of importance/assholery.
1. A disappointing blowjob is always less disappointing than no blowjob at all, NCWTD, particularly for teenage boys. So it's always better to err on the side of blowjobs.
Yes, you'll probably be pretty inept at first. Take things slowly and only take him as far into your mouth as you feel comfortable with. (Feel free to wrap a fist or two around the base of his cock so you can control how fast and far his dick goes into your mouth.) Don't let your boyfriend rush or guilt you into blowing him until he comes by pointing to all the times—all the three times!—that he went down on you. Sucking cock is physically trickier and more taxing than eating pussy. That may seem crazy unfair—hasa diga eebowai—but on the bright side, it frees you from having to get him off with your mouth the first few dozen times you attempt to blow him.
2. Probing is low-risk for pregnancy, NCWTD, but there's still some risk. What worries me is that this activity makes you uncomfortable and either you haven't said anything to your boyfriend or you have said something and he's doing it anyway. Tell him no more probing, if you haven't already, and if he initiates probing after you've made it clear that you're not comfortable with it, break the fuck up with him. Which brings us to...
3. You're going to have to go Bitch Puddin' on his ass, NCWTD. Memorize this, say it to him, and mean it: "If I let you stick your dick in my vagina and I get pregnant, I am getting an abortion. If you can't live with that—if you aren't willing to shoulder the psychic risk of knowing that your girlfriend would get or actually got an abortion, while she shoulders the actual physical risk of an unplanned pregnancy—then I am never going to let you stick your dick in my vagina. You're free to disagree with my choice, of course, but you can't prevent me from making that choice. So what's it going to be?"
My response after the jump...
He's a sex worker, WTBR, not a moron.
Backing up: If we were talking about your lawyer or hairstylist or housekeeper—anyone else with whom you had a client/service-provider relationship—you wouldn't hesitate to send flowers and a card. The only reason you're hesitating in this case is because you fear outing your masseur as a sex worker. And here's what's fucked up about that: You're assuming that he isn't already out about doing sex work. You're assuming that being outed as a sex worker is the worst possible thing that could happen to him (I think your masseur can attest that there are worse things). And—most shockingly—you're assuming that your masseur is too stupid to cover for himself if he isn't out about doing sex work and if someone else reads your card and if that person asks who you are. Trust me, should a nosy relative ask him who you are—which is highly unlikely—your masseur has lots of options before he gets around to "a decent and kind guy I sometimes jack off for money." He can say you're a friend or an acquaintance or someone with whom he's worked.
Better to risk a moment of awkwardness with a nosy relative than to fail to acknowledge your masseur's humanity at a time like this. And that's what failing to acknowledge his grief amounts to, WTBR: a failure to acknowledge his humanity. Sex workers are subjected to far too much of that by people who don't see them as fully human. Don't participate in the dehumanization of sex workers. Send the flowers.
My response after the jump...
When we speak of "beer goggles," CLOD, we refer to someone too drunk to realize that he/she has accidentally picked up—or fucked the shit out of—a type that he/she would not normally/soberly find attractive. But I don't think your friend is getting drunk again and again and going after this particular type again and again by accident. Once? Yes, that could be an accident. Twice? That could be a coincidence. But three times that you know of? Sorry, CLOD, your friend isn't going after these types because he's drunk. He's getting drunk so he can go after these types.
Before we go on, CLOD, a word about the particular term you use to describe your friend's type: transvestite. That word? I don't think it means what you think it means. A transgender woman is not a transvestite, and a transvestite is not a transgender woman. A trans woman is someone who was "coercively assigned male at birth," as they say on Tumblr, but who now identifies and lives as female. A transgender woman may or may not have had sex-reassignment surgery—which means, of course, that a transgender woman could have a dick or she could have a pussy. "Transvestite" is an archaic term for "crossdresser" that no one uses anymore.
Now, I don't know what your friend is looking for in a sex partner, CLOD, but considering his observed pickup history ("a really masculine- seeming girl," "Kevin Garnett in a wig," "another manly looking transvestite type"), it's possible that he's not interested in either trans women or crossdressers.
I did drag for nearly a decade, and there was a certain kind of guy who lurked around drag shows. By all appearances, these guys were straight. But they weren't interested in women, they weren't interested in boys who could pass, and they weren't interested in trans women. They were interested in "girls" who were obviously men in drag. They were interested in guys like me: six foot eight in heels, big tits, 26-inch waist (thank you, waist cincher!), and a latex minidress. I was pretty, but I didn't look like a woman, cis or trans, I looked like a great big fuckin' drag queen. (My drag name? Helvetica Bold.)
The queens I ran with called the guys who wanted to fuck us "panty chasers." It was an odd choice, seeing as none of us actually wore panties. (Trans and cis women wear panties, CLOD; drag queens wear dance belts over tights.) I didn't know at the time that there was an actual $20 term for guys who were into us: gynandromorphophiles, aka "lovers of males in the shape of females." Some gynandromorphophiles are into crossdressers, some are into drag queens, and some are attracted to trans women. While some want partners who can pass, many gynandromorphophiles do not. They want the mix to be obvious. Give the kind of gynandromorphophile who chased after me and my friends in drag a choice between a "real woman"—cis or trans—and a guy who looks like "Kevin Garnett in a wig," and he'll choose Kevin Garnett every time.
So back to your panty-chasing friend, CLOD. I'm pretty sure the reason you've never seen him "act this way when sober" is because booze provides him with the courage he needs before he picks up "Kevin Garnett in a wig" and the alibi he needs after. My advice: Stop cock-in-frock-blocking your friend and let him know you accept him for who he is, and you may help him find the courage to accept himself before his liver gives out.
You're right, WHOOPS—the alcohol was your biggest mistake. But let's tackle those conflicted feelings first. 
On the one hand, WHOOPS, you're upset about a mutual-but-impaired decision to revise your ground rules. (At least that's how your husband describes the decision.) On the other hand, WHOOPS, you're upset you didn't get to fuck someone else after making that mutual-but-impaired decision to revise your ground rules. Hm. It seems to me that your anger with the husband is a little misplaced. Your spouse may bear more responsibility for how things unfolded—if you don't recall the convo about revising the ground rules, WHOOPS, then you were in no condition to consent to revising those ground rules—but your feelings about what happened next (or didn't happen next) either get your husband off the hook or hang you on the hook right next to him. Because if you were too drunk to consent to altering the rules, WHOOPS, then you were too drunk to consent to the sex you wanted to have with that other guy and would've had with that other guy if the alcohol hadn't decided to intervene*.
To put it another way, WHOOPS, you can be upset about one or the other of these options but not both:
1. You're upset about the rule change but you're not upset about the sex you missed out on.
2. You're not upset about the rule change but you are upset about the sex you missed out on.
Even if you were to pick one option—even if your feelings were logically consistent—the fact that you're upset doesn't change. You're upset. You have every right to be upset. You can't help but feel your feelings. But when we slap the "hurt" label on a feeling, WHOOPS, we're naturally gonna look around for someone to blame for causing us that hurt. And... your husband is the most convenient and obvious target.
My advice: peel the "hurt" label off this particular upset, WHOOPS, and resist assigning blame. Your first experience with bringing other partners in didn't go well, you feel let down, you feel like you missed out. But not every "foray into this type of experience" (or any type of experience) is successful the first time you give  it a go. Plus, this attempted experience included booze, genitalia, playrooms, rules, and emotions, making  fucking (see: your husband) a likelihood, but also upping the odds of fucking everything up (see: the both of you).
But, hey, you learned some things, WHOOPS! Things that are going to help you get this right next time! 
Things like...
Don't get wasted. If you need something to take the edge off next time, try a little—very little—pot. It'll chill you out without obliterating your judgment, memory, or impulse control. But don't go too hard on the weed, either. Try something mellow, something like this. (Link kindasorta SFW.) 
Revise your rules before the next party but don't revise them at the party. Reevaluate what you're both looking for from this experience. You say oral and penetrative sex was off the table, which means I'm assuming you were looking forward to... mutual masturbation? Having sex with each while people watched? It also sounds like you were always planning to share your husband at some point—full swap, the swingers call it—but now you're feeling (understandably) apprehensive, you fear a potential repeat, you missed out last time and don't want to miss out next time. So new rule: you get fucked (by someone else) first. If your husband still has a problem following the rules, this sort of scene—parties with with hotties, opportunities, and alcohol—might not be right for you. Meeting up with just one other couple in a bar or a restaurant, i.e. someplace without a fuckspace playroom, could be a better plan.
Take a break. Let this rest for a bit if you're feeling worked up. It'll be better to come back to threesome/swinging/playroom stuff with a fresh perspective than to bring in tension and anxiety.
* Alcohol is an inanimate (if fluid) object, and does not have agency.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
Inexperience might explain extreme emotional neediness, CCG, but it's no excuse. It's just as likely that your boyfriend's clingy, manipulative shtick—he just can't sleep alone, you're his everything, if you go back to a job you loved before you loved him, well, he'll be vewy sad—looks to me like controlling, emotionally abusive behavior in pathetic sad-clown drag.
But you like him, CCG, so let's give him the benefit of the doubt, shall we? Tell your boyfriend that you're going back to your old job and he has a choice to make: Get over it or get over you.
If he sucks it up and makes an effort to change, he was just an insecure little douchebag and, hey, you helped him get over it! If he doubles down on the whining and clinging, then he's a controlling dick and you're well rid of him.
My response after the jump...
I get questions about female ejaculation every day—where does that shit come from? How the hell can I/my girlfriend learn to do that shit? Is that shit really piss?—but you're the first person to ask me about modifying a sex toy so as to enable a woman to come in a man's ass. (You're going to want to patent that thing if it works, OMFG.)
Allow me to quickly dispense with the usual questions: It comes shooting out of a woman's urethra; practice, practice, practice; that shit isn't piss. How do we know it's not piss? Science!
In 2007, a crack team of sex researchers in Vienna "collected" lady ejaculate from two lady ejaculators—not a huge sample, admittedly, but two lady ejaculators are better then none—and rushed their lady ejaculate to the lab, where it was "evaluated biochemically." They published the results of their study in the Journal of Sexual Medicine ("The Female Prostate Revisited: Perineal Ultrasound and Biochemical Studies of Female Ejaculate," JSM, September 2007). They concluded that lady ejaculate isn't piss, it's come: "The fluid emitted [was] clearly different than urine voided prior to sexual activity," they wrote. "The values show that the source of fluid expulsion during orgasm is not urine, but is rather similar to male ejaculate."
As lady ejaculate is chemically similar to gentleman ejaculate, OMFG, the risks of a lady ejaculating in your ass would presumably be similar to the risks of a gentleman ejaculating in your ass: You would be at risk of acquiring any sexually transmitted infection she might have. But if your lady ejaculator is disease-free, OMFG, then letting her come in your ass is a risk-free, if not squick-free, activity.
My response after the jump...
You don't say how long you've been dating this guy, FP.
If you've been fucking him for a while and you still haven't found a groove, well, it might be best to move on. Liberalism and RuPaul's Drag Race are nice, but they're not enough to sustain a long-term romantic relationship.
But if you've been dating him a short time, FP, and there's been some noticeable improvement on the chemistry front, you might want to stick around. Sometimes the chemistry is there and obvious from the start; sometimes chemistry kicks into gear after a few weeks or months. If you dig him—and it sounds like you do—then he's worth the investment of a little time. As for the little dick, well...
How big is his forearm?
My response after the jump...
Knowing that she could be disqualified due to the size of her clit, which she can do nothing about, or the presence of pubic hair, which she can do something about (but might not want to), is information a woman might want before she invests a lot of emotion, time, and effort in you, CMA. Or any emotion, time, and effort. But there's literally no way to ask a woman to show you her clit or to verify either her "baldness" or willingness to go bald in advance of that crucial first date. Even women with six-inch clits who suffer from neck-down alopecia (credit: tinyurl.com/5vle95) are going to run screaming after hearing a request like that.
Don't get me wrong, CMA: It's a fine thing to have preferences, to be aware of them, and to be able to articulate them. And most people would prefer to be with someone whose preferences roughly jibe with their attributes. But most of us would also like to think—even if it's not true—that our personalities are so winning that our partners would love us even if, say, our clits were tiny and our pubes towering.
So what do you do? Well, CMA, since being up-front about your very particular, deal-breaking preferences would result in your never seeing another pussy again in your life, I think you keep your mouth shut. You're just going to have to date and invest the time. And then if you discover once you get into her pants that her clit is too small or her pussy is too hairy, CMA, just make up a nice, polite it's-not-you-it's-me lie. It wouldn't be fair to leave her wondering what the hell is wrong with her, when in actual fact there's something wrong with you.
My response after the jump...
Denying it won't work if your vengeful ex has photos or video that she's willing to deploy. So if there's documentary evidence, KINK, prepare yourself to own your kink and laugh it off. Assholes and vengeful exes can only use the details of your turn-ons against you if you're ashamed of them. If you don't care who knows, KINK, or you can fake it, the people who know won't care that they know, you know? Shrug off the reveal, laugh along with any good-natured ribbing, and look on the bright side: You could have mutual female friends who are interested in pegging and, after they hear the news, interested in you.
My Response after the jump...
It depends, BUTT.
You can enjoy lube-it-up-and-stick-it-in anal without incurring too great a risk of injury so long as your boyfriend isn't shoving his entire dick up your ass in one thrust. If he's pushing his dick in you gradually but firmly, giving your poor butt a chance to relax and adjust as he "forces" his way in, then you'll probably be okay. 
That said, BUTT, while it's a fine thing to enjoy a little pain during sex—or "sensation play," as the kinksters have taken to calling it—making your asshole the focus of erotic pain isn't a sensational idea. Anal fissures and tears take forever to heal, and even a small one can put your ass out of commission for months. A big one can put your ass out of commission for years.
There are plenty of ways your boyfriend can make you hurt during anal without brutalizing your hole. He can slap your ass, yank on a pair of tit clamps, pull your hair, crank up the juice on an e-stim unit. You've got nerve endings all over your body, not just in and around your hole.
My response after the jump...
Monogamous couples have one rule about fucking other people—"don't fuck other people"—but nonmonogamous couples have all sorts of different rules, TOP, and sometimes a particular couple's particular rules make it hard for a third to verify that the partnered person he's sleeping with is, in fact, in an honest and healthy open relationship.
That said, most couples with a "don't want to know about the other people you're fucking" rule—and that's a pretty common rule—also have a rule against getting emotionally involved with the other people they're fucking. So if it's against the rules for the guy you're seeing to introduce his boy-on-the-side to his boyfriend, TOP, odds are good that swapping "I love yous" with his boy-on-the-side is against the rules, too.
Someone is being lied to here. Either this guy is lying to you about being in an open relationship or he's lying to his boyfriend about not getting emotionally involved with the other guys he fucks. Whichever it is, TOP, I don't see a future for you with this guy—or much of a future for him and his boyfriend, frankly.
But to answer your question: No, TOP, don't relax. DTMFA.
My response after the jump...
Seeing as I think saying, "You're doing it wrong, do it better, but don't ask me how I want it done," is an asshole move, TIWDIW, I'm tempted to give asshole advice. Something along the lines of "take a swig of Tabasco sauce immediately before popping his dick in your mouth."
You seem like a good sex partner, TIWDIW, GGG and open to constructive criticism. But "Your blowjobs bore me—do something about it!" isn't constructive criticism. It's destructive criticism, the kind of feedback that can leave a sex partner feeling inadequate and self-conscious. To be constructively critical, your husband needs to come through with some suggestions and direction—something more helpful than "surprise me." (I bet he'd find that mouthful of Tabasco sauce surprising.)
Now, maybe your husband has no clue what he wants. But that's still no excuse for "Your blowjobs bore me. Fix it! Creatively!" Your husband should've tossed out some suggestions and invited you to do the same, and you two should've given 'em all a whirl until you found a few new tricks that worked.
Minor unfairnesses slosh around relationships like water in the bottom of a canoe, of course, but "Be creative!" in this context isn't just unfair, it's paralyzing. Putting all the responsibility for busting out new tricks on the shoulders of the person whose blowjob/assfucking/bondage skills have been criticized rarely results in the criticized person busting out new and mind-blowing blowjob/assfucking/bondage moves. A destructively criticized sex partner is apt to shut down. So your husband isn't just guilty of unfair behavior here, TIWDIW, he's guilty of self-defeating behavior. Meaning, you may be able to give better head—we all have room for improvement—but this is not the way to go about getting better head from you.
Finally, TIWDIW, you mention that your husband was your first partner. Can I ask how many women he's been with? If the answer is "not many," then I would respectfully suggest to your husband that his frame of reference may not be large enough to craft a truly informed critique of your blowjob technique. For all he knows, you give amazing head. (Cue the straight men who'll tell your husband that he should be happy he's getting blowjobs at all, that you wouldn't catch them complaining if they were getting regular and enthusiastic blowjobs eight years into their marriages, etc.) But routine can make even the best blowjobs seem boring. So it may not be the how of your blowjobs that bores him, TIWDIW, but the when and the where. Give him the same old head in a new and exciting place (outside?) or in a new and exciting circumstance (his hands tied behind him?), and see if that doesn't make your blowjobs exciting again.
And while we're on the subject of oral sex: How are your husband's cunnilingus skills these days? If they're not all they could be, now's the time to tell him.
Talk to your husband about what's up—calmly, MISS, without shaming him. Ask him what he's thinking and what he's feeling without demanding a final answer. Then tell him how you're feeling: You miss your husband, you miss PIV sex, you miss his orgasms.
The word "phase" has so much terrible/awful/no good baggage attached to it that we should probably sidestep it. So let's just say that it's possible all the gender stuff—the makeup, the hair, the feminization—is just a shiny new thing that he's excited about exploring and in his excitement he's lost sight of your needs. That this gender stuff seems to have come wrapped up in submissiveness and the deemphasizing of his orgasms could mean it's just a kink for him. It's not about who he is (it's not about his gender identity, i.e. he's not a woman), it's about things he wants to do (it's about newly discovered kinks, i.e. submissiveness, "forced" feminization, orgasm denial). But it's also possible this could be a combo platter that encompasses gender identity and sexual interests.
Things might even out when the sight of himself in makeup isn't so exciting and new—the playing with gender and his submissiveness could become a part of your routine without completely dominating it—or who knows? He may have gender issues that were always there and he always kindasorta knew but he had never faced them. Or maybe he have always had gender issues that he wasn't consciously aware of and you and Ru accidentally made him aware of them. He may be on a journey of self-discovery that shakes his life up in a profound way—his life and yours. Only time will tell.
And in the meantime, MISS, enjoy the cunnilingus.
Relax, SEARCH.
You're not going to be locked away and charged as a pedophile for falling down a questionable clickhole. In this circumstance, SEARCH, you didn't even see the images. Google saved you! In fact, Google actively combats child exploitation online, often through complicated techie tools which allow them to remove child sexual abuse images without humans having to do a manual review. A note from the company's official blog:
Since 2008, we’ve used “hashing” technology to tag known child sexual abuse images, allowing us to identify duplicate images which may exist elsewhere. Each offending image in effect gets a unique ID that our computers can recognize without humans having to view them again. Recently, we’ve started working to incorporate encrypted “fingerprints” of child sexual abuse images into a cross-industry database. This will enable companies, law enforcement and charities to better collaborate on detecting and removing these images, and to take action against the criminals.
You don't need to stop Google imaging porn, SEARC. With Google's rapidly developing technology (they announced a $2 million Child Protection Technology Fund a few years ago), I'd reckon Googling porn may be a safer way to seek out SSBBW images than some of the alternatives. Of course, technology is imperfect, and there are corners of the internet filled with all sorts of horrors (just like real life). But there's a big difference between stumbling on a page with removed images and actively seeking out images of child abuse. And if you do stumble over something questionable, SEARCH, report it. Don't download it for any reason (even to report it), don't forward it for any reason (ditto). Just report that shit.
If you're not comfortable doing Google searches anymore—if it makes you anxious—there must be online porn aggregates out there that do a better job sorting/gathering SSBBW content than a plain ol' Google search ever could. There are also groups/channels/users/WTF-the-lingo-is on Tumblr or Reddit that can bring you a more curated selection. 
Finally, SEARCH, I wanted to highlight something a reader sent to in January on why we should use the term "child sexual abuse images" (the term Google also uses) instead of "kiddie" or "child" porn. I know you didn't say kiddie/child porn, SEARCH, but it's reminder that bears repeating. So let's repeat it:
When I hear the words "kiddie porn" I cringe because it feels so flippant and dismissive to the horrors that I went through. "Kiddie porn" is what those who get off on the images of children being sexually abused and raped call it. The term implies—whether you mean it to or not—that it is similar to legitimate pornography (which I don't have a problem with). To me, and other survivors that I know, the term "Kiddie Porn" is painful to hear and reminds us that the worst and most humiliating moments of our lives are floating around out there being watched by a myriad of individuals who get off on our pain and suffering. It also feels like those who use the term don't see what we went through as sexual abuse or rape.
I know you have the influence to change how people talk about issues related to sexuality and for this reason I am imploring you to start referring to child pornography as "child sexual abuse images" or "child rape images." It doesn't roll off the tongue the way "kiddie porn" does—but maybe that's a good thing.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Love the acronym, GRAMPS. Well done! As for your fuck buddy...
He's having what are known as "dry orgasms." Take it away, Mayo Clinic:
A dry orgasm can occur as a result of surgery to remove the prostate gland and surrounding lymph nodes (radical prostatectomy) or surgery to remove the bladder (cystectomy). After either of these procedures, a man will no longer produce semen. In some cases of dry orgasm, semen is produced but goes into the bladder instead of out through the penis during sexual climax. This is known as retrograde ejaculation and is most often a consequence of medical procedures, particularly some prostate surgeries. It can also be caused by certain medications and health conditions.
Your decade-heavy/boyfriend-lite spank buddy says he doesn't remember whether he still has his prostate gland, GRAMPS, but I'm not buying it. Undergoing a prostatectomy isn't an experience that would slip the mind of an older guy still sharp enough to entertain a woman 44 years his junior—particularly an older guy who can still paddle a pussy competently. Unless his urine is cloudy after he comes (easy enough to slyly check that out), I'm guessing that this guy, like millions of men his age, has had his prostate gland  removed. And I'm guessing he's lying to you about it.
Why would he lie? Another guess: he knows he's never going to have a wet orgasm ever again—he knows semen producin' and spoogin' days are behind him—but the idea that you think he might blow at any moment turns him on. The thought of you looking at his dick and seeing a gun that might have a bullet in the chamber—seeing you handle his dick like it just might go off—that turns him on. 
Regardless, GRAMPS, you don't need to worry that he'll suddenly fill your mouth with puddle of rotten spooge. Even if by some miracle he suddenly starts having "wet orgasms" again, your spank buddy isn't going to shoot a twenty-year-old load of "bad tapioca" into your mouth. Men don't store semen indefinitely between blows. Any semen that didn't expel the last time he stored some has long since been absorbed back into the body.
Allow me to clarify...
You don't have to eradicate all expectations in order to have a successful relationship. We're all entitled to a few expectations, not all expectations are bad, there's no such thing as an expectation-free sex and/or life partner.
But some expectations are unreasonable/unrealistic, ME, and holding on to unreasonable/unrealistic expectations can doom otherwise loving, serviceable, settle-for-able relationships. (Remember, kids: there's no settling down without some settling for.) Take porn. I've spoken with lots of people (mostly women) who've ended relationships (mostly only straight ones) with people (mostly men) they genuinely liked—even loved—because they kept "catching" their partners looking at porn. A not insignificant number of these women have told me that they were in FWB arrangements with their exes and everything was great. Their exes hadn't stopped watching porn but porn suddenly wasn't a problem. Why? Because these women had one set expectations for partners (partners don't watch porn; I can tell my partner what to do when I'm not around) and an entirely different set of expectations for friends with benefits (FWBs can watch porn if they want to; you can't tell a FWB what to do when you're not around).
Call me crazy—and people do—but if you like your ex well enough to keep fucking him after "porn" destroys your relationship... maybe... instead of shitcanning the relationship you might want to think about shitcanning your expectations about porn instead? Maybe?
And then there are those people who have expectations that aren't really their expectations. Take monogamy. Is that something we want because we want it or is it something we want because we're expected to want it? For many people it's the latter. But many people from the latter group nevertheless make monogamous commitments they cannot keep and/or demand monogamous commitments they do not value. Why? Because "a lifetime of programming" has convinced them that monogamy is something everyone should want. We're told it's something every good and decent person should expect—of themselves and their partners—and no one likes to think of themselves as ungood or indecent.
For the record: monogamous commitments can be wonderful things. If monogamy is something a person wants and can do, ME, that person should go ahead and expect the fuck out of it. But if someone can't do it and doesn't value it... maybe that person would be happier if they shitcanned those monogamous expectations? Stop making monogamous commitments they can't keep? Stop insisting on monogamous commitments they don't value? Maybe?
Blah blah blah. Who put a nickel in me? Anyway, ME, turning to your particular circumstance/tale of woe...
I don't think you were the one in this relationship with unreasonable/unrealistic expectations. Wanting some primacy, not expecting 100% monogamous behavior from a guy who doesn't want monogamy—perfectly reasonable expectation, perfectly reasonable accommodation. Fucking around with so many other women that your girlfriend at home feels badly neglected, expecting that loving blandishments will compensate for that neglect—perfectly unreasonable behavior, perfectly unrealistic expectation.
It's your ex who needs to better manage his expectations going forward, ME, not you. He can't treat a primary partner the way he treated you and expect to have that primary partner in his life for long. But it's possible that a primary partner—any kind of longterm commitment—isn't something your ex wants and he's either pretending to want a longterm commitment or he's convinced he wants one because, as with monogamy, a longterm commitment is something we're told every good and decent person wants.
Whatever it is, ME, your ex needs to shitcan that shit.
P.S. The more a guy likes me, the more this seems to happen
My response after the jump...
If you looked only at porn that featured conventionally attractive women—all those skinny bitches—your girlfriend would be worried that you're not attracted to her because of her size. But she caught you looking at BBW porn, and now she's worried that her size is the only reason you're attracted to her. I don't think you can win this one, BBW, but you can try saying this to her: "I like women of all shapes and sizes, honey, including yours—as you can clearly see if you look at all the porn sites I've visited, instead of just obsessing about that particular one." I don't think it'll do much good, because your girlfriend probably doesn't want you looking at porn at all—saying it's okay, snooping, and grilling aren't signs of "okay with porn." So use private browsing, clear your browser history, or watch porn on a secure computer in a secret, undisclosed location.
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
There were a lot of distressing/depressing details in your letter, BLOW, but this was the detail that really blew my mind: Your girlfriend was willing to keep seeing the couple's therapist who advised you to cheat on her.
Wow.
Okay: Let's just set aside your traumatic history (good on you for getting help), your economic situation (props to your parents for letting you live with them), and your weight (love yourself, dude). Set all that aside and what are we left with? A classic "price of admission" conflict: You would like to have at least one blowjob before you die—one measly blowjob—but the girl with whom you want to spend the rest of your life refuses to blow you. And cheating is out of the question. So one of you will have to pay the price of admission, BLOW. You'll have to go without ever experiencing great head in order to keep her (your POA) or she'll have to either blow you (and I promise you that won't be great head) or give you permission to get blown elsewhere (the odds of that head being better are higher, of course, but I still can't promise you that the head will be great).
There's no compromise position here, no middle ground, no half-a-loafjob. You've issued dueling ultimatums and one of you is going to pay the price of admission, aka "lose."
You mentioned that your girlfriend is a fan, BLOW, which means you were probably hoping I would fix this for you by ordering your girlfriend to blow you. But I'm not going to do that. Because that would be wrong—if blowjobs aren't something your girlfriend wants to do, BLOW, your options are to accept that fact or break up with her (enlisting a strange gay man to order her to blow you isn't an option)—and because the head she would give you under duress/under orders would be so far from great head that it wouldn't solve your problem.
UPDATE: I want to second what avast2006 had to say in the comment thread:
On the other hand, you have to balance that with the fact that you might discover, after having dumped her in order to obtain the freedom to experiment, that blowjobs might not even be your thing. Some people don't find them all that wonderful, regardless of the skill of the person giving it. If she is really fabulous in bed in all sorts of other ways, this might turn out to be a really bad bargain. Be advised accordingly.
Blowjobs are way overhyped, in my opinion, and not all guys love head—not even when the person giving 'em head possesses mad skills, as the kids say/said.
I read it. You're welcome.
He asked what you would do if you got pregnant now, TTTT, not what you did the last time you got pregnant. And you answered that question fully and truthfully: You would have the baby, this man's baby, if you were to get pregnant by him. You could've taken the opportunity to disclose your previous pregnancy—and the choice you made to terminate it—but you were under no obligation to disclose that information to him. 
So you've done nothing wrong, TTTT—not then (when you terminated your previous pregnancy), not now (when you failed to disclose the abortion you had seven years ago). 
If learning about his ex-girlfriend's abortion left your new boyfriend so traumatized that he wouldn't want to date a woman who has ever had an abortion or would ever have an abortion, TTTT, then he could've and should've and most likely would've asked you a different pair of questions: "Have you ever had an abortion? Would you ever have an abortion?" But he didn't ask you those questions, TTTT. And, again, you answered the question he actually asked you. So, again, you've done nothing wrong.
As for whether you should tell him: You don't have to, TTTT, but you could and, for your own sanity, perhaps you should. And if he flips out when you tell him—if he judges you or shames you when you inform him that you, like one-in-three American women, have had an abortion—then he isn't the amazing or kind or loving person you mistook him for. A bad or shaming reaction from him outs him as an asshole in need of a prompt DTMFA'ing.
And as for your supposed recklessness...

Planned Parenthood says the withdrawal method—the man "pulling out" before ejaculating—is an effective-ish method of birth control:
• Of every 100 women whose partners use withdrawal, 4 will become pregnant each year if they always do it correctly.
• Of every 100 women whose partners use withdrawal, 27 will become pregnant each year if they don't always do it correctly.
Couples who have great self-control, experience, and trust may use the pull out method more effectively. Men who use the pull out method must be able to know when they are reaching the point in sexual excitement when ejaculation can no longer be stopped or postponed. If you cannot predict this moment accurately, withdrawal will not be as effective. Even if a man pulls out in time, pregnancy can still happen. Some experts believe that pre-ejaculate, or pre-cum, can pick up enough sperm left in the urethra from a previous ejaculation to cause pregnancy. If a man urinates between ejaculations before having sex again, it will help clear the urethra of sperm and may increase the effectiveness of withdrawal.
For comparison's sake: fewer than 1 out of 100 women will get pregnant each year if they take the pill daily; 9 out of 100 women will get pregnant each year if they screw up and fail to take the pill daily. With condoms 2 out of 100 women using condoms correctly get pregnant every year; 18 out of 100 women who aren't always use condoms correctly get pregnant every year.
Like I said: withdrawal is effective-ish. So it's not a method of birth control that I would feel comfortable using if I were a woman, TTTT, as both the risk of pregnancy is higher and it provides no protection against sexually transmitted infections. It's certainly not a method of birth control that I would feel comfortable using with someone I had only known for a month. (Is his self-control "great" or just fair? Is he trustworthy? How could you possibly know at this stage?) The risk of permanently scrambling my DNA together with someone that I had known for four short weeks—the thought of making a baby with someone I barely knew and potentially yoking myself to that person for the next 18 years—is so terrifying that I would stick to oral, anal, or manual before risking condom-less/IUD-less/pill-less PIV sex with Mr. Might Be Wonderful But Who Knows Because It's Only Been A Month.
But if you're being reckless given your past experience with an unplanned pregnancy, TTTT, then so is he. You're both being equally reckless and you both bear an equal share of the responsibility for the informed choice you made together to use the effective-ish pull-out method.
Finally, TTTT, there's a book I think you should read:
Forty years after the landmark Roe v. Wade ruling, "abortion" is still a word that is said with outright hostility by many, despite the fact that one in three American women will have terminated at least one pregnancy by menopause. Even those who support a woman's right to an abortion often qualify their support by saying abortion is a "bad thing," an "agonizing decision," making the medical procedure so remote and radioactive that it takes it out of the world of the everyday, turning an act that is normal and necessary into something shameful and secretive. Meanwhile, with each passing day, the rights upheld by the Supreme Court are being systematically eroded by state laws designed to end abortion outright. In this urgent, controversial book, Katha Pollitt reframes abortion as a common part of a woman's reproductive life, one that should be accepted as a moral right with positive social implications.
You had a normal and necessary abortion, TTTT, and you have nothing to feel ashamed about. I think reading Katha Pollitt's Pro: Reclaiming Abortion Rights could help you feel better about yourself and the choice you made. Order a copy by clicking here.
My response after the jump...
There's a movement in sex-ed circles to replace the old opt-out consent mantra, "No means no," with a new, improved opt-in consent mantra, "Yes means yes." YMY says it's not good enough to wait for the other person to stop the action with a "no," which many people—particularly young people, particularly young girl people—have a hard time doing. You have to get a "yes."
But the kind of person who doesn't give you a chance to say "no," GOY, is unlikely to solicit a "yes." Which is why we all need to advocate for ourselves in the moment.
And you failed to do that, GOY—you failed to advocate for yourself in the moment.
I don't say that to make you feel bad or to shift the blame onto your shoulders, GOY, I say it because we've all been there. Most confident, sexually active adults can point to an early experience that went too far, too fast, a sexual encounter that left us feeling the way you did after you had sex with this girl. And it's possible to walk away from an experience like that—one that left you feeling shitty and powerless—feeling empowered to advocate for yourself in uncomfortable sexual situations in the future, GOY, provided you learn the right lesson.
Here's the wrong lesson: "I'm a total fuckup who can't speak up for myself when I'm having sex, so I'd better not have sex again. Ever." That's bullshit, GOY, and what's worse, that kind of thinking can make a person more vulnerable the next time she winds up in bed with an insensitive jerk. Here's the right lesson: "I don't have to wait for someone to give me a 'chance' to say no. I can and will say no whenever I want to. I'm not going to let this happen to me again because I never want to feel this way again. Ever."
As for the girl, GOY, tell her straight up that you don't have feelings for her. And tell her why: Things went too far, too fast, and the sex ruined it for you. Don't sugarcoat things to avoid hurting her feelings, GOY, because she's got a lesson to learn, too. Hers goes like this: "I didn't ask the person I was with—someone I really liked—if she was cool with what we were doing, and I totally fucked myself out of what could've been a really great relationship. I'm not going to do that to anyone again. Ever."
Welcome to the Democratic Party, HARD. We Democrats specialize in discord and infighting, as you may have already noticed, and we like to go high while they go win elections. Democratic elected officials need all the help/backbone they can get as we stumble through Trumpocalypse, so thanks for coming over to the blue side. We especially need people in deep red territory reasoning with Trumpsters. That's hard work—thanks for taking it on.
I'm sorry to hear the country's state of affairs is wrecking havoc on your wife's libido, HARD. While some of us went in for some good, old-fashioned "terror sex" after Trump's election, others have found it difficult to get in the mood—for Trump reasons and other reasons. As Matthew Haag recently wrote, "It’s Not Just You. Americans Are Having Less Sex."
"From the early 1990s into the early 2000s, Americans generally had sex from about 60 to 65 times a year, according to the study. But after 2002, Americans appeared to lose interest. While the decline has been nearly across the board, one group seems to be pulling everyone else down: married couples."
There's no clear culprit. Our devices might be taking up too much of our time. Or maybe it's Netflix. Or maybe, as could be in your wife's case, HARD, it's Trump exhaustion. Even as a leftie living in a so-called liberal bubble, I've found it almost impossible to escape the Trump. (I was nine time zones away for more than a month and even then I couldn't escape Trump, Bannon, Conway, Tantrum Spice, et al.) So as a "self-described flaming liberal, women's rights activist" living in a very red area, your wife must feel as if she's trapped in some sort of political zombie apocalypse flick. Add family drama to the mix and a farm, HARD, and it's not too hard understand why your wife isn't in the mood. I sympathize—and you do, too, which means I've caught you before resentment set in. So there's hope.
If you're always traveling and she's working a full-time job while also running the farm, bringing up sex—one more goddamn thing she has to do today—could induce some major eye rolls or the odd meltdown. Your job may not let you help your wife out 24/7, but maybe you have enough cash on hand to hire someone to take on some of the chores or meal prep. It doesn't directly address sex, I realize, but free time creates a vacuum that sex often fills. (Sex or Twitter, one of the other.) Also, if your wife has a therapist and you don't, it might be nice for you to see one, too. You'll be able to sort out your feelings on the regular, and your wife won't feel like she's the only one who needs the psychobabble.
And finally... and I'm sure you're not going to like this much... but it's my duty to inform you that your wife's disinterest in more than once-a-week sex may not be about Trump or brothers-in-law or farming or living around so many mouth-breathing, knuckle-dragging assholes. It could just be libido. Once-a-week might be your wife's set point—the amount of sex she's up for and interested in—and she tosses out Trump or work or assholes or melts down strategically because she doesn't know how break it to you that once-a-week is as good as it's ever gonna get.
And finally-for-real-this-time, HARD, you don't say what kind of sex you're having once a week or what kind of sex you're trying to initiate the rest of the week. But if it's all PIV, all the time, HARD, then you need to take the advice I gave to WOES. Expand your definition of sex to include oral and mutual masturbation and low-stakes/minimal-effort assisted masturbation, HARD, and you may find your wife saying yes to sex more often.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
There's a movement in sex-ed circles to replace the old opt-out consent mantra, "No means no," with a new, improved opt-in consent mantra, "Yes means yes." YMY says it's not good enough to wait for the other person to stop the action with a "no," which many people—particularly young people, particularly young girl people—have a hard time doing. You have to get a "yes."
But the kind of person who doesn't give you a chance to say "no," GOY, is unlikely to solicit a "yes." Which is why we all need to advocate for ourselves in the moment.
And you failed to do that, GOY—you failed to advocate for yourself in the moment.
I don't say that to make you feel bad or to shift the blame onto your shoulders, GOY, I say it because we've all been there. Most confident, sexually active adults can point to an early experience that went too far, too fast, a sexual encounter that left us feeling the way you did after you had sex with this girl. And it's possible to walk away from an experience like that—one that left you feeling shitty and powerless—feeling empowered to advocate for yourself in uncomfortable sexual situations in the future, GOY, provided you learn the right lesson.
Here's the wrong lesson: "I'm a total fuckup who can't speak up for myself when I'm having sex, so I'd better not have sex again. Ever." That's bullshit, GOY, and what's worse, that kind of thinking can make a person more vulnerable the next time she winds up in bed with an insensitive jerk. Here's the right lesson: "I don't have to wait for someone to give me a 'chance' to say no. I can and will say no whenever I want to. I'm not going to let this happen to me again because I never want to feel this way again. Ever."
As for the girl, GOY, tell her straight up that you don't have feelings for her. And tell her why: Things went too far, too fast, and the sex ruined it for you. Don't sugarcoat things to avoid hurting her feelings, GOY, because she's got a lesson to learn, too. Hers goes like this: "I didn't ask the person I was with—someone I really liked—if she was cool with what we were doing, and I totally fucked myself out of what could've been a really great relationship. I'm not going to do that to anyone again. Ever."
My response after the jump...
There are people who manage to turn their lives upside down in pursuit of their turn-ons—there are people whose sex lives are complete fucking shitshows—and all they're into is heterosexual sex in the missionary position in their own bedrooms with the lights off. Your brother's problem isn't his childhood or his kink. His problems, plural, are his self-loathing, his attempts to swear off his kink (which leads to these binge-and-purge cycles), and the reckless ways he indulges his kink when he's bingeing.
Instead of running from his kinks—which he can't do—your brother needs to find safer, saner ways to satisfy his desire for erotic humiliation and submitting to someone else's control. People with humiliation kinks managed to find ways to get off before the internet came along, BOKB, and so can your brother.
And you need to establish better boundaries, BOKB. No more swapping pics with your kinky bro, bro, and no more hunting for evidence of your bro's ill-advised online adventures.
My response after the jump...
Obviously.
Maybe your boyfriend wants to cheat but doesn't want to be cheated on—he wants his boyfriend locked down, but doesn't want to be locked down himself—or maybe he thinks it's too soon to delete his online personal profiles. Or maybe, like a lot of gay men, he treats hookup apps like a virtual gay bar, i.e., a place where he can hang out and socialize with friends and exes and, perhaps, get his flirt on now and then.
But if lurking on Scruff and Growlr makes his newly locked-down boyfriend feel insecure, he should stay off hookup apps. Or, if he simply can't give 'em up, your new boyfriend should allow you to look at his chats whenever you care to so you can see for yourself that they're either wholly innocent (just talking with friends) or wholly innocent flirting (swapping photos and compliments with hot guys but not making plans to hook up).
I'm not in New York City, APAS, and I don't have plans to be before your deadline. But here's a little something I just pulled out of my ass: We act differently around our crushes—our behavior changes—because we scrutinize ourselves more closely when in the presence of someone we hope to see naked. Since doing or saying the wrong thing could deprive us of the opportunity to see that person naked, we start second-guessing every gesture, every statement, every glance, every boner. Basically it's the "observer effect," aka the "Hawthorne effect," but in this instance the observer and the observed are one in the same person.
That's my theory, APAS, but like I said... I just pulled that out of my ass. My readers will doubtless have theories (and asses) of their own and their theories (and their asses) might be better than mine. So be sure to keep an eye on the comment thread.
My response... after the jump.
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
I recently responded to a question from a gay man who was obsessed—suddenly, and much to his surprise/consternation—with the idea of having PIV sex with a woman in the context of a M/M/F threesome. Despite spending fifteen minutes searching through recent columns and SLLOTDs, GAYMAD, I wasn't able to locate (and link) the dude's letter and my response.  (Did I dream it?) But rest assured: there's at least one gay dude out there curious about sleeping with a woman. (Unless I dreamt it.)
But there are probably a hell of a lot more bi guys out there rounding themselves up to gay—or rounding themselves down to gay—than there are gay guys out there who are interested in fucking a woman. If a gay-identified bi guy would do the trick, GAYMAD, you might have better luck (and receive swifter service) if you advertise for one of those.
If a gay-identified bi guy simply won't do—if only a gay-identified gay guy will do—then advertise for one of those gay guys. But brace yourself for a long wait.
Blah blah blah. Your problem is a lot simpler than the length of your email would seem to indicate.
You face a choice, TMA—and it's not a choice between a woman with whom you can talk who has a husband and kids at home, control issues, a jealous streak, and a limited sexual repertoire and a woman who is good at texting and fucking but not so good at talking. It's a choice between the women you're with currently—and the dead-end relationship your in currently—and 3.5 billion other women on the planet you could be with.
And that 27-year-old woman you've been seeing for a month—one lousy month—is just one of the 3.5 billion other women on the planet.
The more time you spend with the 27-year-old you've been seeing for a month, TMA, the more shared experiences you'll have, the more you'll have to talk about. She could wind up being your chatty wife, the fecund mother of many, many children (presumably yours), and your sex slave and piss buddy and anal queen for life. Or not. You might just spend a few great months with her, have tons of amazing sex, and wind up single and alone again/for the first time in a long time if/when this relationship implodes. (And my money is on "when," TMA, as the odds of implosion are always higher when two people start talking about kids and marriage after a month.) But "single and alone again" doesn't necessarily mean "single and alone forever." If things don't work out with the 27 year old, TMA, there are still 3,499,999,999 other women on the planet.
Finally, TMA, if the married woman you're with now—the married woman you're with now—is as invested in monogamy (cough, cough) as you claim she is, TMA, it's impossible to read the affair you're having (not to be confused with the affair she's having) as anything other than your hand slamming down on the eject button. You want out and—consciously or subconsciously—and you're engineering an out. But waiting for Ms. Ten Years to find out about Ms. Four Weeks is the cowardly way to go about it. Ova and up and end it honestly.
Meeting up with the top who reached out to you and the guy whose apartment you were going to be using—his consensual slave—for an out-of-roles/we're-all-equals conversation would've been my suggestion, SLAVE, so you clearly didn't need my advice. I'm glad it worked out—and, hey, here's hoping you find a slave with an awesome apartment and convenient cage in the city where you live now.
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
There is something you can do to engage your fiancé's fetish—you can order yourself one of these. Latex catsuits aren't to everyone's taste, of course, but they do allow people with breast enlargement fetishes to explore their kinks with a partner. And if your guy happens to have a thing for both ballooning breasts and actual balloons... Yahtzee.
Ballooning breasts—that problem is easily solved. The more difficult-to-solve problem is your fiancé's selfishness and his disregard for the feelings and sexual self-esteem of the woman he claims to love. I'm happy to defend boys who watch a little porn—I'm happy to defend girls who do the same—but my defense of porn consumption is premised upon the consumer being both moderate and considerate. There are times when you just want to crank one out (while watching a little porn), there are times when masturbation (while watching a little porn) meets a need that partnered sex cannot, there are times when a person wants the release of orgasm (while watching a little porn) without having to engage with another human being who has their own wants, needs, and demands. But it's not okay to choose porn—and dirty boxer shorts (ugh)—over a waiting and willing partner again and again and again.
So, again, the problem isn't that your fiancé watches porn. Everyone's fiancé does. The problem is your fiancé's's lack of consideration the feelings and needs of his fiancée.
Don't marry this guy if you can't get him to see—maybe with the help of a kink-positive couples counselor—that what he's doing is hurtful and unnecessary. (His fiancée is ready, wiling, and able to indulge him.) You're clearly willing to meet his needs, AHTC, but he doesn't seem the least bit concerned about yours. If he can't pull his head out of his ass, his eyes off those videos, and his dick out of those dirty boxer shorts and show his love for you... don't marry him.
A multimedia response... after the jump.
There is no middle ground, SOB. So watch this and have a few laughs...

...then watch Tristan Taormino's "Expert Guide to Pegging." Then fuck the living shit out of your boyfriend's hairy, adorable little butthole. Plow it like a queen, dude.
I have some suggestions, BI, but first, here's your original letter from 2011:
I recently discovered your column through the recommendation of a friend—and I'm extremely impressed. Not only is your advice rational and helpful, it's also inspired me to think about being a little more experimentative (GGG), and stopped me from being so vanilla! I've discovered my mild sub tendencies.
Anyway, I'm a 17-year-old college freshman who's a virgin (saving myself for someone special), and I like to get off to lesbian porn. I've tried watching hetero porn, but it just doesn't turn me on the way lesbian porn does. I've heard of females getting off on male/male porn, but never of this before. Does this mean I'm a lesbian? In real life, I've never been attracted to a girl—not even one of my bi friends recounting stories of her sex life. I feel attracted to guys. I don't have a problem with being a lesbian/ bi, I'm just interested in figuring out where my tendencies lie.
First, it's interesting to note that 17-year-old you was fairly sure you didn't actually wanna have sex with a woman in real life—or that you had never met (or even seen) a woman you wanted to have sex with—while 24-year-old you is fairly sure you're not a lesbian but anxious to (finally!) have sex with a woman. Seems to me that you could be bisexual, BI, or you could be one of those women who doesn't realize she's a lesbian until she's a couple of decades into masturbating to lesbian porn. In either case, beware you don't "fairly sure" yourself into a corner. Explorations first, surities second.
Anyway...
You can call yourself whatever you want—a unicorn, a sparrow, an armadillo; heteroflexible, bicurious, lesbian—but a bicurious-at-the-very-least woman in your situation, a woman with your particular skill/desire set, is commonly called a unicorn. I didn't make that up; it's not what I call women like you. It's what women like you are called, BI, and it's both a compliment (such a delightful creature!) and an expression of frustration (so fucking hard to find one!). 
Here's the good news, BI: unicorn loneliness/horniness is a problem with millions of potential solutions—by which I mean, there are many, many people and couples out there who would like to be your solutions. Did you say that you like men, you're interested in women, and you want to explore your bicuriousity in a group setting? More good news, BI: there are lots of people in the UK who are into threesomes—I've got anecdotes (personal and private!) and data (sensationalized and sketchy!)—so, yeah, you're gonna be able to make this happen.
The good news just keeps coming, BI: there's actually an app designed for the purpose of hooking women (and men) like you up with couples and hooking couples up with women (and men) like you. It's called Feeld and was started in London under the name 3nder. It's like Tinder, but for people interested in polyamory, kink, and couples looking for unicorns. I'm told the users on Feeld tend to be kinder and more sex-positive than the average person looking for sex through apps—although there are going to be exceptions to this, of course, because awful people are everywhere. But Download Feeld anyway and introduce yourself to some Brits—or Spaniards & Brits & Germans & Austrians. London's a global city—for the moment—so why not have an big orgy in honor of the EU while it still exists?
If you're worried about safety—and you should be—tell a friend where you're going. Meet your preferred couple (or solo lady) for a quick drink after work on a night when you have another commitment you can't cancel. Go in with your bullshit detectors on high alert, use your common sense, and trust your gut. Chat about what you're looking for sexually, of course, but chat about some general topics too. (One doesn't want to find oneself in bed with a pair of UKIP supporters, does one?) Say goodbye after just one drink and then contact them later—to set up a fuckdate if you're still interested, or to thank them for their time and wish them well if you're not interested.
Good luck, BI. Be sure to send me another letter in 2024!
Thanks for sharing, JAWDROP. And while I normally wouldn't include a link to a personal ad in the SLLOTD or a column, JAWDROP, I'm making an exception for "absolutbottom." The ad is anonymous, he's a reader, and he clearly gotta kick out of seeing his ad (and his ass) discussed in "Savage Love" last week. So if you're a "Savage Love" reader with a massive cock and a thing for straight-identified bi guys (who come complete with girlfriends game to have threesomes with other bi guys)... you might wanna check out the ass on this dude.
P.S. Dan his cock is thick and beautiful and glorious when it's hard. You would approve.
P.P.S. I've been reading your column for 15 years!
Your boyfriend isn't doing this on purpose to upset you—that's inconceivable—so let's take "being an asshole" off the table. (I'm sure he finds his boner issues just as frustrating as you do, SOS, if not more so.) And he wouldn't have pursued you in the first place, texted you on Valentine's Day, been anxious to jump back in the sack with you, or have been willing to get back together with you if he didn't like you and didn't find you physically appealing. So we can also rule out "thinks you're a jerk" and "isn't attracted to you."
And I think we can safely rule out a medical problem. His dick worked 50% of the time since you got back together officially, SOS, and his dick worked 100% of the time you when you weren't together technically. So from where I'm sitting—right here at Ann Landers' desk—this looks like a cut-and-dried case of performance anxiety.
Your boyfriend's particular strain of performance anxiety seems to kick in as the emotional stakes get higher. Not in a relationship? Boners are not a problem. In a relationship? Boners are suddenly a problem. My hunch is that when you weren't officially together his erections meant one, simple, straightforward thing: He wanted to fuck you. But now that you're officially together, SOS, his erections mean a great deal more. They're no longer a simple and straightforward indication of arousal, SOS, but a barometer that he (rightly) worries his girlfriend uses to measure his attraction to her, his commit to her, and his general levels of satisfaction with the relationship—and his dick is collapsing under the weight of all that meaning.
You say you've been reading my advice for fifteen years. But apparently you missed—or failed to commit to memory (for shame)—my advice to a woman in 2005 whose husband started avoiding sex after experiencing similar difficulties:
Your husband avoids "fool around situations," or FAS, because he feels like he won't be able to satisfy you, his theory being, "no bone, no satisfaction." That seems to be your theory too, HORNYW, and embracing it is making your problem worse. It's perfectly understandable that he would avoid FAS—and the humiliation of failure—until he's absolutely positive he can keep it up. That's why the best approach in a situation like this is to take the focus—and the pressure—off his dick. Tell him he can't fail to satisfy you with oral sex, masturbation, and toys (perhaps working your way up to strap-ons), and he'll begin to think of sex as something he's good at again, boned or boneless. And guess what, HORNYW? You may find that once your husband is not expected to produce an erection during FAS, his dick starts getting hard.
I would give the same advice to you, SOS: Take the focus and pressure off your boyfriend's dick. The talks you had with him before—those three times you gently raised the subject—didn't take the pressure off his dick. Those conversations about his problem (lost erections) were framed around a premise/fix/demand (no more lost erections) that only served to put more pressure on his dick.
It's time for a new conversation. You say you've got a nice collection of toys. Instead of keeping them around for those times when you're not having sex, SOS, you need to incorporate those toys into the sex you're having. Introduce your boyfriend to your vibrators and tell him that from now on there's no reason to stop having sex when he loses his erection. Dick not cooperating? Not a problem: he can use his fingers and his tongue, he can explore your body with your vibrator, you can suck his dick more (always err on the side of sucking more), he can stroke himself while he eats your pussy or uses a vibrator on you—just keep going.
If you stop having sex when he loses his erection, SOS, success will always be contingent on his erections. But if you keep enjoying each other whatever happens—if you keep playing, erection or no erection, if you can learn to shift effortlessly from his cock to other pleasurable activities and back and forth until you both get off—the sex will always be a success.
UPDATE: Also, as the first commenter suggests, ED drugs. ED drugs + pressure off = problem solved.
They were either swingers looking for a couple to take upstairs (10% chance), DADDY, or that youngish lady is a sex worker (90% chance) and that mysterious youngish guy was her protection, her boyfriend, her pimp, or all of the above.
My response... after the jump.
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
I think astrology is annoying bullshit—which is so Libra of me—and astrological bullshittery is never more annoying than when people point to signs in an effort to excuse character flaws. Irrational jealousy is not a fault in your stars, TQ, it's a fault in your character. I'm not suggesting that there's something wrong with a woman who doesn't want to watch her boyfriend screw other girls in front of her—see the next few paragraphs—but there's definitely something wrong with a woman threatened by her SO's platonic female friends. Perhaps you have more cause to be threatened by female friends than the average girlfriend, TQ, but that brand of jealousy is something you need get over if you ever want to have a healthy, lasting relationship.
Moving on...
I'm in partial agreement with your friends, TQ, in that I think you should leave your boyfriend. But I don't think your boyfriend is a bad guy for wanting to have the occasional threesome. (I enjoy the occasional threesome and I don't think I'm a bad guy.) Your boyfriend knows himself, he knows what he wants, and he's putting it out there. The world would be a far happier place, and divorce court wold be a far less crowded place, if more people did the same before making a lifetime commitment. (But pointing to your twin sisters to justify a desire to occasionally have sex with two women at the same time? That is some deeply creepy shit—that's head-for-the-hills degree of creepiness—and here's hoping it was an ill-advised, poorly-thought-out, stomach-churning rationalization on his part and not, you know, indicative of something far more sinister.)
Here's the bottom line: You guys aren't sexually compatible. He wants something you don't think you can give him. The world has plenty of people in it who've traveled from "mildly jealous at the thought" of their partners fucking someone else to okay with it—or even into it—but I haven't met many people who managed to get from "physically sick" at the thought to happily participating. So don't draw this out: break up with your boyfriend now.
Again, your boyfriend deserves credit for being upfront about what he wants. He could just as easily have waited to tell you until after you had gotten married and had a couple of kids, TQ, and then you might've found yourself having threesomes under duress to keep your family together. That shit happens and it's awful. But that isn't going to happen to you because your boyfriend knows what he wants and was honest enough to tell you. He did the right thing. And now you need to do the right thing—for him, for yourself—and end this relationship.
My response after the jump...
••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Your fiancé has a daughter, SO, and you're going to have to reconcile yourself to that fact—for your own good, for the good of your relationship, and for the good of a little girl who needs the adults in her life to stop acting like idiots. As for Bob and Sally...
If Bob isn't paying child support, he needs to start. If Bob hasn't talked to a lawyer about his legally enforceable rights as a parent, he needs to talk to a lawyer. No one can force Sally to seek professional help—preventing a child from seeing her father because you're embarrassed about the particulars of the conception is pretty fucked up*—but she definitely needs to see a fucking shrink. And if Sally tries to cut off contact between Bob and his daughter again, Bob needs to take her to court.
Circling back to you: You've had two years to grieve over the doing-this-for-the-first-time-with-each-other thing, SO, but you avoided grieving because your fiancé's child was out of sight, out of mind. Now that kid is in sight and you're just going to have to let go of that dream. What's done is done and cannot be undone. I'm not going to tell you it's wrong to feel as if your heart is breaking—go ahead and feel your feelings—but you should try to keep this particular heartbreak in perspective. No one is dead, you haven't been dumped, and there's nothing preventing you and Bob from having kids together in the future. Make up your mind to love this kid to the best of your ability, resolve to be the best stepmom you can be, stop speculating about Sally's motives, and get on with your life.
* Exceptions: Child's father was/is a rapist, child's father was/is abusive, one or two more reasons that I've probably overlooked.
P.S. I should clarify: I cheated because I never felt I was attractive to him as I'm not in his demographic. We have supposedly moved on from that. I have major body issues and feel generally unloved and unattractive. I feel like he settled. He says that's not the case. There has been little to no romance and we have two teenage kids. Despite encouraging me to continue with the infidelity he will try to use it against me. I am just at a loss. Please don't tell me to leave him. It is just not going to happen and by the way, he thinks something bad happened to him a a kid to make him so fucked up. Nothing happened to him but I can't tell him to get over the notion he had some horrible child hood as he has too much invested in that. Whoa.
My response... after the jump.
••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Where to start?
I trust that along with the cheating, lying, shaming, guilting, addicting, and negotiating hotwifing vs. subbing... you and your husband are still finding the time to do a little parenting now and then. Adults don't stop having their own lives when they become parents, of course, and the older kids get the more time parents have for cheating, shaming, prostituting, and other adult diversions. I realize you're recounting twenty years worth of events in your letter—a great deal of history and incident—and that requires telegraphing and everything didn't happen all at once. But... man. You and your husband have had a lot to process over the years and one would hope—one would expect—that two decades in you guys would've found a groove or two that worked for you both.
But no such luck.
I'm going to give you the same advice I gave HURTME in this week's "Savage Love": "A few sessions with a kink-positive shrink might help... You can find one through the American Association of Sexuality Educators, Counselors and Therapists (aasect.org)." Your husband needs someone to help him with the shame, the possibility that something awful happened to him in his childhood, and you need to talk to someone about your body image issues and your insecurities.
As for this...
Now he wants me to be a hotwife. I want to be his sub. He has issues with being a Dom and I have issues fucking strangers. Can you refer us in a direction we can start from?
Don't freak out when I use this phrase, BDSM, because I'm not using it in the grounds-for-divorce sense but the less popular thems-the-facts sense: sounds like an irreconcilable difference to me. He's not up for BDSM, you're not up for fucking strangers. (Not anymore.) You don't want to divorce and the existence of one two or three thousand or more minor irreconcilable differences doesn't mean you have to divorce, BDSM. (If it did we would all be divorced before the wedding cake was served.) But it does mean you'll have to let go of your Dom/sub fantasies and he'll have to let go of his hotwife fantasies—at least for now.
Get yourselves to a smart, kink-positive counselor—aasect.org—to discuss your hangups, your shame, your history, and your future, BDSM, and maybe you'll be able to finally find a groove that works for both of you.
P.S. Most people have more than one "type." The fact that your husband is attracted to women his own age doesn't mean he can't also be attracted to women—and men—closer to your age. On that point you're just going to have to ova up already.
My response after the jump...
Your boyfriend can't stare at a neck wound he can't see. So until you've fully recovered, B, turn off the lights or blindfold him or lace him into a leather hood—or all three—and have sex the way the good lord intended us to, i.e., in the dark with our pitiful/regretful/hooded boyfriends. And no more flaming/stunt drinks, ferfucksake!
My response after the jump...
1. Fucking your boss's kid seems like a surefire way to get your ass fired, SON, and depending on what field you're in—and how important good recommendations and work histories are in your field—fucking the boss's son could seriously derail your career. If, you know, you manage to get caught. But if you do decide to fuck the shit out of a gorgeous, funny, sweet, and kinky adult who happens to be your boss's son, well, you wouldn't be the first person in human history to risk everything for sex. As Mark Twain observed more than a century ago: "The human being, like the immortals, naturally places sexual intercourse far and away above all other joys—yet he has left it out of his heaven! The very thought of it excites him; opportunity sets him wild; in this state, he will risk life, reputation, everything—even his queer heaven itself—to make good that opportunity and ride it to the overwhelming climax."
2. He is an adult—who is still in high school. You are not that far out of high school. Math is hard for me, SON, but according to my calculations, you're not that far apart in age. You might be sabotaging your career, but you wouldn't be robbing the cradle.
3. The campsite rule for new readers: The older and/or more experienced person in a sexual relationship with a large age and/or experience gap is obligated to leave their younger and/or less experienced partner in better shape than when they found them. That means no sexually transmitted infections, no fertilized eggs, no unnecessary drama, and no unnecessary trauma.
My response after the jump...
Sorry, SAD, but relationship graveyards around the world are crowded with tombstones that read, "Everything was great... other than the sex."
And this isn't your mundane, run-of-the-mill mismatched-libido problem, which is bad enough. (And, as I've written until my fingers are bleeding, reason enough to end a relationship.) You're dating a guy who can get it up only when he sees his girlfriend sobbing on the floor—that's apparently what it takes to make his dick hard—and this sobbing-on-the-floor shit goes down twice a month. I can only conclude that this is how your boyfriend likes it, SAD. He's turned on only when you're not just miserable but pushed past the breaking point.
DTMFA.
Frequency is not a problem that improves with time, SAD. A boyfriend who wants sex only twice a month at four months into a relationship—and then only when his girlfriend is sobbing—won't want sex once a week five or 10 years in. You know what else doesn't improve with time? Assholery. I promise you that the "wonderful" and "thoughtful" will diminish as the years fly by, and the emotionally abusive games that cause you so much pain—pain that, again, seems to give him pleasure—will metastasize, spreading from your sex life to other areas of your life. The more difficult extricating yourself from this relationship becomes, SAD, the less wonderful and thoughtful he'll become.
End it now.
My response after the jump...
What can you do? You mean besides send video of you and your bear in action to prove this isn't the most entertaining fake letter I've received since Michelle Obama invited me to dinner at Sarah Jessica Parker's house? Besides that?
You can do this: Draw a distinction between what was going on in that bear's mouth and what was going on in your head. When a man beats off—with or without a Fleshlight-enhanced bearskin rug—two things are kindasorta happening simultaneously: what the man is doing with his dick and what the man is imagining he's doing with his dick. Guys who beat off using a clenched fist, for example, generally aren't clenched-fist fetishists; they're just horny and their fists are there and Sarah Jessica Parker isn't.
So your boyfriend walked in and saw you fucking a dead bear. That's gonna look bad, BGA, even to a boyfriend who isn't vegan. So how do you fix it? By patiently explaining to your vegan boyfriend that while, yes, you were face-fucking a bear when he walked in on you—no denying it—you weren't thinking about face-fucking a bear. Tell him you were thinking about him, and the bear's mouth was just a convenient place to wedge your vegan-boyfriend-substitute, i.e., your Fleshlight. Tell your boyfriend you don't entertain any murderous fantasies, tell him you only long to fuck living things, and tell him that Homo sapiens are the only animals you find attractive.
Tell him all of that, BGA, even if not all of that is true.
My response after the jump...
I can understand why you were upset. You had already taken things to the "next level" in your heart—you were thinking of this guy as your boyfriend—you just hadn't gotten around to informing him about the upgrade. And you assumed that, when you did get around to letting him know, he would be delighted. Because he was the one who wanted a relationship at the beginning, right?
Unfortunately, he took you at your word when you said you weren't interested in a relationship. Keeping things "purely casual" meant he was free to pursue a relationship with someone else.
I can't help but wonder what he was about to say when you told him to get out. He met someone else, which wasn't a violation of your rules. Did that mean things were over between you two (which would make the timing of the last fuck an insult)? Or was he willing to pass on this other girl if you were ready for a relationship (which would make tossing him out before he could elaborate a mistake)? You probably should've heard him out.
Go ahead and reach out. Let him know that you were thinking about taking things to the next level—ughers to that phrase—before he told you about the other girl. You were starting to fall for him, you hoped he felt the same, and you were disappointed. But since he was only doing what you asked—keeping it casual—you can't fault him for keeping his options open, looking around, dating other girls, etc. And you can't fault him for failing to read your mind.
Close by telling him that you'd be open to dating—a real, non-casual relationship—if things don't work out with this other girl.
My response after the jump...
Was your boyfriend having cybersex with an ex-girlfriend? Or did it only feel like he was? I would make a distinction, SAD, because while all porn constitutes a betrayal of the terms of your relationship, interacting with a stranger and, very likely, a professional online shouldn't feel quite so threatening.
Backing way the hell up: Your boyfriend shouldn't have lied to you, SAD, but you shouldn't have been so naive as to believe him. If you can't bring yourself to forgive him for lying—if you can't put yourself in his shoes and try to understand why he might lie about this (shame, fear, a desire to spare your feelings)—then this relationship is doomed. End it and find a new boyfriend. But when your next boyfriend tells you he doesn't watch porn, you're going to look at him and say, "Suuuuuure you don't."
Ask your new boyfriend to be discreet and limit his porn consumption to an extent where you're unlikely to uncover any evidence of it, as porn upsets you. If your new boyfriend manages to do that for you, SAD, if he's considerate enough to cover his tracks, you should be considerate enough to turn a blind eye on those rare occasions when you do stumble over evidence that your new boyfriend watches porn—just like your old boyfriend did and all your future boyfriends will.
My response after the jump...
Before I can respond to your question, HITME, I've gotta sacrifice a goat to the snooping-is-always-wrong Gods, or the snooping- is-always-wrong jihadists will cut my head off. It'll just take a sec: Snooping is always wrong! You invaded your husband's privacy! That was wrong! WRONG!
Moving on...
Your husband hit the jackpot when he met you, HITME. There aren't a lot of women out there who would embrace—much less marry—a man with his particular collection of kinks. You've been GGG and all you've asked in return is... total transparency and the immediate, real-time disclosure of all outside flirtations and contacts as they happen. Why can't the kinky ingrate honor this agreement? Only he knows the answer to that question, HITME, but I suspect one of two issues is at play...
Your husband may be ashamed—he may have been brutally shamed in past relationships—about the extent of his kinks and about just how much of his time and erotic energy his kinks consume. You may be completely sincere when you tell him you're okay with everything, HITME, so long as there's immediate and full disclosure. But he may fear that sharing the full extent of his online activities will leave you feeling either squicked out or threatened. So he downplays and minimizes, disclosing some but not all, because he doesn't want to lose you. If this is the issue, impress upon your husband that hiding shit from you represents a bigger threat to his marriage than full disclosure ever could.
Or...
Having and keeping sexual secrets may turn your husband on, HITME, and having a secret life could be another one of his kinks. Even if this is the issue, HITME, I think you two should be able to come to mutually agreeable terms that accommodate both his desire to have a secret and your need for full disclosure.
Here's a potential compromise: He doesn't keep anything from you, HITME, but he doesn't disclose in real time. So long as he's not being unsafe or neglectful, so long as his online activities remain online-only, he can carry on flirting and texting and pic swapping. But every few months, you get to depose his submissive ass. You get to sit him down and ask him questions, and he answers all your questions truthfully and opens up about any current secrets that your questions didn't uncover. This way, he can have all the erotic secrets he wants (he'll just have to make new ones every few months), and you can have the transparency you need (you just won't have it immediately). Good luck.
My response after the jump...
This probably isn't what you want to hear, FFF, but here goes: You alone will ultimately never be able to fulfill your boyfriend entirely... just as he alone will never be able to fulfill you entirely. One person simply can't be all things to another person—sexually or otherwise—and unmet needs, unfulfilled desires, and unexplored possibilities are prices we pay to be in LTRs. Monogamous, polyamorous, Femdom, or whatever: All coupled people walk around feeling a little unfulfilled. (Single people, too.) Because no one gets everything they want.
So, FFF, while some aspects of the polyamorous lifestyle appeal to your boyfriend, he has decided that he prefers the kind of relationship he's in now, with its perks and drawbacks, to the hypothetical polyamorous scenarios he used to contemplate, which would've had their own perks and drawbacks. I'd say your relationship is only doomed if you can't bring yourself to take his "yes"—yes to you, yes to monoamory—for an answer.
Rare is the GF who can hear a BF say, "Yeah, I totally have a crush on this other girl with whom I socialize frequently—she's totes amazing!" without having an epic meltdown, ABC. (Rare is the BF who can hear his GF say the same, rare is the GF who can hear her GF say the same. BFs who can hear their BFs say the same are less rare, but they're far from unheard-of.) Which is why, when a person with a BF/GF/SOPATGSF* has a crush on someone else, keeping quiet about it, minimizing it if asked, and letting the crush burn out without acting on it or causing your BF/GF/SOPATGSF any undue stress by talking about it/copping to it are all considered "best relationship practices."
So if you're the kind of GF who would prefer to hear her BF say, "Yeah, I totally have a crush on this other girl with whom I socialize frequently—she's totes amazing!", ABC, you'll have to make that explicit, i.e. you'll have to tell your BF exactly that. ("I would prefer that you tell me when you have a crush on someone else. Pretending you never have crushes on other girls is a lie and I prefer not to be lied to.") But then you're not allowed to have a meltdown, epic or otherwise, when he cops to a crush.
* some-other-point-along-the-gender-spectrum-friend.
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Don't say anything to your S.O. about the dildos and the poppers and the sounds—which he wasn't making much of an effort to hide from you—until after gets back from his trip, FITS. And don't make an issue of him sleeping in another bedroom for the last few nights. Just say this to him before he goes: "I love you. I know things have been stressful lately and I hope we can reconnect and get 'us' back on track soon. Have a good trip, honey, enjoy yourself, relax, and let's talk things over when you get home, okay?"
And here's what you tell yourself to keep yourself sane while he's gone: It's possible that those are brand-new dildos and sounds and it's possible that your S.O. spent money you two don't have to waste on them. But it's also possible that the toys you found predate your relationship and he only recently pulled them out of whatever corner of the house he'd stashed them in because he was horny and needed to get off and things between you two had become so strained that he didn't feel like he could initiate sex with you. And it's highly unlikely that someone else gave those toys to your S.O. If he had been given them... if he was cheating on you... and the toys were evidence of the affair... wouldn't your S.O. have made more of an effort to hide them from you?
He may not have blown money on toys, he most likely isn't cheating on you—repeat as needed, to treat stress, while your S.O. is away for the weekend.
Then, when your S.O. returns on Sunday, FITS, ask him about the toys without making any accusations and without sounding accusatory. (Practice while he's gone.) You two haven't been connecting sexually, which you blame on money woes, but your S.O. is not without a libido. You presumably aren't without one either, FITS. It also sounds like you two aren't in the habit of speaking openly with each other about your sex life, your kinks, and your fantasies. This is your opportunity. It could be that your S.O. is bored with your sexual routine, wants to be more adventurous, and right now he's having solo adventures in the spare room with his silicone buddies. Would you like to be included in his adventures? If so, ask him to include you. (You say you can't use any of the dildos you saw in that bag. That's not true: You can use them on your S.O. Same goes for the sounds and the tit clamps.) 
If he blew money you don't have right now on toys, FITS, don't blow up at him—not unless you wanna risk turning an argument over an ill-advised, impulse-and-impale purchase into a relationship-extinction-level event. And if a conversation about his new toys leads to an open and honest exchange that (1) helps you reconnect emotionally and (2) helps you reconnect sexually, FITS, then you should regard the toys as a worthwhile investment in your future. Good luck.
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
No advice for you, BALLGAG. Sorry.
Your wife is willing to go there, BALLGAG, but binding and gagging the wife doesn't work for you because "her heart is not in it." The obvious solution is getting the wife's okay to find a woman who's heart is in it—perhaps a woman with a husband whose heart isn't—and exploring this stuff with her. (Easier to do these days, of course, thanks to this thing.) But "looking for the answer outside [your] marriage is not an option." Three-ways aren't an option either.
I'm not a miracle worker, BALLGAG. I can't utter an incantation that makes your wife kinky or open a portal into an alternate universe where you can bind and gag women without technically cheating on the wife thanks to the Universal Alternate Universe Exception. So it looks like you'll have to settle for great sex with a hot woman who gives you megaboners, BALLGAG, while jacking off about your kinks—which doesn't really sound so bad, frankly. (The comment thread on this post is gonna fill with notes from bitter middle-aged men in sexless marriages angrily offering to trade places with you.)
But you're frustrated... and fapping isn't fixing it... and you're panicking... so what do you do? Your only option and only hope is to use your words. When was the last time you talked with your wife about your sex life? If it's been a long time, BALLGAG, if you've been running on autopilot, fumes, and assumptions for 10 or more years, ask your wife where she's at these days. Your wife might surprise you. Her positions on three-ways and outside sexual contact may have softened. It couldn't hurt to ask, and asking—and getting an answer you didn't expect—is the only way out of your predicament.
My response after the jump...
I don't know who's crazier: your controlling, psychotic, hand-sniffing girlfriend, BOMBAST, or you, for sticking around and putting up with this bullshit. There's nothing wrong with having a low libido; it's not a crime to want sex only once a week. But terrorizing a higher-libido partner about whether or not he is making ends meet by masturbating now and then—and demanding to smell his hands!—is borderline abusive behavior. DTMFA, BOMBAST, and be so kind as to pass this bit of advice on to your soon-to-be ex-girlfriend: If you want a companion animal you can castrate, lady, get a dog. Not a boyfriend. Not a husband. A dog.
Congrats on that series of fortunate events, OUT, and welcome out. (Yes, you're out—a little. You just came out to me, anonymously. Baby steps!)
You don't have to know what you are exactly before coming out. You just have to know what you're not. And since you know you "100% want to date some women," OUT, that makes you not straight. Sharing that "not straight" info is scary because people might not react the way we would like them to. There are risks to coming out and the negative consequences tend to come at us first, e.g. your parents could freak out, someone you used to date could react angrily (and make it all about them), your friends or classmates could say (or do) unkind and/or clueless things. But there are also rewards. Sometimes the rewards are immediate (people react with genuine warmth and offer support, you can finally stop worrying about someone finding out your secret), but usually the rewards take time to arrive (people who reacted negatively come around, you wind up meeting people you wouldn't have met and/or loved if you didn't come out). But you can't get to the rewards without first staring down the risks.
So if you're in a position to come out now, you should. Because rewards. But if you're not in a position to come out right now—because your mom might be a raging homophobe or you might be in physical danger at your school or you might wind up without a place to live—then you should wait a year. You know your situation better than I do, OUT, and you need to prioritize your physical safety. But if you able to come out now... I've brainstormed twenty-something* ways you could do it:
1. Write an email. Some people think email is impersonal, but this is your info to share and you can choose how to share it. And you know your mom better than the rest of us do—if mom has a habit of flying off the handle when she gets unwelcome news and then calms down in a few hours and is able to discuss it calmly, sending an email and sparing yourself her initial reaction could be the best approach.
2. Scream it in a crowded room of people you know. If it gets weird, run out of the room. Repeat as necessary.
3. Bake a cake and write "I'M GAY" or "I'M NOT STRAIGHT" on it with frosting—like this gaymo did.
4. Do it one-on-one. Plan coffee dates and dinner dates.
5. Hook up with a girl—maybe this one—and tell your friends about it. They'll ask if you're queer. Or they won't, which means they already thought you were. 
6. Change your Facebook cover photo to say "I'M SO GAY" or "I'M NOT STRAIGHT & THAT'S COOL." 
7. Change your orientation on Facebook. If no one says anything, screenshot your orientation and post it on Instagram. If no one says anything, try a sandwich board.
8. Start volunteering for LGBTQ+ non-profits and groups. Sign up for the Queer Studies classes. Fill your life with so many queer activities that it's preposterous anyone would ever assume you're straight. 9. Tell your friends you have something you need to share with them. Proceed to walk in and out of a closet until they get the message.
10. Skywriting.
11. Watch It Gets Better videos on full volume at the dinner table.
12. Write it on a mirror in lipstick.
13. Put up posters of Jodie Foster all over your room until your mom gets the hint. If she doesn't, frame a picture of Portia De Rossi and put it in the bathroom. If that doesn't wake her up, add Ellen Page. DeGeneres. Sykes. O'Donnell. Stewart. Make an altar of lesbians until your mom finally asks what gives.
14. Share the link to this letter and just write "See #15."
15. YOUR DAUGHTER 100% WANTS TO DATE SOME WOMEN. MIGHT BE SO GAY, MIGHT BE SO LESBIAN, MIGHT BE SO BI, DEFINITELY NOT STRAIGHT.
16. Buy and wear this "Nobody Knows I'm A Lesbian" shirt.
17. Send a Snapchat selfie and write "LESBIAN" on your face. Or "GAY." Or "BI." Send a follow-up snap that explains you're serious.
18. Pick the person who you know will support you and tell them first. Then, once you've passed that initial hurdle, tell a group of people and have the first person by your side.
19. Locate the PFLAG chapter in your area. Go to a meeting and introduce yourself and open up to the moms and dads there. Then invite your mom to go to dinner and a movie with you, OUT, have a nice meal, and then take her to the PFLAG meeting instead of Beauty and the Beast.
20. I guess you could have someone else do it for you, but isn't that what #15 was? 
21. Just say it. When you're alone washing dishes or brushing your hair or just laying in bed staring at the ceiling. Just say: "I'm gay." Or "I'm lesbain." Or "I'm bi." You'll find it gets easier with repetition.
A few other points:
A. Queer or straight, male or female, you do not need someone's permission to break up with them or bail on that fourth date—or that first, second, or third date. You don't need to give someone a reason. You just have to say, "I'm not interested in continuing to see you." Sharing your reasons for ending the relationship is a courtesy, not a requirement.
B. You can be out at home and not out at school or vice-versa.
C. If you're worried about men you know reacting badly to the news that you're not straight, be careful sharing it, carry mace, cut men who react badly out of your life, talk to someone at your school's LGBT center, if your school has one, or talk to a dean about your concerns and be sure to let your dean know you're prepared to go to the media and LGBT civil rights orgs if you're abused or harassed or subjected to violence.
Good luck, OUT, and welcome out!

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Good advice, TDONTD. Thanks for the update!
There are so many great books out there—too many to name—but if you live in a city with a woman-owned, sex-positive, sex-toy store like, say, She Bop (Portland) or Smitten Kitten (Minneapolis) or Venus Envy (Halifax) or Babeland (New York and Seattle) or Come As You Are (Toronto), TP, your best bet is to get to a store, browse through the books section, and find a title that works for you. But if you must have a recommendation: order a copy of Erika Moen's Oh Joy Sex Toy. It's a illustrated/critical guide to sex toys that's also a pro-kink, pro-queer, pro-everybody sex-ed book. And it's fucking funny, TP, and there's nothing like a good laugh—provided by Erika's sense of humane and profane sense of humor (which is evident in the text and the illustrations)—to help relieve prudish tension and keep a sex convo going.
Answers:
1. Take the time to Google vomit and bulimia, SLIME, and you'll quickly learn that lots of potential negative health consequences stem from regular, induced vomiting—from tooth decay to the erosion of the esophagus to mouth sores to rotting gums to broken blood vessels in the eyes. Vomiting once in a great while probably won't do any lasting damage—we evolved to vomit once in a great while—but asking your indulgent-to-fault boyfriend to make vomiting a regular part of your sex life would be both unfair and unhealthy. The hard part is defining "once in a while." Since healthy adults rarely vomit, SLIME, I'd say that your boyfriend shouldn't do this for you more than once a year, tops.
2. I shared your letter with a smart, progressive, sex-positive doctor, a woman who has made other appearances in the column, and she sent this response:
Vomit is not sterile like urine and carries bacteria that are found in our gut. We have bacteria throughout our entire gastrointestinal tract, from mouth to anus. That said, there is also the corrosive nature of vomit to be wary of. People who vomit often risk esophageal tears and bleeding (blood in the vomit requires a trip to the hospital), tooth decay and gum disease caused by the acidity. Electrolyte imbalances may also cause other health problems. The mucosa (or skin) inside of the vagina is the same kind of mucosa we have on the insides of our mouths. Exposing the vagina (which can happen with vulvar exposure) to these acids could cause vaginal irritation and inflammation as well as a change in the pH of the vagina. This could lead to susceptibility to other infections, sexually transmitted or not (as in the case of yeast infections or bacterial vaginosis). I would recommend using good judgement for the frequency of vomiting to reduce health risks as well as avoiding penetrative vaginal play with vomit.
Normally I would credit this smart, progressive, sex-positive doctor by name... but I wasn't sure she would want this particular Q&A; popping up every time someone Googled her A. for the rest of her professional life and B. for all of eternity. So I'm keeping her name out of it.
3. I also shared your letter with Jesse Bering, Associate Professor of Science Communication at the University of Otago in New Zealand, a man whose name doesn't need to be kept out of it. Bering is a frequent contributor to Slate, Scientific American, Das Magazin, and (ahem) "Savage Love." Bering is the author of Perv: The Sexual Deviant In All of Us, and this particular question is right up his alley.
You can find “erotic vomiting” easily enough on shock porn sites. Aficionados refer to this kink as Roman Showers (a nod to the feast-until-you-barf potlucks of ancient times). Mercifully, however, emetophilia is exceedingly rare as a full-blown sexual paraphilia because disgust, for obvious evolutionary reasons, tends to be a natural libido killer for most people. But SLIME isn’t alone in her sensual yearnings for the most intimate innards of her partners. Back in 1982, the psychiatrist Robert Stoller conducted a series of interviews with three female emetophiles and, just like SLIME’s reminiscences of genital excitement upon seeing women with morning sickness, each of these ladies could similarly trace their unusually visceral arousal to an early childhood experience. One believed that it stemmed from her grandmother innocently rubbing her back while she vomited as a six-year-old, her privates being unwittingly stimulated on the old woman’s knee. Another woman believed that her emetophilia was rooted in being sexually abused by her stepfather as an eleven-year-old after he’d caught her masturbating. She was so disgusted by the incident that she vomited, but the two sensations (climaxing in response to the abuse, and then vomiting in response to the man’s actions) became inextricably linked. But the jury is still out on the “causes” of fetishes and kinks, but these anecdotal accounts on the origins of emetophilia, along with countless other such retrospective stories of adults with paraphilias, suggest a sexual imprinting process during childhood development.
Follow Jesse Bering on Twitter.
I'm not sure what MWC can do to save his marriage—his wife sounds like a crazy person—but clearly your husband isn't the only married guy out there, AIA, who enjoys flirting (and only flirting) with other women.
My response after the jump...
Don't sell yourself short, NWATB: It's possible that this 18-year-old is into you. He could be one of those younger guys who prefer older men, and bearish older guys could be his type. But the eat-and-run routine makes it somewhat likelier that you're not, in fact, what he's looking for, but all he feels he can safely get. You're far enough away geographically, and far enough removed socially, that there's no risk of exposure. He's not going to run into you on the street when he's walking around with his friends, and the odds that you know someone in common are nonexistent.
Anyway, here's what you do: Tell him that he's hot, tell him that he's a good little cocksucker, but that's not enough for you to sustain your interest. You're not asking to meet his friends or family—you're not asking him to risk exposure—but if he wants to keep blowing you, well, there's going to be some getting to know you. He'll have to risk a conversation now and then, maybe even watching a movie together sometime at your apartment. Tell him you can't be friends-with-benefits with someone who isn't a friend.
A lot of desperate-to-stay-closeted cases convince themselves that they won't ever have to come out if they can get their sexual needs met in one place and their emotional needs met in another. By showing him that a healthy gay person successfully integrates his sexual and emotional needs—which you'll have done whether he keeps coming over or not—you'll be honoring the campsite rule.
Nope.
I'm tempted to leave it there, HALF, but I'm way too Catholic to leave it there. So let me see what I can scrounge up for you...
The ideal boyfriend for you two—the perfect source of oxytocin—would be a fully programable sex robot. Your requirements are that specific. But it's going to be a few years, if not a few decades, before the lifelike sexbots come online. So what to do in the meantime, HALF? You do what everyone else seeking a partner is doing: You put yourselves out there, you get on OKCupid and other websites, and you make an effort to be open, honest, and breezy about who you are and what you want.
Most guys aren't going to be interested in such a complicated package deal, HALF, so your search may be a long and ultimately fruitless one. But there are definitely guys out there who are or wannabe poly. And while the odds you'll find a guy equally attracted to you both are long, HALF, they're not impossibly long, particularly since he'll only need to be fully intimate/do all the sex stuff with one of you.
And, hey, your particular brand of codependency may be a selling point. There are guys out there who find it difficult to function on their own, HALF, and lots of them. A triad relationship grounded in mutual support and focused on emotional security could be just what some of those guys are looking for... even if they don't realize it until after they've met you.
Good luck.

"Rule of thumb: someone could always be offended," said Bailey Jay, after I shared your email with her. "My opinion: this is harmless and super common on OKC."
Other rules of thumb: Simply stating that you happen to be interested in and that you're actively seeking a certain type of person—particularly when that statement is framed positively, not negatively (no need to rattle off a list of who/what you aren't seeking)—doesn't make you guilty of felony fetishization/objectification. It's how you treat people from your preferred romantic/erotic target groups that matters. If you treat them only as objects—if you treat them like human Fleshlights, there to be used and discarded, without any consideration for their feelings, desires, or agency—then, yeah, you're an asshole who's objectifying/fetishisizing people in a dehumanizing way.
Don't be an asshole.
If you take care not to treat people as objects only—people are objects also ("anything that is visible or tangible and is relatively stable in form")—then you're free to ignore the PC thought/dick/pussy police who insist any mention of traits and/or types amounts to felony objectification. On the other hand, PENIS, if you think you're being careful not to treat people as objects only but the people you've met with the traits you desire tell you that you made them feel objectified/fetishisized, well, then you're doing it wrong. Try harder and do better.
Last word to Bailey Jay: "Have fun and thanks for having sex with trans people!"
He shouldn't have to change who he is to be with you, TOBS, but what if he wants to?
It's unlikely he'll morph into an always-quietly-tittering, always-kink-discreet introvert, just as it's unlikely you'll ever morph into a braying, oversharing extrovert. But if making an effort to dial it back now and then is the price he has to pay to be with you—along with reserving convos about his kinks (and, by inference, your kinks) for fetish clubs and play parties—why not let him decide if that's a price he's willing to pay?
You're gay and kinky, TOBS, as you're well aware. Presumably you're also aware that gays represent a tiny percentage of the general population, and kinky gays represent a not-so-tiny-but-still-small-ish percentage of the gay population. I don't think you should have to marry this man, regardless of his flaws, just because you're gay and your kinks align. But you should think twice about discarding a guy who's gay and kinky and attractive and whose company you enjoy most of the time just because he gets on your nerves now and then. (I'm pretty sure I get on my husband's nerves now and then.) At the very least you owe it to yourself, just as you owe it him, to be specific about the reasons you pulled the plug.
Because he might want to make an effort to win you.
There's a lot that's good here—your kinks align perfectly (so rare!) and you enjoy spending some-but-not-all of your time together (so common!)—and there are workarounds for the bad. A quick example from my own life: Terry is way more extroverted than I am. So sometimes he goes to movies, restaurants, clubs, parties, and concerts without me. I stay home and read or sleep or clean. And then, when he gets home, we have something to talk about: how the movie was, whether the restaurant was any good, who was out at the club, who got messy at the party, if there were any cute boys in the band he saw. He doesn't make me go out, I don't make him stay home. It's a workaround that works for us.
With some effort, TOBS, you could find the workarounds that work for you: he makes an effort, when you nudge him, to dial it back; he goes to comedies with his friends, dramas with you; if he's working a room, you slip into another room. Give it a chance.
Programming note: Terry accidentally set his alarm clock for 4 AM this morning. (He meant to set it for 8 AM, but his finger slipped or something.) He woke up, turned the alarm off, and went right back to sleep. Not me. I couldn't get back to sleep. So if you're wondering what my advice is like when I've had less than three hours of sleep and I'm majorly annoyed with my husband... you're about to find out. Grain of salt for most readers, shaker of salt for the LW.
The moment someone's insecurities become weaponized—the moment they become tools used to dominate and control a partner, not emotional vulnerabilities requiring understanding and compassion from a partner—is the right moment to call that someone's bluff.
Your wife, after cheating on you with multiple people, has taken a secondary partner. You've made sacrifices both emotional and sexual to accommodate her needs—you let her gay boyfriend move into your home—and now it's her turn: She's gonna get a grip on her jealousy and her insecurities, with the help of a professional, because you're going to start dating other people too.
Period.
And to be clear: You're not gonna wait until after she gets a grip on her jealousy and insecurities to start dating other people, GRIPPER, as that creates an incentive to never get a grip. You're gonna start dating other people now. As a concession to her jealousy, her insecurities, and her hypocrisy, promise her you'll be discreet for the time being. But you're not seeking her permission, nor are you waiting for her permission, to get out there, to get poly, and to get your needs met.
And if that blows up your marriage—if it ends your marriage—so be it. You don't want to spend the rest of your life married to a selfish, hypocritical manipulator. I'm sorry there's a kid involved, of course, but parents aren't hostages, GRIPPER, and husbands aren't either.
Good luck.
So... two young children, an infant in diapers, and an angry husband who wants to be diapered, breastfed, dominated, humiliated, and spanked. Even if he was content to have you do the diapering, breastfeeding, dominating, etc., MOMMY, even if you enjoyed doing all of that for him, do you really have the time and the energy?
If I were you, MOMMY, I would be thrilled—ecstatic—to be divorced by this man. Or I would be only too happy to see him take his needs and his nappies elsewhere. Rather than feeling threatened by all these other women apparently anxious to role-play mommy/baby scenes with my husband, I'd be sending them chocolates, flowers, thank-you notes, and cases of wet wipes.
But I'm not you, you're not me, and your husband ain't my husband. (Thank you, Jesus.) So what to do...
Your husband sounds like a selfish asshole, MOMMY—a selfish asshole with lousy timing. He could've prioritized his fetishes/fantasies and made these demands before you two married and/or after your kids were older and you two had more time on your hands for elaborate role-play scenarios. But he didn't do that. Maybe he was struggling with shame, maybe he wanted to trap you at home with kids before making these demands, maybe your sex-/kink-negativity shut him down and his needs and resentments finally boiled over. But whatever happened, however this went down, what happened next doesn't leave me feeling particularly sympathetic to your husband's plight: he somehow managed to convince you—with the help of a counselor—that it's your fault he feels compelled to get his baby on with other women.
That equal parts bullshit and gaslighting. I think your husband wants to explore his kinks with people who share them—and that, by itself, is not unreasonable. It can be dispiriting/deboning to be indulged by someone who isn't into your kinks, no matter how patient and/or desperate to please they are. But instead of honestly owning up to that—"I know you're willing, honey, but it doesn't work for me when we do it because you're not into it"—he put the zap on you head. He's convinced you that you're entirely to blame for his wanting to get diapered elsewhere.
I could be wrong, of course, and I only have your version of events to go on. And there's really only one thing we know for sure, MOMMY: Your husband has issued an ultimatum. You either give him permission to get diapered/breastfed/oral'd elsewhere or he's going to divorce you. Your loving and (taking your word for it here) lovable husband presented you with two bad options and you have to choose between them. Your marriage, if it continues, will not be monogamous.
Again, MOMMY, if I were you, I wouldn't wait around for guy to divorce me. I would hire a really good lawyer and divorce him first.
Say something, PISF.
Your mom is an adult, yes, but she's an elderly one. If you haven't already reached the stage of life where you're gotta parent your parent, PISF, you will soon. And that's presumably why she moved closer to you—not just so you could see more of each other, but so you could keep an eye on her, keep her out of trouble, and keep her from making trouble. (I can't believe I just used "parent" as a verb. My parents parented me better than that!)
First, say something to your mother: "Mom, you shouldn't be pressuring 'Barb' to sell her house—not with your track record. If you're still together a year from now, maybe Barb could sell her house and move closer. Or maybe she can continue to rent the place and move in with you. But you gotta stop pushing her to make what amounts to a huge and premature commitment. You're not an asshole, mom, but that's an asshole move. Stop it."
Then... say something to Barb. You'll be taking a risk, of course, because there's a chance whatever you say to Barb will get back to your mom. But you know your mom's MO and you can't stand idly by while she selfishly upends the lives of her new GF, her GF's son, and her GF's tenants. Loyalty to family matters, PISF, but there are limits—and allowing a family member to manipulate and (perhaps unconsciously) mislead someone into making what could be what will be a huge mistake falls outside those limits. So give Barb a call and strongly urge her to wait at least a year—preferably two—before she makes up her mind about selling her house.
"My mom a wonderful person, and a passionate one, and she's really into you," you might say to Barb, "but my mom has a history of short but intense relationships. Enjoy the ride, Barb, and enjoy my mom, but don't upend your life for her at this stage. Don't sell your house."

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Do what you gotta do to stay married and stay sane—if you actually wanna/hafta stay married, that is. If not, get a divorce regardless of what Mr. Guy From Work decides to do.

My sample is skewed—or maybe I should say that my samples, plural, are skewed.
I don't get tons of questions from people who are happy and/or content. Straight or queer, married or not, monogamous or non-monogamous—happy people don't send me a lot of questions about the problems they don't have. But letters do come in from happily married hetero folks, HMHFHM, and their letters regularly appear in Savage Love. Take the first letter in this week's column:
Down to business: Christmas came and went, and every present I bought for my extraordinary husband could be opened in front of our children. He deserves better, and I have a particular gift in mind for Valentine's Day. My husband has expressed an interest in sounding, something we've attempted only with my little finger. He seemed to enjoy it! But the last thing I want to do is damage his big beautiful dick. So is sounding a fun thing? Is sounding a safe thing? Recommendations for a beginner's sounding kit? Or should I scrap the idea and just get him another butt plug?
Safety Of Sounding doesn't say her marriage is monogamous, HMHFHM, but I would bet my hardly-earned money that she and her husband are monogamous. (Straight couples who aren't typically mention that fact.) And SOS and her husband appear to be just as blissfully happy as you and your husband are, HMHFHM. But don't take my word for it. Here's the first paragraph of SOS's email, which was edited out of her letter for reasons having to with space and Catholicism, which really drives the blissful shit home:
First I want to thank you so much for all that you do. I would not have the happy, healthy, exciting, sexy marriage that I do if I hadn't spent years reading your columns and listening to your advice. What you do is awesome and I hope you never stop!!!
And SOS's letter—a letter from a happily married hetero!—isn't some once-or-twice-per-annum rarity. Perhaps you missed this column from late December: 
After spending some years in the doldrums after having kids, my husband and I are now enjoying hot kinky sex and the occasional free pass to fuck other people. We couldn't be happier. I have a friend who was extremely keen for me to cage his cock with the same kind of locking male chastity device I got for my husband—a fixed-ring stainless-steel type....
Married! Hetero! Couldn't be happier!
So the question here isn't, "Why won't you print letters from happily married folks, Dan?!?," but rather, "How did you miss all the letters I've printed from happily married folks, HMHFHM??"
My best guess: Since happiness isn't the issue/problem/point of contention for those happily married hetero couples who do write in (and whose letters do appear in the column), HMHFHM, these couples don't emphasize their happiness the same way miserable couples emphasize their miserableness. But happily married hetero folks are represented in Savage Love—they're all over the column and the podcast—you're just too distracted by the sounding rods and cock cages to see them.
I'm only running your letter, JOACLA, because it allows me to post another letter that came in from a reader today on this same subject. But quickly: do what you need to do to stay married and stay sane, sometimes cheating is the least worst option, consider asking your wife for permission to seek sex elsewhere. 
And now a long letter from someone who, like you, was trapped in a sexless marriage and refrained from cheating when her spouse refused to okay her seeking sex elsewhere.
I read the letters from people in sexless marriages asking for your advice. It seems like it’s the a big recurrent question. Knowing that it happens to so many couples brought me comfort four years ago when I started reading your column. I felt I wasn’t alone. The circumstances and the stories are always different, but the result is often the same. Sexless marriages bring deep unhappiness for the partner whose sexual needs are not met.
My husband and I had a "happy" marriage; no major fights, supportive of each other, went through ups and downs for fourteen years together. But half of our marriage was sexless. My husband stopped having sex with me. We had fertility issues and I ended up in depression, for which I got therapy and recovered. But gradually he stopped having sex with me and stopped being intimate. Even a cuddle was too much asking sometime.
I thought we had a great relationship, we were good friends and partners in life, we had the same values and we had built a pretty good life together. All these things that make you stay because… because you are afraid that you will not have it as good somewhere else. The French have a saying: “You know what you leave behind, but you don’t know what you will find next." Meaning, be grateful for what you have and stop dreaming you could have it better. So what if the price for a good life partnership is no sex? It’s not that important after all?! Is it? (That’s what I hear!)
For me it was. Every now and then I would bring up the sexless situation to my husband's attention. I tried many different approaches. Each time my husband said he loved me, had nobody else in his life, he was just not that much into sex. He was happy in our marriage and promised to make some efforts.
I thought I might go insane. Monogamy was/is very important for me, so taking charge of my sexual desire and having sex with somebody else was an impossible dilemma for me. After reading your column, I finally brought up the subject of open marriage. If we entered in an agreement, it would ease my dilemma. But he was shocked. An open marriage wasn’t an option for him. But continuing living in a sexless relationship wasn’t an option for me. We had hit a wall. I started to wonder: Do I leave a good relationship, a great partner, a life we built together for fourteen years just in order to have sex?
Now looking back at it, I wonder how it could ever have been difficult to stop putting my needs aside and not choose me. Choose my happiness. Maybe the patriarchal environment, maybe my naivety, maybe my fears of being lonely, maybe my lack of self-confidence allowed me to collude with my husband and let him drag me along in a sex-deprived marriage that was making me unhappy. Most of all, I think I was a coward. I found lots of excuses not to leave. It was obvious that the sex deprivation had destroyed my relationship and yet I couldn’t stand up for myself and allow myself to leave and potentially be happy without him. 
I was stuck in this sexless marriage. I was stuck in my head. I denied myself happiness and a satisfying sex life.
Then one Sunday evening I found out that my loving, supportive, not-that-much-into-sex husband had been cheating on me. For years. With many women. That he had acted on sexual fantasies I did not know he had. That he caught an STD and never told me about it and therefore put my health at risk. And even got one other woman pregnant. So many lies.
By Thursday, we were through. It will be two years next week. Looking back, I mostly blame myself. It would be easy to cast myself in the victim role: he denied me sex for so many years and cheated on me. “Poor me." But I blame myself. I was the one who made the choice to stay. I was the one who denied myself sex and happiness. He didn’t force me.
Two years ago, I promised myself that from now on I would always choose me, my happiness. And I promised myself to not let fear influence my decisions—this has been the most powerful life lesson for me. We are taught that it would be selfish and shallow to leave a "good" marriage for something so meaningless as sex.
“What are you? A sex depraved addict ready to through away a good life for a few hours of pleasure?” .
To which I respond: “This is my life. I only have a limited time to enjoy it. I am already in my forties and I’m too young to give up on sex. I choose me. I choose to be happy”. 
I will finish with a happy ending. 
Once you stop being scared, once you stop holding on to something that’s not good for you, once you start listening to that voice screaming inside that things are not how they should be and then actually do something about it, then you are able to see all the goodness waiting for you. Seven months ago I met a man. It’s still early days but things are going very well. He communicates openly on all subjects. He’s into sex and doesn’t make me feel like a sex addict. He likes sex as much as I do. (Kinky too!) He also has great life values. He has a great personality. He cares about people. He cares about me and my happiness.
But he is not in charge of making me happy. I am. And I am happy with myself. But he surely makes me happier.
So... my point is: thank you for your column. Thank you for all the letter about sexless marriages. I know you must feel like you are repeating yourself. But sometimes, one needs to hear the same thing a 1000 times to finally act on it. I needed to read all these letters to finally chose me.
W.
You're welcome, W. But it seems like you had to read all those letters and find out your husband was cheating on you. Still, I'm glad the letters helped.
Get your newly out gay friend one of these to practice on.
I'm completely serious, NGF. Your 30-year-old buddy might have an easier time building up to partnered sex—he might be more confident in his abilities/erections—if he went for a few rides in what amounts to an assfucking version of a flight simulator. (But do a little digging around online and see if you can't find a silicone one.)
What's his issue? I dunno. He may be distracted by concerns about your pleasure, NGF; he looks in your eyes, he sees expectation and excitement in them, he starts to worry about whether he'll be able to do it this time, he starts thinking about the last time he failed and... pfffft. His dick deflates. Or he may have some hangups about assholes and cleanliness. Or he may be worried about hurting you. Or he may have some other concern(s). Blowing a few loads in something that looks like ass but isn't—a couple of sessions with a partner (or a part of a partner) he doesn't have to worry about disappointing—may help him keep focused, cool, and boned the next time he's getting close to penetrating you.
And for the record: It's awfully nice of you to help your newly-out, much-older gay friend in this way, NGF, but letting a guy practice on your ass is... well, it's both a little dehumanizing (which can be hot) and a little above and beyond the call of duty/friendship (which can be nice). If you're into the guy, or into the sex, and you wouldn't mind getting off with him, well, okay then. You can keep playing Mother Bottom Theresa. But if you're not into him, if you're only letting him take these practice runs at your ass because you pity him, stop letting him fuck attempt to fuck you and share this link with him instead.
You can also direct him to this column about ass play for Beginner Gays. And the next time you two hook up (if there is a next time), NGF, tell him the sex continues whether or not he loses his erection. Because M/M mutual masturbation and oral sex aren't tragic consolation prizes, they're hot, hot, hot gay sex. And a few successful JO and/or oral sessions should help build his confidence too.
UPDATE: The first two commenters—Ricardo and Reverse Polarity—make a great point. Your newly out friend, NGF, may not be a top:
Also, maybe the friend only says he's a top because he sees that as less gay than being a bottom, which he fundamentally is but can't bring himself to accept just yet. I'd say he's still a few steps away from being totally at ease with his desires.
For some guys, being a top is perceived as more masculine and less gay. They can tell themselves that at least they aren't a swishy bottom, they are a macho top. A newly-out insecure gay may be very tempted by this logic.
The SLLOTD is the exception to the never-read-the-comments rule. Always want to read the comments on the SLLOTD!

My podcast about sex and dating: LIVIN' AND LOVIN' IN NYC.Available at iTunes.
You really screwed the pooch there, AYR, and I'm not confident this pooch can be unscrewed.
You have two ex-girlfriends. Ms. Name probably wanted out a long time ago and the existence of Ms. Heart gave her the push/grounds/victim status she needed to end things with you. Ms. Heart, your other ex-girlfriend, was no doubt wounded when you ran after Ms. Name despite your protestations of love for Ms. Heart and the obvious dysfunction/disconnect that characterized your relationship with Ms. Name.
Why did you pursue Ms. Name after she dumped you? Probably for the same reason you stayed with Ms. Name after it was clear your relationship was doomed: you wanted to be supportive and you wanted to be kind, i.e. you're invested in being perceived as a good and decent guy. I'm thinking it killed you to know that Ms. Name was at home complaining to anyone who would listen about what a fucking two-timing piece of shit you are. (Ms. Name most likely neglected to mention the fact that you two hadn't fucked in a year, that she wasn't really that into you or attracted to you, and that you might have grounds to cheat.) Only by winning her back could you redeem yourself in the eyes of Ms. Name and her family.
But let's suppose you had won her back. What then? In time you could reclaim your good-and-decent-guy status, I guess, but at the price of re-trapping yourself in a passionless, urgency-free, sexless relationship.
So what do you do now that you've realized Ms. Heart—sigh—is the woman you wanted to be with all along? (Something you only realized once Ms. Heart ran off with someone else.) Do you cling to hope—most likely of the false variety—or do you try your luck with someone else?
Yes, AYR, you do that—you do both of those things. Live in hope you might hear from Ms. Heart someday ("Would you like to grab a drink and catch up?") while at the same time getting out there and dating other people. You may never hear from Ms. Heart again, AYR, you may be with someone else and completely over Ms. Heart when she calls/DMs you, or you may be between girlfriends when she calls DMs/you.
In other words: don't rule out the possibility of getting back together—if she calls you (you shouldn't call her)—but don't wait for her either. 
Good luck, dude.
P.S. He would be coming to my home each week. And, is it a bad sign if I don't think I would ever want to tell anyone that I took money for sex?
Taking money for sex makes you a sex worker, TTT, and a vindictive ex-husband is a good argument against doing any form of sex work—even sex work of the bank-shot, GGG-ish, indulging-the-kink-of-a-NSA-FWB variety. Also arguing against this arrangement: your gut. You don't know this guy—you've never met him—and he may be a perfectly lovely, perfectly trustworthy person who's simply turned on by the idea of paying for sex. But you have a lot at stake here, TTT: your kid, that custody agreement, and your desire to keep this quiet. What if this guy turns out to be controlling and vindictive? What if the reason he wants to pay you for sex is so that he can use the threat of outing you for taking his money to manipulate and control you?
The risks for you—not for all people who take money for sex, but for you in particular—seem greater than the potential rewards.
And did you read the advice Mike Crawford had for SOTEMPTED a few weeks ago? Like you, TTT, SOTEMPTED was approached online and offered money—a great deal of money—for sex. Mike's advice for SOTEMPTED included this:
One last piece of advice from Mike Crawford: "There is a pretty glaring red flag here: $3,000 is a really, really steep price for a single date. I'm not implying that SOTEMPTED isn't worth it, but the old 'if it sounds too good to be true' adage definitely applies in sex work. Should he decide to do this, he needs to screen carefully before agreeing to meet in person. The safety resources on the Sex Workers Outreach Project website (swopusa.org) are a great place for him to learn how to do just that."
This guy didn't offer you 3K, TTT, but he did offer to pay you for something you're willing to give him for free—and that trips the "sounds too good to be true" wire. Pass on him, TTT.
This probably won't be helpful, it's probably not what you need to hear right now, and it's certainly not what either of your partners would want me to tell you. But it's Friday night and I need to get home and all honesty it was the first thing that came to mind when I read your letter. It's something I've told other people—it's something I say on my podcast so often my listeners probably chant it along with me—but I happen to believe it, SOFT, so here it is... 
If you're with someone for thirty or forty years—if you're with someone until death does you part—and they only cheated on you once or twice in all that time... then they were good at monogamy, not bad at it.
That little gem is for people who've discovered they've been cheated on—just once or with just one person—in the context of a committed longterm relationship that involved a monogamous commitment. I'm basically telling the "wronged party" to take the long view, to give their partner some credit for decades of perfectly executed monogamy, and not to let one assignation/affair/happy ending destroy a relationship or, if death done already parted 'em, their memories of it. Most people agree we shouldn't let the perfect be the enemy of the good and I'm just applying that standard to monogamous commitments.
So as far as I'm concerned, SOFT you could go ahead and fuck that guy from work—you could even have an affair with him—and if still think of yourself as good at monogamy. Or goodish at it. I can't guarantee that your partner or your work friend's wife will feel the same way if you two turn out to be bad at cheating, i.e. if you're careless and get caught.
But without a doubt the safest course of action—the ethical course, the respectful course, the perfect at monogamy course—is for you and your friend from work to get the hell away from each other and stay the hell away from each other. Then you don't have to worry about getting caught or catching a worse case of feelings than you already have.
A few questions to ask yourself before you decide what to do: Do you wanna fuck this guy because he's wonderful and fuckable or do you wanna fuck this guy because on you want out of the relationship you're in and having an affair is the quickest way out? If this guy goes away—if your coworkers exiles himself to some other firm—what are the odds some other guy is going to come along? You've been with your partner for 10 years, and that's lovely, but is he the guy you wanna be with for the next fifty?
You've waited long enough, WAIT—not for sex (four dates doesn't entitle you to sex), but to ask where you stand, what she's thinking, and how she's feeling.
Four dates? At this point you probably know things about her family and childhood and how she loved Stranger Things but hated The OA. You've probably started to pick up on her weird ticks or noticed how she crinkles her nose when she laughs. Now I haven't been in the room for any of these dates, of course—she might not even have a nose, for all I know. (I've been at this long enough to know never to make assumptions about another person's nasal status.) But you get my point: You're not entitled to sex or a make out session, but you are more than entitled to ask questions and get answers.
You're wound up and anxious not because you're a mess, WAIT, but because you're wary—and you have a right to be wary. You're starting to develop feelings. And feelings are tricky. They're hard to get rid of. As a lesbian, it's not a good idea to let yourself develop feelings for a person who possibly "isn't into women as much as she thought she was." Yes, people need friends and companions, but you got on Tinder looking for dates and (at some point) sex. Sex is a thing you want and it's a thing you were actively seeking when you agreed to meet up with her. Does she feel the same way? Was she looking for the same thing? Is she still? Does she want that thing with you? Getting clarity on those points is crucial, WAIT, because you can't loosen up and "enjoy the ride" until you know what ride you're on.
Ask her if she wants to make out, WAIT, and if she might want to have some of that lesbian sex the lesbians are always having. She might not be ready yet or ready ever—invite her to say so either way—but who knows? She may be ready and she's been waiting for you to make the first move—the move being an ask, WAIT, not a lunge—while you're sitting there waiting for her to either make the first move herself or send you a lesbigram that invites you to make the first move. You're making a lot of assumptions about how she feels ("I think that she is someone who wants to wait awhile before having sex..."), assumptions that may or may not be accurate. No more assumptions. Ask already.
And if her answer is not yet and she can't tell you when she might be ready... well, we all have our nonnegotiables, WAIT, and dating someone who actually wants to fuck us is a nonnegotiable for most people. If she can't commit to the sex and romance parts of being with you and/or being a lesbian, WAIT, then it's better to get out now.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
I seem to recall swearing off answering letters from people trapped in sexless relationships/marriages—I distinctly remember saying something to that effect once or twice—but there's no escaping this question.
Instead of answering your question myself, however, I'm going to share an email I received from another reader, SHH. Read it carefully and you may spot a potential solution for you and your girlfriend...
I wanted to thank you. I have never requested advice from you, but you had a hand in helping me handle a very big change in my marriage. My husband and I have been married for almost eight years and for the past five my sex drive has been in the toilet. To his credit my husband has been extraordinarily patient with me and understanding: he has never demanded sex, whined about it, or guilted me about it.  This entire time I have been racking my brain about what is wrong with me. I went to the doctor and had hormone levels checked, got back on anti-depressants, and scoured the internet for help. There were no answers, I was just completely uninterested in being intimate with him or anyone else.
Two weeks ago we went to lunch. As we got into the car he said that we needed to talk. I was sure he was going to divorce me—I have been waiting for this conversation for a while and was steeling myself for it. To my shock (I have known this man for almost 30 years) he came out as bisexual, and as it turns out had been having a fling for a few months with a man. The bi part wasn't the issue for me, it was the lie. To make a long story short we are two weeks days into this new chapter in our lives: we've been communicating, we have decided to open our marriage, and we've begun couples therapy. We have also started the process of joining a group in town that will hopefully allow us to meet other, like-minded people, people who can help us along this new chapter in our lives.
What I want to thank you for is this: You mention the "price of admission" quite a bit in your podcast. I never really had a perspective on this until 13 days ago.  The price of admission for me is accepting my husband's bisexuality and allowing him to explore this part of himself. What I have discovered within this is that I am also free to explore and meet new people. This thought is exciting and it has reignited my sex drive. What I realize now is that my sex drive didn't go away because I wasn't attracted to my husband. I am. But strict monogamy somehow extinguished my sex drive.
So, I want to thank you for giving me information that I never thought I would need. I am thankful that I had you in my ear throughout this and made sure that what I said to my husband was tempered with love and not judgement. Thank you, thank you, thank you.
You didn't consent to an erotic massage, MANUFM, you consented to some work being done to your chest—your pecs, not your breasts or your nipples.
There's no way to massage your chest muscles—your pecs—without touching your breasts, of course, so this massage came with a built-in risk for a "positive side-effect," i.e. your becoming aroused. And arousing you was either your LMP's intention all along... or your arousal was an accident... and your accidentally-/unintentionally-induced arousal prompted your LMP to become aroused... and his arousal prompted him forget his training and his professionalism and take this massage in more explicitly erotic direction (stroking, squeezing, tapping)... and by the time you sensed things were headed to a place (or had already arrived in a place) that made you uncomfortable... it was too late. The damage had been done by the time you pulled the plug/pulled up the sheet.
My money is on the former—arousing you was his intention all along—because Occam's Razor and shit.
A few quick thoughts...
1. I'm so sorry you were sexually assaulted. I so want to live in world where no one is subject to sexual violence—or any other kind of violence.
2. Again, I don't think this was an innocent chest massage that spun out of control. I think your LMP put the moves on you when you were vulnerable—when you were nude, when the two of you were alone in the clinic after hours. Now there are probably some men and women out there whose LMPs have put the moves on them and who have nothing but good things to say about the experience. But in those cases I'm guessing the LMP was either honest and direct—they asked, "Wanna happy ending?" or "Wanna fuck?", not, "Would it be okay if I worked on your chest?"—or the LMPs took a potentially career-ending risk and lucked the fuck out, i.e. the client was only too delighted by the unexpected place their massage went. (For the record: LMPs are much, much likelier to be hit on by clients than vice-versa, and almost all LMPs regard passes made by clients as workplace sexual harassment, not as a perk.
3. This strikes me as a slight, mild and sex-negative double standard: If becoming aroused while receiving a massage can be seen a "positive side-effect" for a client... then becoming aroused while giving a massage has to be viewed as a "positive side-effect" for an LMP. A client's arousal or an LMP's arousal only becomes a problem when the client or the LMP telegraphs their arousal in a way that makes the other person in the room feel uncomfortable or unsafe, makes assumptions that aren't true, makes moves that aren't welcome, or obtains consent for one thing ("work on your chest") and then convinces themselves or pretends they've obtained consent for something else entirely ("stroking and squeezing... [tapping on] nipples").
So what should you do?
Say something to the clinic—even at the risk of derailing this LMP's career.
If he had worked with you for a year, MANUFM, if you two had an established professional relationship and a friendly rapport and he misread things/signals/vibes/desires somehow—yeah, maybe he might deserve a pass. But the fact that 1. he pulled this shit on you during your second session, 2. he pulled it on you in a deserted clinic, and 3. he manipulated you on the matter of consent means he doesn't deserve a pass. I wouldn't be surprised if he's pulled this shit on other clients and either gotten away with it or gotten lucky. If you were the first client he pulled this shit on and he gets away with it, MANUFM, he will try to pull this shit again on other women.
Speak to his boss.
I'm gonna make a numbered list...
1. "I shouldn't have gone to the party in retrospect." I hope that doesn't mean you blame yourself—even in part—for what happened in the tent. You are not to blame and bear no responsibility for your friend's actions that night. Consenting to being hugged by this friend, allowing things to get a little touchy-feely during a party with a friend, even sharing a sleeping bag with a friend—none of that makes what he did next your fault. You may already know that, LBAAG, and you may not have meant "shouldn't have gone" in that way. But just in case—and if only to emphasize the point to others—I wanted to address it.
2. "Sometime during the night my friend, being very, very drunk, tried to shove his hand down my pants." Your friend may have been very, very drunk, but his very, very drunkenness in no way excuses his actions—and you may not have dropped "being very, very drunk" into the middle of that sentence to excuse your friend's actions. But just in case... I wanted to emphasize the point.
3. "He never did anything to me." Your friend did do something to you—he tried to shove his hands in your pants, he attempted to finger you, and he didn't stop with the attempted fingering until you nearly broke one or all of his fingers. I'm not a lawyer, LBAAG, but I'm pretty sure that meets the legal definition of sexual assault and/or attempted sexual assault. (Both count as things.) If hadn't done anything to you that night, LBAAG, you wouldn't be writing to me four years later about the nothing that didn't happen.
4. "He never remembered doing this after the fact, I assume, because he never brought up the subject." That's a big assumption, LBAAG. Your friend may have been too embarrassed or ashamed to bring it up; he may have figured that you weren't troubled by what happened since you didn't bring it up; or he may have actually blacked out and not remembered what happened in the tent that night. The only way to find out which: bring it up.
5. "He was drunk and I don't think he wanted to hurt me." He may have been drunk, and he may not have wanted to hurt you, LBAAG, but he hurt you.
And now I'm gonna try to your answer your questions...
A. "Should I forgive him?" 
Maybe. But regardless of whether you decide to forgive him, LBAAG, please resolve to stop making rationalizations for his actions (he was drunk, he didn't mean to hurt me, he probably doesn't even remember) and resolve to stop minimizing what happened that night (he never did anything to me).
B. "Should I forget it?"
If you could forget it, or were even inclined to forget it, you probably would've forgotten it already.
C. "Should I ignore him?"
I don't think you should ignore him.
You seem torn between feelings of hurt and anger and feelings of affection and gratitude, LBAAG, and if you ask me (and you did ask me) there's only one way out: talk to your friend. Get together with him—for coffee, not drinks—and ask him tell him about that night. Tell him you've always been troubled by what happened his actions that night and tell him how what happened his actions that night negatively impacted you and your friendship with him—you never felt safe around him again, you weren't even sure you ever wanted to see him again, you're still troubled by the memories of that night.
I suspect you'll know the answer to your first question—should you forgive him—after you see how he reacts. He may remember exactly what happened, he may feel terrible about it, he may express genuine remorse and come through with the kind of no-excuses/no-blame-blurring apology 1. you need to hear and 2. may make it possible for you to forgive him.
And if he doesn't remember what happened that night?
He needs to know he's capable of hurting people he cares about—or professes to care about—when he's drunk. By confronting him, LBAAG, you won't just be doing him a favor—he could wind up expelled or imprisoned if pulls something like that at college or ever again—you'll be doing a favor to any other women he winds up sharing drinks, tents, or sleeping bags with in the future.
I don't mind. Thanks for asking. Once all of the baby stuff settles, I will contact you for more advice about how to go about talking to my boyfriend about his bisexuality. I feel bad how I kinda made him come out to me. On one hand, I think he was kinda ready for it. He does seem a bit relieved and we are actually closer than we have been.—D
UPDATE: What Sarah said:
I've lost a baby mid pregnancy. 24 weeks, I don't know if that's about where the writer is. At any rate, the grief is mind numbing. The physical pain is life altering. The hormonal turmoil is unfathomable. The emotional devastation that you may be about to experience is, well, devastating. Basically, there is a good chance that nothing you do or say or think, will make sense for a few weeks (at least). There's a very good chance that things will be just as bad or worse, for your partner. Now is a really good time for you two, to love and support each other. All the other stuff about relationships with a capital R, or all the woulda shoulda coulda about your past.... let it go for now. Worry about it in a month or three, if you have the energy and the need.
Sometimes the best advice you'll find in the SLLOTD... is in the comments threads.
Answer: Size of Asshole (SOA) is very much in the eye of the beholder, MSR, and the beholder's subjective, personal experience will largely determine their SOA estimates. Your ex-girlfriend/fiancé—LDG—would doubtless classify you as a huge asshole, MSR, because how dare you meet Someone Else and how dare you change your mind about spending your life with her after you two had already discussed who to vote for, where to live, and—details, details—after you'd gone and proposed to her. Your current girlfriend—SE—would come in with a very different SOA estimate; earlier in the relationship she may have classified you as a tiny asshole or even a rare-to-nonexistent non-asshole. Now, of course, some months into the relationship, she should be able to see you for the asshole you are—not too big, not too small, just right.
And for the record...
When we make a marriage proposal—when it's made, when it's accepted—we've taken a big step toward making a lifetime commitment. But the proposal by itself isn't that lifetime commitment. Proposals, unlike marriages, are relatively easy to extricate ourselves from. By design. So...
"We're engaged!" = "We're planning to get married and at our wedding we will commit to spending the rest of our lives together... if everything goes well during the engagement and, of course, during the marriage."
"We're engaged!" ≠ "We've already committed to spending our lives together and the actual marriage ceremony is just a tacky, expensive formality!"
So as painful as it might be, and as likely as it is to inflate your SOA average, we have the right to back out of a marriage proposal. Hell, we have a responsibility to back out of a marriage proposal if we think we've proposed to the wrong person. (We also enjoy a hard-won right to back out of the marriage itself, lifetime commitment notwithstanding, if we make the mistake of marrying the wrong person, if we grow apart, etc.)
Looking on the bright side, MSR, your ex is young, there are other men out there, men who may have an easier time sharing a bed with someone who wouldn't vote for Donald Trump but would vote for Cruz, Rubio, Jeb!, Huckabee, Christie, Santorum, or Fiorina. She may look back one day, perhaps after she's fallen in love with Cruz supporter, and be able to see that you made the right decision. At that point your SOA average will shrink.
And... wait: your new girlfriend is less empathetic than your Republican ex-girlfriend? How is that even possible? And how is that a selling point?
Ask yourself which scenario seems likelier:
1. Your wife has always been comfortable with how close her husband and sister are because—as she sees it—her sister is "safe," i.e. her husband's relationship with her sister doesn't threaten her marriage because decent men don't fuck their wives' sisters and loving sisters don't fuck their sisters' husbands and she's always seen you as decent and her sister as loving so... nothing to worry about, you two can be trusted together, neither of you would ever betray her, etc.
2. Your wife would so totally be into the idea of sharing you—sexually, romantically, intimately—with her sister. In fact, there's nothing your wife would enjoy more than the scent of her sister's sex funk all over her husband's cock.
I'm gonna crawl out on this large, sturdy limb, AMILE, and say scenario 1 seems far likelier. I've met plenty of M/F/F poly triads, and heard from scores of them through my column and podcast, but I can't recall a single instance of an M/Sis/Sis poly triad.
So if I were in your shoes, AMILE, I would stuff that one passionate kiss down the ol' memory hole while gracefully distancing myself from my spouse's sibling. I certainly wouldn't bet my happy, loving, stable marriage on the unlikely chance my spouse would not only be into the idea of opening up our relationship after ten years, but also into the idea of bringing her sister into it and onto my cock.  (AMILE, Occam's Razor. Occam's Razor, AMILE.)
Also, AMILE, you could put yourself in your wife's shoes: How would you feel if she wanted to fuck your brother? Or enter into a poly triad with you and your dad? 
But if you simply must sound the wife out on the concept of polyamory—because you never know and you know your wife better than I do and the heart wants what it wants and nothing venture, nothing gained, etc.—you could trick the wife into watching a few episodes of Polyamory: Married and Dating, AMILE. Tell her someone at work was raving about it or someone you went to college with was in it. Then you can have a general discussion about Polyamory, The Concept. If the wife says she could kinda sorta maybe see herself in a poly triad someday, AMILE, go ahead and ask her what kind of woman she could kinda sorta maybe see you two possibly dating together.
Oh, look: another large, sturdy limb: Your wife's answer to that last question is not gonna be, "Definitely a relative of mine."
Nope.
Stop distressing (about your sex drive), DTF, and keep de-stressing (with good sex when you’re with your BF, daily masturbation when you’re apart). Enjoy.
Now won't you please join me in watching "Are We Ready For Robot Relationships," a debate that took place at De Montfort University in the UK in late February.

Remember, kids: It's okay to have a smart phone and it's okay to have a toaster and it's okay to have a Fleshlight. But things get problematic when you duct tape your smart phone and your Fleshlight to your toaster and name it Doug.
Tell her on your next date, NOHOPE—about the sex part, about that.
Being upfront about our attractions/orientations at the outset—whatever our attractions/orientations might be—saves us all a lot of time, heartache, and recrimination on the backend. Your complete lack of interest in sex may be a dealbreaker for this girl, NOHOPE, as odds are good she's sexual, odds are equally good she's sizing you up as a prospective sex (and romance!) partner, and odds are even better she made the entirely reasonable assumption you were open to both romance and sex. Because, you know, you took her up on the offer of a date. Now people shouldn't make assumptions, of course, but we are an assumption-making species. And it's entirely reasonable to assume that someone who says yes to a date is interested in you sexually. (Women shouldn't assume every guy they meet is straight, but if I went on a date with a woman without letting her know first and/or promptly that I wasn't straight and so sex wasn't a possibility... odds are good she would be annoyed, embarrassed, pissed or some combo thereof.) You can certainly continue to go on dates after you fill in that missing piece, NOHOPE, if it's what you both want. After all, dating isn't just for sex, it's about getting to know people.
And if she doesn't want to keep dating you, NOHOPE, but you'd like to keep dating someone? You have options. Gays find gays on Scruff and Grindr and kinksters find kinksters on Fetlife and Recon and asexuals find other asexuals on Asexual Cupid and Asexualitic.
Asexuality has become something of a buzzword lately (see here, here, and here), which is great for ace visibility, but the community and identity is still misunderstood. Asexuality has been treated as a mental health disorder, a sexual dysfunction, and even a paraphilia. Researchers have recently determined—or caught up to the fact that—asexuality is best understood as a sexual orientation. I'm not sure how involved you are in any community, NOHOPE, but joining a group of self-identified asexual people could be helpful—in the social and non-sexual dating departments. And the Asexual Visibility and Education Network (AVEN) has plenty of active forums where experienced aces offer advice and perspective to newly self-identified or newly-out asexuals. Good luck.



My response after the jump...
You may very well be alone for the rest of your life, LASS, but you're already doing everything I urge lonely people to do: You're getting out there and living your life, you're being yourself, you're doing shit, you're going places. Happy, active, and self-actualized people are more attractive and likelier to attract mates—so put up a few personal ads and see if there's anyone in your area who wants to join you for dinner, snowboarding, horseback riding, whatever. But more importantly, LASS, always remember this: It's better to be a happy, active, and self-actualized single person than a miserable, sedentary, and the-opposite-of-self-actualized-whatever-that-is partnered person.
I'm not sure what speech your husband gave you, SAD, but it doesn't sound like one of mine.
Yes, under certain circumstances I believe a person can and perhaps should unilaterally open a closed marriage—a person can cheat to stay married and stay sane—but most of the speeches I've given on the subject have addressed unhappily sexless marriages, i.e. marriages in which one spouse has unilaterally ended the sex life of the other and no amount of working on it, counseling, listening, dishwashing, etc., is going to change things and divorce would create hardship for all involved. Your marriage presumably wasn't sexless, SAD, it was merely dickless—or bonusdickless.
And, yes, I've argued that someone who makes a monogamous commitment and only cheats once or twice over the multi-decade course of a successful marriage—with "successful" here defined as "loving, emotionally fulfilling, mutually gratifying"—can and should be viewed as having been pretty good at monogamy, not bad at monogamy. But there's a difference between cheating once or twice over thirty or forty years and unilaterally imposing a new relationship model on a partner who didn't want to be in that kind of relationship in the first place—particularly if that partner isn't free to walk away because kids, economic interdependence, social and emotional inertia, whatever the fuck, etc.
So for the record, SAD: I take dim view of what your husband has done. He made a monogamous commitment to you fifteen years ago—monogamy was the price of admission he willingly paid to be with you—and at some point he realized he couldn't do it anymore. He could've and should've raised the subject of opening your marriage up at that point instead of running out and jumping up and down on dicks.
You want a monogamous marriage, he wants an open marriage—and an open marriage is what he's got right now, whether you like it or not. Seems to me a textbook example of "irreconcilable differences," SAD—unless being in a non-monogamous marriage is the price of admission you're willing to pay stay married to this dude.
Hello there, Urban Dictionary: 
don't stick your dick in crazy
A relatively recent but perennially true maxim, advising one to refrain from sexual congress with the unbalanced.
Some people, e.g. people like your boyfriend, object to this maxim due to its highly problematic gendering or whatever—because not all crazy people are women—but I would argue that those who make this objection need to check their heterosexism or whatever and promptly cease erasing millions of dick-stickable sexual minorities. Lots of people who aren't women enjoy getting dicks stuck in them: gay men; bisexual men with same-sex partners (or opposite-sex partners who enjoy pegging them); men who have sex with men but do not identify as gay or bisexual; male-bodied agender persons who enjoy being penetrated (singly or doubly); bigender persons who experience their gender identities in a non-concurrent fashion and who also enjoy being on the receiving end of penetrative sex when they are experiencing their male identities, etc.
I would further argue that the maxim "don't stick your dick in crazy" can be used by anyone of either/any gender in reference to anyone of either/any gender. (See also: "suck my dick." Citation: "Broad City," Season 2, Episode 8. Illana: "Why don't you suck my dick!") That said, this maxim is easily adapted for use by cisgendered straight women in reference to cisgendered straight men: "Don't let crazy stick its dick in you."
In summation, NFS: Your boyfriend is crazy and you shouldn't let him stick his dick in you anymore. DTMFA. 
P.S. It was wrong of me to assume NFS's boyfriend has a dick; not all men have dicks. My apologies. It was likewise wrong of me to assume NFS doesn't have a dick; not all women don't have dicks. My apologies. Also: the word "crazy" is ableist AF. My apologies. And yes, bartender, I will have another.
This comes to us courtesy of the National Conference of State Legislators:
Twenty-five states prohibit marriages between first cousins. Six states allow first cousin marriage under certain circumstances, and North Carolina allows first cousin marriage but prohibits double-cousin marriage. States generally recognize marriages of first cousins married in a state where such marriages are legal.
First cousin marriages are totally legal in half the United States and legally recognized in all fifty states—and you guys are second cousins, CSCWS. So you two shouldn't let "OMG COUSINS!" stand in the way of fucking around or, if you can work through your other issues, shacking the fuck up or getting the fuck (re-)married. There's nothing to feel conflicted about here. Yes, it might squick out some family members... but I didn't let that stand in the way of my happiness, CSCWS, and I don't see why you should let it stand in the way of yours.
And, hey, here's a list, courtesy of Wikipedia, of people who were married to their cousins. Bach, Darwin, Einstein, FDR—all married to cousins, as were seemingly half the signers of the Declaration of Independence. And, hey, here's a website with info and message boards—a website that doesn't seem to have had a design update since the early 1990s—just for cousin couples.
Share those links with your towering hulk of a cousin and see if that doesn't make him feel more comfortable with the idea of the rest of the family discovering your hugely boring secret.
But you do need to ask yourself if you want to be a guy who happens to be an asshole over the longterm, CSCWS, which is a much bigger issue than being with a guy who happens to be your second cousin. Your cousin may be the only way-bigger guy you've been with, but he's not the only way-bigger guy on the planet.
I'm Dan Savage and I approve this meme.
Let him crash and let him burn, HELP, and don't feel bad about it.
Consciously or subconsciously, crashing and burning is what your brother wants—his recklessness is proof that. And if he wants to slam his hand down on the self-destruct button, HELP, you are not obligated to spend your days tackling him before he reaches it. So tell your brother you're leaving the company, tell him why, if there's someone over him (a board of directors? a group of investors?) tell them why. Then tell your brother you're not going to lie or cover for him anymore. His wife obviously knowns something's up—hence the texting and cornering—and while you shouldn't provide her with names and dates, you (and your parents) should provide her with the kind of non-answers that function as answers when she asks vague, open-ended questions ("Do you think he's cheating on me?" "That's something you need to talk with your husband about.") and direct answers when she asks questions about lies your bother has told to her that directly involve you ("He says he was at your house last night." "He was not at my house.").
Cheating is no one's business but the persons involved, HELP, and the email that came in immediately after yours—someone stumbled over evidence that a relative might be cheating—is a good example of "mind your own business" scenario. But your brother, by putting your job and the company you co-founded at risk, and by putting you in a position of having to lie to his wife on his behalf, has involved you in his cheating and thus his cheating is your business too.
My response after the jump...
When someone says, "That's so gay," but means, "That's so stupid," they're being homophobic. Obviously. But a straight guy who says he's gay for musicals isn't saying he's stupid for them, TCJ, he's saying, "I love something that many gay men are passionate about—and I'm not talking about cock." Not all gay men are passionate about musical theater, of course, just as not all straight men are into football. But a man with a passion for musical theater is likelier to be gay; if not, he'll at least be comfortable around gay people. I've heard gay guys who avidly follow the NFL describe themselves as straight for football. Likewise, a man with a passion for football is likelier to be straight.
You saying, "I'm gay for musical theater," or a gay guy saying, "I'm straight for football," amounts to a humorous acknowledgment that the majority of people interested in musicals or football are gay or straight, respectively. In neither case is it an insult or a put-down. But while I think you can continue to say that you're gay for musicals, TCJ, some gay men (or some of our more annoying "allies") may take offense. You don't have to pay attention to those people—they're just gay for taking offense.
My response after the jump...
First answer: technically, yes. But a case could be made that you're reusing and recycling. If there were a Green Building Certification program for kinks, SNIFF, yours would qualify.
Second answer: Chester the Molester was a comic strip about a guy, Chester, "who was interested in sexually molesting women and prepubescent girls," says my old friend Wikipedia. This vile comic strip, which ran in Hustler (of course), made child rape look like harmless and hilarious fun. Dwaine Tinsley, the creator of the strip, wound up going to prison for molesting his daughter—I'm guessing she would argue that child rape was neither harmless nor hilarious.
Since you are not interested in prepubescent boys, SNIFF, I don't think you're a pervert in the Chester the Molester mold. But a case could be made that your actions have a whiff of the nonconsensual about them—your coworkers would most likely object to how you're reusing and recycling their abandoned underpants—and you should probably knock it off. There are plenty of guys selling their used underwear and jocks online, from college athletes to porn stars, and if you work at a place with a private gym, SNIFF, you can presumably afford to buy a few pairs.
And finally: a letter from someone who followed my now widely embraced advice for Valentine's Day and all other days:
Great advice on #fuckfirst. My sleeping partner and I went out for Korean BBQ tonight—a total gluttonous feast—but we took your advice first. Thanks!
My response after the jump...
I'm pro maintenance sex, MSS.
Sometimes I sex my husband when I'm not feeling it; sometimes he sexes me when he's not feeling it. But maintenance sex is not the same thing as enthusiastic sex. The person asking for maintenance sex—the horny partner who's being indulged/milked/sexed by the non-horny partner—shouldn't expect mind-blowing, toe-curling, sheet-shredding sex. Maintenance sex is mellow sex, it's low-impact and low-stress, it's sex that requires minimal effort, and it's likely to be non-penetrative sex—and gratitude is the only appropriate response.
Another important note: Being pro maintenance sex doesn't obligate a person to have sex whenever their partner wants it. Proponents and practitioners of maintenance sex still get to say no. There's a difference between indulging your partner when you're not feeling it—when you could take it or leave it—and forcing yourself to have sex (or being guilted/pressured) when you're too exhausted, too sick, or too angry for sex.
And as you've discovered, MSS, and I can also attest, sometimes you go into sex "not wanting or needing it" and then you start to enjoy it, too, i.e., not in the mood when you started but definitely in the mood before you finished. Those are the times when low-stress maintenance sex turns into mind-blowing sex. I would hate to think of how much great sex I would've missed if my feminist principles didn't allow for maintenance sex.
P.S. to my readers. Don't you want a "Fuck First" or "GGG" coffee mug? Of course you do!
You're welcome, NLF, and thank you for the lovely email.
Thank you @fakedansavage for the "tough holidays" episode. Great advice on how to keep moving forward, even in tough times.
            
          
            
            — Eric Carvalho (@ericjcarvalho) November 26, 2015
Thank you @fakedansavage for the "tough holidays" episode. Great advice on how to keep moving forward, even in tough times.
You're welcome, Eric. That episode is here... for anyone who needs it.
Here's an idea: keep having this woman over for bondage and consensual/erotic "torture" scenes—but stuff the ball gag in your own mouth, PIT, at least when you feel the need to discuss mono vs. poly.
You consider yourself poly (because you have a broad definition of sex), she considers herself monogamous (because she has a narrower definition of sex). I'm with you, PIT, as I think all sorts of non-penetrative stuff counts as sex. But I don't see why you're so invested in persuading this woman, a woman who's just as casual play partner, that her definition of monogamy is all wrong isn't the same as yours. If you browbeat her into recognizing kink play as one form of sex—and I'm not suggesting that you are browbeating her, PIT, only that you may have to start if you're gonna convince her that She's Wrong and You're Right—there's no detectable upside for you. She's not going to play with you twice as much or twice as hard if she embraces the poly label. And there's a definite potential downside to browbeating her in to accepting your definition of monogamy: she might stop seeing you due to the browbeating—she doesn't come to you to get her brows beat—or she might stop seeing you because being monogamous is more important to her than playing with her kinky not-actually-fucking fuckbuddy.
Here's a better plan: you agree to disagree, you go right on identifying as poly, she goes right on identifying as monogamous, PIT, and you keep playing and having fun and respecting each other's limits, definitions, safe words, boundaries, sexual identities, and self-conceptions.
I'd like to speak your boyfriend, SOT, so I could ask him the obvious followup question (OFQ): Why does it feel awkward? You either didn't ask him the OFQ... or you did ask the OFQ and didn't like his answer.
Assuming your boyfriend is actually into you and wants to keep seeing you, his answer to the OFQ went or would go something like this: "We've been seeing each other for less than a year and to me it feels like it's too soon to be spending the holidays with each other's families—it's also too soon for us to be calling each other 'partner.' So let's take a deep breath, stay calm and keep being wonderful to each other. If we're still together this time next year then, yeah, we'll do Thanksgiving with your folks or mine."
If you asked and your boyfriend the OFQ and he didn't give you an answer, SOT, then it's possible—and possibility ≠ certainty—that your boyfriend doesn't want to keep seeing you and is operating/dating under the mistaken-but-all-too-common belief that stringing someone along is less cruel than dumping someone right before Thanksgiving/Xmess/NYE. He may not want to spend Thanksgiving/Xmess/NYE with your folks because doing so will be held up as evidence of his lying jerkiness after he dumps you on November 27 or December 26 or January 2.
My advice: Take "it's awkward" for an answer (or whatever answer he gave to the OFQ), tell him you'd like to catch a movie or have dinner on Saturday, and don't make a BFD out of his reluctance to spend Thursday with at your mom's and Friday at your dad's. It could mean nothing at all or it could mean something pretty dire. But there's no way for you to know what it means, SOT, so you'll just have to wait and see.
What do you do? 
You ask yourself if you believe your boyfriend when he says it was a mistake, ATU, one he deeply regrets, and one he never intends to repeat.
If you simply can't be romantically involved with someone capable of such a terrible/Michael Caine-y thing, ATU, the question is a rhetorical one. You can't stay with him and you'll have to end the relationship. But if could stay with someone capable of doing such a terrible thing so long as it's not a thing they'll ever do again, ATU, and if you believe your boyfriend when he says it was a mistake, one he regrets, and won't happen again, then you stay.
And when your find yourself feeling squicked out by the knowledge that your boyfriend fucked around on a previous girlfriend with her own sister, ATU, you take a deep breath and remind yourself that good and decent people sometimes do shitty, indecent things... and then you pause to consider all the shitty and/or indecent things you've done, ATU, some or most of which your boyfriend presumably remains blissfully unaware.
It's too bad that suggestive photo is rattling around out there in the vastness of the Internet, ATU, but I'm a little curious about how exactly you "came across" it in the first place. If you went looking for dirt—if you were snooping—you found it. Congrats. Now I'm not against snooping in all instances. Sometimes we find out shit we had a both right and an urgent need to know: the BF/GF/NBF*/fiancé/spouse is cheating a way that puts you at risk; they're running up ruinous debts; they're hiding a secret second family; they're sending money to Donald Trump, etc. But just as often we find out shit we didn't need to know—something in the BF/GF/NBF's past, something they regret, something they'll never do again (do you even have a sister?)—and can never un-know.
You learned that your boyfriend is did something pretty fucked up once. Whether you decide to stay or go, ATU, know that you snoop at your own risk—sorry, know that you explore "the vastness of the Internet" at your own risk.
* Nonbinaryfriend.
While I can certainly appreciate what’s hot about this fantasy, CUMDUMP, I can’t sign off on your proposed remedy to your husband's inability to be in two places/holes at once. Sucking on a defrosted lump of come just sounds nasty. And while you've given off-the-shelf dildos a try and found them lacking, there's another dildo option you might want to consider.
“A timeless philosophical quandary: How can one person be in two places at the same time?” said Todd Jarnagin of Clone-A-Willy, makers of the in-home penis molding kit. “Or how can CUMDUMP get fucked by her husband while simultaneously having her husband come in her mouth? Two husbands would be the obvious answer but CUMDUMP ruled inviting others to join. And we can’t currently help her find your husband’s alternate-universe double. But I think we do have the solution for you: Clone A Willy.”
This is an unsurprising suggestion... considering that Jarnagin works for Clone A Willy, a sex toy company based in Portland, Oregon. But creating a replica of your husband's cock really is your only realistic/non-icktastic/monogamous option.
And you won't just be replicating your husband's cock, CUMDUMP, you'll be improving on it.
“The Clone A Willy kit allows a person to make a vibrating silicone replica of an erect penis,” said Jarnagin. “Using our product would allow CUMDUMP's husband to penetrate CUMDUMP while he was coming in her mouth. Hell, they could make two copies of his penis and use both while he came in her mouth.”
Hell, you could make three clones of you husband's cock, CUMDUMP, and stuff one up your husband's ass while the other two clones are stuffing your holes—or, hell, why not go crazy and make FOUR clones? Then you can toss one out an open window and onto your lawn while you're using the other three.
“The mold is a fast-setting alginate similar to what dentists use when making casts of teeth, so it captures every detail,” said Jarnagin, “and the silicone is 100% platinum cure, so the entire process is hypoallergenic and body-safe. It requires a little prep work, so CUMDUMP should plan on spending one night getting her husband hard for the purposes of making a mold and then waiting 24 hours for the silicone to cure. She can plan on spending the next night with a vibrating clone of her husband fucking her while he comes in her mouth! Philosophical quandary solved!”
I'm going to make an assumption that may not be fair and may be ageist as hell. If it's unfair and/or ageist, FCG, feel free to disregard the assumption—but my advice stands regardless.
You say you did sex work in your forties. You don't say how long ago that was, FCG, but I'm gonna assume you're in your late forties now or early fifties. Because I suspect there's a voice in your head telling you to settle for this man—settle for this piece of shit—because what other options do you have at your age? It's the only reason I can come up with for why you've stayed with him.
Here are your other options: A different man—one who isn't an a piece of shit—or being single.
There are roughly 3.5 billion other men on the planet—some your age or older, some younger and into older. And there has to be tens thousands of men out there (more!) who would be happy to be with you. But even if there aren't, FCG, or even if you can't find one of them, or even if you're not attracted to any of the ones you do find (or vice-versa), you would be better off alone than with this sadistic, slut-shaming, whore-phobic piece of shit.
With apologies to Maya Angelou: When someone tells you who they are—over and over again—believe them. This shit insults you to your face on a daily basis and then tells you it will never change. He intends to go on slut-shaming/whore-shaming and insulting you for as long as you're together. 
Fuuuuuuuuck that, FCG, and fuuuuuuuuck him: DTMFA.
If you insist on giving him one last chance—which I don't think you should do but this is advice not binding arbitration—then say this to him and fuuuuuuuucking mean it: "The sex work in my past is a fact about me and I have no regrets. It's not something I'm ashamed of and I'm not going to apologize to you or anyone else for it. You can either accept this fact about me or you can get the fuuuuuuuuck out of my life."
Good recommendation, GMTF. Thanks for sharing.
P.S. BTW... my littlest sister told me a little bit ago that she's JC from this column. Thank you for taking care of her at a time when I had moved away so I had no idea what was going on and she didn't feel comfortable talking to our parents about it. You do good work.
DTMFA.
That's not what you wanted to hear, I realize, but in my professional and personal experience, TOM, this isn't a problem that gets better with time. On some level your fiancée wants you to leave her—and she'll go on being shitty to you and unkind to other women, and she'll keep making scenes and running you through the wringer, until you both dump and vindicate her. Face it: she'd rather be right (about you) than with you. And when you do finally dump her—or divorce her (if you're foolish enough to marry her absent a profound and lasting change)—she'll tell herself (and her son) that she was right about you all along, that you were always planning to leave her, that you're still hung up on your ex, that you're attracted to this coworker or that female friend, etc.
There's a small chance that dumping her will bring her to her senses, i.e. she'll realize she has to get a fucking grip and she'll successfully work through her jealousy issues—a process that involves accepting that of course her boyfriend/husband is attracted to other women from time to time, just as she's attracted to other men from time to time. I've seen it work, TOM, but it's a long shot.
There's also the Shamu strategy. 
Good luck.
Brace yourself, TRISTE. Because I'm going to pronounce your teen romance dead, deceased, expired, no more, passed on, [insert Italian word or phrase meaning dead and buried and rapidly decomposing here], etc. A first love can feel big—even a first crush can—and its end can be hard to accept. This isn't about age. If you read my column you know there are plenty of way too many grownass adults out there who also have a hard time understanding when a relationship is dead, deceased, expired, etc.
Romantic love comes with risks. For example... you could fall in love with someone who later realizes she's a lesbian and she might (nicely) tell you to fuck off and then you're gonna have to... well, you're gonna have to fuck off. Nicely. Because you can't force someone remain in a relationship with you. Va via! And that's what you have to do now, TRISTE. Because this relationship is over. Finito! Scaduto! Morto! (I'm gonna need to learn better Italian, seeing as how many Italians write me these days.) 
Backing up... it's great that you're figuring out the type of relationship structure that'll work best for you, TRISTE, but some things need to be clarified. While "poly love" is different from non-poly love in some ways—emotionally, logistically, legally—there are aspects the two share. For instance, even in a polyamorous relationship, being dumped means you've been dumped. Your girlfriend—let's start calling her your ex-girlfriend, shall we?—doesn't need your permission to end things with you. Even if the dumping seems entirely illogical and/or wildly stupid and/or insanely cruel to you, TRISTE, you have no other choice but to respect someone's decision when they dump you.
And, I'm sorry, but there's nothing illogical, stupid, or cruel about what she's done. If she's a lesbian—if she realizes now that she's a lesbian—you can't ask her to grandfather in you and your dick on account of a chronological technicality, e.g. because she was fucking you before she realized she was a lesbian. Opening up the relationship isn't going to magically make her bisexual.
Looking on the bright side... there are a few things you've got going for you. First, you live in Italy and she lives in Sweden, and it's much easier to get over someone when they're far the fuck away. And if you can accept the inevitable—you've been dumped—without letting anger or hurt or bullshit arguments get the better of you, you should be able to salvage a friendship from the wreckage. (We call that "sticking the dismount" in English*.)
But that friendship, if it comes (if she wants it, if it's not painful for you), is a ways down the road. Right now you gotta let this/her go, give her some space, and spend a month or two—but no more than two—moping and feeling sorry for yourself. Binge on Italian Netflix (what's good on Italian Netflix?), get out of the house, hang out with friends, get some exercise (play a sport, go on a hike, have some consensual, casual, athletic, 19-year-old-style sex with some girls who are into boys). And between moping, hiking, and fucking, TRISTE, devote a little time to thinking about how your generation can save the world from the olds who've screwed everything up.
* We don't, actually, but we should.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
Wow, GRIND, your girlfriend is pretty fucking dense. I'm surprised she remembers to breathe in her sleep.
I mean, she actually heard you say, "I wanted to fuck last night—maybe you can wear one of your sexy bras and thongs one day soon?" and somehow didn't realize that what you meant was "Please initiate sex more often." And she's seen you smearing lotion on yourself after showering and somehow didn't realize that you wanted her to start initiating sex once in a while. Amazing. A boyfriend smearing lotion on himself—who doesn't know what that means?
Um. Yeah. No.
Sorry, GRIND, but you're the dense one in this relationship. The likely takeaway from "I wanted to fuck last night—maybe you can wear one of your sexy bras and thongs one day soon?" is "I wanted to fuck last night, but the granny panties/pajama bottoms/hazmat Spanx you were wearing were such a turnoff that I couldn't get it up. You suck at this girlfriend shit." And while seeing your boyfriend "lotion up" after a shower may inspire lust, it doesn't communicate a very specific need like "Please initiate sex more often." The only thing it communicates for sure is "My boyfriend isn't going to put up with dry skin."
You want your girlfriend to initiate sex more often? Tell her you want her to initiate sex more often. Trust me, GRIND, that straightforward request will display more sensitivity to your girlfriend's feelings—and will be less crazy-making—than a potentially confidence-shredding statement like "Hey, I wanted to fuck you last night but you were wearing the wrong panties" or the conspicuous application of skin moisturizer.
But even if you're straight with her, GRIND, things are unlikely to change. She initiates when she's horny/sexually frustrated, but she obviously has a lower libido than you do and gets horny/sexually frustrated at intervals that leave you frustrated. Your desire for her cranks her up, so she's good to go when you initiate. But she's unlikely to feel the urge to initiate as often as you would like her to regardless
I don't get letters like yours often, TOM—thankfully.
And, yes, I would describe this as an abusive relationship—and the abuse may be worse than you know. Abused women who stay with their abusers (because they're trapped by economic circumstance, because they're afraid to leave, because their abusers are threatening their children) will sometimes minimize the violence and abuse they're experiencing for fear of being judged or condemned for not leaving. So I worry that this woman's shitty 35-year-old BF was a more than "slightly physical" with her when she returned home.
And, yes, if it's possible for you to wreck this home, TOM, I think you should wreck it. Bearing in mind that it's no uncommon for an abusive ex-boyfriend or ex-husband to attack the ex's new partner. Look out for yourself too.
That said, if you think the prospect of being with you might inspire this woman to leave her abusive boyfriend—if she needs leverage and you're willing to play the lever—communicate your desire to be with her. But urge her to get counseling after she leaves him for you. She'll need professional help to process the emotional fallout, she'll need help recognizing unhealthy/dysfunctional/codependent warning signs and patterns, and she'll benefit from having an advocate in her life who isn't also in her pants. Tell her you have no desire to take possession of her, tell her you don't see her as some sort of rescue, tell her not to see you as a knight in shining armor. Then do what you can to help line up the resources (social, financial, familial) she'll need to stand on her own two feet—and then, if she chooses to stay with you, it's a free choice she's making, not a choice she's making out desperation or dependance.
Finally... that night she stayed over with you, after the show where you ran into some friends of her abusive boyfriend, you say her boyfriend called and called your number. How did her boyfriend get his hands on your phone number?
You can ask him to leave whenever you like/you're done with him, GTFO.
Your offer to put him up? Predicated upon the assumption that this romance would continue to blossom—or whatever—and, yeah, the bloom is off the rose, the rosebush has been dug up and mulched, the earth under it has been salted, etc. You didn't adopt him, he's not your dependent, you're not obligated to house him past the relationship's expiration date.
As for the awkwardness, GTFO, best to power through that shit. You know it's over (you're not fucking him), he knows it's over (he's not fucking you), but neither of you wants to acknowledge the over-ness of the situation because... what would that mean? You have to kick him out first thing in the morning? He has to ask mom and dad for more money before lunchtime? He has to head back to the UK after dinner?
There's another option.
Go to him and say, "Hey, we gave it a shot but it looks like an LTR isn't in the offing. Still, our STR—short-term relationship—was pretty awesome. Here's the thing: We could salvage a lifelong friendship out of this if we can manage to stick the dismount. But the more time we spend cooped up in my apartment together the greater the odds of things going from merely awkward to completely toxic. I don't want to force you to go home early but I have a ton of work to do and I need my space. So you're welcome to stay here but I'm going to need you—for my sanity and for the sake of our future friendship—to make yourself exceedingly scarce. Get out there, meet other girls, slay 'em with that accent, spend the night as often as you can... and, with luck, the next four weeks should fly by. Deal?"
What should you do, FUCK?
You should do unto others as you would have them do unto you—meaning, of course, you should make an effort to look past the superficial things you condemn other gay men for failing to look past, i.e. income, conventional attractiveness, dick size.
The key to your dilemma is packed into that vague parenthetical: You do the same thing you complain about other guys doing—meaning, guys who aren't hot and/or hung and/or loaded are just as invisible to you as you are to all hot and/or hung and/or loaded guys. I'm sorry, FUCK, but you either gotta be the change you wanna see in the world—you'll either have to start taking second looks at smart and funny guys who aren't handsome in the way guys need to be to get dates with guys who are handsome enough to get by without smarts or a sense of humor—or you'll have to hold out for a guy who may never come along, i.e. a guy who could take his pick of the washboarded and firm-pectoral'd on Grindr, Jacked, Scruff, etc. (some of whom, it must be said, are both smart and funny) but who chooses you over the buff and the beautiful. It could happen, of course, but the wait could be long, frustrating, and ultimately fruitless.
Before I let you go, FUCK...
I remember reading the results of a study—this was at least a decade ago—that compared gay male couples to straight couples; the researchers compared communication skills, sexual fulfillment, stability, and some other traits. (I tried to find the study without luck, FUCK, but maybe someone reading this will recognize the study and toss up a link in the comments.) There was one finding that really shocked these researchers: partnered gay men were able to be honest with partners who were not their physical ideals—and, yes, about the fact that they were not their physical ideals. (Or, in some instances, not their physical ideals anymore.) Needless to say, this wasn't something they saw in the straight couples they studied.
It seems like the guys in that particular study—a study I can't cite because I can't remember what it was called or who conducted it (but I didn't dream it up!)—might be good role models for you. Find a smart, funny guy you enjoy spending time with, maybe someone who isn't your physical ideal (just as you might not be his), and live together and love each other and think about whatever you wanna or need to think about when you fuck around. And maybe, every once in a while, as a treat, you rent yourselves a handsome and hung guy and go to town on him together.
Good luck.
1. Ignore the dumb fuck. And if you get (or already got) promoted over her, you could fire her. But since learning to ignore irritating people is a life skill that all adults who don't aspire to be spree killers must acquire at some point, SMQG, it might be better for all involved (all two of you) if you regarded this dumb fuck as a learning opportunity.
2. I don't think "the female body is icky," at least not objectively speaking. The female body is beautiful and luscious... to people who are into those sorts of bodies. Which I am not. But my disinterest doesn't make them not beautiful and luscious. Similarly, I think oysters are icky. But lots of folks love 'em, my husband included, and will literally put those subjectively disgusting things in their mouths.
And that sexual peak stuff? It's likely a myth and I'm doing my best to unlearn it and to stop repeating it. Why does it seem like men hit their sexual peak in their teens and women later in life? Well, maybe it's because boys are encouraged to think of themselves as sexual (horny boys are the heroes of teen comedies, for example, while horny girls don't exist in teen comedies and are slaughtered in teen horror flicks), boys aren't slut shamed, and boys are raised to feel entitled to go for whatever they want. Women, on the other hand, are discouraged from seeing themselves as sexual, they are brutally slut shamed as girls (and by girls), and girls are raised to defer, not demand. It stands to reason that women need time to dig themselves out from under all the crap heaped up on them in childhood—e.g., what all boys are encouraged to get out there and do by age 18 many women don't find the courage to get out there and do until after age 28.
Or as the sexologist Ava Cadell told Details: "As women mature, they become more comfortable in their own skin and gain sexual confidence to communicate their wants, needs, and desires."
For tips on exploring your lady parts, I recommend Dr. Debby Herenick's book Because It Feels Good: A Woman's Guide to Sexual Pleasure and Satisfaction.
3. Make time to see your mom—maybe when your husband is hanging out with friends. You owe her that. Be polite to your dad—you two don't click, but he wasn't a monster. It's possible your depression prevented you from bonding with your father in your teens or wore away the bond that was already there. He may deserve another chance.) Siblings tend to grow apart, so don't torture yourself about not being tight. But if your feelings toward them are "could take 'em or leave 'em" feelings toward your siblings, SMQG, you should err on the side of taking 'em every once in a while. Because once mom and dad are gone, your siblings are still going to be there. And if the shit ever hits the fan, if your marriage should (God forbid) should fall apart, or if you and your husband fall on hard times and you need help, it's your siblings you'll be calling.
My response after the jump...
While it's great that you're understanding of your girlfriend's sensitivities, LIBIDO, and while it's commendable that you view nonpenetrative sex as fulfilling, you're running the risk of "understanding" her into a relationship that makes you both unhappy. Because someone who wants sex multiple times per week will eventually be made miserable by someone who wants sex far less than once a month (which is what the "or so" at the end of "once-every-three-weeks-or-so" means), and vice versa—being with you will make your girlfriend miserable in the long run, too.
I get e-mails daily from miserable people on both sides of this divide, LIBIDO, from people with high libidos who married lows and from people with low libidos who married highs. The highs are miserable because years of sexual rejection have shredded their sexual self-esteem, or they feel like monsters after years of being "indulged" with going-through-the-motions sex by barely willing and clearly miserable partners. The lows are miserable because going through the motions makes them miserable or they're sick of constantly being pestered for sex and made to feel inadequate or broken when they pass.
You're young and straight, LIBIDO, and the culture tells the young and the straight that they must be monogamous (because sex is so important) and that they shouldn't take sexual compatibility into consideration when picking a partner (because sex is so unimportant). Other shit matters, too, of course—stuff like emotional compatibility, similar life goals, being on the same page about kids, etc. But basic sexual compatibility matters, too, and its absence will eventually undermine everything else.
By which I mean to say, LIBIDO: You've been dating this girl long enough to know that you're not a match—you're not sexually compatible—and that's reason enough to end this relationship.
My response after the jump...
This experience would seem to fall in the "right not to know" column, NIPPLES, but "right not to know" always has to be weighed against "likelihood of finding out."
You indicate that this couple—the girl with the lovely, direct, and inviting breasts (LDIBs), and the boy who witnessed the touching and sucking of said LDIBs—aren't just friends of yours, NIPPLES, but friends of "ours." If either of them makes a reference to this game of strip cribbage—or strip Uno or strip poker or strip Schnapsen—the next time the four of you hang out, the boyfriend could be blindsided. And it's not clear whether there were other witnesses to your drunken touch-and-suck. But if there were others there, and if you socialize with these other witnesses IRL or online, the chances that your boyfriend will find out increase exponentially.
You know your boyfriend better than I do, NIPPLES, so you'll have to ask yourself if finding out about the incident at a party or via a snarky Facebook post would leave him feeling twice as upset—because then we're talking about a crime and a cover-up, and learning about the LDIBs incident in a manner (from a friend, in front of other people) that leaves him feeling humiliated.
My response after the jump...
Closeted gay men don't use colored T-shirts to send messages to out gay men. They use Craigslist.
Look, PID, Jeffrey Dahmer—aka the Milwaukee Cannibal—ate a friend of mine. By which I mean to say: Some gay people are insane. I'm not saying you're in danger of being drugged, raped, butchered, and eaten by this guy from your writing group. But the guy is—if your account is accurate—more than a little unpleasant and a whole lot batshit. Confide in some friends in your writing group about what's going on and be prepared to leave the group and/or form a breakaway group if Mr. Red Sweater continues to detect clues in your wardrobe. Also: Do not spend any more time alone with this guy. Someone who would accuse you of making super-secret passes at him via red T-shirts is capable of making baseless accusations about much worse.
And finally, PID, a bonus pro tip: Writers don't need a writers' group to write. They just need to write.
My response after the jump...
I am sharing your letter, CC, in the hopes that doctors all over the world read it and promptly incorporate your "flared-base" advice into their practice. If they don't, well, then we will just have to conclude that flared-base advice isn't given to patients by doctors—ER or otherwise—because doctors secretly enjoy digging various foreign objects out of the variable rectums of various gentlemen.
For many young queer kids, URBAN, an all expense summer in the city with supportive, accepting relatives would be like winning the lottery. An experience like this could be life-changing—it could be life-saving for a queer kid. But you never know. This particular queer kid could hate it and think everything is awful and spend the entire time he was with you guys sulking in your guest room. You never know with teenagers. They're unpredictable and moody and hard to read and sometimes even harder to tolerate. But there's the potential here for something significant—for significant good to be done—and you and your wife should be given credit for wanting to offer this experience to your nephew. 
Now, as I was recently reminded, it's lazy to assume that "flyover" country is inherently hostile to queer people. There are plenty of areas in the middle of America where LGBT people feel safe-ish and welcome-ish. (Most of them, I would argue, are cities, progressive blue dots in red seas.) In your nephew's case, it sounds like he's in a moderately open-minded area since his school has agreed to convert some of the bathrooms to gender-neutral. Regardless, even if your nephew's small town has the same LGBT-protecting politics as your big gay city, you're still absolutely right to meddle, URBAN. 
We live in a particularly dangerous time of uncertainty and risk for trans kids—fuck you, Donald Trump—and even if, per your sister, your nephew's identity is in flux and not yet fixed, it's crucial to show support for who your nephew is right now. If your sister is shutting down this offer because she's trying to avoid the possibility/likelihood/reality that she has a trans son, URBAN, then present the argument differently: Your nephew should take you up on the offer because it's a great opportunity. In an ideal world, every small town kid should visit a vibrant, smelly city, and every urban prep student should spend time on a bucolic, smelly farm. Cross-cultural experiences round people out and create informed, curious citizens. (And we're going to need so many of those in the coming years.)
Again, URBAN, your approach ("we have to support the person my nephew IS right now, not the person he may or may not become") is the right one. Even if your nephew is still in the process of exploring his gender identity, even if there's a chance he isn't trans (per your sister), supporting who he is right now could mean the difference between your sister having a son or burying one.
Even if your sister can't be reasoned with, URBAN, talk with your nephew. Let him know he has family in the big city that he can depend on and who accept him. If he can't come now, let him know he can come in the future. He might look at you and scowl—or text you back some scowling emoji—because he has friends and crushes and projects where he is now and no desire to leave. You don't know, and you have to respect what he wants. But still give him the offer. At 16, he's pretty close to being a young adult, and a summer in the city with his cool uncle and aunt could be a watershed moment in his life—even if his mother says no, even if has to wait until he's 18 to come see you, you'll have given him something to look forward to. Hope's important. 

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Ugh.
I swore off answering questions like yours in this week's column, LOAC, and then I made the mistake of reading your letter. Just when I thought I was out... your tale of woe pulls me back in.
It's too bad your wife won't allow you to have a girlfriend on the side—I'm assuming the subject of getting your sexual needs met elsewhere was raised during those post-affair couple's counseling sessions—because this particular girlfriend sounds ideal. She's on the other side of the country and married herself, so she wouldn't be eating up all of your time and emotional energy, even as she ate up all of your sexual energy. And your wife isn't particularly interested in eating up your sexual energy—or anything else of yours—so why not outsource that?
I'm fucking mystified by people who aren't interested in having sex with their partners but who are nevertheless adamant that their partners not have sex with anyone else. Your wife would probably say the thought of you fucking another woman makes her miserable—miserable and insecure—but what about your misery? (And how would it make your wife feel to know that sexual deprivation has you looking forward to her death? Assuming that's what you meant by, "Can I just let time play out?") Our culture's simplistic, knee-jerk bias against "cheating" means the world will see you a horrible person who betrayed the woman you professed to love—and you'll see yourself that way—but the world is blind to your partner's betrayal of you. And it is a betrayal. If you make a monogamous commitment to someone, if you demand a monogamous commitment from someone, you are obligated to meet that person's reasonable sexual needs. If you can't meet those needs—if you're not a sexual person—then demanding monogamy (demanding celibacy) is a form of emotional abuse.
I probably shouldn't have picked your question for the SLLOTD, LOAC, and not just because I'm tired of telling people in loving-but-sexless marriages to do what they need to do stay married and stay sane. I shouldn't have run your letter because I can't help you. There are no good options here. You either betray your wife and feel like a piece of shit and spend half of every day worrying about getting caught or you betray yourself and feel like a piece of shit and spend half of every day looking forward to your widowhood or you leave your wife and lose your business and go broke. (Did you sign some sort of onerous prenup?) I  honestly don't know which lousy option you should pick. But if I were you, LOAC, I would rather be poor and free and than married and miserable.
There's also the option, of course, of starring in the lesbian reboot of Same Time Next Year.

Good luck.
I think you missed an opportunity—and I'm not referring to an opportunity to take a ride in a sex swing, SWING, which will hopefully come your way again. You missed an opportunity to educate these two about the risks of mixing oil-based lubes with latex condoms. Instead of cutting off negotiations at the first sign of ignorance about a basic safe-sex practice, you could've and should've clued this guy in on the basic error he was making and the risks he was running. Instead of assuming the worst—he wants to discard the condoms one way or the other (not use them at all, dissolve any that get used)—you should've given him the benefit of the doubt.
That a sexually-active adult might be unaware of the dangers of mixing oil-based lubes and condoms seems incredible, SWING, but if this couple got together young, and if they've been strictly monogamous (and condom-free) until very recently, it's possible that they're as new to swinging and as they are to condoms. Sex ed is really lousy in this country and people sometimes stumble into adulthood—even into middle-age adulthood—without knowing basics likes "don't use oil based lube with latex condoms."
If you had said, "That's not a good idea, dude," and he came back with, "Well, we don't really like to use condoms anyway," then you should've cancelled for sure. But if he had said, "Oh, my God. We honestly had no idea!", SWING, you could've safely tried out that swing safely and made it safer for all the guys who tried it out after you.
Some people are assholes, some people are gay, some gay people are gay assholes.
I've met your brother's particular flavor of gay asshole before: confront him about his bullshit—like showing up to a child's birthday party high on speed and talking about sex—and he'll accuse you of being homophobic. The problem couldn't be that a kid's birthday party isn't the right place to yammer on about the cock(s) you sucked last night—no, no. It's homophobia! Call the ACLU! NOH8!
A quick example from my own life: Years ago I wrote that knowingly exposing someone to HIV was a shockingly immoral act—shameful even—and gay assholes accused me of being homophobic. Now "gay assholes" are not to be confused with "all gay people" or "the gay community," although many of the gay assholes who got in my face about this—"Each us is responsible for our own safety! It's not my responsibility to protect you!", the assholes howled (at a time when there were no effective treatments for HIV and an AIDS diagnoses was still a death sentence!)—nevertheless claimed to speak for "the gay community" while at the same time condemning me for claiming to speak for the gay community (which I didn't do, have never done, will never do). Ah, memories.
Anyway, ISYMUSCAFMIYRWIHYW, you have three options. Confront your brother's bullshit head-on, confront your brother's bullshit indirectly, or let time (and speed) sort your brother's bullshit out.
Head-on would look like this: Call your brother and tell him that you don't appreciate the lies he's been telling about you—it's his assholery you have a problem with, not his sexuality—and seize the next opportunity to raise the subject of your brother's assholery with the whole family. Why not say, "I'm not a homophobe, Ed's a liar, pass the stuffing," at Thanksgiving? Football games, food comas, and family drama—isn't that what Thanksgiving is all about? Or you can confront your brother's bullshit head-on but in a slightly less dramatic fashion: Call your brother and bitch him out, ISYMUSCAFMIYRWIHYW, then call only those relatives you're certain have distanced themselves from you as a result of your brother's bullshit and have a quick, polite, informative conversation with them about what's really going on.
Indirect confrontation would look like this: Make a point of posting pro-queer stuff to Facebook, Instagram, Twitter—I'm assuming that you, like most modern humans, keep in touch with your relatives via social media—and let your relatives weigh what Ed is saying about you (anti-gay!) against your social media (pro-gay!). Maybe one or two will work up the nerve to raise the subject with you.
Finally, ISYMUSCAFMIYRWIHYW, you could let time (and speed) do the heavy lifting for you. If Ed is the type of speed user who gets methy at children's birthday parties, it's only a matter of time before he burns the relatives he's lying to about his meanie big sister. Sooner or later—my money's on sooner—they're going to realize that Ed's the problem here, not you. This option is less likely to produce immediate results/relief, ISYMUSCAFMIYRWIHYW, but it has the best odds of preserving your post-meth/post-asshole relationship with Ed.
My response after the jump...
Some suggestions: Use a hormonal birth control method and a condom and pull out before you come. Don't have penis-in-vagina intercourse—you can stick to oral sex, mutual masturbation, and doing her in the butt (if being done in the butt is something your girlfriend enjoys). Deposit a few loads at a sperm bank, keep 'em on ice until you want kids, and get a vasectomy.
Or, hey, you could learn more about abortion while continuing to act responsibly, i.e., using birth control and condoms. Abortion is not a horrible, horrible thing. It is a medical, medical thing.
I'm gonna give it to you straight, SAD, and I'm gonna give it you quick—because I gotta rush home* to watch the Democratic debate on CNN.
Make a list of what you're willing to put up with and what you're not willing to put up with, SAD. Put the shit you'll put up with in Column A, put the shit you won't put up with in Column B. Then set the list in front of him—do it decisively—and tell him that the shit in Column B changes, finally and for good, or it's over.
Personally, SAD, I could put up with his introversion (so long as he didn't begrudge my going out with friends), I could put up with separate bedrooms (so long as he didn't jump out of bed immediately after sex), and I could put up with the frequency of sex (so long as "twice per month" was the exception and "2-3 times per week" was the rule). But I could not and would not put up with the vapouriser or the poor-dental-hygiene-induced skunk breath.
Give him six months to turn the vaping and stinking around (and tell him you're fine with twice-a-month-or-less until the breath thing is solved), SAD, and if he can't turn it around... pull the fuckin' plug. Decisively.
*Full disclosure: I'm rushing to a bar.
My response after the jump...
Are you such a slut?
Or are you a woman who loves sex, has a high libido, and has consensual sex with a lot of willing and grateful partners? Those are traits a sex-negative/misogynist culture conspires to make you feel conflicted about, GC, and then cons you into slapping a pejorative label on yourself—a label you wouldn't feel a need to slap on yourself if you were a dude, gay or straight.
Don't buy into the sexist double standards, GC. So long as your sex life isn't negatively impacting your relationship(s), your health, your classwork, or your career, GC, you aren't doing anything wrong. Don't let shitty, sexist people make you feel like you have to slap a shitty, sexist label on yourself for the crime of enjoying sex while female.
Have fun out there, GC, be thoughtful, be safe, be considerate. And remember: What works for you now—slutting around in the sex-positive/reclaiming-the-shit-out-of-that-word sense—may not work for you always. Don't look back on this part of your life with shame or regret if or when you elect to downsize your sex life, i.e., less sex, fewer sex partners/more sex, one sex partner. Do what's right for you, eliminate risks that can be eliminated, mitigate risks that can't be eliminated, and don't worry about what other people think.
I'm posting MFT's letter as the SLLOTD because I'm on an airplane, my battery is almost dead, there are no outlets at the seats, and the WifI is on this flight is spotty. A word of warning to readers: I wasn't able to check out the Tumblr MFT is plugging because I'm pretty sure the person sitting to my right doesn't want to see what MFT's friend's dick gets up to when MFT's friend is asleep. So caveat clicktor, kids.
Sexual compatibility is important and there’s nothing foolish about prioritizing it—there is, in fact, something deeply foolish about not prioritizing sexual compatibility and sexual satisfaction in a monogamous relationship. Your friends' comments are “a social construct,” i.e. the product of a deeply sex-negative culture that conspires to stuff two contradictory thoughts in our heads: sex is completely unimportant (how could you leave someone over something so trifling as sex?) and sex is profoundly important (seeking sexual satisfaction outside your relationship is the ultimate betrayal).
Give your boyfriend six months to start making progress on this problem. If his dick is up and down during sex, as some men's are, you can to work around that. If he needs to use his own hand to finish, as some men do, you can accept that this is just the way his dick works. But the rest of it gets better—he comes through with some foreplay, he successfully works toward getting his insecurities under control so you can mix it up a little, you'll continue to school him but he'll start to show some initiative—or you’re through.
Your ex's current relationship will most likely fail, fall apart, collapse, come to tears, turn to shit, etc., in the very near future. Most new relationships do. But again, and for a final time, your ex's current relationship isn't your problem. The problem you have to confront—the one you're endlessly circling around—is your continued emotional and social dependance on your ex-husband. You ask why can't you let this go. Because he's the only family you have and because, even though you divorced him, you never really left him. You never ended it with him. You've been exes for years, EX, but you were more than friends—emotionally wrapped up in each other's lives, frequently in each others' beds, there for each other during major life crises.
On some level, EX, you were and are still hoping your ex would someday be "emotionally open" enough to say, "Hey, don't leave me, I love you, let's work this out." Repeat after me: That's never going to happen. And given what a shit your ex is or has turned into, you shouldn't want it to happen.
It's time to end it, EX. If he's the only family you have where you are, move closer to other family members. If you can't move, make some new friends and create a new family for yourself. The fact that your ex is already ignoring your texts and calls is going to be a big help. Now it's time for you to take the (long overdue) step of deleting his numbers and unfollowing him on social media. Stop sending him texts, stop leaving him messages.
Find a good therapist, stop obsessing about your ex's shit, start working on your own.
* I'm repeating this expression, not endorsing it. 

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Considering how the conversation about gender gets more jargon-laden, more opaque, and more impenetrable with each passing semester, HTH, anything that makes the gender convo more jargon-laden, more opaque, and more impenetrable would probably be regarded as helpful by the folks at the center of this particular conversational hyperspace. So… well done, HTH!
Nope.
Well... actually... I'm gonna walk that back. (One word into a response and I'm already walking it back—that may be a new record, even for me.) I should've said there's no way for you to salvage this relationship, B/B. It's out of your hands. If your girlfriend can get past it, if she can take her share of the responsibility for having poured this poison into her own eyes, if she can accept that no one loves every last thing (physically, emotionally, socially) about their GFs/BFs/husbands/wives/Dominants/submissives/whatevers, if she can will herself to forget the scalding shit she read in your fucking journal... then she may be able to salvage this relationship. But there's nothing you can do, B/B, besides what you've already done: apologizing (for what you wrote) and contextualizing (explaining when and why you wrote it).
If this isn't something she can get past—if she can't look at you looking at her without those stupid fucking journal entries thundering in her head—then this relationship is over.
Assuming this relationship ends, B/B, here's what you're not gonna do in the future: You're not gonna write down every cruel and/or shitty thing that pops into your fucking head about your future girlfriend(s). Just as some things can't be unsaid, some things can't be unread. And unless you're gonna carry your journal around in an aluminum tube that you stuff up your ass when you're not jotting down your cruelest and/or shittiest thoughts, it's a bad idea to put down on paper emotionally shattering things you would never say to your partner's face. Because people find shit and they read it. Yes, your girlfriend shouldn't have read your journal, you're right about that, but your own carelessness—leaving something so toxic in a place where she might find it and read it—was unforgivably thoughtless.
It sure doesn't sound like your husband can get past this—it actually sounds like your husband is determined never to get past this, SALT, which would explain why he insists on ripping the wound open at regular intervals. Because so long as he can keep torturing you for this nothing of an affair, so long as he can keep offloading all responsibility for the state of his marriage onto his wife's shoulders, he doesn't have to be intimate with you in any way (sexually and emotionally), he doesn't have to examine his own role in the breakdown of his marriage, and he never has to give up the "moral high ground" of being the "victim" of this, again, big fat nothing of an affair. (Like Esther Perel says: "The victim of the affair is not always the victim of the  marriage.")
Since you're not in a position to leave, SALT, what you should seek in counseling is some sort of negotiated settlement. Detente. Let go of old expectations, stop picking at past, failures, and focus on your responsibilities to each other and your kids going forward. You aren't lovers and haven't been for a long time. You are partners and you are parents—your kids need you, they need both of you, and it would appear that you can't provide the care they need if you divorce. So you're fucking stuck with each other for the foreseeable future, SALT, and you'll have to make the best of it. Tell your husband, in the presence of your counselor, that you're not seeking his forgiveness. This isn't an attempt to repair your marriage or to restore your relationship to the condition it was in before you married. You're there to put a cap on it—a cap like the one they put on top of the reactors at Chernobyl—and that means no more discussions, no more recriminations, no more fights about this. If not for your sake, then for your kids' sakes.
All you owe each other going forward is kindness, consideration, and respect. Period. He doesn't have to get over his anger about your long-ago sexual betrayal—which came in the wake his sexual betrayal/abandonment—but he'll have to eat it. Because you're not going to answer or apologize for it anymore.
Thanks for sharing, GTCTTWI, and congrats!
My response after the jump...
There are no nonsexual components to this, WKBFM, and if you've never heard of something like this before, well, you must be a new reader.
What we've got here is a rich guy attempting to manipulate his kids' former babysitter into doing sex work for him—no, scratch that. What we've got here is a rich guy who has already manipulated his kids' former babysitter into doing sex work for him, WKBFM, and that's pretty fucking creepy. (Your previous workouts with the blindfolds and the wrestling and the kicking? Unpaid sex work.) Don't get me wrong: I don't think his ball-busting fetish is creepy. It's extreme, as fetishes go, and there are definitely risks. But the risks are his. Paying you to kick him in the nuts doesn't put his wife at risk (swift-kick-to-sack is not a known mode of STI transmission), it won't take food out of his children's mouths, and, as he presumably has all the children he wants, ball-busting-induced sterility might be a blessing/vasectomy in disguise.
If you need the money, WKBFM, and you don't think you'll be scarred by the experience, tell the rich guy you'll consider doing this for him—you'll come over, remain fully clothed, and kick him in the nuts—but only if he levels with you: He's getting off on this. If he can't level with you, WKBFM, don't do this.
You don't want this rich asshole to think he's successfully manipulated you into doing sex work for him, because once the session is under way, you don't want him thinking, "Well, if I could get her to do this, I can probably get her to [remove her clothes, watch me masturbate, have sex with me]." If you go into a ball-busting session without both of you having acknowledged what you're actually doing—you're sorta selling sex, he's definitely paying for sex—and he does try to get you to remove your clothes or watch him masturbate or have sex with him, WKBFM, you may find it difficult to say no. Being direct with someone ("No, I'm not taking my clothes off, asshole!") after you've accepted a dishonest premise ("Sure, rich guy, this isn't about sex, you're just testing yourself!") requires you to admit that you were being dishonest, too. Most people are reluctant to admit to dishonesty, and a skilled manipulator will exploit that inhibition to get what he wants.
So tell him you'll play—you'll bust his balls—but you're not going to play along. He has to admit that this is about sex and he has to agree to honor your conditions: Everything that happens is agreed to in advance, no special requests during a session, he remains fully clothed, you remain fully clothed, no recordings are made, and you get the $150—make that $250—whether or not he bails.
My response after the jump...
Sane people can have extreme and/or violent sexual fantasies, NOPE, and extreme and/or violent sexual fantasies do not make sane people crazy. (Let's call them EVSFs for short, shall we?)
But you need to talk to a shrink—not because you're hopelessly damaged or the only person out there with EVSFs, but because you're troubled by your fantasies. And that's understandable. It's difficult to have EVSFs—or to find a healthy way to incorporate EVSFs into your sex life, or to figure out how to dial EVSFs way the fuck back if there's no healthy way to incorporate them into your sex life—when your erotic imagination is constantly dragging you to new and more disturbing places. And while most people's fantasies are relatively fixed, i.e., certain types of people or scenarios turn them on, your erotic imagination seems to be on the hunt for new "wrong" thoughts, images, stimuli, and scenarios. You need to seize control of your sexuality, and you'll need help doing that, or your sense of estrangement from your sexuality will only continue to grow.
That said, NOPE, you could be seeing causation where there is only coincidence. There are a lot of people out there who didn't suffer the kind of abuse you did—or any kind of abuse at all—but who nevertheless have EVSFs. Some people with troubling fantasies or interests have found relief with low-dose antidepressants; some folks with post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD) have been helped by novel programs that incorporate MDMA, aka ecstasy, into their treatment plans. You could be suffering from PTSD, considering your history.
A good therapist—one with whom you are completely honest—may be able to help you reshape and redirect your fantasies in the direction of still-intense, less-wrong, not- constantly-escalating stimuli that gives you the "wrongness" charge you need without nuking your mental health or your life. (Stay away from all pedo porn sites, NOPE, even "stories only" porn. Please.) And a good sex therapist can help you draw a clear distinction between your adult sexuality—whatever form it takes—and your history of sexual abuse. (I shared your letter with a sex researcher I trust, and she urged me to urge you to insist on seeing a reputable therapist who does sex therapy specifically, as they're less likely to be sex-negative and therefore less likely to react with prudish or panicked judgments when you disclose your EVSFs.)
Considering the abuse you suffered at the hands of your family of origin, NOPE, I trust that your adoptive parents are aware that you may need professional help throughout your life and that your asking for help is a good sign about (1) you as a person and (2) them as parents. At your very first appointment, ask your shrink to confirm that your sessions are confidential. If for some reason your shrink tells you he or she can't offer you complete confidentiality (which they can and, in most places, are required to do by law, unless you're a danger to yourself or others), thank the nice shrink for his or her time and ask your parents to make you an appointment to see a different shrink.
Please get help—not because you are or may be kinky, NOPE, but because you're struggling with doubt, you're confused about your sexual orientation, and you're rightly worried about the way your erotic imagination keeps upping the "wrongness" ante. And remember: Not all counselors or shrinks are created equal. If you don't like or click with the first one you see, tell your parents you want to see someone else.
You’re not alone, SLEEPER.
Plenty of us, whether we’re partnered in couples, throuples, quads, or quints—or we're proudly part of a loose amalgamation of ambigusweeties —have trouble falling asleep next to another person’s sweaty, warm, farting body.
Almost 1 in 4 couples sleep in separate bedrooms or beds, according to a 2015 survey by the National Sleep Foundation. Another study out of Toronto’s Ryerson University estimated nearly 40 percent of couples sleep in separate beds. A significant portion of couples who sleep away (from each other) may be in strictly (and lovingly) companionate relationships, others may be in dysfunctional or high-conflict relationships, but there are countless loving & still fucking couples among their numbers. Because someone's perfectly-lovely-by-day husband/wife/BF/GF/NBF/Dom/sub/Handler/pup/whatever can turn into a snoring, punching, night-terrorizing zombie when night falls, which is why so many people opt for alternative separate beds/bedrooms/dungeons/dogbeds/whatever.
There’s no shame in it, SLEEPER. Having separate beds doesn’t mean you don’t care for each other. It means you value being alert and functional during the day—when you're spending quality/fully conscious time with your partner (and coworkers, kids, constituents, fellow members of your Indivisible group, etc.—instead of a grumpy shit who can barely function after listening to your girlfriend's freaky night terrors and/or engaging recaps of The Bachelor all night.
If you and the GF decide to plunge into cohabitation, think about getting a place that has two bedrooms (if you can afford it). You don’t have to sleep separately every night. The point is that you both have the option to retreat on nights when she's freaking you out or you're sweating her out. And if you try sleeping apart and hate it, you’ll have a guest bedroom for friends and family who come into town—or, hey, you make some extra money (and help with the rent) by listing your extra room on AirBnB. (Be sure to put some earplugs on the nightstand there for your paying guests.)
But, if the two of you want (or have) to commit to one bed, get the largest bed you can possibly afford and sleep under separate comforters like the Germans do. More space means you can flail and kick your sweaty legs without drenching your girlfriend; separate comforters mean you won't pull the blankets off her when you flail and she won't pull them off you when she freaks. Also, SLEEPER, beds are more than mattresses: make sure you have the most stable bed frame you can find. (An active sex life can knock a few screws loose, making every movement sound like you’re on a creaky carnival ride.) Also try fans, sleep machines, and testing out one of the zillions of mattress options currently available. But again, SLEEPER, separate beds is the easiest fix for a sweaty, sleepless problem—and hey, it worked for the Petries.
Listen to me talk about sex and mattresses on the Savage Lovecast, at www.savagelovecast.com.
Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
He's done with sex, and you're not—so you get to fuck other people, and he doesn't get to say anything about it. Take a lover, CWYWF, take two. There are tons of men out there in sexless marriages that they don't want to end because they love their wives or they love their kids or they can't be bothered or all of the above. Get your ass online and find one or two. If your husband is against an open marriage in principle—if he insists that you remain "monogamous" to him—tell him what he wants to hear and fuck other men regardless.
My response after the jump...
Unless there are just two guys at your college—your ex and this dude with the Go Fuck Someone Else card—I would urge you to fuck someone else. This scenario has drama written all over it. Your ex will be pissed at you for fucking his friend, he'll be pissed at his friend for fucking you, the friend's girlfriend will be pissed at you for fucking her boyfriend—GFSE card or no GFSE card. Who needs that kind of grief? Find a hot student, RA, TA, or prof who isn't in your circle and fuck him instead.
My response after the jump...
Wear whatever you like, identify however you like, and refuse to engage with idiots who think they have a right to critique, dictate, or overrule your gender identity.
My response after the jump...
Your boyfriend is essentially forcing you to pick between him or masturbation, and the choice is obvious: Masturbation is a pleasurable friend that doesn't judge you or shame you, and your boyfriend is an unpleasant, sex-negative, controlling, judgmental scold.
DTMFA.
Then after you've enjoyed a few dozen celebratory guilt-free orgasms, MOS, ask yourself why you wasted even two minutes of your precious pansexual time on a guy like him, i.e., someone with whom you're clearly not sexually compatible. You're pansexual! Somewhat sexually experienced! You masturbate! You enjoy porn! I could understand you dating a guy who was a virgin and wanted to remain sexually inactive for now—for religious reasons or otherwise—but dating someone you had to talk out of seeing you as the spawn of Satan? Dating someone you have to lie to about something as common and healthy as masturbation? Not worth it, MOS, not in the short run, not in the long run. You want to be with someone who likes you and wants to be with you, and this boy doesn't like you. Why on earth do you like him?
Finally: I hope that parenthetical in your second paragraph was meant sarcastically. But just in case: Being sexually active does not make you "impure." I think you know that, MOS, but I want you to get out of this relationship while you still believe it.
My response after the jump...
If you were my boyfriend, RING, and you told me—right after I had defeated you in a rimming contest—that you would marry me if you lost a coin toss, but not because marriage mattered to me, I would never rim your ass again. Because if my feelings, however contaminated they were by Catholicism, mattered less to you than a coin toss, well, then your ass would have to learn to eat itself.
Maybe it will help if you look at it this way: You've already lost the coin toss. You fell in love with a woman who wants to spend her life with you, and you want to spend the rest of yours with her. And the woman you want to spend the rest of your life rimming wants to marry the man she spends her life rimming. Since you would be willing to marry her if you lost a coin toss, RING, then clearly marriage isn't something you couldn't bring yourself to do. That means you're the one who should compromise.
My response after the jump...
So your regular third with the big cock is nice, open-minded, and STI-free. Sounds great, CREAMPIE, but how can you be certain about the STI-free part when you see him only three times a year? Unless he's abstinent the rest of the year, or unless you test before each of your threesomes, there's some risk here.
You also describe your regular third as "respectful," and that's great. We all deserve respectful sex partners. You do, CREAMPIE, your wife does—and so does your regular third. But referring to your regular third as BBC, or "big black cock," isn't respectful. It's dehumanizing. Now, his big black cock brought you all together, of course, and it's fine to be attracted to others for particular physical attributes. It's also fine to explore racially charged fantasies so long as everyone is up for it and no one feels disrespected or dehumanized. But since this big black cock is attached to a fun and trustworthy guy who you enjoy spending time with (and cleaning up after), maybe you could refer to him as your ABC ("awesome black chum") instead of as your BBC? Just, you know, to show some respect for him as a person. Which is what he is.
Anyway, CREAMPIE, as for your problem: A man's body releases the hormone prolactin when he comes. That particular hormone makes a man sleepy, it makes his boner deflate, and it temporarily renders him indifferent to and/or repulsed by sex. So something that sounded hot right before you came—eating your own come out of the wife's pussy—is going to be much less appealing right after you come.
It's a snatch-22, CREAMPIE, and there's no fix.
My response after the jump...
When someone says, "That's so gay," but means, "That's so stupid," they're being homophobic. Obviously. But a straight guy who says he's gay for musicals isn't saying he's stupid for them, TCJ, he's saying, "I love something that many gay men are passionate about—and I'm not talking about cock." Not all gay men are passionate about musical theater, of course, just as not all straight men are into football. But a man with a passion for musical theater is likelier to be gay; if not, he'll at least be comfortable around gay people. I've heard gay guys who avidly follow the NFL describe themselves as straight for football. Likewise, a man with a passion for football is likelier to be straight.
You saying, "I'm gay for musical theater," or a gay guy saying, "I'm straight for football," amounts to a humorous acknowledgment that the majority of people interested in musicals or football are gay or straight, respectively. In neither case is it an insult or a put-down. But while I think you can continue to say that you're gay for musicals, TCJ, some gay men (or some of our more annoying "allies") may take offense. You don't have to pay attention to those people—they're just gay for taking offense.
My response after the jump...
First answer: technically, yes. But a case could be made that you're reusing and recycling. If there were a Green Building Certification program for kinks, SNIFF, yours would qualify.
Second answer: Chester the Molester was a comic strip about a guy, Chester, "who was interested in sexually molesting women and prepubescent girls," says my old friend Wikipedia. This vile comic strip, which ran in Hustler (of course), made child rape look like harmless and hilarious fun. Dwaine Tinsley, the creator of the strip, wound up going to prison for molesting his daughter—I'm guessing she would argue that child rape was neither harmless nor hilarious.
Since you are not interested in prepubescent boys, SNIFF, I don't think you're a pervert in the Chester the Molester mold. But a case could be made that your actions have a whiff of the nonconsensual about them—your coworkers would most likely object to how you're reusing and recycling their abandoned underpants—and you should probably knock it off. There are plenty of guys selling their used underwear and jocks online, from college athletes to porn stars, and if you work at a place with a private gym, SNIFF, you can presumably afford to buy a few pairs.
P.S. Just remember, Dan, that if by some off chance he gets to be prez, I slept with him first!
As I read your letter, FCC, I was thinking... yeah, you slept with/beside Marco Rubio. Am I supposed to take your word for that? And then I scrolled all the way down and...
...you have proof.
So, hey, you shared a flight with a sleeping Marco Rubio. But before I answer your question—should you have engaged with him?—let's review my rules for flying. There are only three...
1. Shut the fuck up.
2. Close the fucking window shade.
3. Shut the fuck up.
Introductions are clearly forbidden by rules number one and three. There's no need or excuse for introductions after you're seated on an airplane. (If the person sitting next to the window doesn't know to tap, step over, and excuse themselves, FCC, they're too stupid to find their way on an airplane in the first place.) Introductions on airplanes accomplish just one thing: The fill the person to whom you've just introduced yourself with dread. Someone subjected to an introduction will spend the rest of the flight worrying about whether they've just sat down next to most feared people in the skies after terrorists and infants: talkers. And, I'm sorry, but it doesn't matter if the introducer shuts up after he makes an unnecessary and unwelcome introduction. Because someone who talked to you on a flight—someone who broke rules number one and three before the plane even took off—could at any moment start talking to you again. The introducer thereby forces the introducee to spend the rest of the flight worrying that even a stray moment of eye contact could suck them into a conversation about golf or grandchildren or CrossFit.
The only exception to rules number one and three? When you've been seated next to Marco Rubio.
Marco Rubio, like everyone else running for president, is constantly going on about what he's hearing from "average, ordinary Americans" as he travels back and forth between Iowa and New Hampshire, as he strolls down the hall from the greenroom of The O'Reilly Factor ("The No Spin Zone") to the greenroom of Fox and Friends ("The So Dim Zone"), and as his tongue flits from Charles Koch's asshole to David Koch's asshole and back again. If Rubio is going to talk about chance encounters with "average, ordinary Americans," then average, ordinary Americans who haven't been vetted by the Rubio campaign for some bogus "town hall" can go ahead and seize the opportunity of, say, a chance encounter with Rubio (or Bush or Cruz or Paul or whoever) on a long flight, at a cozy urinal, or in a funky sex dungeon in Berlin.
So in answer to your question, FCC: Yes, I think you should've engaged with Rubio. You could've told him that's he wrong about climate change and that his denialism is dangerous (Miami is sinking under the waves!); you could've told him that his jingoistic opposition to reestablishing diplomatic relations with Cuba was both stupid and "out of step with the mainstream, as they say (Americans back it by wide margins); and you could've told him that his retrograde/bigoted/indefensible position on marriage equality isn't exactly forward thinking (Rubio can't represent a "new generation" while pandering to the bigotry and fear of the old, fearful, and blessedly not immortal generation of GOP voters)
And most importantly, you should've challenged him on his position on abortion.
At the first GOP debate Rubio said he opposed abortion even in the cases of rape and incest. (Rubio pissily denied ever having supported an exceptions for rape an incest—despite having cosponsored an abortion ban that included exceptions for rape and incest—and Rubio also didn't object when Scott Walker said that he would "let a mother die" before allowing her to have an abortion.) Here's the question you could've put to Rubio (it's the question I'll put to him if get the chance): "You have two daughters, Sen. Rubio. If one of your daughters was raped and impregnated, would you deny her an abortion and force her to carry her rapist's baby to term? If one of your daughters needed an abortion to save her life, would you, like Scott Walker, stand by and let your own daughter die?"
If you had asked that question in a loud enough tone of voice, FCC, a mini-town-hall meeting would've instantly broken out in the first class compartment of your Miami-LAX flight. And if you or another passenger had the good sense to film Rubio's response, FCC, you would've made national news instead of just making the SLLOTD.
And finally, dear readers, I recognize the irony here: Marco Rubio followed all the rules on that flight: Rubio shut the fuck up, Rubio closed his window shade, Rubio shut the fuck up. But the rules don't apply to an average, ordinary American who find himself seated next to someone who's running for president.
P.S. Two pieces of recommended reading...
1. Open: Love, Sex and Life in an Open Marriage by Jenny Block.
2. And this informative interview with poly activist and frequent Savage Lovecast guest Diana Adams.
There's a lot more out there you could read—I'm sure that the commenters here on Slog will have some great suggestions—but a lot of it is about how to open your marriage, SM, and you're not interested in that. And I don't think this isn't something you really need to do a whole lot of homework about. Love and accept your son, respect his choices, don't blame his wife, be kind to any partners they wind up introducing you to. It's actually pretty simple.
Thanks for the update, ALS. And for the record: you don't need your husband's permission to end your marriage—he doesn't have to let you leave. I'm sure you know that... but I wanted to put it out there, just in case.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
I'm running out the door to go be on the teevee, ARMS, so this is going to have to be quick.
You can hold on to those fond memories, kiddo, without demanding face-to-face time from your ex-girlfriend. And the ex you admit to treating badly and basically driving off may be less interested in salvaging a friendship than you are. But I don't think it would be out of bounds for you to send your ex-girlfriend a letter* that makes three basic points...
• You were a dick to her and you feel bad about that. You wish you'd had the decency and courage to end things earlier, and more cleanly, instead of allowing it drag out. Instead of going the coward's route, ARMS, and making yourself completely intolerable so that she would dump you. Because that made things toxic at the end—wait, no passive voice: You made things toxic at the end. Take responsibility for "absolute prick" and treating her "like shit" and offer an unqualified apology, i.e. omit the shit about catering to her needs while neglecting your own.
• You are in a much better place emotionally—you're happier now—and you sincerely hope she's happier too.
• You wish her well and if circumstances should conspire to bring both together at the same time and in the same place, you hope you can be friends—or, if not friends, then at least friendly.
Close your short letter with a P.S. inviting her to follow you on Facebook or Twitter or Instagram—pick your preferred social media poison—if she should ever care to know what you're up to these days, ARMS, while pledging not follow her on any social media platforms unless she follows you first and invites you to follow her back. Because if she needs you out of her life permanently, ARMS, you will respect her wishes.
* Unless there was violence toward the end, ARMS, or a restraining order or a clear and explicit demand to never, ever hear from your ass again—in which case, ARMS, a letter would be out of bounds.
Here's how the convo went when I came out to my mom:
Me (after standing outside her bedroom door for an hour working up the courage): "Mom, I'm... gay."
Mom (after a short, excruciating pause): "Did you hear the one about the two gay guys who attacked a woman in Lincoln Park? One held her down while the other did her hair." 
And here's how the convo went when I came out to my biggest big brother:
Me (after hemming and hawing for at least a half an hour): "Billy, I'm... gay." 
Brother: "Are you sure?"
Not exactly portraits of "graceful support," huh?
One could argue that my mother and brother each said the wrong thing then I came out to them—although people can and do say far worse things when their children and siblings come out to them—but both my late mother and beery brother have been incredibly supportive. I honestly don't think I would've survived as an out gay teenager in Chicago in 19Fucking82 without their love and support. And it would've been incredibly churlish of me, to say nothing of colossally self-defeating, to have held against them the very first things that fell out of their mouths when I came out. (Hell, my mom's first, panicked reaction—telling her teenage son a mildly homophobic joke immediately after he came out to her—became a story we shared over and over and laughed about together for years. Fuck, we were laughing about it together later that same week.)
Here's something I want you to relay to your early-twenty-something cousin from me: If you're sulking about what your cousin said, stop. ("I know!" is a really common reaction and, again, there are far worse reactions.) And it has been my experience over the last few decades of being out that not everyone who says the right thing at first turns out to be the most loving and supportive person in the long run and vice-versa. You will find that some of the people who say all the right things wind doing all the wrong things and some of the people say all the wrong things wind up doing (and eventually saying) all the right things. There's no way of predicting who will do right by you until some time has passed.
Back to you, WORST: If your cousin is actually holding your initial reaction against you—if you're stressing about this non-issue because he's actually giving you grief about it—then your cousin may be one of those new-model queers who would rather have a boo-boo than an ally. And that's his problem, WORST, not yours. But if your cousin isn't stressing about this, if he laughed or shrugged it off and you're the one who's fixated on IKnowGate for some reason, stop.
And now, because it seems relevant and because I love this video...

That has to be the funniest "I know!" on the Internet.
I'm so sorry you're going through this. 
I have some advice for you, TAMHISFB, but first I'm going to share something from my past with you.
Once, a long time ago, I threw a glass at my husband. We were fighting. I honestly don't remember what about, TAMHISFB, and what the fight was about isn't important and it wouldn't excuse my behavior that night. I did it in a moment of anger, I'm not proud of it, and I've never written about it before. The glass didn't hit Terry. I didn't throw it straight at him, I wasn't trying to hit him, but that's irrelevant because in the moment he couldn't know that I didn't intend to hit him and the glass could've hit him (and possibly injured him) anyway. That was 18 years ago and I've never done anything like that ever again.
I'm not trying to excuse what your dad did. What your dad did was wrong. Some commenters will immediately (and needlessly) point out that what your mom did was wrong. That may be true—or it may not be true (there are, as I've written, cases where cheating can be justified, although we don't know if your mom's case was one)—but what your dad did was wronger. Throwing someone around in anger can never be justified. All I'm suggesting, based on my own personal experience, is that it's possible your dad will never, ever do anything like this to your mother or anyone else ever again. (It's also possible that the hole in the wall was created not by your mom's head being slammed into it, TAMHISFB, but by that heavy glass ornament being thrown across the room.) 
As for what to do about your parents...
Insist they talk with you about this. They have to talk with you about it—together and separately. And you have leverage: What you witnessed was a crime and reporting it is still an option. Go to each your parents separately and tell them—one adult to another—that you can't pretend not to have witnessed what you damn well did witness. Explain to them that you need certain assurances from them both. Is your mother safe? (This is a question you put to them together and to your mother alone.) Are your siblings safe? (Ditto.) What steps are they taking to work through this? Are they in counseling? Is your dad getting help he needs to control his anger? (Has your dad watched Esther Perel's "Rethinking Infidelity" TEDTalk? Insist that he does.) Does your mom have the support she needs? How exactly was that hole knocked into the wall? These conversations aren't about buying your silence. They're about holding your dad accountable and fulfilling your adult responsibilities to your mother, yourself, and your siblings.
As for forgiveness...
What your dad did was wrong. I'm with you. You will never see him in the same way again. Your dad will never see your mother in the same way again, TAMHISFB, and your mother will never see your father in the same way again. Still. I don't think you should, in the immediate wake of this traumatic experience, forever rule out forgiveness. Forgiveness would be an easy thing if it was always about small stuff—small infractions, small violations, small misunderstandings. Sometimes, though, forgiveness is about big stuff and that's when it's a hard thing and, consequently, that's when it's a meaningful and potentially transformative thing.
Forgiveness in an instance like this will come slowly and it must come with conditions attached—getting help (tell them you want proof that they're in counseling), making amends, demonstrating growth—because without those conditions it wouldn't be forgiveness, TAMHISFB, it would be enabling. And domestic violence obviously isn't something you, me, or any sane person would ever want to enable. But ruling out forgiveness now, in your anger, may prevent you from forgiving your father in the future—not when he wants you to forgive him, TAMHISFB, and not when your mom wants you to forgive him, but when you want to forgive him.
Now I'm going to turn you over to the commenters here on Slog—who can be amazingly helpful, insightful, and compassionate (please ignore the handful who are helpless, dense, and trolly). But before I turn it over to the them, TAMHISFB, I'm gonna give you the number for the National Domestic Violence Hotline: 800-799-SAFE. There's lots of great and helpful information at their website also: thehotline.org.
Good luck—and, yes, the Ashley Madison hack is such fucking bullshit.
I'm not convinced that loving yourself more will result in your finding these young white straightish jocks (YWSJ) any less attractive, FEW, but you go ahead and love yourself more anyway.
A good place to start: the language you use to talk about your interactions with YWSJs: they're not just letting you have sex with them, they're getting to have sex with you; you feel great when you're in their bodies, they feel great when you're in their bodies; you're entering their bedrooms and presumably their buttholes, you're not entering their "realms." (They're gay dudes just like you, FEW, not monarch. Their buttholes aren't wardrobes, their rectums aren't Narnia.)
As for learning to find other kinds of guys attractive: sleep with other guys, date other guys, see if anything/anyone clicks. I know that when I was young—when I was just out—I was only attracted to one very particular type of guy. Those guys were scarce and the ones I could find weren't interested in me (the hair may have had something to do with it), FEW, so I hooked up with and dated other types guys and—wonder of wonders, miracle of miracles—my spectrum of attraction broadened quickly and considerably. (I like to think I was attracted to other types of guys all along, FEW, I just didn't realize it.) 
But I was a teenager then, FEW, and you're a grown ass man now. The bullshit gay beauty ideal and/or your longing for the approval/butts of those cruel high school jocks and/or your failure to explore other types over the last 25 years may have carved a groove in you that's too deep to overcome. So perhaps a workaround instead? Find a non-YWSJ guy who's into the same type you are—someone you click with emotionally and intellectually, someone who is looking for a serious-but-non-monogamous commitment—and spit roast a YWSJ together on your wedding night.
There are lots of gay men out there in loving, committed, successful relationships whose partners aren't their physical ideals. But since gay men are much less hung up on monogamy, FEW, many of these men are able to have their loving, committed, successful relationships and the occasional hookup with the twink/bear/otter/daddy/Dom/sub/YWSJ/whatever of their dreams. (And people lucky enough to wind up with their physical ideals? One day they'll find themselves with partners who aren't their physical ideals—if their relationships last long enough.)
Why did he choose not to tell you? Read your letter—the snooping, the confrontations, the interrogations. It's a wonder he tells you anything at all. 
And all of this mishigas over what? Years ago, before you were married, before you were engaged, before he even proposed to you... your husband briefly flirted with another woman. And he flirted with her the way most people flirt today: text messages and sext messages. But when he realized that you were the one he wanted, when he decided that you were the .64 he could round up to The One, he knocked it the fuck off. He stopped flirting with this other woman, he stopped sexting with her, and committed himself to you. (I have no doubt that you scoured his phone and his email and found nothing else that was the least bit incriminating—no plans to move from sexting to sexing, no other women, no other nothin'.) Yes, he failed to delate the pics. (Maybe he forgot, maybe he liked them‚ maybe they reminded him that, yes, he was desirable and that affirmation made him feel better about himself.) And yes, he failed to punish this woman, a woman who didn't do anything wrong, by treating her like shit and driving her off after he ended the flirtation and proposed to you. So he committed the awful and unforgivable sin of—gasp—remaining cordial.
Here are my thoughts on your situation: 
1. He should be forgiven—and you should ask his forgiveness for snooping.
2. You can start by apologizing to him for snooping and end by growing the fuck up.
3. I think it's perfectly understandable—lots of people have private little rumspringas when they're making up their minds about whether to commit to someone for life; it's not uncommon for people to say (and sext) things to people they don't know well because the stakes are so much lower—and you have got to stop raking him over the coals about shit that went down before you were even engaged. Stuff it down the memory hole.
4. I do not think this was cheating. It was flirting, and it may have crossed a line (presumably you two were exclusive before you got engaged and he knew you wouldn't smile on this), but if your marriage can't weather a big nothing burger like this, BRIDE, it's unlikely to survive the kinds of conflicts, traumas, and, yes, betrayals that sooner or later touch every marriage. (Google "Ashley Madison" and think about how much worse it could be.) Forgiving him for this—really forgiving him, which means dropping it (no more interrogations!)—will be good practice (you'll probably have to forgive him for something else at some point in the future) and a good example (he'll probably have to forgive you for something at some point).
I think you should stay with him. I'm not sure he should stay with you.
I think it's possible for a married person in a closed relationship—or a long-partnered person in the same—to innocently flirt with a friend, a coworker, or a stranger. Ideally the married/partnered person plows the erotic charge they derived from that flirtation into their primary partner when they get home. I would go so far as to say that it's advisable for married/long-partnered persons to allow for flirtation with others, so long as its occasional and innocent, because the ego boost of being found attractive by someone who isn't required to find you attractive can redound to the benefit of both spouses/partners and make a marriage/relationship stronger.
But the operative word here is "innocent." It's one thing to flirt with someone—a vague and general flirtation, a vague and general acknowledgement of mutual attraction—but it's another to suss someone out in detail. When your husband asked his friend whether she found men in women's underwear attractive he crossed the line from innocent flirtation to actionable intelligence. Maybe he just wanted to privately enjoy a very specific masturbatory fantasy featuring his 22-year-old coworker and the stuff he likes best—wearing women's underwear—but the fact that he immediately agreed it was gross when she shot him down is a bad sign. It would be less concerning if after she said "gross!" he said something like, "Actually, my wife and I get into." That would sound like flirty friends swapping details about their sex lives. His immediate and, yes, turdish disavowal of his thing for women's underwear, however, leads me to believe that at the very least he wanted to preserve the potential for some IRL encounter down the road. He didn't want her to rule him out as a potential sex partner, he didn't want to disqualify himself.
Confront away, HNACPL, with my blessing.
You're welcome, ML—and here's hoping your levelheaded reaction to the news that your husband had an account on Ashley Madison isn't a complete anomaly.
My response after the jump...
Was your boyfriend having cybersex with an ex-girlfriend? Or did it only feel like he was? I would make a distinction, SAD, because while all porn constitutes a betrayal of the terms of your relationship, interacting with a stranger and, very likely, a professional online shouldn't feel quite so threatening.
Backing way the hell up: Your boyfriend shouldn't have lied to you, SAD, but you shouldn't have been so naive as to believe him. If you can't bring yourself to forgive him for lying—if you can't put yourself in his shoes and try to understand why he might lie about this (shame, fear, a desire to spare your feelings)—then this relationship is doomed. End it and find a new boyfriend. But when your next boyfriend tells you he doesn't watch porn, you're going to look at him and say, "Suuuuuure, you don't."
Ask your new boyfriend to be discreet and limit his porn consumption to an extent where you're unlikely to uncover any evidence of it, as porn upsets you. If your new boyfriend manages to do that for you, SAD, if he's considerate enough to cover his tracks, you should be considerate enough to turn a blind eye on those rare occasions when you do stumble over evidence that your new boyfriend watches porn—just like your old boyfriend did and all your future boyfriends will.
Remember, OTF, there is no "the one." There's no perfect person, no perfect person for you, no perfect match, no perfect fit, no perfect lid for your perfect pot, etc. You'll meet a .64 or two if you're lucky—if you're really lucky you might even meet a .72—and it's your job to round that motherfucker up to one. It's easy to convince ourselves early in a relationship that we've stumbled over a .92 or a .97 or even a 1.00, i.e. someone who it's either easy to round up or who doesn't require rounding up, but a few years in—no later than six years in—we can clearly see those .92s for the .64s they are and always were.  
So feeling less sure about him being "The One" isn't proof that he isn't "The One," OTF, because he never was "The One." (Is this making sense?) You're just seeing him for the .64 he always was and now you have to decide whether you're gonna spend the rest of your life rounding that motherfucker up.
Tell him what you're feeling. He may be feeling the same way, OTF, but even if he's not... tossing your of ambiguity and doubt on the table will force you two to have a different sort of conversation about your relationship. Up to now all of your conversations—with each other, with counselors, with your thirds—have been grounded in/framed by this question: How do we make this work? Telling him that you're feeling some ambiguity and doubt about your future together—telling him that you're not sure you have a future together—is going to force you two to have a conversation grounded in/framed by a very different question: Should we make this work?
If being with you means not having sex with men ever again—because you're not up for a lifetime of threesomes and you don't want him hooking up with guys on the side (or is that something you would allow?)—does he want to be with you? 
If being with him means marriage and children—if he wins both those fights—do you want to be with him? 
If being with you means forgoing marriage and children—if you win both those fights—does he want to be with you?
If being with him means having your professional ambitions constantly undermined—if the guilting you about getting your Ph.D. was merely the prologue—do you want to be with him?
There are lots of questions you two need to ask and answer—openly and honestly—as you make up your minds about whether you're going keep rounding each other up. Good luck.
Guru?
P'shaw.
Gurus talk about meditation and mindfulness and transcendence, HALP, and most people who talk about those things—as opposed to most people who practice or experience them—give me the heebee-jeebees. I'm not knocking gurus (go ahead and listen to Eckhart Tolle cassettes if that's what gets you off), but gurus and guruing aren't for me.
Anyway, HALP, dirty talk, spanking, and mutual masturbation were too risqué for the West Coast guys you've fucked—so far. The problem isn't that straight men are delicate sex flowers, but that you've obviously been fucking the wrong straight guys. And the coast you're on now isn't the issue either. I've been living on the this damn coast for 25 years and dirty talk, spanking, and mutual masturbation are things we do on the way to first base.
Now I’m not saying the guys you've fucked over the last 18 months are boring because they’re vanilla; vanilla sex isn't boring sex and lord knows kinky sex can be tedious. All "vanilla" means is sex that doesn’t incorporate BDSM, kink, or fetish activities or clothing. No, the problem with the guys you’ve been with since landing on the West Coast isn't that they're vanilla sex flowers. It's that their assholes who shamed you for wanting to jerk off next to them, which is itself a totally vanilla sexual activity—the vanillaist sexual activity. Really, HALP, of the three activities you mentioned, only spanking falls outside the world of vanilla sex. I mean, if mutual masturbation is kinky, then pretty much anything that isn’t straight-up PIV is kinky. That would make many/most/all queer people kinky, and that’s just not true.
So, yeah, screw those guys—in the "to hell with them" sense—because they’re clueless and close-minded and couldn't find a kind, supportive way to say, "That's cool, but it's not for me," when you asked for a spanking.
I’m a big proponent of asking for what you want, HALP, and for laying your kink cards on the table early in a relationship— or, if it's a one-off, early in the evening. We don’t always know what we want, of course, but don’t worry: the West Coast is crawling with guys who are game to spank, mutually masturbate, and talk dirty. We have lots of low-key, super hot and reasonably kind and communicative guys out there too, HALP. Keep looking, keep sharing, and keep going until you find one who's into or up for the same things you are.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
I have a pretty good idea what your friend should say to her daughter, ADCF, but how she says it depends on the her daughter's unique sensibility.
If her daughter has a uniquely prim sensibility: "If being married to women who won't sleep with them turned straight men gay, half the men in the America would be gay—and half the men in America aren't gay, honey, not even close. The fact is this: your dad is gay, he's always been gay, but for a long time he wasn't able admit it to himself or to anyone else. Now he's out, and that's a good thing, but for some reason he feels a need to pin the 'blame' for his sexuality on someone. And it looks like he picked me. I'm not saying there's something blameworthy about being gay. There isn't. There is, however, something deeply messed up about the way your father refuses to take responsibility for who he is. What he's doing to you is completely unfair and kind of pitiful when you think about it. Just tune it out."
If her daughter had a uniquely ribald sensibility: "Your dad is fucking nuts. Straight men don't start sucking cocks just because their wives won't fuck them. The fact is your father was never interested in having sex with me and now I know why. Now we all know why. Gay adults stay in the closet for just one reason: they're afraid of being rejected by the people closest to them. Your dad is out now, and that's a great, but there's still one person he fears being rejected by, honey, and that person is you. So he tells you this is all my fault because he doesn't want you to be angry with him for the drama and chaos and mentee. He want you to be angry with me. The whole thing is just sad."
Your friend can memorize one or the other or both of the above speeches and deliver them to her daughter. Your friend can also take comfort in the knowledge that teenagers, particularly teenage girls, are acutely sensitive to adult hypocrisy and highly unlikely to take anything their fathers tell them at face value. Unless this kid is profoundly dim or overly trusting or both, ADCF, she already knows her father's is packed full of shit.
There are only two reasons why your boyfriend would be making jokes about your bedwetting problem: he is trying to be nice (he mistakenly believes these jokes put you at ease; he’s trying to make you feel less self-conscious, not more; he wants to make the bedwetting seem like no big deal, i.e. something you two can laugh off together) or your boyfriend is a giant asshole (he knows you’re sensitive about it and makes these jokes anyway because HE’S AN ASSHOLE; he makes jokes expressly to demean you because HE’S AN ASSHOLE; he is intentionally shredding your self-esteem so that 1. you'll think that no one else would ever want you and 2. you'll settle for this guy even thought HE'S AN ASSHOLE).
There’s just one way to figure out whether he’s a nice doofus who's accidentally hurting you or an giant asshole who actually does mean to hurt you: USE YOUR WORDS. Tell him the jokes hurt your feelings—no smile, no ambiguity, no gloss—and then see what happens. If he knocks it off, WET, he was a nice doofus and the relationship may be salvageable. If he keeps it up, if the jokes don’t stop, he’s a giant asshole and he actually does mean to hurt you and the relationship isn’t worth salvaging. (Please bear this in mind: an asshole might claim to be a nice doofus—he’ll tell you he was just trying to make you feel better about the bedwetting thing with humor—but if the jokes don’t stop… he’s not a nice doofus. He’s an giant asshole.)
The reason you’re afraid to say something is that don’t want to lose him. But you need to flip that on its head: If your boyfriend is a giant asshole—even if he's just medium asshole—you should be in a big fucking hurry to lose him. Say something.
Let's embrace the worst-case scenario: your husband can't and won't change. Your husband continues to cheat on you—just as he once cheated with you—despite the therapy and the "I'm a victim of a cruel and terrible sex addiction!" routine and the desire, perhaps sincere, to save his (current) marriage. What are your options?
You can divorce him or you can Duchess of Devonshire him:
Her marriage lasted 62 years, surviving Andrew’s long bout with alcoholism, as well as his discreet dalliances. “It was absolutely fixed that we shouldn’t divorce or get rid of each other in any way,” the duchess said. “It’s completely different to Americans, who all divorce each other the whole time. Such a bore for everyone, having to say who’s going to have the dogs, who’s going to have the photograph books.” Andrew was great company, she said, which went a long way, and he shared his wife’s facility for drawing humor from challenging situations.
I love that quote—I've worked into columns, I've linked to it into countless SLLOTDs, I even used it in my last book. Now I'm offering it to you, WITW. If you stay with husband you will, like the Duchess of Devonshire, have to put up with your spouse's philandering. (And he'll have to put up with yours—you're in an open marriage, WITW, and always have been. And now you know it.) If you can't put up with a husband who sleeps around—if that's not a price you're willing to pay to be with a man who is an otherwise kind, caring, stable, smart, etc., spouse—then you should absolutely divorce him now.
One caveat: he's cheated on you throughout your marriage and, by your own account, your marriage has been pretty good, he's been a pretty good husband, the cheating was discreet enough that you were able to suspend your disbelief and pretend that the man you married wasn't actually the man you married. But bringing that 23yo into your house, encouraging her to pretend to be your friend, allowing her to hold your child—that adds a layer of insult to the injury that most people (myself included) would have hard time getting past. But if you can get past it... if you stay married... turning a blind eye to your husband's future dalliances would be less exhausting than policing the whereabouts of his penis for the next 30 years.
I'm torn between urging you and your girlfriend to break the fuck up and get the fuck away from each other—any relationship that generates this much drama is doomed—and urging you to stay together if only to spare the innocents you'll both wind up dating after the curtain comes down on this shitshow.
A few quick points: You moved out, you blocked her on Facebook, you're not speaking—this isn't a break, it's a breakup. Maybe your on-a-break/soon-to-be-ex-girlfriend (OABSTBEG) shouldn't have brought that dude back to the house while you're still paying part of the rent (per her agreement), OAB, but you have absolutely no right to tell your OABSTBEG who she can fuck and where she can fuck him. (Your shit-stirring roommate sounds like a real winner.) If you don't want your OABSTBEG moving your stuff around the house, get your goddam stuff out of that house. If it bothers you that you're still paying rent while your OABSTBEG fucks some other dude in said house, stop paying rent. (Break the lease or sublet the whole place or sublet your part of the place; presumably a bed will fit in the room you had been using as an office.) And if it bothers you that your OABSTBEG is having sex with some other guy in front of the bedroom set you helped to pay for, ask your OABSTBEG to buy you out of your half of the bedroom set or—better yet—let her have the nightstand and the dresser and the chifferobe as lovely parting gifts.
And in answer to your questions:
1. Yes, you're doing the right thing by cutting her off. Not because the blame for this mess is all hers, OAB, but because you two are toxic together. Maybe you two can be friends one day—but you both have a lot of growing the fuck up to do before that day comes.
2. I think you're both at fault, OAB, but if being extremely angry helps you to end this thing, by all means wallow in your anger—just know that a lot of your anger is misplaced.
3. I don't know if your OABSTBEG was attempting to take advantage of you and your rent money or your emotional support, OAB, but she was definitely playing head games. Threatening to crash her car into a tree if you didn't take her call was emotionally manipulative/abusive; unilaterally reopening your relationship was a shitty thing to do; lying to you about where she was and what/who she was doing amounted to her slamming her hand down on the relationship self-destruct button. Doing everything you can to get someone to end a relationship and then freaking out when they actually move to end it—which is what your OABSTBEG was doing—is equal parts manipulation, aggravation, and cliché.
Finally, OAB, it is perfectly acceptable for someone to get on with her life—to do whatever she feels like doing—after a break up. That's exactly what people are supposed to do after a breakup. (It's also what people do when they're "on a break.") Your ex-girlfriend owes you nothing, she doesn't answer to you (or your shitty roommates!), and she doesn't owe you a flawless performance in the role of ex-girlfriend as scripted by you. And the only reason a guy would define "my ex having sex in her own bed, in her own room, with a person of her choosing" as an unforgivable, post-relationship-friendship-precluding betrayal is if that guy really wasn't interested in being friends with his ex in the first place. (You didn't like it when she played games, OAB, so don't play games yourself. Don't want to be her friend? Then don't be her friend. You don't have to justify it by pointing to the brutal way in which she violated the innocence of your bedroom set.)
This relationship generated plenty of drama while it was going on. There's no need to generate drama now that it's over... unless it was drama that you two loved, not each other. If that's the case, OAB, you should take each other back and stay together forever.
...and now I'm wondering if I have to go in to work today. I mean, is it true? Or did this person not flip through the paper and find my column (which used to be on the inside of the back page) in its new home (somewhere in the middle of the paper)?
Also, too: threatening to cease purchasing a free publication isn't a great negotiating strategy.
Your High Times source was right in saying that some people use MJ to self-medicate, and that it's harmless for many people—but he was entirely wrong in saying it's harmless for everyone, and it's actually incredibly dangerous and self-defeating to treat mental health issues (particularly bipolar, anxiety, and depression) with MJ, as it messes with natural hormone production, particularly dopamine and likely seratonin. People can get addicted. And like other drugs of abuse (including alcohol), withdrawal has real symptoms.
Anyway, her boyfriend's symptoms sound quite common. He might not be an asshole (though, of course, he might)—he might just be withdrawing every time he runs out of weed. What he needs to do is get clean—fully clean—either by significantly reducing his use or by completely abstaining until his head clears. That's never an excuse to treat your loved ones poorly, but I hope he finds his way.
Best, and thank you for all that you've written,
A.
Thanks for writing, A, and in fairness to my source at High Times—and in fairness to me—neither of us said that marijuana couldn't be abused or that its use was in all cases perfectly benign. I don't know what Dan Skye's position is on the addictiveness of marijuana, but I believe that people can become dependent on the drug in unhealthy ways; I also believe that pretty much any substance can be abused. I also know functional, happy, productive daily users of the drug... and I don't like to think of them as unclean any more than I like to think of my HIV+ friends as unclean.
Boy... it's shitty BF/GF week around here.
Okay, CATD, until my time machine comes online, there's not much I can do to help you. Without it, I can't stop you from selling your house to please a woman you've known for less than a year and I can't stop you from lavishing money and gifts on a 38-year-old who still lives at home with her parents... but who somehow managed to convince you that it's her ex who's the "deadbeat." And without a time machine, I can't prevent you from encouraging your daughter to form an emotional bond with a woman you've been dating for less than a year.
The only thing I can do for you, CATD, is this: I can encourage you to stop pining for this person—a woman who cashed a $300 check she made out to herself after making up her mind to dump you—and to resolve never to make this mistake this series of mistakes, or similar mistakes, ever again. And I can forbid you from introducing your daughter to girlfriends you've only just met and order you not to provide financial support for the online businesses of your new girlfriends.
And I can order you to go look in a mirror and repeat this until it sinks the fuck in: "I got conned by a charismatic user. The sex was great—the sex was amazing—but the rest of it was a lie. She didn't love me and, as it turns out, I didn't really love her. Because I didn't really know her. Until now."
You are going to walk away from the most beautiful girl you've ever dated, CATD, all the while thanking your lucky fucking stars that you didn't wind up married to this person. That would've made for a much worse mess.
And go get yourself an apartment.
I'm not buying your current girlfriend's rationalizations for her shitty, inconsiderate, game-play-y behavior, BLC.
Shitty GF #2 has managed to convince you that she's the victim here. She goes out her way to hurt you, she causes conflict and attempts sabotage things, but she only does that because she had her heart broken before you came along.
Yeah, no. Almost everyone has had their heart broken once or twice before their current BF/GF/SOPATGSF* came along. It's not excuse for intentionally causing conflict or choosing to sabotage a new relationship.
SGF2 has also managed to convince you that treating you like shit is proof that she really could love you and that you two really could have a future together—because SGF2 only attempts to sabotage things when they seem ideal, right? So your relationship is ideal, or it has the potential to be ideal, and everything could be great... if only poor, sad SGF2 could overcome her fears and just let you love her.
Yeah, no. That's bullshit. She's playing games, she's playing the victim, and she's playing you.
DTMFA.
P.S. Talking to a counsellor about at least some of this seems like the obvious answer, but that's currently not something I can afford, nor have I ever been able to find someone I could talk to about this stuff who has been helpful instead of judgmental or traumatizing. I live in Vancouver, if that’s helpful to know.
This should be obvious, HURTING, but it bears repeating: abuse is never the victim’s fault. Abuse can take on many forms, from sexual to emotional to financial. Overcoming abuse is a struggle, and asking for help—even from some dumb fag with a sex-advice column—is a step in the right direction.
Learning to identify abuse and its warning signs—learning to spot those red flags—is one of the main ways you can set healthy sexual and emotional boundaries. If you’re not already connected with Qmunity, they’re the LGBTQ+ Resource Centre in Vancouver and they’re skilled at helping trans folks identify abusive behavior. They’ve even published a really helpful and thorough resource on relationship safety. Their booklet is extensive, easy-to-read, and packed with resources for folks living in the Vancouver area.
A couple of sparknotes:
Examples of Abuse:Abuse specific to trans* folk may include when someone does the following:Criticizes, limits, or ridicules their partner’s gender expressionInterferes with a partner’s access to trans* communitiesRefuses to have safer sex (such as saying “if you really loved me, you wouldn’t want me to wear a condom")Treats their partner as a sexual object rather than as a person, based on one aspect of them, such as their abilities, weight, trans* identity, cultural background, sexual orientation, or class
Warning SignsIf someone behaves in the following ways, it doesn’t necessarily mean that they’ll be abusive in a relationship, but these behaviours can be reasons for you to be cautious.Pressuring a partner to move in together or make other commitments, such as sharing finances early in the relationshipMaking unreasonable demands of a partner’s time, such as calling multiple times a dayUndermining a partner’s other relationships, such as accusing supportive friends of “making trouble between us"
If you ever feel unsafe, HURTING, you're not obligated to wait for your partner or hookup to tick some or all of the abuser boxes to justify getting the fuck away from them. If you feel unsafe, GTFO. Some people feel they can't GTFO—they feel trapped—because they fear being physically attacked if they attempt to leave. Safety first. But remember: if you're with a hookup and fear being attacked if you say you want to leave, you can make up an excuse, fake an illness, wait for your hookup to use the bathroom, shit your pants, start a small fire—GTFO, in other words, at your earliest and safest opportunity, recognizing that you may need to create an opportunity/distraction that allows you to escape.
If you're hooking up with people who are selfish assholes—not abusers, just jerks—and agreeing to do whatever they want because shit sex with someone who treats you like shit sounds better than no sex at all, well, that's just not true. Consensual-but-shitty sex that leaves you feeling awful afterwards isn't worth it. Painful experience has taught you that, right? If you feel tempted to do whatever someone else wants because they're telling you—or you're telling yourself—that you can't do better, don't believe it. Solo sex is better than shitty partnered sex.
And if you hookup with someone who violates your consent—someone who ignores what you agreed to and initiates something violent, i.e. someone who rapes you—please consider reporting them to the police. Understandably, there are many reasons why people don’t report abuse to the cops, especially trans people. The history of police violence and the exclusion of trans people from public services makes many trans folks understandably reluctant. But, HURTING, the good news is you live in Vancouver, and there are lots of trans-friendly resources available to you—people who can help you, and stand by you, should you decide to go to the authorities.
Beyond Qmunity, another good place to check out may be the BC Society for Male Survivors of Sexual Abuse, which offers support groups and individual counseling. The group is gender inclusive and trans-friendly. While there are costs associated with these services, there is some room for sliding scale payments. Trans Care BC could be a good resource, too, and you can connect with them directly through the form located here. While it may not be applicable to your situation, the Sexual Assault Support Centre at the University of British Columbia offers support groups, crisis and emotional support, advocacy and resources for UBC students, staff and folks with a connection to the university. They serve folks of all genders and operate within a gender inclusive framework.
 
Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
Maybe it's time pressure... or performance anxiety induced by praise... but I'm blanking here. Your meeting, as I sit down to write this, is ninety minutes away. So I won't have time to think this through and I won't be able to take a second to reread/rethink my advice before posting to the blog... but fuck it... here we go...
I can't pick between options 1, 2, 3, or 4 with any certainty without first reading your boyfriend's mind, RNYHBISHT, and mind reading isn't one of my superpowers. But here's what I would've told you to do if your email arrived yesterday, RNYHBISHT:
Cancel the meeting. Text your boyfriend—text him so you don't go to pieces at the sound of his voice—and tell him you shouldn't have called and asked to meet. Then tell him what you told us: you love him, you think you're great together, you want to be with him. But if he doesn't know what he wants and he needs time and space to think about it, or if there's something he hasn't told you and he's gotta go on a vision quest to work up the courage to share it with you, RNYHBISHT, he should take the time, he can have his space, he can go vision questing. But he'll have to time/space/quest as a single person because you don't do holds. A relationship is either on or it's off. Emphasize—it's going to be a long text—that you're not asking for a lifetime commitment at eight months. All you're proposing suggesting is that you keep seeing each other with the understanding that it's a good relationship and it may last. (Or it may not. Just because you're crazy about him at eight months, RNYHBISHT, doesn't mean you'll be crazy about him at sixteen months. You could wind up dumping him.)
But your email didn't arrive yesterday, RNYHBISHT, it arrived ninety minutes ago. And canceling the meeting an hour before it's supposed to go down is gonna make you seem like the one who's playing games here. So here's what I'm going to advise you to do....
Go the meeting... and break up with him. Not because he's an asshole, not because he's done something terrible, but because limbo isn't for you. (It's not for Catholics anymore either.) Tell him you love him and tell him you think you're good together, RNYHBISHT, but don't tell him what he's feeling or thinking. Don't tell him that he thinks this is the best relationship he's ever been in even though he said that to you, RNYHBISHT. Because you can't read his mind either. Maybe he loves you so much it scared him and he needed three weeks off to recover from the shock. Or maybe he wanted to end it and he thought "taking a break" and then ending was the kinder way to pull the plug. You don't know what's up with him and you shouldn't pretend to.
Basically what I'm suggesting is that you go to the meeting and tell him what you're feeling—you're confused, you love him, but no limbo for you—without demanding any answers from him. Maybe he'll offer you an answer, maybe he won't, but don't go in expecting one.
You are not a whore, HAC, nor are you a cheater. You're a survivor—a woman who survived an abusive relationship.
My first bit of advice: stop thinking of your soon-to-be-ex-husband as a cuckold. He's not anything so benign as a fetishist. He's an abuser. He abused you emotionally and he abused you sexually. You might wanna spend some time on websites that list the traits of abusers, HAC, as it will help you see your soon-to-be-ex-husband for exactly who and what he is...
Wants to move too quickly into the relationship.
Pressuring you to have sex when you don’t want to or do things sexually you’re not comfortable with.
Withholding includes refusing to listen, refusing to communicate, and emotionally withdrawing as punishment.
Does your partner install spyware or other computer software to monitor your online activity?
There's plenty more where that came from—seriously, HAC, Google "warning signs that you're in an abusive relationship" and invest an hour reading the results.
Cuckolding is increasingly visible and, it seems, an increasingly mainstream kink—there's a story on it in Playboy this week—and while most of the writing out there amounts to Cuckolding 101 (informative, sex-positive, kink-positive), cuckolding can be an emotional minefield. I believe a man with cuckold fantasies has eroticizing a deep-seated fear (infidelity) in much the same way that a woman with rape fantasies has eroticized a deep-seated fear (rape, obviously). And while many readers have shared positive stories of their cuckolding experiences over the years, I've heard more than a few stories like yours—women who gave their husbands what they wanted, women who gave their husbands what they begged for, only to have their husbands turn on them, berate them, and slut-shame them.
Your husband didn't eroticize his fear of infidelity or his anxieties about his inadequacies—he weaponized them. And part of that weaponization—part of the abuse—was blabbing to everyone he could about the terrible things you supposedly did, aka "the things your husband asked you to do." You have nothing to lose by sharing your side of the story, HAC, including the story of how you were manipulated and abused by this man over a period of many years. He didn't hit with his fists, true, but not all abusers use their fists.
I'm glad you're in therapy, HAC, and I'm so sorry about what was done to you. As for the future...
Many people in the early, traumatic stages of divorce feel so damaged that they believe themselves to be incapable of ever having another relationship, casual or otherwise. But that's rarely the case, HAC. Give it time, give yourself time, stay in therapy, and you will be able to form new relationships. 
And I actually think it might be a good idea to start a blog, HAC. You could help other women whose boyfriends and husbands are turned on by cuckolding. Reading about your experiences might help other women determine what kind of man is asking to be indulged in this particular kink—a kinkster or an abuser?
If your fiancé won't take "not a lesbian" for an answer—to say nothing of great straight sex that just keeps getting better—I can't imagine anything I might say to him making a difference.
But there is something you can and should say to him, IGWS. The next time your fiancé asks/whines/insecures about the possibility that you're a deeply closeted lesbian, IGWS, blow the fuck up at him. In a controlled and strategic way, of course, and with your subsequent remarks already prepared and rehearsed. You could write your own speech or you can memorize the one I've written for you: "For fuck's sake, honey, I am fucking done reassuring you about this. I am not a lesbian. I'm a straightish woman, a slightly butchish woman, and I happen to be in love with you and your dick—that's highly unlesbianlike behavior, don't you think? I'm also sick of having to talk you off the same damn ledge three times a week. So I'm going to say this one more time: I am not a deeply closeted lesbian. From here on out, you're gonna have to reassure yourself on this point. Which means the next time you start feeling insecure about my sexuality, honey, you're going to reflect on all the head I've given you and engage in a little auto-reassurio."
The best reassurance that you're not a deeply closeted lesbian isn't the head you're giving him, of course, or the all the great straight sex. It's the passage of time. The longer you're together, the longer you go without coming out as a dyke, the more secure he can be that you are who you say you are. But the two of you are never get to that point—you won't experience the passage of serious time together—if his insecurities prompt you to dump his ass before or shortly after the wedding.
You say you're trapped in this awful, loveless, sexless marriage, GIDI, but it doesn't sound like you're actually trapped. You aren't bedridden and dependent on your spouse for care, you aren't financially dependent on your spouse, you aren't nailed to the floor or glued to the ceiling. You cite only one not very compelling reason for staying: "We are 'home base' for so many lives and I feel I cannot leave my husband because of that." 
Not good enough.
You are not obligated to spend the next three or four decades of your life rotting away in house filled with your husband's junk and your husband's racist rants and your husband's secondhand smoke just so your kids can drop by for brunch on Sunday mornings and tap you for free childcare the rest of the week. Divorcing your husband may hurt your kids and grandkids—and it may leave some of your kids scrambling to make other childcare arrangements—but the short-term hurt it causes the rest of the family couldn't possibly come close to outweighing the hurt staying for even six more months is gonna cause you. 
So go.
Unless you really and truly can't go—unless there's a really, really good reason didn't share with me for staying—in which case stay.
But if you do stay, GIDI, there are a few things you need to say out loud to your kids:
1. "My marriage to your father is essentially over."
2. "Your father and I are going to remain married but, for my own sanity and his, we will be leading increasingly separate lives."
3. "I'm still mom and I'm still grandma and, yeah, I'm still technically a wife. But I am also my own person and I intend to enjoy the next few decades of my life."
And there are few things you need to say out loud to your husband:
1. "We haven't been intimate for more than a decade and we've obviously grown apart in other ways."
2. "Divorce, like the Duchess of Devonshire told the New York Times, is a huge fucking bore for everyone involved. So let's not get divorced."
3. "Even though we're not getting divorced—unless you decide to divorce me after hearing what comes next—we will be living together as glorified roommates, not as husband and wife. And we will, like our nation's Founding Fathers, show a decent respect to the opinions of mankind and not behave in ways that scandalize our children, our grandchildren, our friends, or our neighbors. But we are both free to do our own thing starting now—without permission and without apology. Oh, and I'm blocking you on Facebook."
Having to pretend—to your husband or your kids—that your marriage isn't broken and miserable is an additional misery, GIDI, but a single afternoon of radical truth telling can put an end to that bonus misery. And no longer having to pretend that a marriage isn't miserable and broken, being freed from the stress of keeping up appearances, can actually make being trapped in a miserable, broken marriage a little less miserable.
So what do you do after telling the truth? What comes after saying all those things that can't be unsaid?
You get to spend the next two or three decades—until you bury him or he buries you—doing whatever the fuck you want, GIDI. Roommates don't cook or clean for each other. Roommates don't eat all their meals together. Roommates don't take second jobs so they have an excuse not to hang out at night with each other.
And, hey, got the means to do some traveling? Go see old friends and family members in other parts of the country—even if you have to take the bus to get to them—and take your time coming back. Really loaded? Pack a suitcase full of great books—and a carryon bag full of great vibrators—and go on a couple of long, bi-annual round-the-world cruises. Got lots of money? Hire a contractor to turn your garage into a guest apartment while you're on that cruise—a guest room (and bathroom! and kitchen!) that will be yours and yours alone when you get back.
And finally, GIDI, see other men. Do it/them discreetly, do it/them without shame or guilt, and do it/them soon.
P.S. And I've just now been catching up on SLLOTDs and I see a recent question was somewhat similar, so I feel like you probably don't see a problem with how he acted as far as not discussing ahead of time, but the betrayal for me was more the ignoring my veto—how can I possibly trust that he will ever listen when I veto someone when he didn't with the very first one? Perhaps this question is too similar to the other one, but he sees no problem with ignoring my veto in this case and I was hoping you may have some insight.
I think you may have misread my advice for Stumped For Clever Name, the woman whose ex-boyfriend violated her One Simple Rule. I didn't tell her that it was silly to have a rule, or to discuss things ahead of time, or that (God forbid) there shouldn't be limits on their hookups with thirds. The problem was her particular rule, which was elaborate, unworkable, and seemed intentionally designed to trip her boyfriend up.
To recap: SFCN wanted her ex-boyfriend to tell her—in advance of a date with a third—exactly what would happen that night so she could "prepare [herself] emotionally." (For the devastation?) She got mad at her ex-boyfriend for smooching—only for smooching—two girls on two separate occasions without first warning her in advance that he might smooch the girls he was going out on dates with. SFCN said she would've been totally fine with smooching—she would've be totally fine with fucking—but only if her ex-boyfriend told her advance so she could, again, brace herself emotionally. That seemed like game playing to me: If she was fine with her boyfriend doing anything, from smooching to fucking, why not send him out the door with a simple "Have fun, honey"?
These three commenters may have done a better job of identifying the problem with SFCN's rule than I did:
What you wanted him to do is pre-emptively set a hard limit on a date with someone else. The practical effect of doing it your way was of you standing behind his left ear and clucking "Nuh-uh-ahhhh! Don't you dare. You promised." Sure, that's going to go over real well with his date. In other words, you were basically preemptively fucking up his evening—all the while claiming "Look how giving I am, see, you nominally have permission to go all the way!" That's pretty manipulative.
If you need to emotionally prepare for every kiss when your monogamish partner is out on a date—and in fact, if you need to get a report of every intimate activity after said date, in a not-a-turn-on kind of way, but to compare to the previously approved activities—then maybe, just maybe, you aren't emotionally ready for an open relationship.
What I don't understand is why these arbitrary rulemakers seem completely incapable of putting themselves in the position of the third person: You have a date. The date has gone well. You want to kiss the person. They say, "No, I can't kiss you, I didn't clear kissing with my partner beforehand." WTF? If I were this hypothetical "you," I'd conclude that, A, this person is a loser, and B, their partner doesn't really get poly and continuing to date this person is going to be a whole lotta drama from an immature metamour. So in other words, yes, SFCN, your "rule" is unreasonable.
So: you can have rules in open relationships—you gotta have rules—but when someone insists on rules that are silly and/or unworkable and/or essentially traps, that person is screaming, "I don't want to be in an open relationship at all!"
The rules you describe—obtain approval before fucking someone else, keep lines of communication open, respect the thumb, don't abandon your primary partner on a camping trip to run off with someone else—aren't silly or unworkable. Your rules, unlike SFCN's rule, seem perfectly reasonable. And it's clear that your boyfriend bent the rules that day and then added insult to injury by pretending not to understand the rules (a "thumbs down" is not hard to decipher). He selfishly prioritized his dick on that camping trip and he was clearly willing to risk doing permanent and perhaps fatal damage to your relationship to get with this other woman.
That's not okay. That's not how you earn someone's trust. That's not the way healthy open relationships function.
If he wanted to fuck her, he needed to ask you for your okay. When you found him fucking her, you let him know he didn't have your okay—and he fucked her anyway. He then justified his actions first by claiming not to understand what your thumbs down meant and then by insisting he only fucked her to spare her feelings—bullshit rationalizations.
My readers told SFCN that her insistence on her boyfriend adhering to her unreasonable rule may be evidence that she's not "emotionally ready for an open relationship." I would say that your boyfriend's inability to honor your reasonable rules may be evidence that he isn't ready for an open relationship either.
It's up to you whether you give him a second chance—I would, CETI, if he were my boyfriend—but definitely no third chance.
First things first, PST: I want to thank you—thank you thank you thank you—for making sure this boy would be in your classroom next year and not in the classroom of a transphobic colleague. The transgender suicide attempt rate is staggeringly high—over 40 percent (nine times the national average)—and hostile family members are a huge contributing factor to suicide attempts by trans youth and other queer kids. But the moral support of even just one understanding, empathetic adult can make all the difference for a trans, lesbian, bi, or gay kid who isn't getting any support at home. So thank you. (I wish I could personally thank all the students who ignored the shitty, bigoted, possibly illegal, and potentially traumatizing order to continue calling this boy by his birth name instead of his preferred/actual name. They're also making a difference for the boy.)
I passed your letter along to Chris Hampton, youth and program strategist for the ACLU LGBT and HIV Project, and she had a lot of great information and resources to share. I'm going to get out of the way now and let Chris do the big download...
Students at public schools are protected by the First Amendment. The school can’t restrict how they refer to each other during non-instructional time. As for the rule about only using nicknames that are approved by parents, that sounds like something the school couldn’t possibly be enforcing evenly. Do they call parents to ask trifling stuff like, “Hey, Thomas wants to go by Tom, is that okay with you? Can you fill out a written permission form saying so?” If they’re really requiring parental approval for all nicknames, that would be a huge inconvenience. So if the teacher can get a sympathetic ear with the administration, maybe they could be persuaded to relax that rule.  
The rest of it is pretty complicated and involves too many variables for us to be able to answer easily. We encourage folks to get in touch with us if they want to work through the details of any situations like this—they can request our help at this section of our website. If the teacher feels he can do so without putting himself at risk in his job, maybe he could at least at some point tell this student, “I want you to know I support you and I’m going to do my best to avoid pronouns and using your given name as much as I possibly can.” And find out if the kid has any positive support in his life. If the student is able to access the web at home without his parents seeing his browsing history, or if he can get some web time at the school or public library, he might want to check out these sites:  
• TrevorSpace: A social networking/support site run by the Trevor Project for LGBTQ youth ages 13 through 24.• WeHappyTrans: A website that provides a platform for trans people to share positive stories about their lives. They also have a blog that covers media, news, support, and legal issues.• GoodReads Booklist for Trans Teens: Maybe, maybe, maaaaybe some of these books are available at the school library. Maybe.• The It Gets Better Project—of course! A few sites the teacher or other adults who are interested in supporting trans youth in their lives might check out:
• Gender Spectrum: An organization that provides education, resources, and training to help schools, health-care providers, and family service agencies create a more gender-sensitive and supportive environment for all children including gender variant and transgender youth.• Gender Diversity: This organization provides family support, works with schools, and provides community-building services to improve the well-being for people of all gender identities and expressions.• Transgender Child: A website that provides extensive information, resources, and support for the parents of transgender and gender-nonconforming children.
Finally, there’s a really detailed national guide on supporting trans students in K-12 schools coming out very soon that will include some suggestions for educators working with trans students whose parents aren’t supportive. It’s being written by folks from the ACLU, Gender Spectrum, NCLR, and HRC, and the goal is to have it out by the beginning of the school year.
Dan here: The ACLU and GLSEN brought out a terrific informational brochure for trans and gender-nonconforming students a few years ago: Know Your Rights. I would urge you to pass the link to the PDF on to your new student along with the other links and resources Chris Hampton cites.
And finally, PST, I'm going to take the liberty of translating something Hampton said out of her gentle, professional legalese and into shit-talking, ass-kicking savagese: When Hampton says, "We encourage folks to get in touch with us if they want to work through the details of any situations like this," what she means is, "If you think the motherfuckers running your school are violating your civil rights, kiddo, you let us know—and if they are violating your civil rights, we will sue these motherfuckers faster than you can share your pronoun preferences."
UPDATE: When's the last time you made a donation to the ACLU? Go here and make one.
"A violation of the letter of law," I ruled in yesterday's SLLOTD, "not a violation of the spirit of the law."
You and your ex-boyfriend were in an open relationship, you were both allowed to fuck other people, and he screwed up by failing to notify you in advance that he might wanna kiss girls that he had asked out on dates with your blessing. That seems like letter-of-the-law violation to me, SFCN, not spirit of the law violation—and a mistake that someone new to monogamishamy might easily make.
Should he have anticipated that he would want to kiss both those girls and informed you "ahead-of-date" of his intentions? Yeah, sure, of course. You also could've anticipated that he would, at the very least, wind up kissing any girl he asked out on a date. But rules are rules: If he knew something was gonna happen on a date, your ex was supposed to tell you before the date, not after.
So why didn't he? Especially since he knew—and he did know, right?—that you were making assumptions about his ability to keep a big promise (always use condoms) based on his ability to keep a small one (tell me everything in advance)? Well... maybe because you were sending mixed messages, SFCN?
First you told your ex-boyfriend that you wanted a monogamish relationship—you told him that it was fine with you if he had sex with other women—and then you informed him that he had to tell you know exactly what he planned to do with these other women before he actually did anything with them so that you could "prepare" yourself for the emotional fallout. Do you detect the subtly contradictory message there? ("I'm totally fine with things happening, honey, but you need to give advance warning so I that can brace myself before any of these things happen.") Your boyfriend may have concluded—erroneously and perhaps subconsciously—that it was kinder to go with "nothing is going to happen" because there was no guarantee that anything would happen. Why needlessly torment his girlfriend by rattling off a list of all the things he might wanna do when he might not actually get to do anything at all?
Summing up, SFCN: Your simple rule was more emotionally complicated than you realized.
If I were your boyfriend, SFCN, I would've insisted on a much simpler rule, a rule that was grounded in perfectly reasonable assumptions and therefore less likely to trip either of us up. ("Most likely we'll wind up making out with the other people we go out on dates with—a smooching session is pretty much a given—but we promise to always use condoms with other people if the smooching progresses to sex.")
If that simpler rule was unacceptable to you, SFCN, then I would've erred on the side of telling you I planned to everything I possibly could with the any other girl I asked out—smooching, mutual masturbation, oral sex, PIV, PIB, PBR, PBJ, pegging, fisting, puppy play, scat, diapers, sounding, nullification—so that instead being upset to learn that I had smooched my date after I got home, SCFN, you would've been relieved to learn that my date didn't cut off my cock and balls.
Two hookups—two hookups that took place three years apart—could lead to a loving (for your friend) and complicating (for you) long-term relationship, SHIT, but odds are better that nothing will come of this. Your friend and this girl don't really know each other, and almost all new relationships fall apart early in the discovery process, aka the getting-to-fuck-you-on-the-regular process. So if you can trust your friend and his new girlfriend not to blurt out all the boozy details of the night they met in front your wife for now—if you can trust them to omit your rather limited participation in their first hookup—you might wanna wait a few months before coming clean, SHIT, as that night could wind up safely back in the memory hole.
But if your friend and his new GF wind up making a go of it, SHIT, you should get in front of the scandal and disclose what happened that night to your wife. You don't want her to find out from someone else—from them or from a mutual friend they shared the unabridged version story with—and even if that never happens, SHIT, you don't want to live with the stress of worrying about whether she'll find out for the next four or five decades.
And however angry your wife is when you let her know what happened—and we're both assuming she'll be angry—it's hard to imagine that she won't come to see your booze-addled behavior that night for what it was: a violation of the letter of law, not a violation of the spirit of the law. You made out with someone else—permissible under the terms of your monogamish agreement—but you failed to get the required okay from her in advance. If a monogamish couple, a couple that has three-ways and allows for some making out with other people, can't forgive a relatively minor violation like that, SHIT, what hope is there for all the monogamous couples working through the fallout of an actual affair? (And a lot of couples do manage to work though an affair—and many come out stronger for it, says Esther Perel.)
And who knows? After you disclose your transgression, SHIT, your wife may disclose one or two of her own.
People come to me with all sorts of problems that can't be fixed. ("My girlfriend broke up with me because I lied, I cheated, I spent all day sitting on the couch playing video games, I refused to help with the housework or get a job or help pay for rent or food or utilities. How do I get her to take me back, Dan?" Or, "He said he'd leave his wife for me but it's been eight years and he and his wife just had another kid and no longer returns my calls and I'm beginning to think he's never going to leave her. If I can get him on the phone, what can I say to finally get him to leave his wife?" Or, "You are not allowed to not like beards, Dan.") Letter writers often don't know what they want—or know on some level that what they want is impossible—and too many have made a series of terrible choices they want me to retroactively justify and somehow make it all better. With advice magic. But in your case, ELDER, I'm struck by how self-aware and self-possessed you are. You know what you want. You're making it happen. And you're benefiting from all the values I'm always pimping in this column (yes, rightwing fuckwits, I do, in fact, have values): communication, leaving people in better shape than you found them, and, of course, GGG'ing your way to a satisfying/rewarding/awsome-ish sex life. 
My first suggestion for you all, ELDER, is to have patience. As you said, you're waking up from "a lot of years of being asleep as a practicing Mormon," and "there are a lot of mind fucks" you're experiencing. You only left the church twelve measly months ago. You're growing into a new identity—after letting go of an identity assigned to you by a dead huckster and an accident of birth—but that shit takes time. Take it slow, keep thinking and processing, don't assume you've already discovered the brand of poly works for you, and continue to appreciate and laugh about the irony of being a straight guy who has to worry about how his Mormon family will react to the whole "I have two female partners" thing.
And long before coming out to your families, ELDER, you'll want to ensure that all of you are on the same page. You say that (from what you can tell) your wife craves to be openly poly with her family, but you'll want to be 100%, she-said-it-with-her-own-words-right-to-your-face-lotsa-times-and-not-just-because-it-was-what-her-husband-wanted-to-hear sure that's the case before blurting anything out to any family. When you do decide to come out (together), an e-blast or Facebook status update i not the right move. Tell people individually, face-to-face, because it's much harder to reject a loved one when they're sitting in front of you and patiently answering your questions.(Some asshole families manage, however.)
Coming out to your families as poly will probably be another "mixed bag of awesome, and bad," just like coming out is a mixed bag for gay, lesbian, and bi folks. So start building a life that'll withstand a "possible financial fallout," which means your wife may wanna consider looking for work that isn't policed by her conservative step-brother. Depending on where you all live (and what shape our country is in by the time you all come out), there may be few/fewer workplace protections if he decides to fire your wife based on his precious religious beliefs.
Another Ex-Mormon wrote me last week with suggestions for helping those who've left the church. I'm sure you know these groups already, ELDER, but here's the letter just in case:
The ex-Mormon community in Utah is increasingly strong as more and more people leave the church and manage to connect with each other via the Internet. 
First off, there's the Underground Handcart Company (a play on the Underground Railroad and the various handcart companies that crossed the Great Plains during the Mormon migration). They're a nonprofit, volunteer outfit. Their Facebook page is here. And their main page here. Second, the largest online ex-Mormon community is currently on Reddit.
We've all got our wounds from the church, which is easily the most sex-negative (among other things) major denomination in the United States. Most of us are eager to help protect and heal others from that same damage when we can.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
You're not going to be happy having safe, boring, predictable sex with Mr. Long Term for the long term, right? Not after all that wild, passionate, unpredictable sex with Mr. New Guy. So if things don't improve, your relationship with Mr. Long Term is doomed. So you have nothing to lose by slapping your cards down on the table, MAS.
Tell Mr. Long Term the truth: The sex has to get better. Now, maybe Mr. Long Term is the problem (he could be lousy at sex) or maybe it's the combo of you and Mr. Long Term that's the problem (maybe you two just don't click sexually), and the relationship is doomed no matter what you do. But there's a chance your problem is a relatively common hang-up, MAS. It's possible that you, or Mr. Long Term, or you and Mr. Long Term feel inhibited during sex because you're in love, and people who are in love are supposed to have sex one way (you're supposed to make safe, boring, predictable love). But people who aren't in love—people like you and Mr. New Guy—are free to have sex another way (they're allowed to have wild, passionate, and unpredictable fucks).
Give Mr. Long Term permission to fuck you like he's never going to see you again. You should fuck him the same way. Fuck each other like the stakes are low—fuck like it's casual, fuck like it could end at any time. The "lovemaking" inhibition can be literally fucked to death, if it's indeed the problem here, and once you've fucked it good and dead, you'll see that you can have a happy life, a committed relationship, and wild, passionate, unpredictable sex—with the same person!
But you gotta want it bad enough to fuck for it.
I asked a doctor—Dr. Barak, a generalist physician at the University of Washington and a regular (if sometimes mortified) guest expert—if mono could damage and/or diminish a guy's libido, ability to stay hard, interest in sex, etc., for nearly a year. He e-mailed me back to say...
Mono is a viral illness for which there is no real treatment other than the tincture of time. Mono is a pretty insidious illness in that it typically causes really really severe fatigue which can linger for a long time. Other common symptoms are muscle and joint aches. Could this fatigue and muscle ache and joint ache slip into affecting mood and interest in sex? They could. Would not be typical, but they could. The duration of mono symptoms is typically around three months, but they can persist to some degree for 1-2 years in more severe cases. None of the effects of mono are typically considered "permanent." So it would be important to reassure someone that the effects of mono that are still present after 12-18 months could still likely resolve as more time passes.
You came down with mono 11 months ago, COMBAT, so you're still in that 1-2 year symptoms-could-persist window. You were also shipped off to a combat zone—which is stressful and potentially libido-impairing. The fact that morning wood is returning would seem to be a good sign, as is the fact that a few dirty texts from the girl back home and your regular FWB can crank you up. Be reassured, like the doctor said, that things—your dick included—will most likely right themselves in another 6-12 months. And come home safe!
I've never written, but I felt compelled to after reading DEHUMANE's letter and your response. Sorry, Dan, but you missed the most OBVIOUS point, in this scenario, in your response, in my opinion. I believe Recon guy not only tricked and decieved DEHUMANE, he broke the agreement. Recon guy agreed not to leave any marks and most people will argue he didn't, but it will be OBVIOUS to anyone who knows DEHUMANE that he is hairless. The absence of his hair is noticeable and is, therefore, a mark left by Recon guy. It's obvious Recon guy can't be trusted and DEHUMANE should obviously avoid future play sessions with him. But will DEHUMANE avoid Recon guy? I don't think so. It's obvious he wrote seeking your approval and permission to do so.
No Untrustworthy Tops, Seriously!
In defense of Recon Guy, NUTS, after DEHUMANE told him he didn't want to be "marked," Recon Guy asked him for a clarification—what exactly did "no marks" mean to DEHUMANE?—and DEHUMANE said, "No bruises, no welts, no red marks." Mr. Recon left no bruises, welts, or red marks. Shaving off someone's body hair is a limit-pushing dick move, that's for sure, but it's not as if Recon Guy cut off his pinky toes. Recon Guy pushed DEHUMANE's limits, yes, and that was probably too much, too soon, for a novice like DEHUMANE, but I don't think that means Recon Guy is an unsafe player.
I too got the impression that DEHUMANE wanted to play with Recon Guy again—which is why I recommended that he have a much more detailed conversation with Recon Guy about his limits, make it clear that only things that were ruled in were on the menu, and ideally bring his boyfriend along to any future play/dehumanization sessions.
Short and to the point: I would advise these people to divorce.
And if the "she" half of this he/she union is the half whose mind has changed, SATTP, I would advise the "he" half not to engage in vaginal intercourse until after this conflict is resolved and/or the divorce is finalized.
One other thought...
If the person who suddenly wants a child is okay with being the non-custodial/part-time parent of a child who lives full time with one or more other parents, being a known sperm donor and the spare dad for an oppo-sex couple's kid or the only dad for a same-sex couple's kid (if it's the "he" half of this he/she union whose mind has changed*), or being a known egg donor and/or gestational/surrogate and the spare mom for an oppo-sex couple's kid or the only mom for a same-sex couple's kid (if it's the "she" half of this he/she union whose mind has changed**) are options these days.
It's a highly complicated option, of course, and one that would require trust and trailblazing and lawyering up. (The lawyers would be there to hammer out agreements in advance of conflict, SATTP, thereby making conflicts easier to resolve if or when they arise.) It's a uniquely modern path to parenthood that would allow the person whose mind has changed to have a kid and hold on to the still-child-free person they married. All he/she would have to do is find a couple, same-sex or oppo-sex, who were open to triad parenting as a concept and whose values and ideas about parenting closely aligned with his/her own.
Divorce would be way easier.
* Assuming the "he" half of this he/she union is a cisgender man.
** Assuming the "she" half of this he/she union is a cisgender woman.
My answer, BORING, is threefold...
1. A few years ago I interviewed a doctor who works with people with dangerous and/or distressing kinks. The kink in question was totally different—ball busting scenes involving "erotic-target override" (it's complicated)—but this bit is relevant:
"These problems are often highly treatable," said Dr. Paul Fedoroff, who is a neuropsychiatrist, a forensic psychiatrist, and the director of the Sexual Behaviors Clinic at the Royal Ottawa Mental Health Centre. "Typically, a low-dose SSRI works magic." SSRIs, or "selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors," are a class of drugs that are usually prescribed as antidepressants. SSRIs can crater a person's libido, as is commonly known, but they can also, according to Fedoroff, help a person overcome an unwanted sexual interest or compulsion. "I had one patient who used to tie his testes with rope and then hit them with a hammer," said Fedoroff. "He was referred to me by a urologist when he asked for surgical castration. I prescribed an SSRI, and a month later he told me, 'That [was] the craziest idea I ever had.' He had no further interest in 'ball busting' and said his life would have been different if he had found this medication earlier." 
So, yeah, antidepressants could be responsible for your FWB's sudden disinterest in ropes, whips, and toys. (For the record: I do not support "treating" kinks with meds.) The impact antidepressants can have on a person's libido—they can completely obliterate a person's libido—is well known, and most docs are willing to tweak dosages and/or prescribe different antidepressants so that their patients don't have to sacrifice their sex lives for their mental health.
2. It could be the drugs—either the antidepressant your FWB recently started taking or the drug he recently stopped abusing. Booze may have helped him overcome sexual inhibitions (where his kinks are concerned) and/or crippling sexual self-consciousness (the kind that can derail boners and induce premature ejaculation). It's also possible that your FWB associates "good, hard poundings" with his out-of-control drinking, BORING, and consequently doesn't feel comfortable engaging in that kind of sex at the moment. Here's hoping his desire to pound you reemerges once he's passed out of the early and delicate stages of his sobriety.
3. Some people can't end their love affair with booze without a new love to take its place. And while I don't think there's a nice way to tell someone that their happiness is destroying your sex life, BORING, I do think you should tell him you miss the intensity and the kinks—then urge him to ask his doctor about adjusting his meds. (Due to the rampant kink-phobia in the medical community, BORING, your boyfriend might not get a good response if he tells his doctor he wants to tweak his meds so that tying up and whipping his casual sex partner starts making his cock hard again. He should speak to his doc in more general terms.) And push back gently when he says he's totally in love with you—tell him you like him, tell him you're going to be there for him as a friend, but don't allow him to assume the feelings are mutual.
While the LGBT community is wildly, beautifully, and sometimes exhaustingly diverse—we have our religious groups too (some of them oppose gay sex and gay relationships!), we have our Americans and foreigners, we have our racists (sadly), we have our crazy gun nuts (ditto), we are a part of every culture in the world, and many, many Deaf people are a part of the queer community—the rainbow flag does not symbolize diversity.
Not technically.
The rainbow flag represents a diverse community—as does the rainbow windsock and the rainbow dog collar and the rainbow board shorts and the rainbow detachable pony tail butt plug—but the rainbow stands for other stuff:
In 1974, Gilbert Baker’s life changed forever when he met Harvey Milk, who showed him “how action could create change.” Three years after they met, Milk was elected to the San Francisco Board of Supervisors—making him the first openly gay person to hold a high public office in a major American city. Milk, once known fondly as the Mayor of Castro St., had campaigned on a positive message of hope for young gay people, saying, “The only thing they have to look forward to is hope. And you have to give them hope.” After winning the election, Milk challenged Gilbert Baker to come up with a symbol of pride for the gay community—a positive alternative to the pink triangle. The pink triangle, once imposed by Nazis to identify and persecute homosexuals, had been reclaimed in the 70s as a bold symbol of remembrance and action against persecution. It is still widely used, often alongside or superimposed upon the Rainbow Flag.
Inspired, Baker began working on a flag. He dyed the fabrics himself and, with the help of volunteers, stitched together eight strips of brilliant color into a huge banner that spoke volumes: hot pink stood for sexuality, red for life, orange for healing, yellow for the sun, green for nature, turquoise blue for art, indigo for harmony and violet for spirit.
“It all goes back to the first moment of the first flag back in 1978 for me. Raising it up and seeing it there blowing in the wind for everyone to see. It completely astounded me that people just got it, in an instant like a bolt of lightening—that this was their flag. It belonged to all of us. It was the most thrilling moment of my life. Because I knew right then that this was the most important thing I would ever do—that my whole life was going to be about the Rainbow Flag.”
As you now know, DAHLR, the adoption of the rainbow as a symbol of the LGBT community/movement was not a decision made by all queer people everywhere. There was no constitutional convention where the flag was adopted, there were no other candidates, there was no queer nationwide vote. The brilliant and creative Gilbert Baker created the rainbow flag and it was an immediate hit. Perhaps there was someone else out there who could've come up with something better, flag-wise, but he/she/they didn't. Gilbert got there first, no one has come up with anything better since, and we're still waving his rainbow flag four decades later. Other communities within the wider LGBT community—BDSMers, bears, trans people, asexuals, etc.—have created pride flags of their own that riff on Gilbert's original creation—another measure of its genius.
And seeing as this went down in Seattle today...

A project that will cover six intersections of Pike/Pine between 11th Ave and Broadway with rainbow crosswalks as a symbol of Gay Pride was unveiled early Tuesday morning. Mayor Ed Murray, Seattle’s first openly gay mayor and a Capitol Hill resident, said the new rainbow crosswalks represent the neighborhood as “a place where we are tolerant and accepting.”
...I don't think there's any chance of yanking the rainbow flags/windsocks/dog collars/board shorts/butt plugs back from the queers. That cruise ship has sailed. I'm very sorry, of course, that you are unable to display the rainbow without attracting the unwanted attentions of bigots and/or Larry Craigs, DAHLR, and it may come some comfort to know that you're not the only person who is annoyed by the queer community sneaking off with the rainbow. But the rainbow is queer now. You'll just have to get used to it.
UPDATE: Of course this iconic performance by this iconic icon had a lot to do with the queer community's thing for rainbows:

Somewhere out there, someplace that it may be impossible to actually get to, there's gotta be a better place—a happier place, a safer place, a place where I can create my own family and wear fabulous red shoes. That image resonated with millions of gay people when the Wizard of Oz first came out in 1939 and it continued to resonated with gay people down through the 50s and 60s and 70s. With so many LGBT people still having to flee from homophobic and transphobic churches and families and communities to be free, the a metaphor continues to resonate with LGBT people today.
And this next song has nothing to do with the queers—proving that you can sing about rainbows without everyone's minds going here—but I like the song...

"Once a cheater, always a cheater" does seem to be a thing—although it may be more accurate to say "once a cheater, somewhat likelier to cheat than someone who was never a cheater." HuffPo:
University of Denver psychology graduate student Kayla Knopp studied 484 unmarried adults aged 18 to 35 to find out if people who stray in one relationship are more likely to do so in the next. Her findings were presented at the annual American Psychological Association convention in Washington D.C. Knopp and her fellow researchers asked participants questions such as, "Have you had sexual relations with someone other than your partner since you began seriously dating?" and "Has your partner had sexual relations with someone other than you since you seriously began dating?" Those who admitted to having sexual relations outside their relationship were three and a half times more likely to do so in their next relationship as well, Knopp explained to The Huffington Post in an email.
The study didn't include same-sex couples, HuffPo notes, so your odds may be the same, higher, or lower. But "likelier to cheat again" by whatever multiple does not mean "destined to cheat again."
The likelihood of a cheater cheating again, in my opinion, depends on the reason(s) for the cheater cheating in the first place. Someone who cheats because she's easily bored, aroused by risk-taking, or to punish her partner seems a highly likely candidate for future cheating, HOPING. So you'll have to contemplate why she did it, HOPING, not just that she did it.
And, yes, your potential new girlfriend may deserve a pass since she was cheating "at the end of a relationship that really wasn't working anyway." But if cheating is how she breaks up with people—if that's how she gets out of relationships that aren't working—that's not a good sign.
So ask yourself: Being cheated on is a violation that you can aid and abet, it seems, but is it one you can forgive and forget?
If your boyfriend were my friend—not my boyfriend, just my friendfriend—and he confided in me about this mess, TADID, here's what I would say to him:
Let's pretend you don't have a girlfriend. You're totally single. You stopped fucking damsel-in-distress girl for a reason, right? You didn't want to be with her and now she's got a new boyfriend. But she says she's still in love with you and her new boyfriend is deeply shitty and she's really unhappy—and so you swap texts with her all day long. Because you feel sorry for her. Because you're a nice guy. Because she's unhappy. And you know what? She knows it. She knows you pay attention to her because she's unhappy. Because her boyfriend is shitty. So...
As long unhappiness and shitty boyfriends are the key to getting attention from the man she loves—that man would be you—what incentive does she have to get happy? Or to get herself a better boyfriend? None. Her unhappiness may be genuine or it could be a stratagem—she may actually be miserable or she may just be claiming she's miserable to keep you in her life. Either way, friendfriend, you're not doing her any favors when you text with her. If she's manipulating you by pretending to be miserable, she's not being nice to you. If the attention you're giving her, limited though it may be, is keeping her in a miserable spot (because subconsciously she's realized that being miserable is the only way to win your attention), you're not being nice. Either way: this isn't nice. So stop it.
That's how you should frame your objections from here on out, TADID: by expressing your concern for her (you don't want her to stay miserable just to keep him texting) and by expressing your concern for him (you don't want her manipulating him just to keep him texting).
Get it off your chest once or twice, TADID, then back the fuck off—trust your boyfriend, let this thing run its course, and bite your tongue until either your boyfriend comes to his senses or his sadsack and/or manipulative ex comes to hers.
P.S. I also wanted to say thanks. I grew up in a super conservative Catholic family/community in the rural midwest. I was introduced to you about ten years ago by a college friend from Seattle, and because of you I have turned into a sex positive and proudly out queer adult. And my life is so so so so so much better than I ever envisioned it could be!
First things first: Congrats on your upcoming wedding! That's wonderful. And to know my column helped you pleases me more than I can say, PPPH, but for the record: That out-and-proud, sex-positive, loved-and-capable-loving person you are today? You built her.
Now about your shitty family...
You are not going to absorb your shitty family's rejection personally, PPPH, because you are not going to call each and every shitty member of your shitty family to personally ask each individual shit in your shitty family if they're coming to your wedding. The shits aren't coming—adjust your seating charts accordingly—and you know what? You don't want these shits at your wedding. You don't want to see your shitty sister-in-law's sour face when you look out at your guests. You don't want to see your shitty brother's face—the shitty relative who throws you non-committal shitty scraps and then fails to invite you to his own wedding—when you cut the cake. You don't want any of these shits at your wedding. You want people at your wedding who love and support you, who love and support your relationship, and your shitty family has made it abundantly clear that they are incapable of loving and supporting you.
It's worse than that: Your shitty family had made it clear that they will seize any opportunity to wound you. Stop creating those opportunities. Don't send any more invitations, don't make any more phone calls, unfollow the fuckers on Facebook. Devote a week to grieving your loss—this kind of rejection is painful—and then resolve to focus on your wife-to-be, your education, your friends, and your career.
Focus on the life you and your fiancée are embarking on together. She's your family now.
I'm so sorry for your loss, MIA, my heart goes out to you.
As for your horrible, terrible, no good, really bad sister-in-law... send her the fucking note.
Don't put the note at the bottom of a box of photos; there's always a chance the box will sit unopened for months or years, MIA, and you don't want that note to go undiscovered until after your SIL croaks and her next of kin finally get around to opening the box. And don't send the note to your SIL via her truly nice daughter/your late partner's truly nice niece. Your late partner's niece (she's your niece too) is most likely aware that her mother is an awful person and she's probably had to make apologies for her awful mother in the past. You should spare her from having to make another one now.
Send the note directly to your late partner's cruel and unusual sister—hell, send it registered mail and make the hateful old bat sign for it. And for what it's worth, MIA, your note didn't strike me as angry. I've been sitting here composing the note I would write if someone sent a that "condolence card" to me after the death of a loved one and it's a web of death threats held together by strings of F-bombs. Your note is a model of restraint and composure.
Finally, MIA, keep talking with your late partner's niece—she's your niece too—and don't allow her mother's actions to pollute this new connection to your late partner's extended family. (You were his immediate family.) At some point down the road the subject of her mother may come up, MIA, and then you can calmly express your disappointment (not your anger) with the way her mother treated you immediately after your partner's death. If your truly nice niece tries to apologize, MIA, stop her; she's not responsible for her mother's shitty behavior. Hopefully by then you'll be ready to share a mordant/morbid laugh with your niece about the whole thing—the best possible revenge you could have over her mother.
I'm not going to yell at you.
I'm also not gonna crawl into your boyfriend's head and attempt to articulate his feelings about his ex, NTBYA, and I'm not gonna tell you to leave him so he can work through this shit. I'm going to tell you to keep dating this guy—say yes to the great sex and the divine pork butts—and then I'm going ask you a simple question:
What's the worst thing that could possibly happen, NTBYA?
He could dump you. That's the worst thing that could happen, right? Getting dumped is what you're worried about. You could date this guy, really fall for him, and wind up alone. He could very well dump you because he's still hung up on his ex—or it could be something else. He might dump you because your personalities don't mesh or he might dump you because you want kids and he doesn't or vice-versa. He could get completely over his ex and still wind up dumping you. He could have no exes at all—you could be his first girlfriend ever—and he could still wind up dumping you.
So let's say he dumps you. What do you have left? Besides a broken heart, which people acquire and get over every day (not the same people on the same day), what do you have? Let's make a short list...
1. Your youth.
2. Your friends.
3. Your career.
You're going to be fine, NTBYA. Even if the worst thing happens—even if he dumps you—you'll be okay. And you know what? He might not dump you. You might dump him. Or you might not ever dump each other and you'll be eating his divine butt for the rest of your life.
It's like this, NTBYA: There's no dating, there's no falling in love, there's no nothin' without risk. Everyone out there who's in a relationship or a marriage or a slave collar has run the risk of being dumped and still runs the risk of being dumped. You're not special in that regard, NTBYA, there's nothing out of the ordinary about the stakes here or the risk you're running. If you can't bear the risk of being dumped—because of an ex or some other issue—you'll have to be celibate.
Here's a better option then celibacy: Calm the fuck down. Enjoy this guy, enjoy his butt, and tell yourself that you'll be fine—if this relationship works out, if it doesn't work out.
Either way, NTBYA, you'll be fine.
Sorry, BADACRONYM, but I don't see a "both win" solution/compromise/scenario here.
It could be that stress and overwork and insecurity are behind her request to close the relationship, BADACRONYM, and maybe she'll agree to open the relationship back up once she's done with law school and after she's lost the weight and/or started to feel better about her body. But my hunch is that she's discovered, after making a good-faith effort, that nonmonogamy just isn't for her—at least when it comes to sharing you with other women. So staying with her means either you're gonna be in a monogamous relationship* (which will make you miserable) or she's going to be in a nonmonogamous relationship (which will make her miserable). And guess what? You'll both wind up miserable in the end if you stay together. Eventually the frustration of the miserable person who caved on the monogamy/nonmonogamy issue will curdle into toxic resentment and consciously or subconsciously that person, i.e., the person who was miserable first, will set out to make the other person miserable too.
So, yeah, no. Just as there's no compromise win/win position when one person in a relationship wants to have kids and the other person doesn't, there's no compromise win/win position when one person wants monogamy and the other doesn't. You're either parents or not, you're either monogamous or not.
And you're a monogamous not, BADACRONYM. You were clear about that from the start—you were clear about who you are, what you need, and the kind of commitment you're capable of keeping. Mathilda is now asking you to make precisely the kind of commitment you know you can't keep and you've told her you can't keep, BADACRONYM, and you would be foolish to make that kind of commitment and she would be foolish to believe you if were foolish enough to make it.
Let's pause here to play let's pretend for a quick second: If Mathilda had told you back when you first got together that she wanted a monogamous commitment and you agreed to be monogamous and then you unilaterally informed her—after moving in together, after adopting a rescue dog together—that you not only wanted to open the relationship up but that you insisted on opening it up right now, BADACRONYM, no one would hesitate to identify you as the bad guy.
So should you end it? No, BADACRONYM, you shouldn't. Mathilda helped you get started and now she's in school and she needs your support. But you should, for your own sanity, and to avoid "cheating" on Mathilda, remind her that you never made a monogamous commitment to her and inform her that you will not have a monogamous commitment imposed on you by ultimatum. If she ends this relationship as a result—if she leaves the nonmonogamous relationship she entered into with you—then leaving was her decision, BADACRONYM, not yours.
* I predict that her offer to let you suck all the dick you want will be rescinded the first time you suck a dick.
National Child Abuse Hotline: 1-800-4-A-Child (1-800-422-4453)
UPDATE: A followup question for Meghan Fagundes:
DS: Do juvenile sex offenders who are taken in for treatment—or reported to the authorities—wind up on sex-offender registries for the rest of their lives?
MF: Generally speaking, no. The overall sentiment is that juvenile registries are more harmful than anything, and some sexually abusive youth never go through the legal process, so that would not be the outcome for them. However, there are some that do have to register. This is another one of those things that depends on so many factors, one of them being that different states have different laws about who is required to register as a juvenile: http://www.csom.org/train/juvenile/7/7_4.htm.
That said, even if you live in a state without juvenile registration requirements, if you are adjudicated for a sex offense as a juvenile, but don't complete your probation requirements by the age of majority, you are often then required to register as an adult. I've known kids who sexually abused someone at the age of 14, who, by the time they went through the legal process, found an opening at a treatment facility and completed the program, and/or served their time in a detention facility, were well over the age of 18. At that point, if they were still on probation, and then, for example, violated their probation requirements (even with an unrelated charge), it would be possible that they would have to register for life as an adult sex offender.
I hate to be the one to break this to you, FAP, but your ability to appreciate all forms of pornography isn't evidence that you're more highly evolved than the rest of us poor motherfuckers or that you've forsaken or seen through or outgrown or escaped MALE and FEMALE.
So what's up with you?
You can't have M2M sex, that's true, but let's take a second to think about why you might enjoy M2M porn. Thinking... thinking... GOT IT: you're a bi woman and you're attracted to guys. You're into guys and there are guys in M2M porn so M2M porn works for you because there are guys in it and you're into guys. Make sense? F2F porn works for you because you're attracted to women and M2F porn works for you because you're attracted to men and women. Whatever kind of porn is available, whatever you pull up on XTube, there's something/someone in it for you.
Straight guys, on the other hand, generally don't enjoy M2M porn because... thinking... straight guys aren't attracted to other guys. There's nothing in gay porn for them. Likewise, most gay men aren't into F2F porn because there's nothing in F2F porn for us. And while some gay men enjoy straight porn, APFAP, it's not because these gay guys are into M2F sex. Gay guys who watch straight porn almost always focus/perv on the guys, projecting themselves into the action and the girls out of it. ("I predominantly watch straight porn," Raziel Reid wrote at the Daily Xtra, "imagining I’m the lucky bitch." Ironically the piece is about the small handful of straight guys—or straight-identified guys—who actually do watch M2M porn.)
Lesbians screw up my neat and orderly porn universe, as there are tons of lesbians out there who watch M2M porn. Some of these M2M-porn-watching lesbians have called into my podcast to explain that since most F2F porn is terrible (fake lesbians having fake lesbian sex for straight male viewers) they watch gay porn instead because the guys aren't fake and they're really fucking and they're obviously into it. Two things: a lot of the guys in gay porn aren't into and are faking. And if the converse were true—if M2M porn was terrible and F2F porn was amazing—I wouldn't watch F2F porn instead. So... something else is at play, I'm thinking, with lesbians who watch gay porn, even if I'm not sure what.
Summing up, FAP, you're attracted to men and you're attracted to women and so you like all kinds of porn. You haven't forsaken male and female—you're into both male and female. And that's fine, that's great, it's not fine to fault people who are incapable of enjoying all forms of porn the same way you do. You're essentially saying, "There's something wrong with people who who aren't just like me and don't do sex and gender the same way I do it." It's not okay when straight people say shit like that, FAP, because it's not... what? It's not respectful.
Saying "I would so totally fuck the shit out of you if you were single," or some variation on that theme ("I would so thoroughly enjoy an FWB arrangement if you should find yourself single again..."), seems like dick move. But anyone who would end the relationship they're in after hearing something like that—a guy who would dump his girlfriend for some NSA sex with an old family friend—isn't in any sense committed to their person they're with now.
If your old friend's commitment to his girlfriend is so flimsy that he would dump her for NSA/FWB sex with you, WTFTF, he would be doing his girlfriend a favor by dumping her. And you would be doing her a bank-shot favor.
Make the offer.
Probably not a question I should answer in a rush to get on an airplane. But here goes...
Gender identity, unlike marrying a pillow or pushing "realistic dolls" around in prams, is not an affectation or an eccentricity or plain ol' batshittery. Gender identity goes to the core of who we are and how we wish to be—or how we fundamentally need to be—perceived by others. Take it away, Human Rights Campaign:
The term "gender identity," distinct from the term "sexual orientation," refers to a person's innate, deeply felt psychological identification as a man, woman, or some other gender, which may or may not correspond to the sex assigned to them at birth (e.g., the sex listed on their birth certificate)... Transitioning is the process some transgender people go through to begin living as the gender with which they identify, rather than the sex assigned to them at birth. This may or may not include hormone therapy, sex-reassignment surgery, and other medical procedures.
Unlike amputating healthy limbs (which some doctors will do, if only to prevent "transabled" people who may have "body integrity identity disorder" from amputating their own limbs) or thin people starving themselves to death because they think they're fat, transgender people who embrace their true gender identity and take steps toward transitioning are happier and healthier. That said, transitioning is not a panacea.
You seem pretty concerned about the surgical removal of healthy body parts. To which I would say...
Other people's bodies—and other people's body parts—are theirs, not yours. And if someone needs to change or even remove some part(s) of their body to be who they are and to be happy and to be healthy, they should have that right. That said, NSFM, not all trans people get surgery, top or bottom, and many trans people change everything else (they take hormones, they get top surgery) but opt to stick with the genitals they were born with. (The ones they were born with tend to work better than the ones that can currently be constructed for them.) But unless you're trans yourself, currently sleeping with a trans person, or about to sleep with a trans person, NSFM, it's none of your business what any individual trans person elects to do with their genitals.
For me it boils down to letting people be who they are and do what they want. Sometimes people do things for what can seem like silly and/or mystifying reasons (marry pillows, vote Republican, grow beards), while sometimes people—sometimes even the same people—do things for very serious reasons (come out of the closet, alter their bodies to bring them into alignment with their gender identities). Unless the choices being made by other people impact you in some immediate or material way—unless someone wants to marry your pillow or wants to sleep with you or wants to persecute you politically or economically—there's no conflict for you to resolve. All you gotta do is strike the right balance between minding your own business and embracing/celebrating the infinite diversity of the human experience.
Dilemma? Put up two profiles, HTIT, one for
My response after the jump...
Your letter confused me, CUCK. Here's why: You describe your relationship as open, then as poly, then as a "cuckolding thing."
First things first: Polyamorous relationships and open relationships are two different things. Some poly relationships are open, but many poly relationships are closed—that is, three people (or more) are involved with each other exclusively, i.e., no randoms, no romancing potential fourths, fifths, or sixths. The reverse is also true: Not all open relationships are poly. Two people in an open relationship may allow fucking around with other people with the understanding that there will be no dating or—God forbid—falling in love with anyone else.
And then there's cuckolding. The whole "cuckolding thing" is about the female half of a heterosexual couple breaking the rules and then rubbing her partner's nose in the evidence of her cheating. (Some cuckolds get off on literally having their noses rubbed in the evidence.) Cuckolding is eroticized betrayal, CUCK, and you spent months fantasizing with your girlfriend about being betrayed. All that dirty talk, all those made-up stories—remember? But when it came time to turn your fantasies into reality, CUCK, you laid out the rules for what sounds like a fairly standard open-not-poly relationship: She could fuck other people and so could you. Once again, I'm confused: The cuckold in a "cuckolding thing" typically doesn't get to fuck around. He gets fucked around on.
If your discussions with your girlfriend were as confusing as your letter, CUCK, it's possible that she was likewise confused. It's possible that she thought the rules applied to you and not to her. It's possible that she figured she was free to break the rules because betrayal turned you on. Now she knows that betrayal turns you on as a fantasy and not a reality.
I'm giving your girlfriend the benefit of the doubt here, CUCK, but seeing as you love her and want to make this work, and seeing as girlfriends who are open to cuckolding are hard to come by, on, and in, I think you should give her the benefit of the doubt, too. Time will tell if she's an honest "cheater" who can be trusted or a lying cheater who must be dumped.
My response after the jump...
I'm going to take your problems one at a time, NCWTD, in ascending order of importance/assholery.
1. A disappointing blowjob is always less disappointing than no blowjob at all, NCWTD, particularly for teenage boys. So it's always better to err on the side of blowjobs.
Yes, you'll probably be pretty inept at first. Take things slowly and only take him as far into your mouth as you feel comfortable with. (Feel free to wrap a fist or two around the base of his cock so you can control how fast and far his dick goes into your mouth.) Don't let your boyfriend rush or guilt you into blowing him until he comes by pointing to all the times—all the three times!—that he went down on you. Sucking cock is physically trickier and more taxing than eating pussy. That may seem crazy unfair—hasa diga eebowai—but on the bright side, it frees you from having to get him off with your mouth the first few dozen times you attempt to blow him.
2. Probing is low-risk for pregnancy, NCWTD, but there's still some risk. What worries me is that this activity makes you uncomfortable and either you haven't said anything to your boyfriend or you have said something and he's doing it anyway. Tell him no more probing, if you haven't already, and if he initiates probing after you've made it clear that you're not comfortable with it, break the fuck up with him. Which brings us to...
3. You're going to have to go Bitch Puddin' on his ass, NCWTD. Memorize this, say it to him, and mean it: "If I let you stick your dick in my vagina and I get pregnant, I am getting an abortion. If you can't live with that—if you aren't willing to shoulder the psychic risk of knowing that your girlfriend would get or actually got an abortion, while she shoulders the actual physical risk of an unplanned pregnancy—then I am never going to let you stick your dick in my vagina. You're free to disagree with my choice, of course, but you can't prevent me from making that choice. So what's it going to be?"
You've heard the term heteroflexible, right? It describes a straight person who's up for a little same-sex sex/sexiness every once in a while. And you've heard of situational homosexuality, correct? That's when otherwise straight men engage in a little same-sex sex/sexiness because there are no women around or otherwise straight women engage in a little same-sex sex/sexiness because there are no men around, i.e. prisons, pirate ships, Mormon missions, etc. 
Homoflexible isn't as popular term but it's definitely a thing, MO, and the same goes for situational heterosexuality. Also a thing: bisexuality.
Your son, having come out at 11 and then spent the next five years watching his straight peers date and hookup, may have decided that messing around with a girl he likes and trusts is better than not messing around with anyone at all—in other words, this is some situational heterosexuality. So long as he isn't misleading this girl about his orientation or his intentions, there's no harm in it. A lot of gay teens experiment with the opposite sex—sometimes because there aren't any other out gay teens around, sometimes because the connection is less emotionally consequential and therefore less fraught. It's also possible that son came out as gay at age 11 because he was attracted to boys too, not to boys only, and wrongly concluding (at his tender age!) that any attraction to boys automatically meant gay.
I would tell you to stay the fuck out of it—to let your son figure this out on his own—if it weren't for the results of this 2015 study...
Pregnancies are more common among lesbian, gay, bisexual youths than among their heterosexual counterparts, suggests a new study of New York City high school students. Overall, sexual-minority students who were sexually active were about twice as likely as other students to report becoming pregnant or getting someone pregnant, researchers found. "The message for me is that these populations are often ignored or assumed to not need information or reproductive care or services and they absolutely do," said Lisa Lindley, the study's lead author from George Mason University in Fairfax, Virginia. 
So you're gonna need to have a talk to your gay son about birth control, MO, and consent and pleasure and STIs while you're on the subject.
I was having sex with women when I was your son's age, MO, and I somehow got it into my head that closing my eyes and pretending my girlfriend was Andy Gibb or Sean Cassidy or—better yet—Andy Gibb and Sean Cassidy was an effective form of birth control. It wasn't, as it turned out. Have that talk with your son ASAP.


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
He's a sex worker, WTBR, not a moron.
Backing up: If we were talking about your lawyer or hairstylist or housekeeper—anyone else with whom you had a client/service-provider relationship—you wouldn't hesitate to send flowers and a card. The only reason you're hesitating in this case is because you fear outing your masseur as a sex worker. And here's what's fucked up about that: You're assuming that he isn't already out about doing sex work. You're assuming that being outed as a sex worker is the worst possible thing that could happen to him (I think your masseur can attest that there are worse things). And—most shockingly—you're assuming that your masseur is too stupid to cover for himself if he isn't out about doing sex work and if someone else reads your card and if that person asks who you are. Trust me, should a nosy relative ask him who you are—which is highly unlikely—your masseur has lots of options before he gets around to "a decent and kind guy I sometimes jack off for money." He can say you're a friend or an acquaintance or someone with whom he's worked.
Better to risk a moment of awkwardness with a nosy relative than to fail to acknowledge your masseur's humanity at a time like this. And that's what failing to acknowledge his grief amounts to, WTBR: a failure to acknowledge his humanity. Sex workers are subjected to far too much of that by people who don't see them as fully human. Don't participate in the dehumanization of sex workers. Send the flowers.
My response after the jump...
When we speak of "beer goggles," CLOD, we refer to someone too drunk to realize that he/she has accidentally picked up—or fucked the shit out of—a type that he/she would not normally/soberly find attractive. But I don't think your friend is getting drunk again and again and going after this particular type again and again by accident. Once? Yes, that could be an accident. Twice? That could be a coincidence. But three times that you know of? Sorry, CLOD, your friend isn't going after these types because he's drunk. He's getting drunk so he can go after these types.
Before we go on, CLOD, a word about the particular term you use to describe your friend's type: transvestite. That word? I don't think it means what you think it means. A transgender woman is not a transvestite, and a transvestite is not a transgender woman. A trans woman is someone who was "coercively assigned male at birth," as they say on Tumblr, but who now identifies and lives as female. A transgender woman may or may not have had sex-reassignment surgery—which means, of course, that a transgender woman could have a dick or she could have a pussy. "Transvestite" is an archaic term for "crossdresser" that no one uses anymore.
Now, I don't know what your friend is looking for in a sex partner, CLOD, but considering his observed pickup history ("a really masculine- seeming girl," "Kevin Garnett in a wig," "another manly looking transvestite type"), it's possible that he's not interested in either trans women or crossdressers.
I did drag for nearly a decade, and there was a certain kind of guy who lurked around drag shows. By all appearances, these guys were straight. But they weren't interested in women, they weren't interested in boys who could pass, and they weren't interested in trans women. They were interested in "girls" who were obviously men in drag. They were interested in guys like me: six foot eight in heels, big tits, 26-inch waist (thank you, waist cincher!), and a latex minidress. I was pretty, but I didn't look like a woman, cis or trans, I looked like a great big fuckin' drag queen. (My drag name? Helvetica Bold.)
The queens I ran with called the guys who wanted to fuck us "panty chasers." It was an odd choice, seeing as none of us actually wore panties. (Trans and cis women wear panties, CLOD; drag queens wear dance belts over tights.) I didn't know at the time that there was an actual $20 term for guys who were into us: gynandromorphophiles, aka "lovers of males in the shape of females." Some gynandromorphophiles are into crossdressers, some are into drag queens, and some are attracted to trans women. While some want partners who can pass, many gynandromorphophiles do not. They want the mix to be obvious. Give the kind of gynandromorphophile who chased after me and my friends in drag a choice between a "real woman"—cis or trans—and a guy who looks like "Kevin Garnett in a wig," and he'll choose Kevin Garnett every time.
So back to your panty-chasing friend, CLOD. I'm pretty sure the reason you've never seen him "act this way when sober" is because booze provides him with the courage he needs before he picks up "Kevin Garnett in a wig" and the alibi he needs after. My advice: Stop cock-in-frock-blocking your friend and let him know you accept him for who he is, and you may help him find the courage to accept himself before his liver gives out.
My response after the jump...
Inexperience might explain extreme emotional neediness, CCG, but it's no excuse. It's just as likely that your boyfriend's clingy, manipulative shtick—he just can't sleep alone, you're his everything, if you go back to a job you loved before you loved him, well, he'll be vewy sad—looks to me like controlling, emotionally abusive behavior in pathetic sad-clown drag.
But you like him, CCG, so let's give him the benefit of the doubt, shall we? Tell your boyfriend that you're going back to your old job and he has a choice to make: Get over it or get over you.
If he sucks it up and makes an effort to change, he was just an insecure little douchebag and, hey, you helped him get over it! If he doubles down on the whining and clinging, then he's a controlling dick and you're well rid of him.
My response after the jump...
I get questions about female ejaculation every day—where does that shit come from? How the hell can I/my girlfriend learn to do that shit? Is that shit really piss?—but you're the first person to ask me about modifying a sex toy so as to enable a woman to come in a man's ass. (You're going to want to patent that thing if it works, OMFG.)
Allow me to quickly dispense with the usual questions: It comes shooting out of a woman's urethra; practice, practice, practice; that shit isn't piss. How do we know it's not piss? Science!
In 2007, a crack team of sex researchers in Vienna "collected" lady ejaculate from two lady ejaculators—not a huge sample, admittedly, but two lady ejaculators are better then none—and rushed their lady ejaculate to the lab, where it was "evaluated biochemically." They published the results of their study in the Journal of Sexual Medicine ("The Female Prostate Revisited: Perineal Ultrasound and Biochemical Studies of Female Ejaculate," JSM, September 2007). They concluded that lady ejaculate isn't piss, it's come: "The fluid emitted [was] clearly different than urine voided prior to sexual activity," they wrote. "The values show that the source of fluid expulsion during orgasm is not urine, but is rather similar to male ejaculate."
As lady ejaculate is chemically similar to gentleman ejaculate, OMFG, the risks of a lady ejaculating in your ass would presumably be similar to the risks of a gentleman ejaculating in your ass: You would be at risk of acquiring any sexually transmitted infection she might have. But if your lady ejaculator is disease-free, OMFG, then letting her come in your ass is a risk-free, if not squick-free, activity.
My response after the jump...
You don't say how long you've been dating this guy, FP.
If you've been fucking him for a while and you still haven't found a groove, well, it might be best to move on. Liberalism and RuPaul's Drag Race are nice, but they're not enough to sustain a long-term romantic relationship.
But if you've been dating him a short time, FP, and there's been some noticeable improvement on the chemistry front, you might want to stick around. Sometimes the chemistry is there and obvious from the start; sometimes chemistry kicks into gear after a few weeks or months. If you dig him—and it sounds like you do—then he's worth the investment of a little time. As for the little dick, well...
How big is his forearm?
My response after the jump...
Knowing that she could be disqualified due to the size of her clit, which she can do nothing about, or the presence of pubic hair, which she can do something about (but might not want to), is information a woman might want before she invests a lot of emotion, time, and effort in you, CMA. Or any emotion, time, and effort. But there's literally no way to ask a woman to show you her clit or to verify either her "baldness" or willingness to go bald in advance of that crucial first date. Even women with six-inch clits who suffer from neck-down alopecia (credit: tinyurl.com/5vle95) are going to run screaming after hearing a request like that.
Don't get me wrong, CMA: It's a fine thing to have preferences, to be aware of them, and to be able to articulate them. And most people would prefer to be with someone whose preferences roughly jibe with their attributes. But most of us would also like to think—even if it's not true—that our personalities are so winning that our partners would love us even if, say, our clits were tiny and our pubes towering.
So what do you do? Well, CMA, since being up-front about your very particular, deal-breaking preferences would result in your never seeing another pussy again in your life, I think you keep your mouth shut. You're just going to have to date and invest the time. And then if you discover once you get into her pants that her clit is too small or her pussy is too hairy, CMA, just make up a nice, polite it's-not-you-it's-me lie. It wouldn't be fair to leave her wondering what the hell is wrong with her, when in actual fact there's something wrong with you.
My response after the jump...
Denying it won't work if your vengeful ex has photos or video that she's willing to deploy. So if there's documentary evidence, KINK, prepare yourself to own your kink and laugh it off. Assholes and vengeful exes can only use the details of your turn-ons against you if you're ashamed of them. If you don't care who knows, KINK, or you can fake it, the people who know won't care that they know, you know? Shrug off the reveal, laugh along with any good-natured ribbing, and look on the bright side: You could have mutual female friends who are interested in pegging and, after they hear the news, interested in you.
My Response after the jump...
It depends, BUTT.
You can enjoy lube-it-up-and-stick-it-in anal without incurring too great a risk of injury so long as your boyfriend isn't shoving his entire dick up your ass in one thrust. If he's pushing his dick in you gradually but firmly, giving your poor butt a chance to relax and adjust as he "forces" his way in, then you'll probably be okay. 
That said, BUTT, while it's a fine thing to enjoy a little pain during sex—or "sensation play," as the kinksters have taken to calling it—making your asshole the focus of erotic pain isn't a sensational idea. Anal fissures and tears take forever to heal, and even a small one can put your ass out of commission for months. A big one can put your ass out of commission for years.
There are plenty of ways your boyfriend can make you hurt during anal without brutalizing your hole. He can slap your ass, yank on a pair of tit clamps, pull your hair, crank up the juice on an e-stim unit. You've got nerve endings all over your body, not just in and around your hole.
My response after the jump...
Monogamous couples have one rule about fucking other people—"don't fuck other people"—but nonmonogamous couples have all sorts of different rules, TOP, and sometimes a particular couple's particular rules make it hard for a third to verify that the partnered person he's sleeping with is, in fact, in an honest and healthy open relationship.
That said, most couples with a "don't want to know about the other people you're fucking" rule—and that's a pretty common rule—also have a rule against getting emotionally involved with the other people they're fucking. So if it's against the rules for the guy you're seeing to introduce his boy-on-the-side to his boyfriend, TOP, odds are good that swapping "I love yous" with his boy-on-the-side is against the rules, too.
Someone is being lied to here. Either this guy is lying to you about being in an open relationship or he's lying to his boyfriend about not getting emotionally involved with the other guys he fucks. Whichever it is, TOP, I don't see a future for you with this guy—or much of a future for him and his boyfriend, frankly.
But to answer your question: No, TOP, don't relax. DTMFA.
I'm not a healthcare professional, PILL, nor am a federal bureaucrat charged with enforcing patient confidentiality rules. But I gotta say... if this piece of shit can get away with this and that piece of shit can get away with that, I don't see why a gray-area Facebook friend request should derail a pharmacist's career.
But it could, PILL.
Even it couldn't or didn't, the ethics of your lurking/stalking are murky. HIPAA was created to protect the privacy of a patient's personal and health information, and a patient's name, PILL, is a part of that protected information. You had access, in your professional capacity, to private info about these men—their names. Looking a person up on Facebook doesn't on its face appear to be a violation of HIPAA (my layperson's quick/slapdash reading), mostly because you're not making anyone's information publicly available. Adding or contacting them on Facebook, however, could make your ex-patients uncomfortable and land you in trouble with your employer. You don't know these guys and you don't know how they'll react to hearing from you. Maybe one of these dudes is a raging homophobe and your friend request will drive them into a straight panic, causing them to call your pharmacy and complain that the creepy pharmacist added them on Facebook. Perhaps the gay one/ones may not want to be Facebook friends with the person who used to handle their PREP prescriptions and complain, and get your ass in trouble.
But if you're deadset on meeting these guys, PILL, and since you're already stalking them... you could engineer a "chance meeting" in public/IRL and strike up a conversation. You already know the name of least one bar frequented by the one dude you know to be gay. Strike up a conversation with him the next to you run into him. By accident. In that bar.
That being said, PILL, do you have any mutual friends in common with these guys? (Facebook tells you that, right?) If you've got a couple mutual friends, maybe reach out to these friends to have them introduce you. But if these guys are total strangers, PILL, don't send them a friend request. Because other gay dudes are easy to find and jobs are hard to find. Find other cute guys to obsess over that you didn't meet while filling their prescriptions. 

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
Seeing as I think saying, "You're doing it wrong, do it better, but don't ask me how I want it done," is an asshole move, TIWDIW, I'm tempted to give asshole advice. Something along the lines of "take a swig of Tabasco sauce immediately before popping his dick in your mouth."
You seem like a good sex partner, TIWDIW, GGG and open to constructive criticism. But "Your blowjobs bore me—do something about it!" isn't constructive criticism. It's destructive criticism, the kind of feedback that can leave a sex partner feeling inadequate and self-conscious. To be constructively critical, your husband needs to come through with some suggestions and direction—something more helpful than "surprise me." (I bet he'd find that mouthful of Tabasco sauce surprising.)
Now, maybe your husband has no clue what he wants. But that's still no excuse for "Your blowjobs bore me. Fix it! Creatively!" Your husband should've tossed out some suggestions and invited you to do the same, and you two should've given 'em all a whirl until you found a few new tricks that worked.
Minor unfairnesses slosh around relationships like water in the bottom of a canoe, of course, but "Be creative!" in this context isn't just unfair, it's paralyzing. Putting all the responsibility for busting out new tricks on the shoulders of the person whose blowjob/assfucking/bondage skills have been criticized rarely results in the criticized person busting out new and mind-blowing blowjob/assfucking/bondage moves. A destructively criticized sex partner is apt to shut down. So your husband isn't just guilty of unfair behavior here, TIWDIW, he's guilty of self-defeating behavior. Meaning, you may be able to give better head—we all have room for improvement—but this is not the way to go about getting better head from you.
Finally, TIWDIW, you mention that your husband was your first partner. Can I ask how many women he's been with? If the answer is "not many," then I would respectfully suggest to your husband that his frame of reference may not be large enough to craft a truly informed critique of your blowjob technique. For all he knows, you give amazing head. (Cue the straight men who'll tell your husband that he should be happy he's getting blowjobs at all, that you wouldn't catch them complaining if they were getting regular and enthusiastic blowjobs eight years into their marriages, etc.) But routine can make even the best blowjobs seem boring. So it may not be the how of your blowjobs that bores him, TIWDIW, but the when and the where. Give him the same old head in a new and exciting place (outside?) or in a new and exciting circumstance (his hands tied behind him?), and see if that doesn't make your blowjobs exciting again.
And while we're on the subject of oral sex: How are your husband's cunnilingus skills these days? If they're not all they could be, now's the time to tell him.
Talk to your husband about what's up—calmly, MISS, without shaming him. Ask him what he's thinking and what he's feeling without demanding a final answer. Then tell him how you're feeling: You miss your husband, you miss PIV sex, you miss his orgasms.
The word "phase" has so much terrible/awful/no good baggage attached to it that we should probably sidestep it. So let's just say that it's possible all the gender stuff—the makeup, the hair, the feminization—is just a shiny new thing that he's excited about exploring and in his excitement he's lost sight of your needs. That this gender stuff seems to have come wrapped up in submissiveness and the deemphasizing of his orgasms could mean it's just a kink for him. It's not about who he is (it's not about his gender identity, i.e. he's not a woman), it's about things he wants to do (it's about newly discovered kinks, i.e. submissiveness, "forced" feminization, orgasm denial). But it's also possible this could be a combo platter that encompasses gender identity and sexual interests.
Things might even out when the sight of himself in makeup isn't so exciting and new—the playing with gender and his submissiveness could become a part of your routine without completely dominating it—or who knows? He may have gender issues that were always there and he always kindasorta knew but he had never faced them. Or maybe he have always had gender issues that he wasn't consciously aware of and you and Ru accidentally made him aware of them. He may be on a journey of self-discovery that shakes his life up in a profound way—his life and yours. Only time will tell.
And in the meantime, MISS, enjoy the cunnilingus.
Love the acronym, GRAMPS. Well done! As for your fuck buddy...
He's having what are known as "dry orgasms." Take it away, Mayo Clinic:
A dry orgasm can occur as a result of surgery to remove the prostate gland and surrounding lymph nodes (radical prostatectomy) or surgery to remove the bladder (cystectomy). After either of these procedures, a man will no longer produce semen. In some cases of dry orgasm, semen is produced but goes into the bladder instead of out through the penis during sexual climax. This is known as retrograde ejaculation and is most often a consequence of medical procedures, particularly some prostate surgeries. It can also be caused by certain medications and health conditions.
Your decade-heavy/boyfriend-lite spank buddy says he doesn't remember whether he still has his prostate gland, GRAMPS, but I'm not buying it. Undergoing a prostatectomy isn't an experience that would slip the mind of an older guy still sharp enough to entertain a woman 44 years his junior—particularly an older guy who can still paddle a pussy competently. Unless his urine is cloudy after he comes (easy enough to slyly check that out), I'm guessing that this guy, like millions of men his age, has had his prostate gland  removed. And I'm guessing he's lying to you about it.
Why would he lie? Another guess: he knows he's never going to have a wet orgasm ever again—he knows semen producin' and spoogin' days are behind him—but the idea that you think he might blow at any moment turns him on. The thought of you looking at his dick and seeing a gun that might have a bullet in the chamber—seeing you handle his dick like it just might go off—that turns him on. 
Regardless, GRAMPS, you don't need to worry that he'll suddenly fill your mouth with puddle of rotten spooge. Even if by some miracle he suddenly starts having "wet orgasms" again, your spank buddy isn't going to shoot a twenty-year-old load of "bad tapioca" into your mouth. Men don't store semen indefinitely between blows. Any semen that didn't expel the last time he stored some has long since been absorbed back into the body.
Allow me to clarify...
You don't have to eradicate all expectations in order to have a successful relationship. We're all entitled to a few expectations, not all expectations are bad, there's no such thing as an expectation-free sex and/or life partner.
But some expectations are unreasonable/unrealistic, ME, and holding on to unreasonable/unrealistic expectations can doom otherwise loving, serviceable, settle-for-able relationships. (Remember, kids: there's no settling down without some settling for.) Take porn. I've spoken with lots of people (mostly women) who've ended relationships (mostly only straight ones) with people (mostly men) they genuinely liked—even loved—because they kept "catching" their partners looking at porn. A not insignificant number of these women have told me that they were in FWB arrangements with their exes and everything was great. Their exes hadn't stopped watching porn but porn suddenly wasn't a problem. Why? Because these women had one set expectations for partners (partners don't watch porn; I can tell my partner what to do when I'm not around) and an entirely different set of expectations for friends with benefits (FWBs can watch porn if they want to; you can't tell a FWB what to do when you're not around).
Call me crazy—and people do—but if you like your ex well enough to keep fucking him after "porn" destroys your relationship... maybe... instead of shitcanning the relationship you might want to think about shitcanning your expectations about porn instead? Maybe?
And then there are those people who have expectations that aren't really their expectations. Take monogamy. Is that something we want because we want it or is it something we want because we're expected to want it? For many people it's the latter. But many people from the latter group nevertheless make monogamous commitments they cannot keep and/or demand monogamous commitments they do not value. Why? Because "a lifetime of programming" has convinced them that monogamy is something everyone should want. We're told it's something every good and decent person should expect—of themselves and their partners—and no one likes to think of themselves as ungood or indecent.
For the record: monogamous commitments can be wonderful things. If monogamy is something a person wants and can do, ME, that person should go ahead and expect the fuck out of it. But if someone can't do it and doesn't value it... maybe that person would be happier if they shitcanned those monogamous expectations? Stop making monogamous commitments they can't keep? Stop insisting on monogamous commitments they don't value? Maybe?
Blah blah blah. Who put a nickel in me? Anyway, ME, turning to your particular circumstance/tale of woe...
I don't think you were the one in this relationship with unreasonable/unrealistic expectations. Wanting some primacy, not expecting 100% monogamous behavior from a guy who doesn't want monogamy—perfectly reasonable expectation, perfectly reasonable accommodation. Fucking around with so many other women that your girlfriend at home feels badly neglected, expecting that loving blandishments will compensate for that neglect—perfectly unreasonable behavior, perfectly unrealistic expectation.
It's your ex who needs to better manage his expectations going forward, ME, not you. He can't treat a primary partner the way he treated you and expect to have that primary partner in his life for long. But it's possible that a primary partner—any kind of longterm commitment—isn't something your ex wants and he's either pretending to want a longterm commitment or he's convinced he wants one because, as with monogamy, a longterm commitment is something we're told every good and decent person wants.
Whatever it is, ME, your ex needs to shitcan that shit.
P.S. The more a guy likes me, the more this seems to happen
My response after the jump...
If you looked only at porn that featured conventionally attractive women—all those skinny bitches—your girlfriend would be worried that you're not attracted to her because of her size. But she caught you looking at BBW porn, and now she's worried that her size is the only reason you're attracted to her. I don't think you can win this one, BBW, but you can try saying this to her: "I like women of all shapes and sizes, honey, including yours—as you can clearly see if you look at all the porn sites I've visited, instead of just obsessing about that particular one." I don't think it'll do much good, because your girlfriend probably doesn't want you looking at porn at all—saying it's okay, snooping, and grilling aren't signs of "okay with porn." So use private browsing, clear your browser history, or watch porn on a secure computer in a secret, undisclosed location.
Forgive me, YIGI, but it's late where I am—it's the cocktail hour here—so I'm not going to a deep dive on your letter and/or take the intentional-or-not MRA bait.
But I will say this...
I have detected some institutional bias at work in the advice racket. I once read an advice column—no time to sift through Google to find it—where the columnist, a Canadian, told a woman whose husband was cheating on her that "real men" don't cheat and that she should divorce the lying bastard. The very next letter in the very same column was from a man whose wife was cheating on him. The columnist told LW2 he had to be doing something wrong—not helping out enough, not being attentive enough, not making an effort to please his wife during sex—otherwise she wouldn't be cheating on him. Husband cheats on wife? His fault. Wife cheats on husband? His fault.
And I'll say this...
I get a lot of letters from women who blame themselves when their men can't come, YIGI, and I get nearly as many letters from men wanting my help convincing their women that it isn't their fault (the women's fault) when they (the men) don't come. Perhaps you've had different experiences? If you've been with women who blamed you when you didn't come and then turned around blamed you when they didn't come, well, that had to be annoying. (Have you been with any women who did that? If so, and again, that had to be annoying. Have you been with any women at all? If not, it's possible your letter is an MRA setup and I took the bait. Dang.) Or maybe you're not referring to any personal experience but to some memes, jokes, comedians, advice columnists, etc., who made you feel this way and not to any personal experience with inability-to-climax/inability-to-induce-climax shaming.
If this has never actually happened to you, let it go. Because men: sometimes we come during sex, sometimes we don't; the number of times we don't tends to increase with age. Same goes for boners: less reliable with age. So focus on the intimacy, connection, and mutual pleasure more, YIGI, and on the spooging less—and find partners who want to focus on the same.
And as for women...
You do know dick alone isn't gonna do it for most women, right? (If you didn't, you know now and you're welcome.) And you're familiar with this, right? (If you weren't, you are now and you're welcome.) And foreplay? And oral, both as foreplay and the main event?
Finally, YIGI, a suggestion if/when you find yourself in bed with a woman and you're having difficultly helping* her come despite knowing all of the above: Ask her if she can make herself come. If she can't, odds are you won't be able to make help her come either—you or anyone else. If she can make herself come, ask her to let you watch her make herself come. Make a close study of what works. If she touches herself in a certain way, learn to touch her that way too and encourage her to touch herself during PIV. If she busts out a vibrator, incorporate that vibrator into PIV and other forms of mutual sex play.
* Remember, straight & bi guys: You're not making her come, you're helping her come.

Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats and—soon—lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
There were a lot of distressing/depressing details in your letter, BLOW, but this was the detail that really blew my mind: Your girlfriend was willing to keep seeing the couple's therapist who advised you to cheat on her.
Wow.
Okay: Let's just set aside your traumatic history (good on you for getting help), your economic situation (props to your parents for letting you live with them), and your weight (love yourself, dude). Set all that aside and what are we left with? A classic "price of admission" conflict: You would like to have at least one blowjob before you die—one measly blowjob—but the girl with whom you want to spend the rest of your life refuses to blow you. And cheating is out of the question. So one of you will have to pay the price of admission, BLOW. You'll have to go without ever experiencing great head in order to keep her (your POA) or she'll have to either blow you (and I promise you that won't be great head) or give you permission to get blown elsewhere (the odds of that head being better are higher, of course, but I still can't promise you that the head will be great).
There's no compromise position here, no middle ground, no half-a-loafjob. You've issued dueling ultimatums and one of you is going to pay the price of admission, aka "lose."
You mentioned that your girlfriend is a fan, BLOW, which means you were probably hoping I would fix this for you by ordering your girlfriend to blow you. But I'm not going to do that. Because that would be wrong—if blowjobs aren't something your girlfriend wants to do, BLOW, your options are to accept that fact or break up with her (enlisting a strange gay man to order her to blow you isn't an option)—and because the head she would give you under duress/under orders would be so far from great head that it wouldn't solve your problem.
UPDATE: I want to second what avast2006 had to say in the comment thread:
On the other hand, you have to balance that with the fact that you might discover, after having dumped her in order to obtain the freedom to experiment, that blowjobs might not even be your thing. Some people don't find them all that wonderful, regardless of the skill of the person giving it. If she is really fabulous in bed in all sorts of other ways, this might turn out to be a really bad bargain. Be advised accordingly.
Blowjobs are way overhyped, in my opinion, and not all guys love head—not even when the person giving 'em head possesses mad skills, as the kids say/said.
I read it. You're welcome.
He asked what you would do if you got pregnant now, TTTT, not what you did the last time you got pregnant. And you answered that question fully and truthfully: You would have the baby, this man's baby, if you were to get pregnant by him. You could've taken the opportunity to disclose your previous pregnancy—and the choice you made to terminate it—but you were under no obligation to disclose that information to him. 
So you've done nothing wrong, TTTT—not then (when you terminated your previous pregnancy), not now (when you failed to disclose the abortion you had seven years ago). 
If learning about his ex-girlfriend's abortion left your new boyfriend so traumatized that he wouldn't want to date a woman who has ever had an abortion or would ever have an abortion, TTTT, then he could've and should've and most likely would've asked you a different pair of questions: "Have you ever had an abortion? Would you ever have an abortion?" But he didn't ask you those questions, TTTT. And, again, you answered the question he actually asked you. So, again, you've done nothing wrong.
As for whether you should tell him: You don't have to, TTTT, but you could and, for your own sanity, perhaps you should. And if he flips out when you tell him—if he judges you or shames you when you inform him that you, like one-in-three American women, have had an abortion—then he isn't the amazing or kind or loving person you mistook him for. A bad or shaming reaction from him outs him as an asshole in need of a prompt DTMFA'ing.
And as for your supposed recklessness...

Planned Parenthood says the withdrawal method—the man "pulling out" before ejaculating—is an effective-ish method of birth control:
• Of every 100 women whose partners use withdrawal, 4 will become pregnant each year if they always do it correctly.
• Of every 100 women whose partners use withdrawal, 27 will become pregnant each year if they don't always do it correctly.
Couples who have great self-control, experience, and trust may use the pull out method more effectively. Men who use the pull out method must be able to know when they are reaching the point in sexual excitement when ejaculation can no longer be stopped or postponed. If you cannot predict this moment accurately, withdrawal will not be as effective. Even if a man pulls out in time, pregnancy can still happen. Some experts believe that pre-ejaculate, or pre-cum, can pick up enough sperm left in the urethra from a previous ejaculation to cause pregnancy. If a man urinates between ejaculations before having sex again, it will help clear the urethra of sperm and may increase the effectiveness of withdrawal.
For comparison's sake: fewer than 1 out of 100 women will get pregnant each year if they take the pill daily; 9 out of 100 women will get pregnant each year if they screw up and fail to take the pill daily. With condoms 2 out of 100 women using condoms correctly get pregnant every year; 18 out of 100 women who aren't always use condoms correctly get pregnant every year.
Like I said: withdrawal is effective-ish. So it's not a method of birth control that I would feel comfortable using if I were a woman, TTTT, as both the risk of pregnancy is higher and it provides no protection against sexually transmitted infections. It's certainly not a method of birth control that I would feel comfortable using with someone I had only known for a month. (Is his self-control "great" or just fair? Is he trustworthy? How could you possibly know at this stage?) The risk of permanently scrambling my DNA together with someone that I had known for four short weeks—the thought of making a baby with someone I barely knew and potentially yoking myself to that person for the next 18 years—is so terrifying that I would stick to oral, anal, or manual before risking condom-less/IUD-less/pill-less PIV sex with Mr. Might Be Wonderful But Who Knows Because It's Only Been A Month.
But if you're being reckless given your past experience with an unplanned pregnancy, TTTT, then so is he. You're both being equally reckless and you both bear an equal share of the responsibility for the informed choice you made together to use the effective-ish pull-out method.
Finally, TTTT, there's a book I think you should read:
Forty years after the landmark Roe v. Wade ruling, "abortion" is still a word that is said with outright hostility by many, despite the fact that one in three American women will have terminated at least one pregnancy by menopause. Even those who support a woman's right to an abortion often qualify their support by saying abortion is a "bad thing," an "agonizing decision," making the medical procedure so remote and radioactive that it takes it out of the world of the everyday, turning an act that is normal and necessary into something shameful and secretive. Meanwhile, with each passing day, the rights upheld by the Supreme Court are being systematically eroded by state laws designed to end abortion outright. In this urgent, controversial book, Katha Pollitt reframes abortion as a common part of a woman's reproductive life, one that should be accepted as a moral right with positive social implications.
You had a normal and necessary abortion, TTTT, and you have nothing to feel ashamed about. I think reading Katha Pollitt's Pro: Reclaiming Abortion Rights could help you feel better about yourself and the choice you made. Order a copy by clicking here.
My response after the jump...
There's a movement in sex-ed circles to replace the old opt-out consent mantra, "No means no," with a new, improved opt-in consent mantra, "Yes means yes." YMY says it's not good enough to wait for the other person to stop the action with a "no," which many people—particularly young people, particularly young girl people—have a hard time doing. You have to get a "yes."
But the kind of person who doesn't give you a chance to say "no," GOY, is unlikely to solicit a "yes." Which is why we all need to advocate for ourselves in the moment.
And you failed to do that, GOY—you failed to advocate for yourself in the moment.
I don't say that to make you feel bad or to shift the blame onto your shoulders, GOY, I say it because we've all been there. Most confident, sexually active adults can point to an early experience that went too far, too fast, a sexual encounter that left us feeling the way you did after you had sex with this girl. And it's possible to walk away from an experience like that—one that left you feeling shitty and powerless—feeling empowered to advocate for yourself in uncomfortable sexual situations in the future, GOY, provided you learn the right lesson.
Here's the wrong lesson: "I'm a total fuckup who can't speak up for myself when I'm having sex, so I'd better not have sex again. Ever." That's bullshit, GOY, and what's worse, that kind of thinking can make a person more vulnerable the next time she winds up in bed with an insensitive jerk. Here's the right lesson: "I don't have to wait for someone to give me a 'chance' to say no. I can and will say no whenever I want to. I'm not going to let this happen to me again because I never want to feel this way again. Ever."
As for the girl, GOY, tell her straight up that you don't have feelings for her. And tell her why: Things went too far, too fast, and the sex ruined it for you. Don't sugarcoat things to avoid hurting her feelings, GOY, because she's got a lesson to learn, too. Hers goes like this: "I didn't ask the person I was with—someone I really liked—if she was cool with what we were doing, and I totally fucked myself out of what could've been a really great relationship. I'm not going to do that to anyone again. Ever."
My response after the jump...
There's a movement in sex-ed circles to replace the old opt-out consent mantra, "No means no," with a new, improved opt-in consent mantra, "Yes means yes." YMY says it's not good enough to wait for the other person to stop the action with a "no," which many people—particularly young people, particularly young girl people—have a hard time doing. You have to get a "yes."
But the kind of person who doesn't give you a chance to say "no," GOY, is unlikely to solicit a "yes." Which is why we all need to advocate for ourselves in the moment.
And you failed to do that, GOY—you failed to advocate for yourself in the moment.
I don't say that to make you feel bad or to shift the blame onto your shoulders, GOY, I say it because we've all been there. Most confident, sexually active adults can point to an early experience that went too far, too fast, a sexual encounter that left us feeling the way you did after you had sex with this girl. And it's possible to walk away from an experience like that—one that left you feeling shitty and powerless—feeling empowered to advocate for yourself in uncomfortable sexual situations in the future, GOY, provided you learn the right lesson.
Here's the wrong lesson: "I'm a total fuckup who can't speak up for myself when I'm having sex, so I'd better not have sex again. Ever." That's bullshit, GOY, and what's worse, that kind of thinking can make a person more vulnerable the next time she winds up in bed with an insensitive jerk. Here's the right lesson: "I don't have to wait for someone to give me a 'chance' to say no. I can and will say no whenever I want to. I'm not going to let this happen to me again because I never want to feel this way again. Ever."
As for the girl, GOY, tell her straight up that you don't have feelings for her. And tell her why: Things went too far, too fast, and the sex ruined it for you. Don't sugarcoat things to avoid hurting her feelings, GOY, because she's got a lesson to learn, too. Hers goes like this: "I didn't ask the person I was with—someone I really liked—if she was cool with what we were doing, and I totally fucked myself out of what could've been a really great relationship. I'm not going to do that to anyone again. Ever."
My response after the jump...
There are people who manage to turn their lives upside down in pursuit of their turn-ons—there are people whose sex lives are complete fucking shitshows—and all they're into is heterosexual sex in the missionary position in their own bedrooms with the lights off. Your brother's problem isn't his childhood or his kink. His problems, plural, are his self-loathing, his attempts to swear off his kink (which leads to these binge-and-purge cycles), and the reckless ways he indulges his kink when he's bingeing.
Instead of running from his kinks—which he can't do—your brother needs to find safer, saner ways to satisfy his desire for erotic humiliation and submitting to someone else's control. People with humiliation kinks managed to find ways to get off before the internet came along, BOKB, and so can your brother.
And you need to establish better boundaries, BOKB. No more swapping pics with your kinky bro, bro, and no more hunting for evidence of your bro's ill-advised online adventures.
My response after the jump...
Obviously.
Maybe your boyfriend wants to cheat but doesn't want to be cheated on—he wants his boyfriend locked down, but doesn't want to be locked down himself—or maybe he thinks it's too soon to delete his online personal profiles. Or maybe, like a lot of gay men, he treats hookup apps like a virtual gay bar, i.e., a place where he can hang out and socialize with friends and exes and, perhaps, get his flirt on now and then.
But if lurking on Scruff and Growlr makes his newly locked-down boyfriend feel insecure, he should stay off hookup apps. Or, if he simply can't give 'em up, your new boyfriend should allow you to look at his chats whenever you care to so you can see for yourself that they're either wholly innocent (just talking with friends) or wholly innocent flirting (swapping photos and compliments with hot guys but not making plans to hook up).
I'm not in New York City, APAS, and I don't have plans to be before your deadline. But here's a little something I just pulled out of my ass: We act differently around our crushes—our behavior changes—because we scrutinize ourselves more closely when in the presence of someone we hope to see naked. Since doing or saying the wrong thing could deprive us of the opportunity to see that person naked, we start second-guessing every gesture, every statement, every glance, every boner. Basically it's the "observer effect," aka the "Hawthorne effect," but in this instance the observer and the observed are one in the same person.
That's my theory, APAS, but like I said... I just pulled that out of my ass. My readers will doubtless have theories (and asses) of their own and their theories (and their asses) might be better than mine. So be sure to keep an eye on the comment thread.
My response... after the jump.
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
I recently responded to a question from a gay man who was obsessed—suddenly, and much to his surprise/consternation—with the idea of having PIV sex with a woman in the context of a M/M/F threesome. Despite spending fifteen minutes searching through recent columns and SLLOTDs, GAYMAD, I wasn't able to locate (and link) the dude's letter and my response.  (Did I dream it?) But rest assured: there's at least one gay dude out there curious about sleeping with a woman. (Unless I dreamt it.)
But there are probably a hell of a lot more bi guys out there rounding themselves up to gay—or rounding themselves down to gay—than there are gay guys out there who are interested in fucking a woman. If a gay-identified bi guy would do the trick, GAYMAD, you might have better luck (and receive swifter service) if you advertise for one of those.
If a gay-identified bi guy simply won't do—if only a gay-identified gay guy will do—then advertise for one of those gay guys. But brace yourself for a long wait.
Blah blah blah. Your problem is a lot simpler than the length of your email would seem to indicate.
You face a choice, TMA—and it's not a choice between a woman with whom you can talk who has a husband and kids at home, control issues, a jealous streak, and a limited sexual repertoire and a woman who is good at texting and fucking but not so good at talking. It's a choice between the women you're with currently—and the dead-end relationship your in currently—and 3.5 billion other women on the planet you could be with.
And that 27-year-old woman you've been seeing for a month—one lousy month—is just one of the 3.5 billion other women on the planet.
The more time you spend with the 27-year-old you've been seeing for a month, TMA, the more shared experiences you'll have, the more you'll have to talk about. She could wind up being your chatty wife, the fecund mother of many, many children (presumably yours), and your sex slave and piss buddy and anal queen for life. Or not. You might just spend a few great months with her, have tons of amazing sex, and wind up single and alone again/for the first time in a long time if/when this relationship implodes. (And my money is on "when," TMA, as the odds of implosion are always higher when two people start talking about kids and marriage after a month.) But "single and alone again" doesn't necessarily mean "single and alone forever." If things don't work out with the 27 year old, TMA, there are still 3,499,999,999 other women on the planet.
Finally, TMA, if the married woman you're with now—the married woman you're with now—is as invested in monogamy (cough, cough) as you claim she is, TMA, it's impossible to read the affair you're having (not to be confused with the affair she's having) as anything other than your hand slamming down on the eject button. You want out and—consciously or subconsciously—and you're engineering an out. But waiting for Ms. Ten Years to find out about Ms. Four Weeks is the cowardly way to go about it. Ova and up and end it honestly.
Meeting up with the top who reached out to you and the guy whose apartment you were going to be using—his consensual slave—for an out-of-roles/we're-all-equals conversation would've been my suggestion, SLAVE, so you clearly didn't need my advice. I'm glad it worked out—and, hey, here's hoping you find a slave with an awesome apartment and convenient cage in the city where you live now.
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
There is something you can do to engage your fiancé's fetish—you can order yourself one of these. Latex catsuits aren't to everyone's taste, of course, but they do allow people with breast enlargement fetishes to explore their kinks with a partner. And if your guy happens to have a thing for both ballooning breasts and actual balloons... Yahtzee.
Ballooning breasts—that problem is easily solved. The more difficult-to-solve problem is your fiancé's selfishness and his disregard for the feelings and sexual self-esteem of the woman he claims to love. I'm happy to defend boys who watch a little porn—I'm happy to defend girls who do the same—but my defense of porn consumption is premised upon the consumer being both moderate and considerate. There are times when you just want to crank one out (while watching a little porn), there are times when masturbation (while watching a little porn) meets a need that partnered sex cannot, there are times when a person wants the release of orgasm (while watching a little porn) without having to engage with another human being who has their own wants, needs, and demands. But it's not okay to choose porn—and dirty boxer shorts (ugh)—over a waiting and willing partner again and again and again.
So, again, the problem isn't that your fiancé watches porn. Everyone's fiancé does. The problem is your fiancé's's lack of consideration the feelings and needs of his fiancée.
Don't marry this guy if you can't get him to see—maybe with the help of a kink-positive couples counselor—that what he's doing is hurtful and unnecessary. (His fiancée is ready, wiling, and able to indulge him.) You're clearly willing to meet his needs, AHTC, but he doesn't seem the least bit concerned about yours. If he can't pull his head out of his ass, his eyes off those videos, and his dick out of those dirty boxer shorts and show his love for you... don't marry him.
A multimedia response... after the jump.
There is no middle ground, SOB. So watch this and have a few laughs...

...then watch Tristan Taormino's "Expert Guide to Pegging." Then fuck the living shit out of your boyfriend's hairy, adorable little butthole. Plow it like a queen, dude.
Thanks for sharing, JAWDROP. And while I normally wouldn't include a link to a personal ad in the SLLOTD or a column, JAWDROP, I'm making an exception for "absolutbottom." The ad is anonymous, he's a reader, and he clearly gotta kick out of seeing his ad (and his ass) discussed in "Savage Love" last week. So if you're a "Savage Love" reader with a massive cock and a thing for straight-identified bi guys (who come complete with girlfriends game to have threesomes with other bi guys)... you might wanna check out the ass on this dude.
P.S. Dan his cock is thick and beautiful and glorious when it's hard. You would approve.
P.P.S. I've been reading your column for 15 years!
Your boyfriend isn't doing this on purpose to upset you—that's inconceivable—so let's take "being an asshole" off the table. (I'm sure he finds his boner issues just as frustrating as you do, SOS, if not more so.) And he wouldn't have pursued you in the first place, texted you on Valentine's Day, been anxious to jump back in the sack with you, or have been willing to get back together with you if he didn't like you and didn't find you physically appealing. So we can also rule out "thinks you're a jerk" and "isn't attracted to you."
And I think we can safely rule out a medical problem. His dick worked 50% of the time since you got back together officially, SOS, and his dick worked 100% of the time you when you weren't together technically. So from where I'm sitting—right here at Ann Landers' desk—this looks like a cut-and-dried case of performance anxiety.
Your boyfriend's particular strain of performance anxiety seems to kick in as the emotional stakes get higher. Not in a relationship? Boners are not a problem. In a relationship? Boners are suddenly a problem. My hunch is that when you weren't officially together his erections meant one, simple, straightforward thing: He wanted to fuck you. But now that you're officially together, SOS, his erections mean a great deal more. They're no longer a simple and straightforward indication of arousal, SOS, but a barometer that he (rightly) worries his girlfriend uses to measure his attraction to her, his commit to her, and his general levels of satisfaction with the relationship—and his dick is collapsing under the weight of all that meaning.
You say you've been reading my advice for fifteen years. But apparently you missed—or failed to commit to memory (for shame)—my advice to a woman in 2005 whose husband started avoiding sex after experiencing similar difficulties:
Your husband avoids "fool around situations," or FAS, because he feels like he won't be able to satisfy you, his theory being, "no bone, no satisfaction." That seems to be your theory too, HORNYW, and embracing it is making your problem worse. It's perfectly understandable that he would avoid FAS—and the humiliation of failure—until he's absolutely positive he can keep it up. That's why the best approach in a situation like this is to take the focus—and the pressure—off his dick. Tell him he can't fail to satisfy you with oral sex, masturbation, and toys (perhaps working your way up to strap-ons), and he'll begin to think of sex as something he's good at again, boned or boneless. And guess what, HORNYW? You may find that once your husband is not expected to produce an erection during FAS, his dick starts getting hard.
I would give the same advice to you, SOS: Take the focus and pressure off your boyfriend's dick. The talks you had with him before—those three times you gently raised the subject—didn't take the pressure off his dick. Those conversations about his problem (lost erections) were framed around a premise/fix/demand (no more lost erections) that only served to put more pressure on his dick.
It's time for a new conversation. You say you've got a nice collection of toys. Instead of keeping them around for those times when you're not having sex, SOS, you need to incorporate those toys into the sex you're having. Introduce your boyfriend to your vibrators and tell him that from now on there's no reason to stop having sex when he loses his erection. Dick not cooperating? Not a problem: he can use his fingers and his tongue, he can explore your body with your vibrator, you can suck his dick more (always err on the side of sucking more), he can stroke himself while he eats your pussy or uses a vibrator on you—just keep going.
If you stop having sex when he loses his erection, SOS, success will always be contingent on his erections. But if you keep enjoying each other whatever happens—if you keep playing, erection or no erection, if you can learn to shift effortlessly from his cock to other pleasurable activities and back and forth until you both get off—the sex will always be a success.
UPDATE: Also, as the first commenter suggests, ED drugs. ED drugs + pressure off = problem solved.
They were either swingers looking for a couple to take upstairs (10% chance), DADDY, or that youngish lady is a sex worker (90% chance) and that mysterious youngish guy was her protection, her boyfriend, her pimp, or all of the above.
My response... after the jump.
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
I think astrology is annoying bullshit—which is so Libra of me—and astrological bullshittery is never more annoying than when people point to signs in an effort to excuse character flaws. Irrational jealousy is not a fault in your stars, TQ, it's a fault in your character. I'm not suggesting that there's something wrong with a woman who doesn't want to watch her boyfriend screw other girls in front of her—see the next few paragraphs—but there's definitely something wrong with a woman threatened by her SO's platonic female friends. Perhaps you have more cause to be threatened by female friends than the average girlfriend, TQ, but that brand of jealousy is something you need get over if you ever want to have a healthy, lasting relationship.
Moving on...
I'm in partial agreement with your friends, TQ, in that I think you should leave your boyfriend. But I don't think your boyfriend is a bad guy for wanting to have the occasional threesome. (I enjoy the occasional threesome and I don't think I'm a bad guy.) Your boyfriend knows himself, he knows what he wants, and he's putting it out there. The world would be a far happier place, and divorce court wold be a far less crowded place, if more people did the same before making a lifetime commitment. (But pointing to your twin sisters to justify a desire to occasionally have sex with two women at the same time? That is some deeply creepy shit—that's head-for-the-hills degree of creepiness—and here's hoping it was an ill-advised, poorly-thought-out, stomach-churning rationalization on his part and not, you know, indicative of something far more sinister.)
Here's the bottom line: You guys aren't sexually compatible. He wants something you don't think you can give him. The world has plenty of people in it who've traveled from "mildly jealous at the thought" of their partners fucking someone else to okay with it—or even into it—but I haven't met many people who managed to get from "physically sick" at the thought to happily participating. So don't draw this out: break up with your boyfriend now.
Again, your boyfriend deserves credit for being upfront about what he wants. He could just as easily have waited to tell you until after you had gotten married and had a couple of kids, TQ, and then you might've found yourself having threesomes under duress to keep your family together. That shit happens and it's awful. But that isn't going to happen to you because your boyfriend knows what he wants and was honest enough to tell you. He did the right thing. And now you need to do the right thing—for him, for yourself—and end this relationship.
My response after the jump...
••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Your fiancé has a daughter, SO, and you're going to have to reconcile yourself to that fact—for your own good, for the good of your relationship, and for the good of a little girl who needs the adults in her life to stop acting like idiots. As for Bob and Sally...
If Bob isn't paying child support, he needs to start. If Bob hasn't talked to a lawyer about his legally enforceable rights as a parent, he needs to talk to a lawyer. No one can force Sally to seek professional help—preventing a child from seeing her father because you're embarrassed about the particulars of the conception is pretty fucked up*—but she definitely needs to see a fucking shrink. And if Sally tries to cut off contact between Bob and his daughter again, Bob needs to take her to court.
Circling back to you: You've had two years to grieve over the doing-this-for-the-first-time-with-each-other thing, SO, but you avoided grieving because your fiancé's child was out of sight, out of mind. Now that kid is in sight and you're just going to have to let go of that dream. What's done is done and cannot be undone. I'm not going to tell you it's wrong to feel as if your heart is breaking—go ahead and feel your feelings—but you should try to keep this particular heartbreak in perspective. No one is dead, you haven't been dumped, and there's nothing preventing you and Bob from having kids together in the future. Make up your mind to love this kid to the best of your ability, resolve to be the best stepmom you can be, stop speculating about Sally's motives, and get on with your life.
* Exceptions: Child's father was/is a rapist, child's father was/is abusive, one or two more reasons that I've probably overlooked.
P.S. I should clarify: I cheated because I never felt I was attractive to him as I'm not in his demographic. We have supposedly moved on from that. I have major body issues and feel generally unloved and unattractive. I feel like he settled. He says that's not the case. There has been little to no romance and we have two teenage kids. Despite encouraging me to continue with the infidelity he will try to use it against me. I am just at a loss. Please don't tell me to leave him. It is just not going to happen and by the way, he thinks something bad happened to him a a kid to make him so fucked up. Nothing happened to him but I can't tell him to get over the notion he had some horrible child hood as he has too much invested in that. Whoa.
My response... after the jump.
••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Where to start?
I trust that along with the cheating, lying, shaming, guilting, addicting, and negotiating hotwifing vs. subbing... you and your husband are still finding the time to do a little parenting now and then. Adults don't stop having their own lives when they become parents, of course, and the older kids get the more time parents have for cheating, shaming, prostituting, and other adult diversions. I realize you're recounting twenty years worth of events in your letter—a great deal of history and incident—and that requires telegraphing and everything didn't happen all at once. But... man. You and your husband have had a lot to process over the years and one would hope—one would expect—that two decades in you guys would've found a groove or two that worked for you both.
But no such luck.
I'm going to give you the same advice I gave HURTME in this week's "Savage Love": "A few sessions with a kink-positive shrink might help... You can find one through the American Association of Sexuality Educators, Counselors and Therapists (aasect.org)." Your husband needs someone to help him with the shame, the possibility that something awful happened to him in his childhood, and you need to talk to someone about your body image issues and your insecurities.
As for this...
Now he wants me to be a hotwife. I want to be his sub. He has issues with being a Dom and I have issues fucking strangers. Can you refer us in a direction we can start from?
Don't freak out when I use this phrase, BDSM, because I'm not using it in the grounds-for-divorce sense but the less popular thems-the-facts sense: sounds like an irreconcilable difference to me. He's not up for BDSM, you're not up for fucking strangers. (Not anymore.) You don't want to divorce and the existence of one two or three thousand or more minor irreconcilable differences doesn't mean you have to divorce, BDSM. (If it did we would all be divorced before the wedding cake was served.) But it does mean you'll have to let go of your Dom/sub fantasies and he'll have to let go of his hotwife fantasies—at least for now.
Get yourselves to a smart, kink-positive counselor—aasect.org—to discuss your hangups, your shame, your history, and your future, BDSM, and maybe you'll be able to finally find a groove that works for both of you.
P.S. Most people have more than one "type." The fact that your husband is attracted to women his own age doesn't mean he can't also be attracted to women—and men—closer to your age. On that point you're just going to have to ova up already.
A beard. On the face. Of a sex partner. Ugh. I feel so strongly about beards on sex partners—I haaaaaaaaaaaate them*—that I briefly considered recusing myself from answering your question, BUSH. But there are no other justices on this court, so....
You say your fiancé is the opposite of what you find attractive. Instead of chunky, short, and fem, I'm assuming you're into lean, tall, and masc. That's kind of a problem, BUSH, and it seems your fiancé's beard is just a thick, hairy, disgusting face-wig disguised as a solution. You're engaged to a person, BUSH, not a beard. It's important that you find your fiancé-the-person, attractive. 
Well, normally it's important for someone to be attracted to their fiancé. People can and do enter into marriages that are purely companionate; a companionate marriage is about emotional intimacy, not sexual intimacy. In a companionate marriage the spouses are life partners and companions (duh), they're not life partners and companions and lovers. Companionate marriages are just as legit, and just as potentially loving and functional (or unloving and dysfunctional), as a marriage with a strong sexual connection.
But this isn't supposed to be a companionate marriage, BUSH, so it's a problem—again—that you aren't attracted to your fiancé. If you had such a strong emotional connection that a sexual attraction grew in the absence of any of your preferred physical traits, that would be one thing. But it's troubling that you're only attracted to this one particular physical thing—the beard you love, a beard I would loathe—and you feel no attraction to him when his face isn't marred—excuse me: complimented—by a thick mat of disgusting chincheeklipneck hair.
I'm not saying you should call off the wedding because your husband-to-be doesn't match your ideal physical fantasy. Very few of us get to marry our physical ideals; even those who do find that time has a way of unwinding their mate's physically perfection. (Do not despair, perfectos: a strong emotional connection can cement a sexual connection that outlasts the physical perfection years and/or sex can become less important to a couple over time.) But are there aspects of your husband-to-be that appeal to you? His shoulders? Eyes? Cock? Sense of humor? Voice? You say you have a good sex life (with a little effort), so what makes it work? If your only answer is his beard, BUSH, then I'm tempted to revoke my advice about not calling off the wedding and advise you both (particularly him) to run away—and  fast. I just don't think it's wise to make a (theoretically) lifelong commitment to someone if sex is only bearable with they have facial hair. (What if they develop chin-only alopecia?)
Finally, BUSH, you're right that your husband can do what he wants with his face. Something else missing from your letter was any sense of how your fiancé feels about his beard. You say he's always shaving it off. Does he hate it? Does he only grow it out for you? Are you going to make him grow out his beard until you die, he dies, or you get a divorce? If he's into his beard, BUSH, then this isn't an issue. You might want to tell him, if you haven't already, just how into his beard you are. You say you told him you preferred him with a beard. Have you told him how strongly you prefer him that way? Because he may be shaving it off now and then for no good reason. Knowing the beard makes you wanna fuck him—and beardlessness has the opposite effect—could give him a very good reason to keep the beard forever.
* To the many beardos out there who may have taken offense: So long as I'm not having sex with you, I don't care if you have a beard. You can keep your beard! Some people, like BUSH here, love beards! You can grow your beard past your tits, for all I care. So long as I don't have to press my face to yours, I don't care if you have a beard. And it makes you feel any better, beardos: I hate mustaches even more.

My response after the jump...
Your boyfriend can't stare at a neck wound he can't see. So until you've fully recovered, B, turn off the lights or blindfold him or lace him into a leather hood—or all three—and have sex the way the good lord intended us to, i.e., in the dark with our pitiful/regretful/hooded boyfriends. And no more flaming/stunt drinks, ferfucksake!
My response after the jump...
1. Fucking your boss's kid seems like a surefire way to get your ass fired, SON, and depending on what field you're in—and how important good recommendations and work histories are in your field—fucking the boss's son could seriously derail your career. If, you know, you manage to get caught. But if you do decide to fuck the shit out of a gorgeous, funny, sweet, and kinky adult who happens to be your boss's son, well, you wouldn't be the first person in human history to risk everything for sex. As Mark Twain observed more than a century ago: "The human being, like the immortals, naturally places sexual intercourse far and away above all other joys—yet he has left it out of his heaven! The very thought of it excites him; opportunity sets him wild; in this state, he will risk life, reputation, everything—even his queer heaven itself—to make good that opportunity and ride it to the overwhelming climax."
2. He is an adult—who is still in high school. You are not that far out of high school. Math is hard for me, SON, but according to my calculations, you're not that far apart in age. You might be sabotaging your career, but you wouldn't be robbing the cradle.
3. The campsite rule for new readers: The older and/or more experienced person in a sexual relationship with a large age and/or experience gap is obligated to leave their younger and/or less experienced partner in better shape than when they found them. That means no sexually transmitted infections, no fertilized eggs, no unnecessary drama, and no unnecessary trauma.
My response after the jump...
Sorry, SAD, but relationship graveyards around the world are crowded with tombstones that read, "Everything was great... other than the sex."
And this isn't your mundane, run-of-the-mill mismatched-libido problem, which is bad enough. (And, as I've written until my fingers are bleeding, reason enough to end a relationship.) You're dating a guy who can get it up only when he sees his girlfriend sobbing on the floor—that's apparently what it takes to make his dick hard—and this sobbing-on-the-floor shit goes down twice a month. I can only conclude that this is how your boyfriend likes it, SAD. He's turned on only when you're not just miserable but pushed past the breaking point.
DTMFA.
Frequency is not a problem that improves with time, SAD. A boyfriend who wants sex only twice a month at four months into a relationship—and then only when his girlfriend is sobbing—won't want sex once a week five or 10 years in. You know what else doesn't improve with time? Assholery. I promise you that the "wonderful" and "thoughtful" will diminish as the years fly by, and the emotionally abusive games that cause you so much pain—pain that, again, seems to give him pleasure—will metastasize, spreading from your sex life to other areas of your life. The more difficult extricating yourself from this relationship becomes, SAD, the less wonderful and thoughtful he'll become.
End it now.
My response after the jump...
What can you do? You mean besides send video of you and your bear in action to prove this isn't the most entertaining fake letter I've received since Michelle Obama invited me to dinner at Sarah Jessica Parker's house? Besides that?
You can do this: Draw a distinction between what was going on in that bear's mouth and what was going on in your head. When a man beats off—with or without a Fleshlight-enhanced bearskin rug—two things are kindasorta happening simultaneously: what the man is doing with his dick and what the man is imagining he's doing with his dick. Guys who beat off using a clenched fist, for example, generally aren't clenched-fist fetishists; they're just horny and their fists are there and Sarah Jessica Parker isn't.
So your boyfriend walked in and saw you fucking a dead bear. That's gonna look bad, BGA, even to a boyfriend who isn't vegan. So how do you fix it? By patiently explaining to your vegan boyfriend that while, yes, you were face-fucking a bear when he walked in on you—no denying it—you weren't thinking about face-fucking a bear. Tell him you were thinking about him, and the bear's mouth was just a convenient place to wedge your vegan-boyfriend-substitute, i.e., your Fleshlight. Tell your boyfriend you don't entertain any murderous fantasies, tell him you only long to fuck living things, and tell him that Homo sapiens are the only animals you find attractive.
Tell him all of that, BGA, even if not all of that is true.
My response after the jump...
I can understand why you were upset. You had already taken things to the "next level" in your heart—you were thinking of this guy as your boyfriend—you just hadn't gotten around to informing him about the upgrade. And you assumed that, when you did get around to letting him know, he would be delighted. Because he was the one who wanted a relationship at the beginning, right?
Unfortunately, he took you at your word when you said you weren't interested in a relationship. Keeping things "purely casual" meant he was free to pursue a relationship with someone else.
I can't help but wonder what he was about to say when you told him to get out. He met someone else, which wasn't a violation of your rules. Did that mean things were over between you two (which would make the timing of the last fuck an insult)? Or was he willing to pass on this other girl if you were ready for a relationship (which would make tossing him out before he could elaborate a mistake)? You probably should've heard him out.
Go ahead and reach out. Let him know that you were thinking about taking things to the next level—ughers to that phrase—before he told you about the other girl. You were starting to fall for him, you hoped he felt the same, and you were disappointed. But since he was only doing what you asked—keeping it casual—you can't fault him for keeping his options open, looking around, dating other girls, etc. And you can't fault him for failing to read your mind.
Close by telling him that you'd be open to dating—a real, non-casual relationship—if things don't work out with this other girl.
My response after the jump...
Was your boyfriend having cybersex with an ex-girlfriend? Or did it only feel like he was? I would make a distinction, SAD, because while all porn constitutes a betrayal of the terms of your relationship, interacting with a stranger and, very likely, a professional online shouldn't feel quite so threatening.
Backing way the hell up: Your boyfriend shouldn't have lied to you, SAD, but you shouldn't have been so naive as to believe him. If you can't bring yourself to forgive him for lying—if you can't put yourself in his shoes and try to understand why he might lie about this (shame, fear, a desire to spare your feelings)—then this relationship is doomed. End it and find a new boyfriend. But when your next boyfriend tells you he doesn't watch porn, you're going to look at him and say, "Suuuuuure you don't."
Ask your new boyfriend to be discreet and limit his porn consumption to an extent where you're unlikely to uncover any evidence of it, as porn upsets you. If your new boyfriend manages to do that for you, SAD, if he's considerate enough to cover his tracks, you should be considerate enough to turn a blind eye on those rare occasions when you do stumble over evidence that your new boyfriend watches porn—just like your old boyfriend did and all your future boyfriends will.
My response after the jump...
Before I can respond to your question, HITME, I've gotta sacrifice a goat to the snooping-is-always-wrong Gods, or the snooping- is-always-wrong jihadists will cut my head off. It'll just take a sec: Snooping is always wrong! You invaded your husband's privacy! That was wrong! WRONG!
Moving on...
Your husband hit the jackpot when he met you, HITME. There aren't a lot of women out there who would embrace—much less marry—a man with his particular collection of kinks. You've been GGG and all you've asked in return is... total transparency and the immediate, real-time disclosure of all outside flirtations and contacts as they happen. Why can't the kinky ingrate honor this agreement? Only he knows the answer to that question, HITME, but I suspect one of two issues is at play...
Your husband may be ashamed—he may have been brutally shamed in past relationships—about the extent of his kinks and about just how much of his time and erotic energy his kinks consume. You may be completely sincere when you tell him you're okay with everything, HITME, so long as there's immediate and full disclosure. But he may fear that sharing the full extent of his online activities will leave you feeling either squicked out or threatened. So he downplays and minimizes, disclosing some but not all, because he doesn't want to lose you. If this is the issue, impress upon your husband that hiding shit from you represents a bigger threat to his marriage than full disclosure ever could.
Or...
Having and keeping sexual secrets may turn your husband on, HITME, and having a secret life could be another one of his kinks. Even if this is the issue, HITME, I think you two should be able to come to mutually agreeable terms that accommodate both his desire to have a secret and your need for full disclosure.
Here's a potential compromise: He doesn't keep anything from you, HITME, but he doesn't disclose in real time. So long as he's not being unsafe or neglectful, so long as his online activities remain online-only, he can carry on flirting and texting and pic swapping. But every few months, you get to depose his submissive ass. You get to sit him down and ask him questions, and he answers all your questions truthfully and opens up about any current secrets that your questions didn't uncover. This way, he can have all the erotic secrets he wants (he'll just have to make new ones every few months), and you can have the transparency you need (you just won't have it immediately). Good luck.
My response after the jump...
This probably isn't what you want to hear, FFF, but here goes: You alone will ultimately never be able to fulfill your boyfriend entirely... just as he alone will never be able to fulfill you entirely. One person simply can't be all things to another person—sexually or otherwise—and unmet needs, unfulfilled desires, and unexplored possibilities are prices we pay to be in LTRs. Monogamous, polyamorous, Femdom, or whatever: All coupled people walk around feeling a little unfulfilled. (Single people, too.) Because no one gets everything they want.
So, FFF, while some aspects of the polyamorous lifestyle appeal to your boyfriend, he has decided that he prefers the kind of relationship he's in now, with its perks and drawbacks, to the hypothetical polyamorous scenarios he used to contemplate, which would've had their own perks and drawbacks. I'd say your relationship is only doomed if you can't bring yourself to take his "yes"—yes to you, yes to monoamory—for an answer.
Rare is the GF who can hear a BF say, "Yeah, I totally have a crush on this other girl with whom I socialize frequently—she's totes amazing!" without having an epic meltdown, ABC. (Rare is the BF who can hear his GF say the same, rare is the GF who can hear her GF say the same. BFs who can hear their BFs say the same are less rare, but they're far from unheard-of.) Which is why, when a person with a BF/GF/SOPATGSF* has a crush on someone else, keeping quiet about it, minimizing it if asked, and letting the crush burn out without acting on it or causing your BF/GF/SOPATGSF any undue stress by talking about it/copping to it are all considered "best relationship practices."
So if you're the kind of GF who would prefer to hear her BF say, "Yeah, I totally have a crush on this other girl with whom I socialize frequently—she's totes amazing!", ABC, you'll have to make that explicit, i.e. you'll have to tell your BF exactly that. ("I would prefer that you tell me when you have a crush on someone else. Pretending you never have crushes on other girls is a lie and I prefer not to be lied to.") But then you're not allowed to have a meltdown, epic or otherwise, when he cops to a crush.
* some-other-point-along-the-gender-spectrum-friend.
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Don't say anything to your S.O. about the dildos and the poppers and the sounds—which he wasn't making much of an effort to hide from you—until after gets back from his trip, FITS. And don't make an issue of him sleeping in another bedroom for the last few nights. Just say this to him before he goes: "I love you. I know things have been stressful lately and I hope we can reconnect and get 'us' back on track soon. Have a good trip, honey, enjoy yourself, relax, and let's talk things over when you get home, okay?"
And here's what you tell yourself to keep yourself sane while he's gone: It's possible that those are brand-new dildos and sounds and it's possible that your S.O. spent money you two don't have to waste on them. But it's also possible that the toys you found predate your relationship and he only recently pulled them out of whatever corner of the house he'd stashed them in because he was horny and needed to get off and things between you two had become so strained that he didn't feel like he could initiate sex with you. And it's highly unlikely that someone else gave those toys to your S.O. If he had been given them... if he was cheating on you... and the toys were evidence of the affair... wouldn't your S.O. have made more of an effort to hide them from you?
He may not have blown money on toys, he most likely isn't cheating on you—repeat as needed, to treat stress, while your S.O. is away for the weekend.
Then, when your S.O. returns on Sunday, FITS, ask him about the toys without making any accusations and without sounding accusatory. (Practice while he's gone.) You two haven't been connecting sexually, which you blame on money woes, but your S.O. is not without a libido. You presumably aren't without one either, FITS. It also sounds like you two aren't in the habit of speaking openly with each other about your sex life, your kinks, and your fantasies. This is your opportunity. It could be that your S.O. is bored with your sexual routine, wants to be more adventurous, and right now he's having solo adventures in the spare room with his silicone buddies. Would you like to be included in his adventures? If so, ask him to include you. (You say you can't use any of the dildos you saw in that bag. That's not true: You can use them on your S.O. Same goes for the sounds and the tit clamps.) 
If he blew money you don't have right now on toys, FITS, don't blow up at him—not unless you wanna risk turning an argument over an ill-advised, impulse-and-impale purchase into a relationship-extinction-level event. And if a conversation about his new toys leads to an open and honest exchange that (1) helps you reconnect emotionally and (2) helps you reconnect sexually, FITS, then you should regard the toys as a worthwhile investment in your future. Good luck.
This is just one of several recent studies that have come to the same conclusion. This doesn't mean BDSM all by itself makes people happier and healthier and everyone, kinky or not, should practice BDSM for the social and mental health benefits. But someone who is out there practicing BDSM, and is a part of the BDSM community (where most subjects for these studies have been drawn from), someone who has thought through their kinks, learned to accept themselves and their sexualities, and found a way to act on them that's healthy and self-actualizing? Apparently that can create a kind of positive-mental-health-feedback loop.
So, CANE, you might wanna start the conversation with your wife with science—science agrees that indulging your desire for caning could, like you said, increase your happiness and actually make you a better husband. And science recognizes your interest in caning—so long as that's all you do with your pro-Dom—as a kind of "recreational leisure," not a form (necessarily) of sexual contact, so perhaps that language can get you off the monogamy hook.
That said, CANE, your wife sounds pretty amazing—she comes through with face slapping, tit clamping, foot worshipping, and cuckold fantasizing. I don't think you should pressure her to cane you; she gave it a try, it wasn't for her, and Doms (pro and otherwise) are allowed to have limits. Ultimately going without caning may be the price of admission you have to pay to be with an otherwise GGG and highly accommodating spouse.
*At least it looks that way—if I'm wrong, APA-ers, please write in to correct me.

My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
No advice for you, BALLGAG. Sorry.
Your wife is willing to go there, BALLGAG, but binding and gagging the wife doesn't work for you because "her heart is not in it." The obvious solution is getting the wife's okay to find a woman who's heart is in it—perhaps a woman with a husband whose heart isn't—and exploring this stuff with her. (Easier to do these days, of course, thanks to this thing.) But "looking for the answer outside [your] marriage is not an option." Three-ways aren't an option either.
I'm not a miracle worker, BALLGAG. I can't utter an incantation that makes your wife kinky or open a portal into an alternate universe where you can bind and gag women without technically cheating on the wife thanks to the Universal Alternate Universe Exception. So it looks like you'll have to settle for great sex with a hot woman who gives you megaboners, BALLGAG, while jacking off about your kinks—which doesn't really sound so bad, frankly. (The comment thread on this post is gonna fill with notes from bitter middle-aged men in sexless marriages angrily offering to trade places with you.)
But you're frustrated... and fapping isn't fixing it... and you're panicking... so what do you do? Your only option and only hope is to use your words. When was the last time you talked with your wife about your sex life? If it's been a long time, BALLGAG, if you've been running on autopilot, fumes, and assumptions for 10 or more years, ask your wife where she's at these days. Your wife might surprise you. Her positions on three-ways and outside sexual contact may have softened. It couldn't hurt to ask, and asking—and getting an answer you didn't expect—is the only way out of your predicament.
My response after the jump...
I don't know who's crazier: your controlling, psychotic, hand-sniffing girlfriend, BOMBAST, or you, for sticking around and putting up with this bullshit. There's nothing wrong with having a low libido; it's not a crime to want sex only once a week. But terrorizing a higher-libido partner about whether or not he is making ends meet by masturbating now and then—and demanding to smell his hands!—is borderline abusive behavior. DTMFA, BOMBAST, and be so kind as to pass this bit of advice on to your soon-to-be ex-girlfriend: If you want a companion animal you can castrate, lady, get a dog. Not a boyfriend. Not a husband. A dog.
Good advice, TDONTD. Thanks for the update!
There are so many great books out there—too many to name—but if you live in a city with a woman-owned, sex-positive, sex-toy store like, say, She Bop (Portland) or Smitten Kitten (Minneapolis) or Venus Envy (Halifax) or Babeland (New York and Seattle) or Come As You Are (Toronto), TP, your best bet is to get to a store, browse through the books section, and find a title that works for you. But if you must have a recommendation: order a copy of Erika Moen's Oh Joy Sex Toy. It's a illustrated/critical guide to sex toys that's also a pro-kink, pro-queer, pro-everybody sex-ed book. And it's fucking funny, TP, and there's nothing like a good laugh—provided by Erika's sense of humane and profane sense of humor (which is evident in the text and the illustrations)—to help relieve prudish tension and keep a sex convo going.
Answers:
1. Take the time to Google vomit and bulimia, SLIME, and you'll quickly learn that lots of potential negative health consequences stem from regular, induced vomiting—from tooth decay to the erosion of the esophagus to mouth sores to rotting gums to broken blood vessels in the eyes. Vomiting once in a great while probably won't do any lasting damage—we evolved to vomit once in a great while—but asking your indulgent-to-fault boyfriend to make vomiting a regular part of your sex life would be both unfair and unhealthy. The hard part is defining "once in a while." Since healthy adults rarely vomit, SLIME, I'd say that your boyfriend shouldn't do this for you more than once a year, tops.
2. I shared your letter with a smart, progressive, sex-positive doctor, a woman who has made other appearances in the column, and she sent this response:
Vomit is not sterile like urine and carries bacteria that are found in our gut. We have bacteria throughout our entire gastrointestinal tract, from mouth to anus. That said, there is also the corrosive nature of vomit to be wary of. People who vomit often risk esophageal tears and bleeding (blood in the vomit requires a trip to the hospital), tooth decay and gum disease caused by the acidity. Electrolyte imbalances may also cause other health problems. The mucosa (or skin) inside of the vagina is the same kind of mucosa we have on the insides of our mouths. Exposing the vagina (which can happen with vulvar exposure) to these acids could cause vaginal irritation and inflammation as well as a change in the pH of the vagina. This could lead to susceptibility to other infections, sexually transmitted or not (as in the case of yeast infections or bacterial vaginosis). I would recommend using good judgement for the frequency of vomiting to reduce health risks as well as avoiding penetrative vaginal play with vomit.
Normally I would credit this smart, progressive, sex-positive doctor by name... but I wasn't sure she would want this particular Q&A; popping up every time someone Googled her A. for the rest of her professional life and B. for all of eternity. So I'm keeping her name out of it.
3. I also shared your letter with Jesse Bering, Associate Professor of Science Communication at the University of Otago in New Zealand, a man whose name doesn't need to be kept out of it. Bering is a frequent contributor to Slate, Scientific American, Das Magazin, and (ahem) "Savage Love." Bering is the author of Perv: The Sexual Deviant In All of Us, and this particular question is right up his alley.
You can find “erotic vomiting” easily enough on shock porn sites. Aficionados refer to this kink as Roman Showers (a nod to the feast-until-you-barf potlucks of ancient times). Mercifully, however, emetophilia is exceedingly rare as a full-blown sexual paraphilia because disgust, for obvious evolutionary reasons, tends to be a natural libido killer for most people. But SLIME isn’t alone in her sensual yearnings for the most intimate innards of her partners. Back in 1982, the psychiatrist Robert Stoller conducted a series of interviews with three female emetophiles and, just like SLIME’s reminiscences of genital excitement upon seeing women with morning sickness, each of these ladies could similarly trace their unusually visceral arousal to an early childhood experience. One believed that it stemmed from her grandmother innocently rubbing her back while she vomited as a six-year-old, her privates being unwittingly stimulated on the old woman’s knee. Another woman believed that her emetophilia was rooted in being sexually abused by her stepfather as an eleven-year-old after he’d caught her masturbating. She was so disgusted by the incident that she vomited, but the two sensations (climaxing in response to the abuse, and then vomiting in response to the man’s actions) became inextricably linked. But the jury is still out on the “causes” of fetishes and kinks, but these anecdotal accounts on the origins of emetophilia, along with countless other such retrospective stories of adults with paraphilias, suggest a sexual imprinting process during childhood development.
Follow Jesse Bering on Twitter.
I'm not sure what MWC can do to save his marriage—his wife sounds like a crazy person—but clearly your husband isn't the only married guy out there, AIA, who enjoys flirting (and only flirting) with other women.
My response after the jump...
There's a movement in sex-ed circles to replace the old opt-out consent mantra, "No means no," with a new, improved opt-in consent mantra, "Yes means yes." YMY says it's not good enough to wait for the other person to stop the action with a "no," which many people—particularly young people, particularly young girl people—have a hard time doing. You have to get a "yes."
But the kind of person who doesn't give you a chance to say "no," GOY, is unlikely to solicit a "yes." Which is why we all need to advocate for ourselves in the moment.
And you failed to do that, GOY—you failed to advocate for yourself in the moment.
I don't say that to make you feel bad or to shift the blame onto your shoulders, GOY, I say it because we've all been there. Most confident, sexually active adults can point to an early experience that went too far, too fast, a sexual encounter that left us feeling the way you did after you had sex with this girl. And it's possible to walk away from an experience like that—one that left you feeling shitty and powerless—feeling empowered to advocate for yourself in uncomfortable sexual situations in the future, GOY, provided you learn the right lesson.
Here's the wrong lesson: "I'm a total fuckup who can't speak up for myself when I'm having sex, so I'd better not have sex again. Ever." That's bullshit, GOY, and what's worse, that kind of thinking can make a person more vulnerable the next time she winds up in bed with an insensitive jerk. Here's the right lesson: "I don't have to wait for someone to give me a 'chance' to say no. I can and will say no whenever I want to. I'm not going to let this happen to me again because I never want to feel this way again. Ever."
As for the girl, GOY, tell her straight up that you don't have feelings for her. And tell her why: Things went too far, too fast, and the sex ruined it for you. Don't sugarcoat things to avoid hurting her feelings, GOY, because she's got a lesson to learn, too. Hers goes like this: "I didn't ask the person I was with—someone I really liked—if she was cool with what we were doing, and I totally fucked myself out of what could've been a really great relationship. I'm not going to do that to anyone again. Ever."
My response after the jump...
There are people who manage to turn their lives upside down in pursuit of their turn-ons—there are people whose sex lives are complete fucking shitshows—and all they're into is heterosexual sex in the missionary position in their own bedrooms with the lights off. Your brother's problem isn't his childhood or his kink. His problems, plural, are his self-loathing, his attempts to swear off his kink (which leads to these binge-and-purge cycles), and the reckless ways he indulges his kink when he's bingeing.
Instead of running from his kinks—which he can't do—your brother needs to find safer, saner ways to satisfy his desire for erotic humiliation and submitting to someone else's control. People with humiliation kinks managed to find ways to get off before the internet came along, BOKB, and so can your brother.
And you need to establish better boundaries, BOKB. No more swapping pics with your kinky bro, bro, and no more hunting for evidence of your bro's ill-advised online adventures.
My response after the jump...
Obviously.
Maybe your boyfriend wants to cheat but doesn't want to be cheated on—he wants his boyfriend locked down, but doesn't want to be locked down himself—or maybe he thinks it's too soon to delete his online personal profiles. Or maybe, like a lot of gay men, he treats hookup apps like a virtual gay bar, i.e., a place where he can hang out and socialize with friends and exes and, perhaps, get his flirt on now and then.
But if lurking on Scruff and Growlr makes his newly locked-down boyfriend feel insecure, he should stay off hookup apps. Or, if he simply can't give 'em up, your new boyfriend should allow you to look at his chats whenever you care to so you can see for yourself that they're either wholly innocent (just talking with friends) or wholly innocent flirting (swapping photos and compliments with hot guys but not making plans to hook up).
It just so happens, NOHUMP, that plenty of asexuals (aka "aces") identified as L, G, or B before realizing they were A. Julia Sondra Decker, asexuality activist and author of The Invisible Orientation, gives some context:
Tons of us grew up knowing we didn't feel what we were "supposed" to feel (read: we weren't good at being straight), NOHUMP, and since the other option many of us had heard of was "gay," we figured we must be that. Many of us share with you the history of having sex because that's "what adults do" as well. But if a label you once chose no longer fits you and it's bothering you, other people in your life should respect your desire to use different terms. Also, as an asexual activist, I can absolutely say I've heard stories from aces who originally identified as gay and were terrified to switch labels for similar reasons. You're not alone.
I've described sexual identity as a cake with three layers, NOHUMP. The first layer is who you wanna do (desire), the second layer is who you're actually doing (behavior), and the third layer is what you tell people you're doing/who you are (identity). The more neatly aligned your layers, the less messy your cake. It's a thing some brainy types have called "Savage's Heirarchy," and it applies to asexuality, too. In your case, NOHUMP, you've spent most your life doing other men, and the simplest path has been to say you're gay and assume your desires would (or did) follow suit or would kick into high gear at some point. But surprise! Discovering your sexual identity—assembling that damn cake—isn't always so simple.
Now, NOHUMP, if the right answer to, "Who do you wanna do?" is "no one in particular," you should probably stop doing boys and start identifying by the label or labels that feel right, whenever safe and feasible. (Lots of asexuals embrace more than one label. You could asexual but homoromantic or heteroromantic, for example.) That doesn't mean you have to go from gay to asexual overnight (or at all; there are gay identified asexuals out there), but you shouldn't feel obligated to stick with the gay label if it doesn't feel right.
While you're figuring it all out, here's more advice on asexuality from Decker:
 Asexuality isn't "nothing"—it's not an empty space, just like answering "none of the above" on a multiple choice quiz is very different from not answering the question. We have a community and a set of shared experiences, some of which dovetail with experiences you've had identifying as a gay man (and some of which don't). Please know that if you choose to identify as asexual, NOHUMP, it's a respectable identity even if it's also sometimes hard. Not desiring sex doesn't necessarily make a person asexual, either, but I'd trust you to decide how to identify yourself. If you're willing to spend some time engaging with the community and exploring the rich tapestry of romantic and sexual orientations and experiences we discuss, you may find yourself somewhere in that quilt, and may become more comfortable asking people to use your terms over time.
Asexuality, like all sexual orientations, can be expressed in different ways and there are niche communities, NOHUMP. Explore a bit and decide what labels work best for you. And don't worry about devaluing "the plight of any LGBT individual by recanting" your gayness. You're not recanting anything. You're bringing the second and third layers of your sexual identity cake into alignment with the first layer. You're telling your truth, not betraying or abandoning anyone—and as an asexual, NOHUMP, you're still in the sexual minority camp with us homos. Not gay anymore, maybe not gay ever, but still queer.
I'm not in New York City, APAS, and I don't have plans to be before your deadline. But here's a little something I just pulled out of my ass: We act differently around our crushes—our behavior changes—because we scrutinize ourselves more closely when in the presence of someone we hope to see naked. Since doing or saying the wrong thing could deprive us of the opportunity to see that person naked, we start second-guessing every gesture, every statement, every glance, every boner. Basically it's the "observer effect," aka the "Hawthorne effect," but in this instance the observer and the observed are one in the same person.
That's my theory, APAS, but like I said... I just pulled that out of my ass. My readers will doubtless have theories (and asses) of their own and their theories (and their asses) might be better than mine. So be sure to keep an eye on the comment thread.
My response... after the jump.
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
I recently responded to a question from a gay man who was obsessed—suddenly, and much to his surprise/consternation—with the idea of having PIV sex with a woman in the context of a M/M/F threesome. Despite spending fifteen minutes searching through recent columns and SLLOTDs, GAYMAD, I wasn't able to locate (and link) the dude's letter and my response.  (Did I dream it?) But rest assured: there's at least one gay dude out there curious about sleeping with a woman. (Unless I dreamt it.)
But there are probably a hell of a lot more bi guys out there rounding themselves up to gay—or rounding themselves down to gay—than there are gay guys out there who are interested in fucking a woman. If a gay-identified bi guy would do the trick, GAYMAD, you might have better luck (and receive swifter service) if you advertise for one of those.
If a gay-identified bi guy simply won't do—if only a gay-identified gay guy will do—then advertise for one of those gay guys. But brace yourself for a long wait.
Blah blah blah. Your problem is a lot simpler than the length of your email would seem to indicate.
You face a choice, TMA—and it's not a choice between a woman with whom you can talk who has a husband and kids at home, control issues, a jealous streak, and a limited sexual repertoire and a woman who is good at texting and fucking but not so good at talking. It's a choice between the women you're with currently—and the dead-end relationship your in currently—and 3.5 billion other women on the planet you could be with.
And that 27-year-old woman you've been seeing for a month—one lousy month—is just one of the 3.5 billion other women on the planet.
The more time you spend with the 27-year-old you've been seeing for a month, TMA, the more shared experiences you'll have, the more you'll have to talk about. She could wind up being your chatty wife, the fecund mother of many, many children (presumably yours), and your sex slave and piss buddy and anal queen for life. Or not. You might just spend a few great months with her, have tons of amazing sex, and wind up single and alone again/for the first time in a long time if/when this relationship implodes. (And my money is on "when," TMA, as the odds of implosion are always higher when two people start talking about kids and marriage after a month.) But "single and alone again" doesn't necessarily mean "single and alone forever." If things don't work out with the 27 year old, TMA, there are still 3,499,999,999 other women on the planet.
Finally, TMA, if the married woman you're with now—the married woman you're with now—is as invested in monogamy (cough, cough) as you claim she is, TMA, it's impossible to read the affair you're having (not to be confused with the affair she's having) as anything other than your hand slamming down on the eject button. You want out and—consciously or subconsciously—and you're engineering an out. But waiting for Ms. Ten Years to find out about Ms. Four Weeks is the cowardly way to go about it. Ova and up and end it honestly.
Meeting up with the top who reached out to you and the guy whose apartment you were going to be using—his consensual slave—for an out-of-roles/we're-all-equals conversation would've been my suggestion, SLAVE, so you clearly didn't need my advice. I'm glad it worked out—and, hey, here's hoping you find a slave with an awesome apartment and convenient cage in the city where you live now.
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
There is something you can do to engage your fiancé's fetish—you can order yourself one of these. Latex catsuits aren't to everyone's taste, of course, but they do allow people with breast enlargement fetishes to explore their kinks with a partner. And if your guy happens to have a thing for both ballooning breasts and actual balloons... Yahtzee.
Ballooning breasts—that problem is easily solved. The more difficult-to-solve problem is your fiancé's selfishness and his disregard for the feelings and sexual self-esteem of the woman he claims to love. I'm happy to defend boys who watch a little porn—I'm happy to defend girls who do the same—but my defense of porn consumption is premised upon the consumer being both moderate and considerate. There are times when you just want to crank one out (while watching a little porn), there are times when masturbation (while watching a little porn) meets a need that partnered sex cannot, there are times when a person wants the release of orgasm (while watching a little porn) without having to engage with another human being who has their own wants, needs, and demands. But it's not okay to choose porn—and dirty boxer shorts (ugh)—over a waiting and willing partner again and again and again.
So, again, the problem isn't that your fiancé watches porn. Everyone's fiancé does. The problem is your fiancé's's lack of consideration the feelings and needs of his fiancée.
Don't marry this guy if you can't get him to see—maybe with the help of a kink-positive couples counselor—that what he's doing is hurtful and unnecessary. (His fiancée is ready, wiling, and able to indulge him.) You're clearly willing to meet his needs, AHTC, but he doesn't seem the least bit concerned about yours. If he can't pull his head out of his ass, his eyes off those videos, and his dick out of those dirty boxer shorts and show his love for you... don't marry him.
A multimedia response... after the jump.
There is no middle ground, SOB. So watch this and have a few laughs...

...then watch Tristan Taormino's "Expert Guide to Pegging." Then fuck the living shit out of your boyfriend's hairy, adorable little butthole. Plow it like a queen, dude.
Thanks for sharing, JAWDROP. And while I normally wouldn't include a link to a personal ad in the SLLOTD or a column, JAWDROP, I'm making an exception for "absolutbottom." The ad is anonymous, he's a reader, and he clearly gotta kick out of seeing his ad (and his ass) discussed in "Savage Love" last week. So if you're a "Savage Love" reader with a massive cock and a thing for straight-identified bi guys (who come complete with girlfriends game to have threesomes with other bi guys)... you might wanna check out the ass on this dude.
P.S. Dan his cock is thick and beautiful and glorious when it's hard. You would approve.
P.P.S. I've been reading your column for 15 years!
Your boyfriend isn't doing this on purpose to upset you—that's inconceivable—so let's take "being an asshole" off the table. (I'm sure he finds his boner issues just as frustrating as you do, SOS, if not more so.) And he wouldn't have pursued you in the first place, texted you on Valentine's Day, been anxious to jump back in the sack with you, or have been willing to get back together with you if he didn't like you and didn't find you physically appealing. So we can also rule out "thinks you're a jerk" and "isn't attracted to you."
And I think we can safely rule out a medical problem. His dick worked 50% of the time since you got back together officially, SOS, and his dick worked 100% of the time you when you weren't together technically. So from where I'm sitting—right here at Ann Landers' desk—this looks like a cut-and-dried case of performance anxiety.
Your boyfriend's particular strain of performance anxiety seems to kick in as the emotional stakes get higher. Not in a relationship? Boners are not a problem. In a relationship? Boners are suddenly a problem. My hunch is that when you weren't officially together his erections meant one, simple, straightforward thing: He wanted to fuck you. But now that you're officially together, SOS, his erections mean a great deal more. They're no longer a simple and straightforward indication of arousal, SOS, but a barometer that he (rightly) worries his girlfriend uses to measure his attraction to her, his commit to her, and his general levels of satisfaction with the relationship—and his dick is collapsing under the weight of all that meaning.
You say you've been reading my advice for fifteen years. But apparently you missed—or failed to commit to memory (for shame)—my advice to a woman in 2005 whose husband started avoiding sex after experiencing similar difficulties:
Your husband avoids "fool around situations," or FAS, because he feels like he won't be able to satisfy you, his theory being, "no bone, no satisfaction." That seems to be your theory too, HORNYW, and embracing it is making your problem worse. It's perfectly understandable that he would avoid FAS—and the humiliation of failure—until he's absolutely positive he can keep it up. That's why the best approach in a situation like this is to take the focus—and the pressure—off his dick. Tell him he can't fail to satisfy you with oral sex, masturbation, and toys (perhaps working your way up to strap-ons), and he'll begin to think of sex as something he's good at again, boned or boneless. And guess what, HORNYW? You may find that once your husband is not expected to produce an erection during FAS, his dick starts getting hard.
I would give the same advice to you, SOS: Take the focus and pressure off your boyfriend's dick. The talks you had with him before—those three times you gently raised the subject—didn't take the pressure off his dick. Those conversations about his problem (lost erections) were framed around a premise/fix/demand (no more lost erections) that only served to put more pressure on his dick.
It's time for a new conversation. You say you've got a nice collection of toys. Instead of keeping them around for those times when you're not having sex, SOS, you need to incorporate those toys into the sex you're having. Introduce your boyfriend to your vibrators and tell him that from now on there's no reason to stop having sex when he loses his erection. Dick not cooperating? Not a problem: he can use his fingers and his tongue, he can explore your body with your vibrator, you can suck his dick more (always err on the side of sucking more), he can stroke himself while he eats your pussy or uses a vibrator on you—just keep going.
If you stop having sex when he loses his erection, SOS, success will always be contingent on his erections. But if you keep enjoying each other whatever happens—if you keep playing, erection or no erection, if you can learn to shift effortlessly from his cock to other pleasurable activities and back and forth until you both get off—the sex will always be a success.
UPDATE: Also, as the first commenter suggests, ED drugs. ED drugs + pressure off = problem solved.
They were either swingers looking for a couple to take upstairs (10% chance), DADDY, or that youngish lady is a sex worker (90% chance) and that mysterious youngish guy was her protection, her boyfriend, her pimp, or all of the above.
I've always known homos could be just as awful as breeders about, well, absolutely everything. But I kindasorta hoped we'd be better about wedding awfulness, at least for a little while. After all those years of fighting and lobbying and shouting and lawyering up for marriage equality... I kindasorta thought we'd have some perspective, you know? I thought, at least for the first few decades of legal same-sex marriage, we wouldn't get upset over silly things like having to share the spotlight. I kindasorta thought we might be immune, at least for a little while, to un-ironic and weaponized references to "our big day."
It's not your day. No day is. There are seven billion other people on the planet, all having days. The same days. So you'll have to share this day, like you've shared all the days that came before it, and all the days that will come after it.
And why not share it with brother-in-law and his wife to be? Like you said, your BIL and SIL-to-be didn't do this maliciously. Perhaps it was thoughtless. But you can obsess about their thoughtlessness or you can seize the opportunity to have a great, big, mixed-sexuality family wedding bash. I can’t think of anything that would signify your family’s acceptance of your marriage on equal term more clearly than holding a joint celebration for both couples. If your BIL and SIL-to-be are willing to share the day—that's the day, not their day (no day is their day, no day is your day)—then you can focus on what matters: both couples sharing the commitments they've made with the whole family and a giant tribe of friends on hand to celebrate.
Plus, a joint wedding party is very Shakespearean comedy—the comedies always end happily with everyone getting laid. (Except for poor unlaid Malvolio, of course, and abused and unhappy Kate. And poor blissed-but-drugged-and-so-not-consenting Demetrius. Say, have you read Jillian Keenan's Sex With Shakespeare yet? Get it and read it.) And, if you absolutely must have your own day, take your friend's advice. Have one big weekend with two wedding parties. It's not an "excessive and ridiculous idea," it's an idea that will endear both couples to friends and family.

Listen to my awful yet award-winning podcast, the Savage Lovecast, at www.savagelovecast.com.
My response... after the jump.
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
I think astrology is annoying bullshit—which is so Libra of me—and astrological bullshittery is never more annoying than when people point to signs in an effort to excuse character flaws. Irrational jealousy is not a fault in your stars, TQ, it's a fault in your character. I'm not suggesting that there's something wrong with a woman who doesn't want to watch her boyfriend screw other girls in front of her—see the next few paragraphs—but there's definitely something wrong with a woman threatened by her SO's platonic female friends. Perhaps you have more cause to be threatened by female friends than the average girlfriend, TQ, but that brand of jealousy is something you need get over if you ever want to have a healthy, lasting relationship.
Moving on...
I'm in partial agreement with your friends, TQ, in that I think you should leave your boyfriend. But I don't think your boyfriend is a bad guy for wanting to have the occasional threesome. (I enjoy the occasional threesome and I don't think I'm a bad guy.) Your boyfriend knows himself, he knows what he wants, and he's putting it out there. The world would be a far happier place, and divorce court wold be a far less crowded place, if more people did the same before making a lifetime commitment. (But pointing to your twin sisters to justify a desire to occasionally have sex with two women at the same time? That is some deeply creepy shit—that's head-for-the-hills degree of creepiness—and here's hoping it was an ill-advised, poorly-thought-out, stomach-churning rationalization on his part and not, you know, indicative of something far more sinister.)
Here's the bottom line: You guys aren't sexually compatible. He wants something you don't think you can give him. The world has plenty of people in it who've traveled from "mildly jealous at the thought" of their partners fucking someone else to okay with it—or even into it—but I haven't met many people who managed to get from "physically sick" at the thought to happily participating. So don't draw this out: break up with your boyfriend now.
Again, your boyfriend deserves credit for being upfront about what he wants. He could just as easily have waited to tell you until after you had gotten married and had a couple of kids, TQ, and then you might've found yourself having threesomes under duress to keep your family together. That shit happens and it's awful. But that isn't going to happen to you because your boyfriend knows what he wants and was honest enough to tell you. He did the right thing. And now you need to do the right thing—for him, for yourself—and end this relationship.
My response after the jump...
••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Your fiancé has a daughter, SO, and you're going to have to reconcile yourself to that fact—for your own good, for the good of your relationship, and for the good of a little girl who needs the adults in her life to stop acting like idiots. As for Bob and Sally...
If Bob isn't paying child support, he needs to start. If Bob hasn't talked to a lawyer about his legally enforceable rights as a parent, he needs to talk to a lawyer. No one can force Sally to seek professional help—preventing a child from seeing her father because you're embarrassed about the particulars of the conception is pretty fucked up*—but she definitely needs to see a fucking shrink. And if Sally tries to cut off contact between Bob and his daughter again, Bob needs to take her to court.
Circling back to you: You've had two years to grieve over the doing-this-for-the-first-time-with-each-other thing, SO, but you avoided grieving because your fiancé's child was out of sight, out of mind. Now that kid is in sight and you're just going to have to let go of that dream. What's done is done and cannot be undone. I'm not going to tell you it's wrong to feel as if your heart is breaking—go ahead and feel your feelings—but you should try to keep this particular heartbreak in perspective. No one is dead, you haven't been dumped, and there's nothing preventing you and Bob from having kids together in the future. Make up your mind to love this kid to the best of your ability, resolve to be the best stepmom you can be, stop speculating about Sally's motives, and get on with your life.
* Exceptions: Child's father was/is a rapist, child's father was/is abusive, one or two more reasons that I've probably overlooked.
P.S. I should clarify: I cheated because I never felt I was attractive to him as I'm not in his demographic. We have supposedly moved on from that. I have major body issues and feel generally unloved and unattractive. I feel like he settled. He says that's not the case. There has been little to no romance and we have two teenage kids. Despite encouraging me to continue with the infidelity he will try to use it against me. I am just at a loss. Please don't tell me to leave him. It is just not going to happen and by the way, he thinks something bad happened to him a a kid to make him so fucked up. Nothing happened to him but I can't tell him to get over the notion he had some horrible child hood as he has too much invested in that. Whoa.
My response... after the jump.
••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Where to start?
I trust that along with the cheating, lying, shaming, guilting, addicting, and negotiating hotwifing vs. subbing... you and your husband are still finding the time to do a little parenting now and then. Adults don't stop having their own lives when they become parents, of course, and the older kids get the more time parents have for cheating, shaming, prostituting, and other adult diversions. I realize you're recounting twenty years worth of events in your letter—a great deal of history and incident—and that requires telegraphing and everything didn't happen all at once. But... man. You and your husband have had a lot to process over the years and one would hope—one would expect—that two decades in you guys would've found a groove or two that worked for you both.
But no such luck.
I'm going to give you the same advice I gave HURTME in this week's "Savage Love": "A few sessions with a kink-positive shrink might help... You can find one through the American Association of Sexuality Educators, Counselors and Therapists (aasect.org)." Your husband needs someone to help him with the shame, the possibility that something awful happened to him in his childhood, and you need to talk to someone about your body image issues and your insecurities.
As for this...
Now he wants me to be a hotwife. I want to be his sub. He has issues with being a Dom and I have issues fucking strangers. Can you refer us in a direction we can start from?
Don't freak out when I use this phrase, BDSM, because I'm not using it in the grounds-for-divorce sense but the less popular thems-the-facts sense: sounds like an irreconcilable difference to me. He's not up for BDSM, you're not up for fucking strangers. (Not anymore.) You don't want to divorce and the existence of one two or three thousand or more minor irreconcilable differences doesn't mean you have to divorce, BDSM. (If it did we would all be divorced before the wedding cake was served.) But it does mean you'll have to let go of your Dom/sub fantasies and he'll have to let go of his hotwife fantasies—at least for now.
Get yourselves to a smart, kink-positive counselor—aasect.org—to discuss your hangups, your shame, your history, and your future, BDSM, and maybe you'll be able to finally find a groove that works for both of you.
P.S. Most people have more than one "type." The fact that your husband is attracted to women his own age doesn't mean he can't also be attracted to women—and men—closer to your age. On that point you're just going to have to ova up already.
My response after the jump...
Your boyfriend can't stare at a neck wound he can't see. So until you've fully recovered, B, turn off the lights or blindfold him or lace him into a leather hood—or all three—and have sex the way the good lord intended us to, i.e., in the dark with our pitiful/regretful/hooded boyfriends. And no more flaming/stunt drinks, ferfucksake!
My response after the jump...
1. Fucking your boss's kid seems like a surefire way to get your ass fired, SON, and depending on what field you're in—and how important good recommendations and work histories are in your field—fucking the boss's son could seriously derail your career. If, you know, you manage to get caught. But if you do decide to fuck the shit out of a gorgeous, funny, sweet, and kinky adult who happens to be your boss's son, well, you wouldn't be the first person in human history to risk everything for sex. As Mark Twain observed more than a century ago: "The human being, like the immortals, naturally places sexual intercourse far and away above all other joys—yet he has left it out of his heaven! The very thought of it excites him; opportunity sets him wild; in this state, he will risk life, reputation, everything—even his queer heaven itself—to make good that opportunity and ride it to the overwhelming climax."
2. He is an adult—who is still in high school. You are not that far out of high school. Math is hard for me, SON, but according to my calculations, you're not that far apart in age. You might be sabotaging your career, but you wouldn't be robbing the cradle.
3. The campsite rule for new readers: The older and/or more experienced person in a sexual relationship with a large age and/or experience gap is obligated to leave their younger and/or less experienced partner in better shape than when they found them. That means no sexually transmitted infections, no fertilized eggs, no unnecessary drama, and no unnecessary trauma.
My response after the jump...
Sorry, SAD, but relationship graveyards around the world are crowded with tombstones that read, "Everything was great... other than the sex."
And this isn't your mundane, run-of-the-mill mismatched-libido problem, which is bad enough. (And, as I've written until my fingers are bleeding, reason enough to end a relationship.) You're dating a guy who can get it up only when he sees his girlfriend sobbing on the floor—that's apparently what it takes to make his dick hard—and this sobbing-on-the-floor shit goes down twice a month. I can only conclude that this is how your boyfriend likes it, SAD. He's turned on only when you're not just miserable but pushed past the breaking point.
DTMFA.
Frequency is not a problem that improves with time, SAD. A boyfriend who wants sex only twice a month at four months into a relationship—and then only when his girlfriend is sobbing—won't want sex once a week five or 10 years in. You know what else doesn't improve with time? Assholery. I promise you that the "wonderful" and "thoughtful" will diminish as the years fly by, and the emotionally abusive games that cause you so much pain—pain that, again, seems to give him pleasure—will metastasize, spreading from your sex life to other areas of your life. The more difficult extricating yourself from this relationship becomes, SAD, the less wonderful and thoughtful he'll become.
End it now.
My response after the jump...
What can you do? You mean besides send video of you and your bear in action to prove this isn't the most entertaining fake letter I've received since Michelle Obama invited me to dinner at Sarah Jessica Parker's house? Besides that?
You can do this: Draw a distinction between what was going on in that bear's mouth and what was going on in your head. When a man beats off—with or without a Fleshlight-enhanced bearskin rug—two things are kindasorta happening simultaneously: what the man is doing with his dick and what the man is imagining he's doing with his dick. Guys who beat off using a clenched fist, for example, generally aren't clenched-fist fetishists; they're just horny and their fists are there and Sarah Jessica Parker isn't.
So your boyfriend walked in and saw you fucking a dead bear. That's gonna look bad, BGA, even to a boyfriend who isn't vegan. So how do you fix it? By patiently explaining to your vegan boyfriend that while, yes, you were face-fucking a bear when he walked in on you—no denying it—you weren't thinking about face-fucking a bear. Tell him you were thinking about him, and the bear's mouth was just a convenient place to wedge your vegan-boyfriend-substitute, i.e., your Fleshlight. Tell your boyfriend you don't entertain any murderous fantasies, tell him you only long to fuck living things, and tell him that Homo sapiens are the only animals you find attractive.
Tell him all of that, BGA, even if not all of that is true.
My response after the jump...
I can understand why you were upset. You had already taken things to the "next level" in your heart—you were thinking of this guy as your boyfriend—you just hadn't gotten around to informing him about the upgrade. And you assumed that, when you did get around to letting him know, he would be delighted. Because he was the one who wanted a relationship at the beginning, right?
Unfortunately, he took you at your word when you said you weren't interested in a relationship. Keeping things "purely casual" meant he was free to pursue a relationship with someone else.
I can't help but wonder what he was about to say when you told him to get out. He met someone else, which wasn't a violation of your rules. Did that mean things were over between you two (which would make the timing of the last fuck an insult)? Or was he willing to pass on this other girl if you were ready for a relationship (which would make tossing him out before he could elaborate a mistake)? You probably should've heard him out.
Go ahead and reach out. Let him know that you were thinking about taking things to the next level—ughers to that phrase—before he told you about the other girl. You were starting to fall for him, you hoped he felt the same, and you were disappointed. But since he was only doing what you asked—keeping it casual—you can't fault him for keeping his options open, looking around, dating other girls, etc. And you can't fault him for failing to read your mind.
Close by telling him that you'd be open to dating—a real, non-casual relationship—if things don't work out with this other girl.
My response after the jump...
Was your boyfriend having cybersex with an ex-girlfriend? Or did it only feel like he was? I would make a distinction, SAD, because while all porn constitutes a betrayal of the terms of your relationship, interacting with a stranger and, very likely, a professional online shouldn't feel quite so threatening.
Backing way the hell up: Your boyfriend shouldn't have lied to you, SAD, but you shouldn't have been so naive as to believe him. If you can't bring yourself to forgive him for lying—if you can't put yourself in his shoes and try to understand why he might lie about this (shame, fear, a desire to spare your feelings)—then this relationship is doomed. End it and find a new boyfriend. But when your next boyfriend tells you he doesn't watch porn, you're going to look at him and say, "Suuuuuure you don't."
Ask your new boyfriend to be discreet and limit his porn consumption to an extent where you're unlikely to uncover any evidence of it, as porn upsets you. If your new boyfriend manages to do that for you, SAD, if he's considerate enough to cover his tracks, you should be considerate enough to turn a blind eye on those rare occasions when you do stumble over evidence that your new boyfriend watches porn—just like your old boyfriend did and all your future boyfriends will.
My response after the jump...
Before I can respond to your question, HITME, I've gotta sacrifice a goat to the snooping-is-always-wrong Gods, or the snooping- is-always-wrong jihadists will cut my head off. It'll just take a sec: Snooping is always wrong! You invaded your husband's privacy! That was wrong! WRONG!
Moving on...
Your husband hit the jackpot when he met you, HITME. There aren't a lot of women out there who would embrace—much less marry—a man with his particular collection of kinks. You've been GGG and all you've asked in return is... total transparency and the immediate, real-time disclosure of all outside flirtations and contacts as they happen. Why can't the kinky ingrate honor this agreement? Only he knows the answer to that question, HITME, but I suspect one of two issues is at play...
Your husband may be ashamed—he may have been brutally shamed in past relationships—about the extent of his kinks and about just how much of his time and erotic energy his kinks consume. You may be completely sincere when you tell him you're okay with everything, HITME, so long as there's immediate and full disclosure. But he may fear that sharing the full extent of his online activities will leave you feeling either squicked out or threatened. So he downplays and minimizes, disclosing some but not all, because he doesn't want to lose you. If this is the issue, impress upon your husband that hiding shit from you represents a bigger threat to his marriage than full disclosure ever could.
Or...
Having and keeping sexual secrets may turn your husband on, HITME, and having a secret life could be another one of his kinks. Even if this is the issue, HITME, I think you two should be able to come to mutually agreeable terms that accommodate both his desire to have a secret and your need for full disclosure.
Here's a potential compromise: He doesn't keep anything from you, HITME, but he doesn't disclose in real time. So long as he's not being unsafe or neglectful, so long as his online activities remain online-only, he can carry on flirting and texting and pic swapping. But every few months, you get to depose his submissive ass. You get to sit him down and ask him questions, and he answers all your questions truthfully and opens up about any current secrets that your questions didn't uncover. This way, he can have all the erotic secrets he wants (he'll just have to make new ones every few months), and you can have the transparency you need (you just won't have it immediately). Good luck.
My response after the jump...
This probably isn't what you want to hear, FFF, but here goes: You alone will ultimately never be able to fulfill your boyfriend entirely... just as he alone will never be able to fulfill you entirely. One person simply can't be all things to another person—sexually or otherwise—and unmet needs, unfulfilled desires, and unexplored possibilities are prices we pay to be in LTRs. Monogamous, polyamorous, Femdom, or whatever: All coupled people walk around feeling a little unfulfilled. (Single people, too.) Because no one gets everything they want.
So, FFF, while some aspects of the polyamorous lifestyle appeal to your boyfriend, he has decided that he prefers the kind of relationship he's in now, with its perks and drawbacks, to the hypothetical polyamorous scenarios he used to contemplate, which would've had their own perks and drawbacks. I'd say your relationship is only doomed if you can't bring yourself to take his "yes"—yes to you, yes to monoamory—for an answer.
Rare is the GF who can hear a BF say, "Yeah, I totally have a crush on this other girl with whom I socialize frequently—she's totes amazing!" without having an epic meltdown, ABC. (Rare is the BF who can hear his GF say the same, rare is the GF who can hear her GF say the same. BFs who can hear their BFs say the same are less rare, but they're far from unheard-of.) Which is why, when a person with a BF/GF/SOPATGSF* has a crush on someone else, keeping quiet about it, minimizing it if asked, and letting the crush burn out without acting on it or causing your BF/GF/SOPATGSF any undue stress by talking about it/copping to it are all considered "best relationship practices."
So if you're the kind of GF who would prefer to hear her BF say, "Yeah, I totally have a crush on this other girl with whom I socialize frequently—she's totes amazing!", ABC, you'll have to make that explicit, i.e. you'll have to tell your BF exactly that. ("I would prefer that you tell me when you have a crush on someone else. Pretending you never have crushes on other girls is a lie and I prefer not to be lied to.") But then you're not allowed to have a meltdown, epic or otherwise, when he cops to a crush.
* some-other-point-along-the-gender-spectrum-friend.
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
Don't say anything to your S.O. about the dildos and the poppers and the sounds—which he wasn't making much of an effort to hide from you—until after gets back from his trip, FITS. And don't make an issue of him sleeping in another bedroom for the last few nights. Just say this to him before he goes: "I love you. I know things have been stressful lately and I hope we can reconnect and get 'us' back on track soon. Have a good trip, honey, enjoy yourself, relax, and let's talk things over when you get home, okay?"
And here's what you tell yourself to keep yourself sane while he's gone: It's possible that those are brand-new dildos and sounds and it's possible that your S.O. spent money you two don't have to waste on them. But it's also possible that the toys you found predate your relationship and he only recently pulled them out of whatever corner of the house he'd stashed them in because he was horny and needed to get off and things between you two had become so strained that he didn't feel like he could initiate sex with you. And it's highly unlikely that someone else gave those toys to your S.O. If he had been given them... if he was cheating on you... and the toys were evidence of the affair... wouldn't your S.O. have made more of an effort to hide them from you?
He may not have blown money on toys, he most likely isn't cheating on you—repeat as needed, to treat stress, while your S.O. is away for the weekend.
Then, when your S.O. returns on Sunday, FITS, ask him about the toys without making any accusations and without sounding accusatory. (Practice while he's gone.) You two haven't been connecting sexually, which you blame on money woes, but your S.O. is not without a libido. You presumably aren't without one either, FITS. It also sounds like you two aren't in the habit of speaking openly with each other about your sex life, your kinks, and your fantasies. This is your opportunity. It could be that your S.O. is bored with your sexual routine, wants to be more adventurous, and right now he's having solo adventures in the spare room with his silicone buddies. Would you like to be included in his adventures? If so, ask him to include you. (You say you can't use any of the dildos you saw in that bag. That's not true: You can use them on your S.O. Same goes for the sounds and the tit clamps.) 
If he blew money you don't have right now on toys, FITS, don't blow up at him—not unless you wanna risk turning an argument over an ill-advised, impulse-and-impale purchase into a relationship-extinction-level event. And if a conversation about his new toys leads to an open and honest exchange that (1) helps you reconnect emotionally and (2) helps you reconnect sexually, FITS, then you should regard the toys as a worthwhile investment in your future. Good luck.
My response after the jump...
•••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••••
No advice for you, BALLGAG. Sorry.
Your wife is willing to go there, BALLGAG, but binding and gagging the wife doesn't work for you because "her heart is not in it." The obvious solution is getting the wife's okay to find a woman who's heart is in it—perhaps a woman with a husband whose heart isn't—and exploring this stuff with her. (Easier to do these days, of course, thanks to this thing.) But "looking for the answer outside [your] marriage is not an option." Three-ways aren't an option either.
I'm not a miracle worker, BALLGAG. I can't utter an incantation that makes your wife kinky or open a portal into an alternate universe where you can bind and gag women without technically cheating on the wife thanks to the Universal Alternate Universe Exception. So it looks like you'll have to settle for great sex with a hot woman who gives you megaboners, BALLGAG, while jacking off about your kinks—which doesn't really sound so bad, frankly. (The comment thread on this post is gonna fill with notes from bitter middle-aged men in sexless marriages angrily offering to trade places with you.)
But you're frustrated... and fapping isn't fixing it... and you're panicking... so what do you do? Your only option and only hope is to use your words. When was the last time you talked with your wife about your sex life? If it's been a long time, BALLGAG, if you've been running on autopilot, fumes, and assumptions for 10 or more years, ask your wife where she's at these days. Your wife might surprise you. Her positions on three-ways and outside sexual contact may have softened. It couldn't hurt to ask, and asking—and getting an answer you didn't expect—is the only way out of your predicament.
My response after the jump...
I don't know who's crazier: your controlling, psychotic, hand-sniffing girlfriend, BOMBAST, or you, for sticking around and putting up with this bullshit. There's nothing wrong with having a low libido; it's not a crime to want sex only once a week. But terrorizing a higher-libido partner about whether or not he is making ends meet by masturbating now and then—and demanding to smell his hands!—is borderline abusive behavior. DTMFA, BOMBAST, and be so kind as to pass this bit of advice on to your soon-to-be ex-girlfriend: If you want a companion animal you can castrate, lady, get a dog. Not a boyfriend. Not a husband. A dog.
Good advice, TDONTD. Thanks for the update!
There are so many great books out there—too many to name—but if you live in a city with a woman-owned, sex-positive, sex-toy store like, say, She Bop (Portland) or Smitten Kitten (Minneapolis) or Venus Envy (Halifax) or Babeland (New York and Seattle) or Come As You Are (Toronto), TP, your best bet is to get to a store, browse through the books section, and find a title that works for you. But if you must have a recommendation: order a copy of Erika Moen's Oh Joy Sex Toy. It's a illustrated/critical guide to sex toys that's also a pro-kink, pro-queer, pro-everybody sex-ed book. And it's fucking funny, TP, and there's nothing like a good laugh—provided by Erika's sense of humane and profane sense of humor (which is evident in the text and the illustrations)—to help relieve prudish tension and keep a sex convo going.
Answers:
1. Take the time to Google vomit and bulimia, SLIME, and you'll quickly learn that lots of potential negative health consequences stem from regular, induced vomiting—from tooth decay to the erosion of the esophagus to mouth sores to rotting gums to broken blood vessels in the eyes. Vomiting once in a great while probably won't do any lasting damage—we evolved to vomit once in a great while—but asking your indulgent-to-fault boyfriend to make vomiting a regular part of your sex life would be both unfair and unhealthy. The hard part is defining "once in a while." Since healthy adults rarely vomit, SLIME, I'd say that your boyfriend shouldn't do this for you more than once a year, tops.
2. I shared your letter with a smart, progressive, sex-positive doctor, a woman who has made other appearances in the column, and she sent this response:
Vomit is not sterile like urine and carries bacteria that are found in our gut. We have bacteria throughout our entire gastrointestinal tract, from mouth to anus. That said, there is also the corrosive nature of vomit to be wary of. People who vomit often risk esophageal tears and bleeding (blood in the vomit requires a trip to the hospital), tooth decay and gum disease caused by the acidity. Electrolyte imbalances may also cause other health problems. The mucosa (or skin) inside of the vagina is the same kind of mucosa we have on the insides of our mouths. Exposing the vagina (which can happen with vulvar exposure) to these acids could cause vaginal irritation and inflammation as well as a change in the pH of the vagina. This could lead to susceptibility to other infections, sexually transmitted or not (as in the case of yeast infections or bacterial vaginosis). I would recommend using good judgement for the frequency of vomiting to reduce health risks as well as avoiding penetrative vaginal play with vomit.
Normally I would credit this smart, progressive, sex-positive doctor by name... but I wasn't sure she would want this particular Q&A; popping up every time someone Googled her A. for the rest of her professional life and B. for all of eternity. So I'm keeping her name out of it.
3. I also shared your letter with Jesse Bering, Associate Professor of Science Communication at the University of Otago in New Zealand, a man whose name doesn't need to be kept out of it. Bering is a frequent contributor to Slate, Scientific American, Das Magazin, and (ahem) "Savage Love." Bering is the author of Perv: The Sexual Deviant In All of Us, and this particular question is right up his alley.
You can find “erotic vomiting” easily enough on shock porn sites. Aficionados refer to this kink as Roman Showers (a nod to the feast-until-you-barf potlucks of ancient times). Mercifully, however, emetophilia is exceedingly rare as a full-blown sexual paraphilia because disgust, for obvious evolutionary reasons, tends to be a natural libido killer for most people. But SLIME isn’t alone in her sensual yearnings for the most intimate innards of her partners. Back in 1982, the psychiatrist Robert Stoller conducted a series of interviews with three female emetophiles and, just like SLIME’s reminiscences of genital excitement upon seeing women with morning sickness, each of these ladies could similarly trace their unusually visceral arousal to an early childhood experience. One believed that it stemmed from her grandmother innocently rubbing her back while she vomited as a six-year-old, her privates being unwittingly stimulated on the old woman’s knee. Another woman believed that her emetophilia was rooted in being sexually abused by her stepfather as an eleven-year-old after he’d caught her masturbating. She was so disgusted by the incident that she vomited, but the two sensations (climaxing in response to the abuse, and then vomiting in response to the man’s actions) became inextricably linked. But the jury is still out on the “causes” of fetishes and kinks, but these anecdotal accounts on the origins of emetophilia, along with countless other such retrospective stories of adults with paraphilias, suggest a sexual imprinting process during childhood development.
Follow Jesse Bering on Twitter.
No need to worry any longer about whether or not you overreacted, STRESSED, because I'm here to tell you that you did. Describing this event as an "affair"—and, yes, I know you meant "affair" in the "matter occasioning public anxiety, controversy, or scandal" sense of the word, not "romantic or passionate attachment" sense—gives you away.
That said... this isn't the sort of thing you wanna under-react to either, particularly if you're insecure and your insecurities, when sandpapered, makes life unpleasant for everyone around you.
I looked up "padiddle," and it's a real term people use for a car with a broken headlight. While the name sounds like it's related to sexy times (blame the "diddle"), it's not inherently sexual—and people are not legally required to start removing articles of clothing when they spot a car with a broken headlight. So someone in that car suggested a game of strip-padiddle, which appears to be a thing. (I also found a story about three girls and a guy who got into a car crash during a game of strip-padiddle. Enjoy.) And why would someone suggest games of strip poker, strip-parcheesi, or strip-padiddle? Because someone wants to see someone else in the room/car/blimp naked. And why do they want to see them naked? Because they wanna fuck 'em.
Someone in that car wanted to fuck your girlfriend, STRESSSED. Could've been one or both of the other girls, or it could've been the guy. It's also possible that someone in that car wanted to see someone else in that car naked—one of the other girls or the sole straight guy. It's possible your girlfriend wanted to see someone naked. But seeing as a twosome in a car is physically/logistically difficult, a foursome would've been impossible. So long as they were in the car.
Anyway!
Nothing good comes out of possessive behavior, like you said, but incidents (not affairs!) like this are a part of a relationship's growing pains. Your girlfriend took off some clothes during a stupid game and you felt jealous. Maybe the person who initiated the game hoped it would lead to a rolling girl-on-girl-on-girl-on-boy orgy. But it didn't. So from your girlfriend's POV, STRESSED, this was hijinks, it was goofing around, and what she thought was some harmless flirtatiousness—and, as your girlfriend later learned, it wasn't okay with her boyfriend and it could've harmed her relationship. She apologized. You forgave her.
Could this happen again? Sure it could. Will it? Hopefully not, STRESSED. And if this and things like it keep not happening again, your girlfriend will win your trust back and you'll stop feeling so stressed out every time she heads to a "potentially sexually charged event with friends." And if this or something like it does happen again—if your girlfriend enjoys flirtatious attention too much to resist and you can't deal—she may not be the right girlfriend for you. But it's possible to have a rock-solid relationship with someone who enjoys flirting with people other than her SO. If she can bask in that kind of attention without fucking anyone else and if she shows you she's still crazy attracted to you and if there's something in it for you too (if she gets revved up by this kind of attention and then comes home and plows all that sexual energy into you), confronting your insecurities instead of your girlfriend could have a big payoff for you.
Listen to my dumb podcast, the Savage Lovecast, at www.savagelovecast.com.
I'm not sure what MWC can do to save his marriage—his wife sounds like a crazy person—but clearly your husband isn't the only married guy out there, AIA, who enjoys flirting (and only flirting) with other women.
My response after the jump...
Don't sell yourself short, NWATB: It's possible that this 18-year-old is into you. He could be one of those younger guys who prefer older men, and bearish older guys could be his type. But the eat-and-run routine makes it somewhat likelier that you're not, in fact, what he's looking for, but all he feels he can safely get. You're far enough away geographically, and far enough removed socially, that there's no risk of exposure. He's not going to run into you on the street when he's walking around with his friends, and the odds that you know someone in common are nonexistent.
Anyway, here's what you do: Tell him that he's hot, tell him that he's a good little cocksucker, but that's not enough for you to sustain your interest. You're not asking to meet his friends or family—you're not asking him to risk exposure—but if he wants to keep blowing you, well, there's going to be some getting to know you. He'll have to risk a conversation now and then, maybe even watching a movie together sometime at your apartment. Tell him you can't be friends-with-benefits with someone who isn't a friend.
A lot of desperate-to-stay-closeted cases convince themselves that they won't ever have to come out if they can get their sexual needs met in one place and their emotional needs met in another. By showing him that a healthy gay person successfully integrates his sexual and emotional needs—which you'll have done whether he keeps coming over or not—you'll be honoring the campsite rule.
There's just one thing you can do, SHIT, other than what you're already doing. In addition to enduring his ramming (and then feeling like shit during and after) or avoiding sex entirely, you could put oral, mutual masturbation, and outercourse on the menu and cut way back on the terrible, horrible, no good, very bad PIV intercourse. With the understanding, of course, that he doesn't get to fuck your mouth the way he's been fucking your pussy.
But there is something he can do about it: he can retrain his cock. Your boyfriend clearly has a terrible, horrible, etc., case of what I call Death Grip Syndrome—difficultly coming during intercourse thanks to that vigorous-to-violent masturbatory style of his—and you're suffering the consequences. He is too, to a lesser extent, as his partner is now avoiding sex. And he can and should take the advice I gave to another man with Death Grip Syndrome:
You'll have to swear off the death grip forever, ABF, if you want your dick to respond to more subtle sensations. When you jerk off, use a light touch and let it take as long as necessary—and it may take a while. When you're with a woman, fuck her brains out and give her orgasms galore, and when it's time for you to come—the moment you're used to taking matters into your own hands and finishing yourself off with the death grip—force yourself to use her body or her mouth or her pussy, or, if you must use your own hand, use that same light touch you've been practicing with when you beat off. If you don't come, well, tough shit, you don't get to come. To avoid giving the women you're with complexes, warn them in advance that you're trying to retrain your dick. While this approach may be frustrating in the short run, in the long run only this approach—a light touch, a firm resolve, and consistent denial—will kick your dick's dormant nerve endings into gear.
Mike Pearl, writing for Vice, did a deep (and skeptical) dive into Death Grip Syndrome—and other "idiosyncratic" forms of masturbation—and the experts he consulted agreed: a guy can do something about it. Pearl:
New York sex therapist Michael A. Perelman [is] a clinical professor of psychology in psychiatry at Cornell University, and co-director of the Human Sexuality Program at The New York Presbyterian Hospital. Perelman has encountered delayed ejaculation in many, many incarnations, including the endless thrusting anecdotally associated with a "death grip."
Full disclosure: Perelman isn't a big fan of my "Death Grip Syndrome" descriptor/theory/diagnoses, which he finds "ridiculously provocative." (Just doing my job, doc, just doing my job.) Back to Pearl:
In a "five year retrospective chart review," (meaning gathering data from his patients' charts) Perelman told us he looked at 80 men with delayed ejaculation, and 37 percent of them had a history of masturbating in a way that stimulated a "specific spot," or "with an idiosyncratic style." He estimates that in total, 40 percent of men who make it to his office after complaining about delayed ejaculation are "idiosyncratic" masturbators. But too tight of a masturbatory grip is just one variation in the wonderful world of idiosyncratic masturbation. "There are a lot of variations on this," he said. In addition to a tight grip, "you've got speed—super rapid simulation. You've got a particular place, and if that place isn't touched, it doesn't work." Then there are the really idiosyncratic ones. "Someone else might always use the same sock," Perelman said.
But, in the end, Perelman's prescription for men with your boyfriend's problem is the same as mine: retrain your cock.
As for what to do about it, Savage was remarkably on point when he changed his boyfriend's habits. Perelman does something similar: "I'll have them suspend masturbation temporarily until they're able to ejaculate with whatever their preferred form of sexual activity is with their partner.
Perelman thinks your boyfriend should stop masturbating, I think your boyfriend should keep masturbating but with a very light touch and, again, if he doesn't come, he doesn't come. But both approaches require your boyfriend to recognize that this is his problem, not yours, and that he has to fix it. And if he won't do that—if he doesn't love you enough to fix his problem (and spare both your pussy and your psyche)—I don't think there's much hope for your relationship.
P.S. In some cases, SHIT, Death Grip Syndrome isn't a problem that can be solved—even with a sincere, good-faith effort on the part of guy suffering from it. Like I said in that column I quoted above...
Your problem may not be fixable, ABF, because your dick, after 30 years of abuse, may be too far gone. If that's the case, you may have to accept your fate, adjust, and deal. Fuck your girlfriends until they're satisfied, then pull out, use the death grip, and when you've reached the point of no return, stuff it back in her.
Fucking the girlfriend until she's satisfied? In your case, SHIT, that means fucking you gently, not slamming in and out of you. Since the point will be your pleasure—your mutual pleasure—not getting him off, there's no need for him to do the ramming that he needs to make himself come. If he can't fix his Death Grip Syndrome, he fucks you until you come, he pulls out, he masturbates in his accustomed/damaging style, gets himself to the point of "orgasmic inevitability," as it's called, and then he slides back in you to come. Mix that up with lots of oral, outercourse, and mutual masturbation, SHIT, and you can have a pretty great sex life with this guy.
Let me guess: You've never met this friend, have you? In person? Face-to-face?
And you've never managed to get her on the phone either, ALLY, right? And you've never had a video chat via Skype, have you? I'm guessing this "friendship"exists only on social media platforms, in private email exchanges, and in message rooms. Maybe you've seen a few of pictures. But they're blurry and you can't really tell if they're the same person, can you? And seeing as you’re aware of the exact mileage between the two of you, I'm guessing you met this woman on a dating app. (Those tend to tell you exactly how far you are from the person you wanna bang, even if you’re on the other side of the world.) I’m asking these particular questions and making these particular guesses, ALLY, because I think you’re being catfished.
Take it away, Urban Dictionary:
Catfish: Someone who pretends to be someone they're not using Facebook or other social media to create false identities, particularly to pursue deceptive online romances.
Why would someone pretend to be a trans twentysomething who clearly needs help, spend hours online convincing good people to offer help, and then refuse all help? For attention. For kicks. To pass the time. To scam people. Because they feel entitled to sympathy and attention and don't think their actual plight, whatever it might be, is interesting or sexy enough to attract much of either. Who the fuck knows?
But this much we do know, ALLY: If you’ve never met or spoken with this person—if it's all been texting and social media and one or two blurry photographs (and an anime avatar, right?)—this person may not be who she says she is.
Ask your friend to Skype or talk via Snapchat. (The latter is less invasive, but you’ll still be able to verify she’s a real person). If she can't or won't Skype or Snap with you, ALLY, there's your proof. If she does Skype/Snap with you, great. Doesn't mean she isn't catfishing you, of course, but at least then you can beg her—one last time—to accept the help and the resources already offered to her. If you know people who can help her in Atlanta, connect with them and create an escape plan. But the decision to accept or reject your help is ultimately hers, ALLY. If she decides to stay in Biblefuck, Georgia, surrounded by cruel makeup-case-withholding grannies and nail-driving cousins, well, then she's made her choice: She's in a terrible situation but doesn't want to be helped or she's lying and doesn't really need help. (People do lie about shit they shouldn't lie about.)
Honestly, ALLY, I hope your friend is fake—because otherwise someone is out there, suffering terribly, all because she's self-destructively invested in winning over an idiotic/barely-credible collection of Southern Gothic grotesques. But even if she's real, ALLY, you can't force someone to accept your help. If you can't help help her—for whatever reason—there are surely trans and gender-nonconforming people in your own community who could really use some help and might be willing to accept yours.
UPDATE: From the Dept. of FFS: My response to ALLY is being held up as evidence of my alleged—my routinely and falsely alleged—transphobia.

Skepticism is not hatred. I am often skeptical—deeply skeptical—when responding to letters from straight and gay people. (Somehow my skepticism in those cases is never been held up as evidence of heterophobia or homophobia.) And, yes, I am aware that trans people are subjected to higher rates of violence—physical, economic, and familial—than other groups. It's appalling, it's unjust, and anyone who actually follows my column or listens to my podcast has heard me condemn anti-trans violence. (Here's a recent report on the hardships trans Americans face—a report that would've gotten more traction and play in the media if these idiots hadn't decided to shit the bed by lodging bullshit charges of transphobia against Kim Peirce.)
As for my specific advice to ALLY, I suggested that their friend—who sounded like an online-only friend—might be catfishing them. I wasn't the only person who thought that might be the case. People do lie. People have lied about being raped. People have lied about being gay bashed. To suggest that no one could possibly lie about having a shitty family—an appallingly shitty family that they refuse to detach from—is absurd. I also allowed for the possibility that ALLY wasn't being catfished and that their friend might, indeed, be in the dire situation described and I encouraged ALLY to offer help and to make a plan with others to get her help. ("If you know people who can help her in Atlanta, connect with them and create an escape plan. But the decision to accept or reject your help is ultimately hers, ALLY.") And I concluded by encouraging ALLY to look around for trans and gender-nonconforming people in their own community who might need help and be willing to accept it. Because that's how we transphobes roll.
Full disclosure: I heard back from ALLY, who informed me that they believe they're not being catfished and shared some proof. ALLY also took me to task for my response. But ALLY slapped me around for a perfectly valid reason: they didn't think my response was helpful. And because I'm always willing to take my legit lumps—that's how we Catholic boys roll—here's ALLY's letter:
Would it have killed you to ask for further info? No, she doesn't have an anime cutesy picture. No, her profile wasn't created within the last two months. Yes, she seems to have a reasonable number of friends, contacts and posts about other things than gender dysphoria. I was kinda hoping I'd be able to link her to an answer you'd give to push her over that "If you won't help yourself, no one else can" hump, but your answer is so asinine that I don't have the heart to do that. All in all, 3/10, not sure if I would write again. But thank you for trying.
I wrote back to ALLY...
Sorry about whiffing this one. it just seemed like cat fishing could be a possibility. But, yes, I should’ve written back to you. (Writing LWers back isn't always possible, though.)  But, again, someone who refuses help can’t be helped. So the rest of my advice—admittedly only about 20% of it—stands. If she won’t accept help, if she won’t get out, there’s not much you can do from 4500 miles away. The only thing I would add, if i were talking to her directly, is the same thing I’ve said to other trans people (and gay people and lesbian people and bi people and poly people and kinky people) with deeply shitty families: the only leverage you have over your family of origin is your presence. if they won’t treat you with respect, don’t be a presence in their lives. In other words: get the hell away from them and stay the hell away from them.
And ALLY wrote back to me...
You are right, of course. None of us can really help her if she will not help herself. Which is half the reason why I wrote to you in the first place—to send her the link to your, "Hey! Take the bleeping outstretched hand already, you silly girl!" response. Only you would have chosen more elaborate words, I'm sure.
UPDATE 2: Someone in the comments suggested I wouldn't question a gay boy with a similar tale/shitty family. Yeah, no: Friends of a gay boy being abused by his family wrote me in 2015 and asked for my help. I asked them for proof that what they said was true, I got them on the phone and interviewed them, I asked them to send me documentation, transcripts, and letters of admission from the university the boy got into and his shitty, homophobic family was trying to prevent him from attending. I did all that to make sure it wasn't a scam—to make sure he wasn't catfishing. So, yeah, I would treat a gay boy with the same skepticism. In fact, I did.
My response after the jump...
You can certainly negotiate a "one-and-done" agreement, WAW, but if you find the idea of pissing on your boyfriend upsetting—if the thought doesn't just leave you cold but actually revolts and/or traumatizes you—then you don't have to go through with it. (You're not trapped in some piss-fetish version of The Merchant of Venice, WAW. You don't need a Portia to rescue you from this verbal contract.) As for sexy, safe, and sanitary: You don't have to find it sexy, he's not going to drown, droppeth your gentle rain upon him in the tub.
DEAR READERS: DMMA sent me that letter in 2006. She wasn't referring to Donald Trump, our current awful president, but George W. Bush, our last truly awful president. I thought DMMA's idea was great, I put up a website (impeachthemotherfuckeralready.com), and I raised more than $20,000 selling ITMFA lapel pins and buttons. I donated half the money to the ACLU and the other half to two Democratic candidates for the US Senate. (My readers didn't just help turf Rick Santorum out of office by turning his name into a dirty joke—they raised money too!)
I didn't think I'd see a worse president than George W. Bush in my lifetime. But here we are. So I'm bringing back ITMFA buttons and adding T-shirts and, yes, red hats to the ITMFA collection. Go to impeachthemotherfuckeralready.com or, if that's too much typing, ITMFA.org to order some ITMFA swag for yourself or someone you love. Let's make #ITMFA our response to #MAGA! All money raised will be donated to the American Civil Liberties Union, Planned Parenthood, and the International Refugee Assistance Project. And, yes, we're going to add coffee mugs soon! And lapel pins!
We're in for a long and ugly four years, readers. Let's raise some money for groups fighting Trump, let's bring ITMFA back into our everyday vocabulary, and let's remember that we—people who voted against Trump, people who want to see him out of office as quickly as possible, people who are appalled by this and this and this and this—are the majority.
ITMFA!
Like I told someone else about "The One" recently...
Remember, OTF, there is no "the one." There's no perfect person, no perfect person for you, no perfect match, no perfect fit, no perfect lid for your perfect pot, etc. You'll meet a .64 or two if you're lucky—if you're really lucky you might even meet a .72—and it's your job to round that motherfucker up to one. It's easy to convince ourselves early in a relationship that we've stumbled over a .92 or a .97 or even a 1.00, i.e. someone who it's either easy to round up or who doesn't require rounding up, but a few years in—no later than six years in—we can clearly see those .92s for the .64s they are and always were.
I've been talking about non-existent "The Ones" and actually obtainable/doable/marryable ".64s" for a long, long time. (Look at how black my hair was!) Glad to see it's sinking in.  
But before we determine if this woman is the .64 you could round the fuck up to one, BREASTS, I have a two concerns: She's only recently single and she hasn't demonstrated any interest in you... and there you are, BREASTS, debating whether your preference for/love of large breasts could ruin this relationship. So, yeah. Seems to me like you're putting the cart before the horse. (I wish there was a sexy version of that cart-before-the-horse aphorism. Putting the swallow before the blow? The aftercare before the flogging? The dick in the butt before applying the lube to the dick? Get to work on it, people.)
But let's game this out. Does a woman lacking the breasts you wank to drop her below .64 on your personal scale? Perhaps. But if you're capable of appreciating her body as-is, BREASTS, if big boobs are nice but not essential, her small breasts may knock off a few points. And you cite lots of things that drive her points back up: she's "smart, funny, ambitious and beautiful" (we should all be so lucky to have partners we can describe that way) and you two have "very similar values" (ditto). So, hey, maybe once she's ready and not reeling from her breakup, BREASTS, ask this girl on a date.
Maybe she'll say yes and everything will work out and you two will spend the rest of your lives together and you'll make sure she knows you love her body as-is and she'll be mature enough to accept that you like her body type and other body types too and she won't freak out when she stumbles over your porn browser history and who knows? Maybe you two will have a baby someday and she'll suddenly have big boobs. It could happen. Or maybe she'll say yes and you'll date for a few weeks or months before realizing, nope, you're not a match and her breasts weren't the issue and you'll part on good terms. Or maybe she'll say "Thanks but no thanks, BREASTS, I'm not interested in you that way" and you won't have to worry about the crossing the boobicon or whatever. (Sorry—it's late here.) There are so many steps to take before it's time to worry about whether you need to end a relationship you're not actually in because boobs.
Our sexual interests can evolve based on our partners, BREASTS. A girl you're really into could be really into sucking your toes and then—bam!—you develop a thing for feet. And then there's this sometimes disputed evolutionary theory:
Whereas most primates have a great view of the female's reproductive organs, particularly the fatty deposits on their butts, humans look more at the top half of each another's bodies. As a result, evolution gave women fatty deposits on their chests that resemble the buttocks, exciting males so they would still want to get it on.
Wasn't it nice of evolution to give us that? Breasts look butts! So, hey, if your future girlfriend doesn't have the kind of cleavage you like on the top half of the front of her body, BREASTS, turn her over and enjoy the original cleavage on the lower half of the backside of her body.

Take it slow, ALONE, be proud of the work you've already done, and start working toward your goal of moving—if that's what you wanna do—in four years. (With any luck the next four years will FLY THE FUCK BY. Please, Jesus, please.)
And take it easy on yourself: Coming out is hard. (Or it usually is—individual results may vary.) It's even harder when you're raising a kid, harder still as a single parent, and infinitely harder in a small and illiberal town. You're in a tough spot, ALONE.
And so, potentially, is your kid. As parents, we gotta be there for our kids, and one of the best ways we can be there for them is by being healthy, confident, autonomous adults. It's terrific that you've found a good therapist, ALONE. I've become a huge proponent of getting your ass into therapy and working through your shit—but just like doctors, babysitters, anti-depressants, jobs, and butt plugs, it can take some time to find the right fit. Keep showing up to those appointments, ALONE, and if this therapist doesn't work out then try out a new one.
But please don't lose sight of your kid while you work on yourself. Check in with her regularly, ALONE, to make sure she isn't being bullied or ostracized because her mom came out. Your daughter may be feeling some feelings and/or thinking some thoughts that put you on the spot. Don't view them as attacks—she's still a child—and encourage her to express her issues/concerns/fears too. Your kid may need some outside (non-mom, perhaps professional) support as well.
As for finding other lesbians.... 
Yes, apps can be a minefield. Even when women mark that they're only seeking women, ALONE, asshole straight dudes barge in, as you've experienced. There's also Her, a lesbian dating app that could be helpful, but there may not be users in your area. Lesbian hook-up culture is more word-of-mouth, lesbian-event, and meet-my-ex driven. But despite the handful of negative experiences you've had on dating apps, you should hop back on and keep trying. It can be difficult to meet people IRL everywhere, even in gayborhoods (LGBTQorhoods?), but it's especially difficult in rural areas with small queer populations. Dating apps can be a blessing to a single, rural lesbian. Even if you can't meet up with anyone, you may find people who are willing to chat. There may not be much of a queer community where you live (right now), but you can definitely find queer community/communities online.
Even if there isn't more than one other lesbian in your tiny town (which might be your reality, but probably isn't), there are so many places online where you can find solidarity, advice, and (if you want) sexual connection. (Cyber sex can feel like a consolation prize, I realize, but it's a pretty good one.) Private Facebook groups (where moderators can screen for homophobes, trolls, and menz) are a great place to connect with other lesbians. I won't post specific examples here, for fear of trolls invading them, but you'll probably find some suggestions from my (often insightful, frequently helpful, occasionally asshole-y) commenters. (If you're having trouble, message back and I'll have one of the tech-savvy at-risk youths send along a list.)
Your allies and peers and future girlfriends may be hundreds of miles away from you right now physically, ALONE, but they can be at your side (an in your pants) right now virtually.
Oh, and for context: Daffyd Thomas eventually discovered that out he actually wasn't the only gay in his village.

Maybe you'll have the same luck. Welcome out, ALONE!

That being said, CLIT, thanks for the offer. We hardly deserve it.

Let it go, COLD.
Take it away, Dr. Sara Pentlicky of Planned Parenthood...
The short answer is no. It is almost impossible (if not entirely impossible) for you to transmit HSV-1 (the herpes that causes oral cold sores) from your mouth to your genitals. This is true for two reasons. First, because you have cold sores you have antibodies to HSV-1 that will fight any new exposure, making it unlikely for you to ever develop genital HSV-1. Second, herpes doesn’t live on dry skin surfaces (hence herpes blisters don’t form on fingers). Therefore, it is even less likely that touching a cold sore and then removing a tampon would transmit HSV-1. However, everyone should wash their hands often and definitely after touching herpes blisters. Herpes transmission happens during skin to skin contact with skin that is susceptible to infection: i.e. genital to genital, mouth to mouth, or mouth to genital. Thus, it is almost impossible for you contract genital HSV-1 from your cold sores.
Throw this fear away, COLD. Never think about again. Bury “this horror” along with all the other things that aren’t possible in 2017, like affordable health care, a free press, and a sane lady president. (Just kidding, kinda—we can still fight for those things.)
And, hey! Isn’t it great to have Planned Parenthood around to answer our questions? Here’s my regular reminder to SUPPORT PLANNED PARENTHOOD. Donate to Planned Parenthood by following this link. Even a small, symbolic donations of five or ten bucks helps because the number of donors matters just as much as the amount of money Planned Parenthood raises.
Finally, COLD, people don’t have sex for plenty of reasons, from asexuality to grad school to busyness to health issues. I don’t know if you’re beating yourself up about being accidentally celibate for five years—but if you are: stop! 

So long as you're wanking alone, so long as you're wanking with a reasonable expectation of privacy, and so long as you're not bothering anyone besides your sex partners and sex-advice professionals about your wanking, (Not) ALWAYS, you can wank to whatever you'd like.*
Your question reminds me of an example I've used before, (Not) ALWAYS: the shoe salesman with a foot fetish. Let's say a guy working in a high-end shoe store has an intense attraction to feet. Is it inappropriate for him to get an obvious boner while helping women try on shoes? Of course it is, (Not) ALWAYS, because then his secret thrill isn't secret anymore. It would also be inappropriate for him to drool and to pant—and it would be super inappropriate of him to ask the women he's serving if he can jack off about their feet after his shift. But if he can be completely professional, if he can go eight hours without giving off any signs of secret perving, that guy can sell shoes IMO.
And he's free to upload mental images to his spank bank for later—we're all free to do so, all day long, every day, and it's only creepy if the people whose images we're uploading/repurposing are made aware that we're uploading/repurposing them.
So in answer to your question, (Not) ALWAYS, under no circumstances should you ask the girls whose selfies you wank to for their permission. On some level people who post pictures to social media—men and women—know they run the risk of their pics being wanked to by random strangers. But there's a difference between knowing some stranger out there might be wanking to your pics and hearing from an actual wanking stranger. Being asked for permission drags the poster into someone else's fantasies and forces unwelcome and unsolicited mental images into their heads—and not only is that creepy, (Not) ALWAYS, it's also no way to show your gratitude. If some stranger makes your day by posting a hot pic, why would you want to ruin theirs—or make them think twice about post less revealing pics—by telling them what you're doing while you gaze at it?
The internet is a public space like the street is a public space, (Not) ALWAYS, and we encounter weird crap and pretty faces on the daily in both. If you saw a girl on the street that you thought was hot you wouldn't stop her to ask if you're allowed to wank about her later. You would no more ask a stranger that question than you would flash your penis at her because both constitute sexual harassment. (Promise me you wouldn't do either of those things.) You would instead walk on by, (Not) ALWAYS, minding your own business while discreetly filing a mental image in your spank bank. You should behave similarly on social media: don't harass, don't stalk, don't send unsolicited dick pics, and don't ask for permission to wank.
* Not kiddie porn, never kiddie porn.

Let's review the options you've decided are a waste of time and money, ANAL.
Bars. You aren't the first person to make this complaint and you won't be the last. I guarantee you there are people—right now—in bars complaining that bars are a waste of time and money. But you know what also happens at bars? Or, best practices, shortly after people leave bars with someone(s) they met in said bars? People get laid. They get their dicks sucked, their pussies licked, their holes fingered, their asses caressed or slapped, their balls cupped or busted, their tits sucked or clamped, etc. For every whiny complaint that bars are a waste of time and money there's a counterexample proving the opposite—a counterexample proving that, yes, the investment of time and money and liver function can pay off. But, ANAL, there are plenty of people who aren't going to bars for hookups, and it often comes down to trial and error and kismet at bars and clubs. Which brings us to...
Meet Ups. The term "Meet Up" is kind of vague. It can mean strangers coming together because they're interested in anything from board games to fursuit orgies. So, what type of Meet Ups were you going to? Was it Daddies Looking For Twinks? Straight Dudes Wanting To Do Anal With Femme Guys Without Tats? Or were you going to a general community meet up, hoping to find some "slim, VERY smooth" guy "with a bit of a preppy look"? Because that's probably too specific of a request for a Meet Up, which leads us to...
Online Dating & Apps. If you're looking for something specific—like, say, slim and very smooth guys with a bit of a preppy look, no tats, into both anal and older gentlemen with entitlement issues and a strong preference for women—then your best option is online dating and apps. Gay hookup apps let you get pretty specific, ANAL. Beyond being able to put exactly what you're looking for on your profile, you're also usually able to search based on build and age (sometimes for an extra fee). But, ANAL, even though gay hookup apps give you the exact platform you're looking for, you've decided online dating's also a waste of time and money... which makes me think your attitude is the real problem here.
Here's the thing, ANAL, good sex isn't always easy to find. Ideal/fantasy/perfect partners are even harder to find. Sometimes, especially if you're looking for something ridiculously specific, it can take a while. Sometimes years. Sometimes several lives. It's great you're able to identify the type of dude you wanna fuck, but you're gonna need some more patience, if not open-mindedness, before you can find exactly what you want.
Get back online, ANAL, find the right bar, keep going to Rain City Jacks. Move on all fronts. It takes time. Buck up. Stop whining. Keep looking.
P.S. If everybody—men and women, smooth and hairy, tatted and not—is blowing you off after a few dates/hookups, then problem probably isn't "everybody." It's probably you. So you might wanna waste some time and money on a good therapist—it's never too late—who can help you with your interpersonal skills. If you don't wanna waste time and/or money on a therapist anymore than you wanna waste time and money on bars, apps, or Meet Ups, ANAL, then you really should consider hiring a sex worker.


Sometimes we stay in a relationship longer than we should because the sex is good, CUMM, and sometimes good sex keeps us in a relationship we thought we wanted out of but later realize we don't actually want out of. Good sex—it can put something on life support that needs to die or it can keep something alive long enough for us to recognize its value.
Presumably your relationship with your ex fell into the needed-to-die category. But now that it's dead... you're really missing all that good sex. One possible solution: reaching out to your ex and seeing if he'd be interested in being friends with benefits. If the sex was as good for him as it was for you, CUMM, perhaps he'd be down for some casual fucking with clear boundaries—boundaries like, "I'm not having kids ever, dude, and I'm not becoming a Baptist/Scientologist/Whateverist just to keep your dick coming, okay?"
That seems like the obvious thing to do.
It's so obvious, CUMM, I can only assume you thought of that already and vetoed it for a valid reason—like, maybe, "My ex-boyfriend is too religious for casual sex." Or perhaps your ex is in a monogamous relationship now with someone else. Or maybe he's a mean, terrible person that you wouldn't have wasted more than a single evening/weekend on if the sex weren't so good. If fucking your ex isn't an option for one or more of these reasons I've listed (or some other very good reason(s)), then what do you do? Well, CUMM, if the sex was good because you had chemistry... chemistry is all about elements and compounds. So maybe Identifying the elements that made for good sex can help you recreate it with someone new?
So what made the sex good, CUMM? The way you handled each other? The positions? The restraints? THE RUSSIAN SEX WORKERS PEEING ON THE BED? Identify those components, CUMM, and then tell these mediocre men what it takes to get you off good.
Or you could keep fucking other guys until you find one who's just as good or even better than your ex.

Oh yeah, GEAR, the "just my preference" gays.
JMPGs pop up everywhere in this country, of course, but they're thicker on the ground in more conservative areas. And they have enablers. Just last year, Scruff's founders defended the app's ability to filter people based on their race as a preference and not casual racism that allows guys to block other users based on the color of their skin. (And as Colby Keller demonstrated last fall, it's (unfortunately) silly to think that a person who's into gay sex—and really, really good at it—would find Orange Julius Ceasar's blatant racism disqualifying.)
But first and again and for the record but sadly not for once and for all (for reasons I'll unpack in a moment), here's something I had to say on the subject last year...
A quick word to gay white men: It's fine to have "preferences." But we need to examine our preferences and give some thought to the cultural forces that may have shaped them. It's a good idea to make sure your preferences are actually yours and not some limited and limiting racist crap pounded into your head by TV, movies, and porn. But while preferences are allowed (and gay men of color have them, too), there's no excuse for littering Grindr or Tinder or Recon—or your conversations in bars—with dehumanizing garbage like "no Asians," "no Blacks," "no femmes," "no fatties," etc.
Now on to my theory about casually and/or thoughtlessly and/or maliciously racist JMPGs...
While you can definitely find examples of white gays in their 30s and 40s (and older) doing this kind of crap, it's much more prevalent among younger gay white men. These young guys—often recently out and many from overwhelmingly white areas—get online and start saying dumb, racist shit. So long as they stay in the middle of Kansas or Utah or South Carolina, GEAR, they're not gonna get a lot of pushback. But when a JMPG moves to Chicago or Los Angeles or Baltimore, they suddenly encounter some pushback. Other gay men start to hold them accountable—by which I mean to say, "Other gay men get in their fucking faces," "Other gay men publicly shame them," and, "Other gay men with a lot of time on their hands and more patience than average will slowly explain to them just how shitty they're being."
Decent gay men of all ages and races often despair over this "just my preference" crap because it never seems to stop. That's not true; it does stop—individuals stop. Ideally, after people get in the face of a JMPG, his dormant moral imagination kicks into gear. He starts to think about how would he feel, he recalls what he learned about the Golden Rule back in Sunday School, he makes a few friends of color. Maybe he even takes the time figure out whether his precious preferences are actually his or if he's mindlessly adopted monochromatic preferences assigned to him by porn and racist "beauty ideals." And then he stops being a JMPG. Even if he determines that, yes, he's primarily or exclusively attracted to white guys, he finds a way to talk about his preferences without disparaging anyone.
What happens next... well, what happens next is kinda depressing. Another young and/or dumb gay white man comes along who doesn't know any better to take the place of our ex-JMPG and the whole get-in-his-face/publicly-shame-him/patiently-explain-to-him process starts up all over again.
When you see JMPGers, GEAR, you should say something. Pushback. Be a part of the solution, even if it's slow, one-dude-at-at-time work. With effort we can get out in front of this someday and hit a point of diminishing returns and watch "just my preference" gays go extinct. But for the time being, GEAR, we all have a role to play in combatting JMPG.

Ending a relationship if things aren't working out is a good idea, SOS, but if you're going to end it anyway... why not open it up first? It could be the hallelujah pass that saves and improves your relationship or it could be the beginning of the inevitable end. But if the end is inevitable—which you can't know for sure—you've got nothing to lose by opening it up.
If I were in your shoes, SOS, I would give her permission to fuck this guy, wait a week or four, and see what happens. She may freak out at your suggestion—she'll probably freak out—but she clearly wants to fuck this guy. Right now you symbolize, “No, you can’t," to your girlfriend. That’s a desire killer. If you symbolized, “Yes, you can," to her, SOS, her desire—for you, to be clear—could kick back into gear. Or, then again, it might be dead and gone for good. Only one way to find out.


My views on cosmetic surgery: Our bodies are ours to use, and ours to use up—or alter, if we so choose.
My cutting to the chase: If you want bigger boobs, SMALL, feel free to get bigger boobs. Preferences are personal. Some people love big boobs (on themselves or others), some people love small boobs (ditto), some people have no strong preference one way or the other (ditto some more). There's a scene in Fleabag where Phoebe Waller-Bridge's character is lusted after for her tiny boobs, with a man hornily rattling off, "They’re so fucking tiny. They’re hardly even there. Where the fuck even are they?" (Kind of the opposite of "admiring speechlessness," I know, but close to the impact you're looking for and with the breasts you have now.) Other guys get off on being smothered by monster tits. But while one person's (or the majority of one gender's) preferences for your body shouldn't take precedent over your own preferences, SMALL, you're allowed to have your own preferences and your own reasons for having them and you're allowed to make changes to your own body for your own reasons. And it seems you've already made a decision: You want bigger boobs. So do it? Maybe? After consulting with a physician? After talking to shrink? To work through your conflicted feelings/motivations? And definitely after acquainting yourself with the possible side effects?
People from all walks of life get cosmetic surgery for reasons big and small. Of course, talking about plastic surgery can get messy. We encourage women to strive for unrealistic bodies and also disparage women for getting plastic surgery to achieve them. So, in a "damned if you do and damned if you don't" dilemma, SMALL, what do you do? You do what you want—and what you want doesn't sound unrealistic or unachievable. You just want a set. You're the only person living in your body (unless you're posessed or something, which you aren't (right?))—and like a tattoo, a gigantic ear gauge, a cock piercing or worse, the decision is ultimately and finally yours to make. Interrogate your motives, think it through, side effects, etc., but if you decide to do this... you have my (wholly unnecessary) blessing.
Some thoughts: Boob jobs require maintenance, a thing often overlooked before cosmetic surgery. They'll need to be replaced about every decade. (A mother of one my Tech-Savvy At-Risk Youth didn't replace her breast implants for almost twenty years. She suffered an almost-fatal leak that landed her in the ER three times. It's rare, but it can happen.) Also, a no-brainer, but breast implants feel different from natural breasts, so work with a good, patient doc who'll find you an implant you'll love. And again... there are risks.


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats, lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
You could dig in your heels and tell them to fuck off, KNOTS... but your fiancé and future husband is included in that plural pronoun ("them"). Do you really wanna tell him to fuck off? Also among the go-fuck-offs: your future MIL. I assume she didn't vote for Trump—otherwise you would object to her coming to the wedding too—and I wonder if you wanna start your marriage by putting your future husband in the uncomfortable position of having to choose between upsetting his mother and upsetting his fiancé?
Maybe you do, KNOTS.
Maybe your future husband allows himself to be bossed around by his overbearing mom and your man needs to start standing up to his mommy and if you're the most important person in his life—if you're the person with whom he wants to spend his life and make his immediate next-of-kin through marriage (supplanting dear ol' mom and dad in the process)—now might be a good time for him to start standing up to his overbearing mother. Because you should come first and your feelings—particularly in regards to your own wedding—should take precedence over hers.
But does your fiancé routinely cave to his mom? Is his mother overbearing? Or is she lovely and would having these four dumbfucks at the wedding mean a lot to her? And what kind of relatives are we talking about crossing off the guest list here? Are we talking about cousins or are we talking about siblings? Are we talking about hurting the fee-fees of some near-/glorified-strangers you're unlikely to see ever again or are we talking about going to war with people you're gonna see again and again at family events—Christmases, Thanksgivings, weddings, funerals, milestone birthdays—where someone else is in control of the guest list?
I'm torn.
I definitely think people who voted for Trump should be held accountable, KNOTS, and exacting a social price is one way of holding them accountable. Lots of people didn't go home for the holidays this year to communicate their displeasure to Trump-voting family members. It was a move I supported, KNOTS, and not just rhetorically: Terry and I hosted a refugee from a red state over Christmas.
But... but... but... 
Compromise is the grease that lubricates a marriage. As SPUNK Lube is to your ass, KNOTS, so compromise will be to your marriage. Over the years you're gonna have to weigh your preferences against those of your husband when you're making choices about all sorts of things, from buying housewares to buying houses, from having kids to having threesomes. Sometimes there's not going to be a middle ground—sometimes there's no compromise that allows everyone to win—and one of you is gonna have to lube up and take one for the team.
A wedding wouldn't have to make a political statement, KNOTS, in an ideal world. But in a world with a Trump/Pence White House, gay weddings will continue to be politicized. And you don't want these Trump voters at your wedding, KNOTS, for totally legit political and personal reasons. But if your fiancé has to invite these four assholes to your wedding to keep the peace with his otherwise lovely mother, KNOTS, here's the compromise you should propose/demand: a speech will be given, either during the ceremony or at the reception, about the importance of defending marriage equality from Donald Trump, Mike Pence, and anyone they might get away with appointing to the Supreme Court. Put pens and donation envelopes for Lambda Legal and the National Center for Lesbian Rights at every place setting and encourage your guests to join you in resisting Trump/Pence by making small, symbolic donations—or great big ones—to either or both of these excellent organizations. Send your cute flower girls/boys/nonbinaries around to collect the envelopes and make an awwwwwwe moment out of it.
Don't run the idea by your fiancé's mom, KNOTS. Just do it. Will the two couples who voted for Trump be made to feel uncomfortable? Yes, they will—and they should feel uncomfortable (and ashamed, IMO). Knowing that moment is coming, knowing a point will be made, should help you relax and enjoy your wedding and your other guests. And who knows? Maybe spending an evening surrounded by people who didn't vote for Trump/Pence will have an impact. Maybe hearing your friend's speech and seeing other people fill out those envelopes will make these four assholes less likely to vote for Trump/Pence in 2020—or Pence/Santorum if Trump is impeached in his first term, which looks likelier with every passing day.
Basically, KNOTS, I'm suggesting that you can invite these two couples to your wedding and tell them to fuck off. You can have it all, gurl.
P.S. After the election I received scores of letters from nervous gay and queer couples asking if they should get married ASAP, and those questions are still coming in. So once again: Shannon Minter, the legal director for the National Center for Lesbian Rights, which has taken marriage-rights cases to the US Supreme Court (and won), gave this advice:
There is no realistic possibility that anyone's marriage will be invalidated. The law is very strong that if a marriage is valid when entered, it cannot be invalidated by any subsequent change in the law. So people who are already married should not be concerned that their marriage can be taken away.
Additionally, it's unlikely that marriage equality will be overturned. Minter again:
The doctrine of stare decisis—which means that courts generally will respect and follow their own prior rulings—is also very strong, and the Supreme Court very rarely overturns an important constitutional ruling so soon after issuing it. Even the appointment of an anti-marriage-equality justice to replace Justice Scalia would not jeopardize the Supreme Court's 2015 ruling on marriage equality, and the great majority of Americans still strongly support the freedom of same-sex couples to marry.
That said, this administration is armed to attack the rights of women and minorities, and there are plenty of fights coming our way—including other attacks on queer rights. Trans people are especially vulnerable. We can fight by donating our time and money, by paying attention, by making sure everyone we know is registered to vote, by showing up to vote in midterms and off-year elections, and by reading this and following its recommendations.


Congrats on your engagement, VOW.
Weddings can be fucking stressful, especially if you're throwing a Brides-Magazine-straight-people-type-of-wedding or its gay counterfarce. (To be clear: I'm not saying same-sex weddings are farcical versions of straight ones, only that completely over-the-top/no-expense-spared/arriving-by-fucking-helicopter gay weddings are as big a waste of time and money as straight ones.) You have so many things to think about and discuss, VOW, but a long-ago/pseudo/soft infidelity isn't one of them.
Being with someone for eight years is an accomplishment (although one that should feel relatively effortless), VOW, and very few of us manage to get to eight years without making at least one or two shitty choices. But good news: making a few shitty choices—making a mistake or two dozen along the way—doesn't make you a shitty person. It makes you a human person.
And was what you did a mistake without any redeeming features? Or was it a mistake you made early-ish in your relationship, back before your commitment was formalized/eternalized (before he proposed, before you accepted, before you were actually married), the kind of mistake that helped you appreciate what you had? Sounds to me like you stared into the abyss—you saw what you were capable of, you thought about the risk you were running, you realized you could've lost the man you want to spend your life with—and you pulled back. Your recent engagement brought back memories of that abyss and now you're having panic attacks. But instead of beating yourself up endlessly for this "mistake," VOW, you should regard at as an important formative experience, a valuable life lesson, something that made you more likely to honor the monogamous commitment you're about to make/remake, not less likely. (My rationalizations are better than yours, VOW, because mine are rationale.)
I order you to stop obsessing about this, VOW. It might help to imagine how you would feel if the shoe tongue was on the other foot in the other mouth. If your fiancé had made out with some rando six years ago (and who's to say he didn't?) and swapped a few dirty phone calls with that rando long before you got engaged... would you want to know? Would you want him to confess all? Would you want him up all night, consumed by guilt? Or would you want him to keep his fucking mouth shut, let it go, and get some sleep? The latter, I suspect/hope. (Bonus rationalization: there are probably definitely one or two things he's done over the last eight years—one or two mistakes he's made—that he hasn't told you about it. Forgive him for his his as-yet-undisclosed errors at the same you forgive yourself for yours, VOW.)
So stuff that married man down the memory hole (do NOT contact him again) and get on with the wedding planning/helicopter booking—and if your family and friends really would abandon you over something like this, VOW, then you really need to make better friends and spend less time with your family. Same goes for your love: If he finds out about this—which he won't (unless you tell him (which you're NOT going to do)), and abandons you... then you need to get yourself a better fiancé.
And if you're not already a pot smoker, VOW, take it up.

He's fucking other women.
Wait! I don't know that for sure! I can't say that with any certainty! I had a feeling reading your letter but feelings aren't proof! But I was thinking that—and thinking it loudly—even before I got to that highly incriminating "never say never." My bullshit detectors autotranslated that "never say never" to "taking photos is how I get into women's pants and I'm in other women's pants all the time and I don't need to take your photos because I'm already in your pants and when did you say you're going out of town next, honey?"
Maybe I'm being harsh. Maybe I'm being pessimistic. Maybe I'm being an asshole.
So let's start over...
Mutual respect and admiration are important ingredients in any relationship, PHOTOG, but the word I want to emphasize here is mutual. I'm concerned that, in the case of you and your incredibly sexy fine art photographer never-saying-never BF, you're more FG (fangirl) than GF (girlfriend). Yes, yes: It's wonderful that he found photography and that it brings him joy. But your boyfriend doesn't belong on a pedestal—no one's boyfriend does—not even if his "incredible talent and eye for beauty and detail" is admired by all. Boyfriends are things you love and fuck, not things you gaze at in awe whenever they aren't photographing nude women they may or may not be fucking (but so totally are fucking) because you aren't allowed to gaze at them in awe while they are photographing nude women they may not be fucking (but so totally are fucking).
Zooming out: Dating an artist who works with nudes sounds like the beginning of a hipster romance novel or a two-season arc on House of Cards. But it also sounds like a cliche. Remember what happened in Titanic after Kate got Jack to draw her like one of his French girls? The scene fades to Kate being a sentimental old woman, reminiscing about the lover she let drown in the freezing Atlantic ocean. (The transition is pretty jarring.) My point: tragedy befalls those who romance cliches. Or something. Maybe that's not my point. Maybe this Titanic aside is just an excuse to say I TOTALLY AGREE WITH ROXANNE GAY. Rose killed Jack. Case closed.
Full disclosure: I think one of the Christmas cookies I ate before sitting down to bang out today's SLLOTD might've been made with chartreuse butter.
Anyway...
Have the two of you had a conversation about maybe having an honest open relationship, PHOTOG? People in consensually non-monogamous relationships, according to the latest studies, "have similar psychological well-being and relationship quality as monogamists." People in non-consensually non-monogamous relationships, on the other hand, don't rank highly on those "well-being" and "relationship quality" charts. And it seems clear you're either in a non-monogamous relationship now or will be soon. If monogamy is a deal breaker for you and your BF knows it, PHOTOG, then "never say never" is a shitty thing to say (and cheating on you, if he's already cheating on you*, is a shitty thing to do). I'd like to think there's more to your relationship than your fangirling and your boyfriend's indifference to your wants, needs, and anxieties, but I'm not certain there is. So, yeah. DTMFA.
* He's already cheating on you.

Your first mistake—or your most recent one—was listing Kathy as your reference. Did you go to school? Elementary, middle, high, or college? There wasn't a single teacher, coach, or counselor you could've asked to serve as a reference?
There had to be, STUCK, so I'm calling bullshit on the reason you reinitiated contact with Kathy. You reached out to her hoping things might be different—you hoped she might want you now in the same way you've wanted her always—only to learn that nothing has changed. You're as into her as ever, STUCK, she's as not into you as ever. So you're going to have to cut her out of your life.
Again. You say you "accepted that things would never work out," but you didn't, dude, not really. You kept thinking about it—and most of that thinking was of the wishful/dickful variety—and that was your biggest mistake. By continually reinvesting in this idea of You (someday) + Kathy (someday) = Bliss (lifelong), you kept something that should've been left by the side of the road to die on life support.
You ask if it's possible to "remain friends with this person" when it feels like she’s "not respecting my personal space or the boundaries between us." It would be possible, STUCK, if you were over Kathy. You aren't, so it isn't. And if respecting your personal space and boundaries requires Kathy to pretend that she is single (no mentioning boyfriend(s), making sure you never meet any of her boyfriend(s)), then your demand for respect is unreasonable and unworkable.
Kathy did her job, STUCK: You told her you had romantic feelings for her, she told you she doesn't feel the same way and never will. She's obviously open to having you in her life—she'll make time and space for you—because she genuinely likes you or because she needs someone presentable to pass off as her boyfriend at family events or because she's cruel and gets off on torturing you. It could be all of the above. But now that you know for sure you and Kathy are never, ever gonna happen, and now that you know being Kathy's friend only makes you miserable, you need to cut Kathy out of your life. Again. Once and for all and forever and for always. Amen.
And, hey, did you say you were thinking about applying to the PeaceCorp? Great idea! Get some space! See the world! Make some new friends! But physical distance alone doesn't cut it these days—not in the InstagramTwitterSnapchatFacebook Era—so the onus is on you to create mental/emotional/social distance. Unfollow her on all social media platforms, STUCK, refrain from lurking, don't talk to her, don't talk about her. And while the PeaceCorp's a good step (professionally, socially, emotionally), you need to start thinking about what comes after the PeaceCorp. What are you gonna do when you come home? Where do you want to live? What kind of friends do you want to have? (Also, none of your old friends return your texts? Are you a bad friend? Do you pick bad friends? What can you do to be a better friend/pick better friends?) There are so many things for you to think about that aren't your hopeless crush on Kathy.
Good luck.
This question is tricky, GUY, because it sounds like the "Am I Still Straight If I Date A Trans Person" question. You're a man, she's a woman, you identify primarily as heterosexual and she's straight. Even with PIV off the menu—and something else on it—this relationship wouldn't make you gay or bi.
On the other hand... trans people, even straight trans people, are members of the LGBT community, and queer is the umbrella term often used in place of the awkward LGBTQIATSLFQ, etc. You're currently partnered with someone who's queer, GUY, even if she doesn't identify as queer (so as not to out herself as trans), so in a sense you've married into the queer community. Perhaps that makes you a queer-in-law.
But your question is even more complicated than that, GUY, because the land of Queer Theory has many definitions, surprises, cul-de-sacs, containment ponds, chutes and ladders. Jose Muñoz, smart academic guy who wrote Cruising Utopia in 2009, has some things to say about being queer:
Queerness is not yet here. Queerness is an ideality. Put another way, we are not yet queer. We may never touch queerness, but we can feel it as the warm illumination of a horizon imbued with potentiality. We have never been queer, yet queerness exists for us as an ideality that can be distilled from the past and used to imagine a future. The future is queerness’s domain.
Got that?
Muñoz says queerness is a type of utopian vision we are constantly striving for and reinventing. I think. Practically speaking, this all sounds exhausting—queerness is something we work towards all our lives without ever achieving—but it may be a helpful approach to your problem, GUY, since Muñoz separates queerness from sexuality. Instead, queerness is an alternative approach to experiencing life and imagining your future, an alternative approach that LGBT people are overwhelmingly drawn to, but an approach to/idea of queerness that has room inside it for the odd Kinsey 0.75 dude like yourself.
While we're talking about the future, GUY, it may be helpful for you to spend some time thinking about your own. In the future, if you aren't dating this particular girlfriend anymore, would you still consider yourself queer or want to identify as such? If this experience feels like it's awakened/shifted/(insert verb) your understanding of yourself and who you are, then maybe you're queer. But if this queerness feels situational and only tied to your current relationship—if you're really just a queer-in-law—then you may want to stick with straight/Kinsey 0.75. 
If you find all of this confusing—and it is confusing (I've been queer for decades and I can barely follow it)—here are some helpful words from Jack Halberstam, author of The Queer Art of Failure:
Failing is something queers do and have always done exceptionally well; for queers failing can be a style, to cite Quentin Crisp, or a way of life, to cite Foucault, and it can stand in contrast to the grim scenarios of success that depend upon 'trying and trying again.'
If you're not sure what to do and you feel like you're failing, do the queer thing and embrace failure. We grow into ourselves in increments, so it's okay if things aren't always clear and or feel clear for a time; our identities, as you've recently come to realize, aren't carved in marble.
P.S. You can identify as queer in "safe space" situation/emergency without necessarily outing your girlfriend. You can say you're queer without having to say exactly what kind of queer you are. People are likelier to assume you're a bi guy with a girlfriend than they are to assume you're a straight guy with a trans girlfriend.
Humans—gays and other varieties—tend to make assumptions and classifications and group things by type. We shouldn't do it, it can do real harm (especially when assumptions are made based on race, religion, class, body type, sexual orientation, etc.), but we can't seem to help ourselves. Even people who know better have to remind themselves not to make assumptions all goddamn day.
And there must be something about ingesting semen that kicks assumption- and classification-making into high gear, BALD, because gay men are obsessed with typing each other. We've developed a zoo's worth of new nicknames/classifications over the last two decades—bears, otters, wolfs, cubs, pups, dolphins, manatees—that we endlessly cross tabulate with the old nicknames/classifications, e.g. twinks, twunks, daddies, leather daddies, queens, clones, etc.
As someone who has never felt like I fit neatly into one category of homosexual, BALD, I feel your pain. But you need to keep your pain in perspective. There are worse things than being young, gay, muscular, handsome, bald, and living in Amsterdam. And while a guy with your looks & body—and thank you for the pictures [insert drooling emoji here]—do look amazing in leather, that's not who you are or what you want. Being typed into a category you don't identify with—being lumped in with the fisted-at-Berghain crowd—can certainly be annoying, BALD, but it's not annoying like cancer or third degree burns or "president-elect Donald Trump." Unlike cancer, burns, and Trump, you can fix this—you can correct someone's faulty assumption—just by using your words. ("Yeah, no. Leather and fisting and Berghain aren't my scene. I'm not into any of that.")
What I was waiting for in your letter—and didn't get—was what you are into, BALD. You say don't identify with the "older, techno, fetish scene," which is fine. Not everything has to be for everybody. And while you can't control looking like someone who might wanna get fisted at Berghain (in the opinions of some), BALD, you can control the guys you choose to hang out with, the parties you choose to go to, and the sorts of men you choose to date/fuck/marry. Be yourself—be aggressively you—and the people you know and like and hang out with and date and fuck and marry will know you for who and what you really are. (And, when relevant, what you're into sexually.) As for the rest, BALD, who cares if some stranger in a bar or on the street or on a dating app takes one look at you and guesses wrong? (And I'll bet most aren't guessing you're into leather/SM/fetish to judge you, BALD. They're putting that out there because they're hoping you're into kink and that you'll get all kinky on their asses.)
All that said, BALD, if you've never hung out with that underground/fetish scene, you might want to check it out before writing it off. Rest assured: Not every guy at Berghain is there to be fisted, BALD, and some guys wear leather because they look great in it, not because it speaks to their kinky souls. (Not that there's anything wrong with getting fisted or being seriously into leather.) And contrary to popular belief: you can meet good, decent, stable guys who are open to commitment (an evening's or a lifetime's) at places like Berghain... and you can meet shitty, indecent, messy guys who should be committed at an ice skating club for teetotaling vanilla twinks with full heads of hair.
TL;DR: Use your words, BALD, shrug it off.
More than 100 years ago, DILDO, a brave group of women launched the First War On Christmas. WOC1 began when a group of female activists, fed up with just the expensive and waste of Christmas, founded The Society for the Prevention of Useless Giving (SPUG). They urged other women around the country to start SPUG clubs to protest unnecessary gift gifting. (There isn't a national SPUG memorial but there ought to be—a lavish and gaudy one, IMO, with an attached souvenir shop where we could all buy limited-edition, collectable SPUG ornaments for our trees.)
Lord knows gift gifting has never seemed quite so... unnecessary, what with all the fucking awful garbage happening in the world. We should take all the money we're spending on gifts this year and send it to the American Civil Liberties Union, Lambda Legal, the National Immigration Law Center, Planned Parenthood, and other orgs fighting the good fight.
Online trading groups like the one in your city are a nice idea—a good way to scrounge up gifts without wasting any money—but swapping dildos... yeah, most people are gonna have a problem with that. Even people who've sat their holes down on dicks that have been in ten thousand other holes are gonna get all aghast at the thought. (Necklaces, pearl and otherwise, will be clutched.)
I get this question a lot—can used sex toys be passed along—so that means there must be lots of open-minded, sex-positive, broke/cheap/anti-capitalist/eco-friendly readers out there contemplating similar swaps. And there are legit health concerns when it comes to swapping sex toys or sharing used ones, as you can never really know a used sex toy has been or, more worryingly, what the hell many of them are made of. To quote Hannah Jordan, a senior staff sex educator at Smitten Kitten who gave advice on sex toys in my column back in 2014, "Sex toys aren't regulated like food when it comes to packaging. There's no list of ingredients on the back. It could be latex, some other porous rubbery substance, or even a nasty, rash-inducing, endocrine-disrupting, cancer-causing mixture of PVC and phthalates."
I don't wanna make sex toys sound scary, DILDO, but many are just plain toxic. That's why you wanna buy quality toys from quality retailers. If your penetration toy is made of silicone—more expensive, yes, but you're worth it (and so is/are your hole/holes)—you can easily sterilize them by putting them in boiling water for a few minutes or running them through a hot dishwashing cycle. (Same goes for stainless steel.) When thoroughly sterilized, silicone or steel toys can be used and reused without risk. But buyer beware: low-quality sex toys may not be made out of what they say they are.
So, DILDO, while your neighborhood's self-professed sex toy tester may know exactly what she's doing, it really comes down to trust. Trust and three due diligence-y questions: What are these toys made out of? Where is she getting them? Does she have the original packaging?
If your local sex toy tester knows what the toys are made of, if she obtained them from reputable manufacturers/dealers, if she still has the original packaging and if they can be sterilized and have been been sterilized (and sterilized again by the new owner), DILDO, the risks are low and the potential rewards are high. (More pleasure in your community's holes, less trash in your community's landfills)
I'm with you, DILDO: fucking strangers—with dicks and tongues and holes that can't be run through extra-hot dishwashing cycles—is far riskier and reasonable people run those risks all the time. If there's any doubt about one of these toys, i.e. if it might not be silicone or stainless steel (or glass!), it should be tossed. But if there's no doubt about a particular toy—quality materials, sterilizable and sterilized—it should be enjoyed.
Welcome to the United States, NAIVE. I'm sorry to say we're not at our best right now. As I'm sure you're aware, being an immigrant and all, we're currently in the process of shitting the bed. I'm afraid there aren't enough Ivanka-Trump-scented-inaugural-souvenir candles to cover the stench.
But despite our newly elected demagogue and his cabinet of xenophobic horrors, real Americans—the majority of us who didn't vote for Orange Julius Caesar—are relatively open-minded and usually pretty excited about meeting different people with diverse life experiences. We have a long history of welcoming immigrants into our communities and our beds. But despite being a pretty vulgar and slutty bunch, we've got our fair share of hang ups and reservations about sex and relationships. We also have our fair share of inexperienced virgins of all ages and genders. So, while 25 might feel old to be a virgin, NAIVE, you're not alone, being inexperienced is nothing to freak out about, and you shouldn't date or fuck anyone who gives you grief about it.
What do I do?
While you can technically meet girls anywhere, NAIVE, the kind of first contacts that lead to dates (and sometimes sex) tend to happen on apps. If you haven't already downloaded Tinder and Bumble (it's like Tinder except girls are in charge), take a moment to do so now. Make a profile that's honest ("I'm new to the US and looking for ____") without being too honest ("I'm a virgin and worried you'll think I'm a huge loser"), respond to some ads, initiate some text/DM exchanges, and set up some dates. While most of the women you'll interact with via dating apps will wanna swap messages before meeting (to make sure you're not a creep), it's best to propose a quick, low-stakes, face-to-face meeting before you've made a huge investment of time in some stranger whose picture you liked.
Would peers here consider me a loser of some sort for being sexually inexperienced? Is that even a thing?
Some would, but they're jerks. Some others might find your inexperience hot or endearing. And some—other inexperienced people (you're not alone)—might find it a relief. Look for people who are into you and don't worry your pretty head about people who aren't. 
What is a reasonable expectation I should have from women here? 
First, and always bear this in mind: Women, much like the universe itself, don't owe you anything. You have a right to expect honesty and civility in exchange for both. Other than that, you're/they're not entitled to squat.
Since you're 25, NAIVE, you're still fairly young, but you're also basically an adult. You should strive to bring something to the table—ideas, ambitions, charm, abs. No one wants to date someone with nothing to offer. While you may be sexually inexperienced, you have a lifetime of experience—you have a backstory—that's more interesting than average. Start with what you know and have fun exploring the things you don't. If the dates don't go anywhere—and most won't—don't be too hard on yourself. If none of your dates go anywhere, you may be doing something wrong. Ask friends for feedback.
And quickly: You shouldn't expect sex right away (although you might get it right away—you never know). You shouldn't expect sex—or feel entitled to sex—after a certain number of drinks, dates, dinners, or kisses. You should expect to use condoms. When in doubt, ask direct questions ("Can I kiss you?"); always be in doubt. And honesty about feeling awkward due to inexperience is always better than pretending to be something you're not, e.g. pretending to be experienced/pretending not to feel awkward, because she'll sense you're lying about something and wind up feeling awkward around you and unsafe with you.
Am I even asking the right questions?
These were pretty good questions now, NAIVE, but you'll probably have more later. Feel free to write back in again. In the meantime, set up a date or two, be chill, and be confident. And check out the comments—I'm sure the non-assholes among my readers (also the majority) will have some excellent advice for you.
You don't have to keep giving blowjobs forever, BWB. You could quit today, you could quit tomorrow, you could jump in the time machine I wish I had and quit 40+ years ago.
My dispassionate, third-party perspective: Your husband has received a lifetime of sex—in the style he prefers—and in exchange he's told you a handful of bedtime stories. I'm assuming he's been telling you dirty stories, BWB, and I'm furthermore assuming you furiously masturbate while he tells you those dirty stories, and my final assumption is that the you get off on his stories. Still, lots-of-head-for-occasional-dirty-story seems like a shitty deal.
But rather than focus on the entire history of your relationship and your husband's boring obsession with a standard, run-of-the-mill blowjob, let's focus on his sulking fit and your future. You voiced your displeasure with Suck Only and asked for the odd Good Fuck. Your husband responded by moping. We can roll our eyes and dismiss the sulking—it can be a manipulative strategy meant to shut down partner's reasonable complaint(s)—but your husband may have aged into a legit justification for preferring blowjobs and being sulky about it. Penetration, like you said, may be difficult for him now, at his age; in the past he was a lazy and selfish lover, now he may be an old man with erectile issues and insecurities about those issues that he may be too ashamed to discuss directly (so, sulking).
Now for the good news, BWB: You don't need his dick to get a good fuck—and you don't need to cheat on him either. Dicks can have erectile issues but quality dildos don't. Order yourself some brand new toys, set them on the nightstand, and make a new deal with your husband: you'll give him one good blowjob for each good fuck he gives you—dick or dildo, whichever he prefers.
Listen to my mouthy podcast, the Savage Lovecast, at www.savagelovecast.com.
P.S. I hope my English is understandable, I'm writing you from Italy, I'm not so good at that!
A few things...
1. Your English is a whole lot better than my German, BI. You have nothing to apologize for.
2. You know who else has had HORRIBLE experiences with men? Me, I have, and more than a couple—and I didn't let those horrible experiences stop me. If I could find guys capable of providing me with wonderful experiences, BI, so can you. Don't let any dude pressure you or talk you into doing anything you're not comfortable doing (sometimes people talk us into doing things we are comfortable doing and/or really wanted to do), take all reasonable precautions, and err on the side of treating men like the testosterone-soaked dick monsters many/most are, even the ones you know personally. But there are good ones out there, BI, and they're worth searching for.
3. Sometimes confusion can only be resolved with a little exploration, BI. But if the thought of hooking up or casually dating men makes you feel panicked, there are plenty of straight (or straightish) couples looking for bisexual/lesbian/curious women to join them for some fun (as MW4W's letter demonstrates). Connect with a couple, BI, and you'll able to explore sex with men with perhaps less pressure to perform or conform. If you don't click with the dude, there's always a hot lady for you to focus on instead... and vice-versa. (A caveat: It's curious that your interest in men seems to have surfaced during an infatuation with a straight girl. Hopefully your interest in men is sincere, BI, and not a tactic to somehow make yourself more appealing to this straight girl. ("Hey, I like dicks sometimes too—we have so much in common!") If your newly discovered interest in men is some weird move to make this girl find you attractive, BI, drop this plan and run towards the nearest girl who actually wants to fuck you.)
Bonus thing:
4. Your sudden interest in men doesn't require you to surrender your out-and-proud card. You could be an out-and-proud bisexual or an out-and-proud lesbian-identified bisexual or an out-and-proud lesbian who messed around with a guy once because she was curious but then realized guys didn't do it for her and has no plans to mess around with guys in the future.


Impeach the motherfucker already! Get your ITMFA buttons, t-shirts, hats, lapel pins and coffee mugs at www.ITMFA.org!
